Datenschutzerklärung
Datenschutzerklärung
Inhaltsverzeichnis
Information über die Erhebung personenbezogener Daten und Kontaktdaten des Verantwortlichen
Datenerfassung beim Besuch unserer Website
Hosting
Content-Delivery-Network
Cookies
Kontaktaufnahme
Datenverarbeitung bei Eröffnung eines Kundenkontos und zur Vertragsabwicklung
Nutzung von Kundendaten zur Direktwerbung
Datenverarbeitung zur Bestellabwicklung
Kontaktaufnahme zur Bewertungserinnerung
Verwendung von Sozialen Medien: Videos
Online-Marketing
Webanalysedienste
Retargeting / Remarketing / Empfehlungswerbung
Verwendung eines Live-Chat-Systems
Verwendung eines Email-Ticketing-Systems
Tools und Sonstiges
Rechte des Betroffenen
Dauer der Speicherung personenbezogener Daten
1. Information über die Erhebung personenbezogener Daten und Kontaktdaten des Verantwortlichen
1.1
Wir freuen uns, dass Sie unsere Website besuchen und bedanken uns für Ihr Interesse. Im Folgenden informieren wir Sie über den Umgang mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten bei der Nutzung unserer Website. Personenbezogene Daten sind hierbei alle Daten, mit denen Sie persönlich identifiziert werden können.
1.2
Verantwortlicher für die Datenverarbeitung auf dieser Website im Sinne der Datenschutz-Grundverordnung (DSGVO) ist Automatenland GmbH, Ikrausstraße 24, 40474 Düsseldorf, Deutschland, Tel.: 0211 942 55 99 0, E-Mail: info@automatenland.de. Der für die Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten Verantwortliche ist diejenige natürliche oder juristische Person, die allein oder gemeinsam mit anderen über die Zwecke und Mittel der Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten entscheidet.
1.3
Diese Website nutzt aus Sicherheitsgründen und zum Schutz der Übertragung personenbezogener Daten und anderer vertraulicher Inhalte (z.B. Bestellungen oder Anfragen an den Verantwortlichen) eine SSL-bzw. TLS-Verschlüsselung. Sie können eine verschlüsselte Verbindung an der Zeichenfolge „https://“ und dem Schloss-Symbol in Ihrer Browserzeile erkennen.
2. Datenerfassung beim Besuch unserer Website
Bei der bloß informatorischen Nutzung unserer Website, also wenn Sie sich nicht registrieren oder uns anderweitig Informationen übermitteln, erheben wir nur solche Daten, die Ihr Browser an unseren Server übermittelt (sog. „Server-Logfiles“). Wenn Sie unsere Website aufrufen, erheben wir die folgenden Daten, die für uns technisch erforderlich sind, um Ihnen die Website anzuzeigen:
Unsere besuchte Website
Datum und Uhrzeit zum Zeitpunkt des Zugriffes
Menge der gesendeten Daten in Byte
Quelle/Verweis, von welchem Sie auf die Seite gelangten
Verwendeter Browser
Verwendetes Betriebssystem
Verwendete IP-Adresse (ggf.: in anonymisierter Form)
Die Verarbeitung erfolgt gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO auf Basis unseres berechtigten Interesses an der Verbesserung der Stabilität und Funktionalität unserer Website. Eine Weitergabe oder anderweitige Verwendung der Daten findet nicht statt. Wir behalten uns allerdings vor, die Server-Logfiles nachträglich zu überprüfen, sollten konkrete Anhaltspunkte auf eine rechtswidrige Nutzung hinweisen.
3. Hosting
Hosting durch Shopify
Wir nutzen das Shopsystem des Dienstleisters Shopify International Limited, Victoria Buildings, 2. Etage, 1-2 Haddington Road, Dublin 4, D04 XN32, Irland („Shopify“), zum Zwecke des Hostings und der Darstellung des Online-Shops auf Basis einer Verarbeitung in unserem Auftrag. Sämtliche auf unserer Website erhobenen Daten werden auf den Servern von Shopify verarbeitet. Im Rahmen der vorgenannten Leistungen von Shopify können Daten auch im Rahmen einer weiteren Verarbeitung im Auftrag an die Shopify Inc., 150 Elgin St, Ottawa, ON K2P 1L4, Kanada, Shopify Data Processing (USA) Inc., Shopify Payments (USA) Inc. oder Shopify (USA) Inc. übermittelt werden. Für den Fall der Übermittlung von Daten an die Shopify Inc. in Kanada ist durch Angemessenheitsbeschluss der Europäischen Kommission das angemessene Datenschutzniveau gewährleistet. Weitere Hinweise zum Datenschutz von Shopify erhalten Sie unter der nachstehenden Internetseite:
https://www.shopify.de/legal/datenschutz
Eine weitere Verarbeitung auf anderen Servern als den vorgenannten von Shopify findet nur im nachstehend mitgeteilten Rahmen statt.
4. Content-Delivery-Network
4.1
AWS-CloudFront (Amazon)
Auf unserer Website verwenden wir das Content Delivery Network ("CDN") „AWS CloudFront“ des Dienstanbieters „Amazon“ (Amazon EU S.a. r.l., 38 avenue John F. Kennedy, L-1855 Luxemburg).
Bei einem Content Delivery Network handelt es sich um einen Online-Dienst, mit dessen Hilfe insbesondere große Mediendateien (wie z.B. Grafiken, Seiteninhalte oder Skripte) durch ein Netz regional verteilter und über das Internet verbundener Server ausgeliefert werden. Der Einsatz des Content Delivery Network von Amazon hilft uns bei der Optimierung der Ladegeschwindigkeiten unserer Website.
Die Verarbeitung erfolgt gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO auf Basis unseres berechtigten Interesses an einer sicheren und effizienten Bereitstellung, sowie Verbesserung der Stabilität und Funktionalität unserer Website.
Weitere Informationen finden Sie in der Datenschutzerklärung von Amazon unter
https://docs.aws.amazon.com/de_de/AmazonCloudFront/latest/DeveloperGuide/data-protection-summary.html
4.2
Cloudflare
Auf unserer Website verwenden wir ein sog. Content Delivery Network ("CDN") des Technologiedienstleisters Cloudflare Inc., 101 Townsend St. San Francisco, CA 94107, USA ("Cloudflare"). Bei einem Content Delivery Network handelt es sich um einen Online-Dienst, mit dessen Hilfe insbesondere große Mediendateien (wie z.B. Grafiken, Seiteninhalte oder Skripte) durch ein Netz regional verteilter und über das Internet verbundener Server ausgeliefert werden. Der Einsatz des Content Delivery Network von Cloudflare hilft uns bei der Optimierung der Ladegeschwindigkeiten unserer Website.
Die Verarbeitung erfolgt gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO auf Basis unseres berechtigten Interesses an einer sicheren und effizienten Bereitstellung, sowie Verbesserung der Stabilität und Funktionalität unserer Website.
Wir haben mit Cloudfare einen Auftragsverarbeitungsvertrag (Data Processing Addendum, einsehbar unter
https://www.cloudflare.com/media/pdf/cloudflare-customer-dpa.pdf
) abgeschlossen, mit dem Cloudfare verpflichtet wird, die Daten unserer Seitenbesucher zu schützen und sie nicht an Dritte weiter zu geben. Für die Übermittlung von Daten aus der EU in die USA beruft sich Cloudfare hierbei auf sog. Standarddatenschutzklauseln der Europäischen Kommission, welche die Einhaltung des europäischen Datenschutzniveaus in den USA gewährleisten sollen.
Weitere Informationen finden Sie in der Datenschutzerklärung von Cloudflare unter:
https://www.cloudflare.com/privacypolicy/
5. Cookies
Um den Besuch unserer Website attraktiv zu gestalten und die Nutzung bestimmter Funktionen zu ermöglichen, verwenden wir auf verschiedenen Seiten sogenannte Cookies. Hierbei handelt es sich um kleine Textdateien, die auf Ihrem Endgerät abgelegt werden. Einige der von uns verwendeten Cookies werden nach dem Ende der Browser-Sitzung, also nach Schließen Ihres Browsers, wieder gelöscht (sog. Sitzungs-Cookies). Andere Cookies verbleiben auf Ihrem Endgerät und ermöglichen, Ihren Browser beim nächsten Besuch wiederzuerkennen (sog. persistente Cookies). Werden Cookies gesetzt, erheben und verarbeiten diese im individuellen Umfang bestimmte Nutzerinformationen wie Browser- und Standortdaten sowie IP-Adresswerte. Persistente Cookies werden automatisiert nach einer vorgegebenen Dauer gelöscht, die sich je nach Cookie unterscheiden kann. Die Dauer der jeweiligen Cookie-Speicherung können Sie der Übersicht zu den Cookie-Einstellungen Ihres Webbrowsers entnehmen.
Teilweise dienen die Cookies dazu, durch Speicherung von Einstellungen den Bestellprozess zu vereinfachen (z.B. Merken des Inhalts eines virtuellen Warenkorbs für einen späteren Besuch auf der Website). Sofern durch einzelne von uns eingesetzte Cookies auch personenbezogene Daten verarbeitet werden, erfolgt die Verarbeitung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO entweder zur Durchführung des Vertrages, gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO im Falle einer erteilten Einwilligung oder gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO zur Wahrung unserer berechtigten Interessen an der bestmöglichen Funktionalität der Website sowie einer kundenfreundlichen und effektiven Ausgestaltung des Seitenbesuchs.
Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie Ihren Browser so einstellen können, dass Sie über das Setzen von Cookies informiert werden und einzeln über deren Annahme entscheiden oder die Annahme von Cookies für bestimmte Fälle oder generell ausschließen können. Jeder Browser unterscheidet sich in der Art, wie er die Cookie-Einstellungen verwaltet. Diese ist in dem Hilfemenü jedes Browsers beschrieben, welches Ihnen erläutert, wie Sie Ihre Cookie-Einstellungen ändern können. Diese finden Sie für die jeweiligen Browser unter den folgenden Links:
Internet Explorer:
https://support.microsoft.com/de-de/help/17442/windows-internet-explorer-delete-manage-cookies
Firefox:
https://support.mozilla.org/de/kb/cookies-erlauben-und-ablehnen
Chrome:
https://support.google.com/chrome/answer/95647?hl=de&hlrm=en
Safari:
https://support.apple.com/de-de/guide/safari/sfri11471/mac
Opera:
https://help.opera.com/de/latest/web-preferences/#cookies
Bitte beachten Sie, dass bei Nichtannahme von Cookies die Funktionalität unserer Website eingeschränkt sein kann.
6. Kontaktaufnahme
6.1
Im Rahmen der Kontaktaufnahme mit uns (z.B. per Kontaktformular oder E-Mail) werden personenbezogene Daten erhoben. Welche Daten im Falle der Nutzung eines Kontaktformulars erhoben werden, ist aus dem jeweiligen Kontaktformular ersichtlich. Diese Daten werden ausschließlich zum Zweck der Beantwortung Ihres Anliegens bzw. für die Kontaktaufnahme und die damit verbundene technische Administration gespeichert und verwendet. Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung dieser Daten ist unser berechtigtes Interesse an der Beantwortung Ihres Anliegens gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO. Zielt Ihre Kontaktierung auf den Abschluss eines Vertrages ab, so ist zusätzliche Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO. Ihre Daten werden nach abschließender Bearbeitung Ihrer Anfrage gelöscht. Dies ist der Fall, wenn sich aus den Umständen entnehmen lässt, dass der betroffene Sachverhalt abschließend geklärt ist und sofern keine gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten entgegenstehen.
6.2
WhatsApp-Business
Wir bieten Besuchern unserer Webseite die Möglichkeit, mit uns über den Nachrichtendienst WhatsApp der WhatsApp Ireland Limited, 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Irland, in Kontakt zu treten. Hierfür verwenden wir die sog. „Business-Version“ von WhatsApp.
Sofern Sie uns anlässlich eines konkreten Geschäfts (beispielsweise einer getätigten Bestellung) per WhatsApp kontaktieren, speichern und verwenden wir die von Ihnen bei WhatsApp genutzte Mobilfunknummer sowie – falls bereitgestellt – Ihren Vor- und Nachnamen gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b. DSGVO zur Bearbeitung und Beantwortung Ihres Anliegens. Auf Basis derselben Rechtsgrundlage werden wir Sie per WhatsApp gegebenenfalls um die Bereitstellung weiterer Daten (Bestellnummer, Kundennummer, Anschrift oder E-Mailadresse) bitten, um Ihre Anfrage einem bestimmten Vorgang zuordnen zu können.
Nutzen Sie unseren WhatsApp-Kontakt für allgemeine Anfragen (etwa zum Leistungsspektrum, zu Verfügbarkeiten oder zu unserem Internetauftritt) speichern und verwenden wir die von Ihnen bei WhatsApp genutzte Mobilfunknummer sowie – falls bereitgestellt – Ihren Vor- und Nachnamen gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO auf Basis unseres berechtigten Interesses an der effizienten und zeitnahen Bereitstellung der gewünschten Informationen.
Ihre Daten werden stets nur zur Beantwortung Ihres Anliegens per WhatsApp verwendet. Eine Weitergabe an Dritte findet nicht statt.
Bitte beachten Sie, dass WhatsApp Business Zugriff auf das Adressbuch des von uns hierfür verwendeten mobilen Endgeräts erhält und im Adressbuch gespeicherte Telefonnummern automatisch an einen Server des Mutterkonzerns Facebook Inc. in den USA überträgt. Für den Betrieb unseres WhatsApp-Business-Kontos verwenden wir ein mobiles Endgerät, in dessen Adressbuch ausschließlich die WhatsApp-Kontaktdaten solcher Nutzer gespeichert werden, die mit uns per WhatsApp auch in Kontakt getreten sind.
Hierdurch wird sichergestellt, dass jede Person, deren WhatsApp- Kontaktdaten in unserem Adressbuch gespeichert sind, bereits bei erstmaliger Nutzung der App auf seinem Gerät durch Akzeptanz der WhatsApp-Nutzungsbedingungen in die Übermittlung seiner WhatsApp-Telefonnummer aus den Adressbüchern seiner Chat-Kontakte gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO eingewilligt hat. Eine Übermittlung von Daten solcher Nutzer, die WhatsApp nicht verwenden und/oder uns nicht über WhatsApp kontaktiert haben, wird insofern ausgeschlossen.
Zweck und Umfang der Datenerhebung und die weitere Verarbeitung und Nutzung der Daten durch WhatsApp sowie Ihre diesbezüglichen Rechte und Einstellungsmöglichkeiten zum Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre entnehmen Sie bitte den Datenschutzhinweisen von WhatsApp:
https://www.whatsapp.com/legal/?eea=1#privacy-policy
7. Datenverarbeitung bei Eröffnung eines Kundenkontos und zur Vertragsabwicklung
Gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO werden personenbezogene Daten weiterhin erhoben und verarbeitet, wenn Sie uns diese zur Durchführung eines Vertrages oder bei der Eröffnung eines Kundenkontos mitteilen. Welche Daten erhoben werden, ist aus den jeweiligen Eingabeformularen ersichtlich. Eine Löschung Ihres Kundenkontos ist jederzeit möglich und kann durch eine Nachricht an die o.g. Adresse des Verantwortlichen erfolgen. Wir speichern und verwenden die von Ihnen mitgeteilten Daten zur Vertragsabwicklung. Nach vollständiger Abwicklung des Vertrages oder Löschung Ihres Kundenkontos werden Ihre Daten mit Rücksicht auf steuer- und handelsrechtliche Aufbewahrungsfristen gesperrt und nach Ablauf dieser Fristen gelöscht, sofern Sie nicht ausdrücklich in eine weitere Nutzung Ihrer Daten eingewilligt haben oder eine gesetzlich erlaubte weitere Datenverwendung von unserer Seite vorbehalten wurde.
8. Nutzung von Kundendaten zur Direktwerbung
8.1
Anmeldung zu unserem E-Mail-Newsletter
Wenn Sie sich zu unserem E-Mail Newsletter anmelden, übersenden wir Ihnen regelmäßig Informationen zu unseren Angeboten. Pflichtangabe für die Übersendung des Newsletters ist allein Ihre E-Mailadresse. Die Angabe weiterer Daten ist freiwillig und wird verwendet, um Sie persönlich ansprechen zu können. Für den Versand des Newsletters verwenden wir das sog. Double Opt-in Verfahren. Dies bedeutet, dass wir Ihnen erst dann einen E-Mail Newsletter übermitteln werden, wenn Sie uns ausdrücklich bestätigt haben, dass Sie in den Empfang von Newsletter einwilligen. Wir schicken Ihnen dann eine Bestätigungs-E-Mail, mit der Sie gebeten werden durch Anklicken eines entsprechenden Links zu bestätigen, dass Sie künftig den Newsletter erhalten wollen.
Mit der Aktivierung des Bestätigungslinks erteilen Sie uns Ihre Einwilligung für die Nutzung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO. Bei der Anmeldung zum Newsletter speichern wir Ihre vom Internet Service-Provider (ISP) eingetragene IP-Adresse sowie das Datum und die Uhrzeit der Anmeldung, um einen möglichen Missbrauch Ihrer E-Mail- Adresse zu einem späteren Zeitpunkt nachvollziehen zu können. Die von uns bei der Anmeldung zum Newsletter erhobenen Daten werden ausschließlich für Zwecke der werblichen Ansprache im Wege des Newsletters benutzt. Sie können den Newsletter jederzeit über den dafür vorgesehenen Link im Newsletter oder durch entsprechende Nachricht an den eingangs genannten Verantwortlichen abbestellen. Nach erfolgter Abmeldung wird Ihre E-Mailadresse unverzüglich in unserem Newsletter-Verteiler gelöscht, soweit Sie nicht ausdrücklich in eine weitere Nutzung Ihrer Daten eingewilligt haben oder wir uns eine darüberhinausgehende Datenverwendung vorbehalten, die gesetzlich erlaubt ist und über die wir Sie in dieser Erklärung informieren.
8.2
Versand des E-Mail-Newsletters an Bestandskunden
Wenn Sie uns Ihre E-Mailadresse beim Kauf von Waren bzw. Dienstleistungen zur Verfügung gestellt haben, behalten wir uns vor, Ihnen regelmäßig Angebote zu ähnlichen Waren bzw. Dienstleistungen, wie den bereits gekauften, aus unserem Sortiment per E-Mail zuzusenden. Hierfür müssen wir gemäß § 7 Abs. 3 UWG keine gesonderte Einwilligung von Ihnen einholen. Die Datenverarbeitung erfolgt insoweit allein auf Basis unseres berechtigten Interesses an personalisierter Direktwerbung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO. Haben Sie der Nutzung Ihrer E-Mailadresse zu diesem Zweck anfänglich widersprochen, findet ein Mailversand unsererseits nicht statt. Sie sind berechtigt, der Nutzung Ihrer E-Mailadresse zu dem vorbezeichneten Werbezweck jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft durch eine Mitteilung an den zu Beginn genannten Verantwortlichen zu widersprechen. Hierfür fallen für Sie lediglich Übermittlungskosten nach den Basistarifen an. Nach Eingang Ihres Widerspruchs wird die Nutzung Ihrer E-Mailadresse zu Werbezwecken unverzüglich eingestellt.
8.3
Newsletterversand via Shopify Email
Der Versand unserer E-Mail-Newsletter erfolgt über Shopify Email, einen Service der Shopify International Limited, Victoria Buildings, 2. Etage, 1-2 Haddington Road, Dublin 4, D04 XN32, Irland („Shopify“), an die wir Ihre bei der Newsletteranmeldung bereitgestellten Daten weitergeben. Diese Weitergabe erfolgt gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO und dient unserem berechtigten Interesse an der Verwendung eines werbewirksamen, sicheren und nutzerfreundlichen Newslettersystems. Die von Ihnen zwecks Newsletterbezugs eingegebenen Daten (z.B. E-Mail-Adresse) werden grundsätzlich auf den Servern von Shopify in der EU gespeichert.
Im Rahmen der vorgenannten Leistungen von Shopify können Daten auch im Rahmen einer weiteren Verarbeitung im Auftrag an die Shopify Inc., 150 Elgin St, Ottawa, ON K2P 1L4, Kanada, die Shopify Data Processing (USA) Inc., Shopify Payments (USA) Inc. oder Shopify (USA) Inc. übermittelt werden. Für den Fall der Übermittlung von Daten an die Shopify Inc. in Kanada ist durch Angemessenheitsbeschluss der Europäischen Kommission das angemessene Datenschutzniveau gewährleistet.
Shopify verwendet diese Informationen zum Versand und zur statistischen Auswertung der Newsletter in unserem Auftrag. Für die Auswertung können die versendeten E-Mails sog. Web-Beacons bzw. Trackings-Pixel enthalten, die Ein-Pixel-Bilddateien darstellen, die auf unserer Website gespeichert sind. So kann festgestellt werden, ob eine Newsletter-Nachricht geöffnet und welche Links ggf. angeklickt wurden. Außerdem werden technische Informationen erfasst (z.B. Zeitpunkt des Abrufs, IP-Adresse, Browsertyp und Betriebssystem). Die Daten werden ausschließlich pseudonymisiert erhoben und werden nicht mit Ihren weiteren persönlichen Daten verknüpft, eine direkte Personenbeziehbarkeit wird ausgeschlossen. Diese Daten dienen ausschließlich der statistischen Analyse von Newsletterkampagnen. Die Ergebnisse dieser Analysen können genutzt werden, um künftige Newsletter besser an die Interessen der Empfänger anzupassen. Wenn Sie der Datenanalyse zu statistischen Auswertungszwecken widersprechen möchten, müssen Sie den Newsletterbezug abbestellen.
Des Weiteren kann Shopify diese Daten gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO selbst aufgrund seines eigenen berechtigten Interesses an der bedarfsgerechten Ausgestaltung und der Optimierung des Dienstes sowie zu Marktforschungszwecken nutzen, um etwa zu bestimmen, aus welchen Ländern die Empfänger kommen. Shopify nutzt die Daten unserer Newsletterempfänger jedoch nicht, um jene selbst anzuschreiben oder die Daten an Dritte weiterzugeben.
Wir haben mit Shopify einen Auftragsverarbeitungsvertrag abgeschlossen, mit dem wir Shopify verpflichten, die Daten unserer Kunden zu schützen und sie nicht an Dritte weiterzugeben.
Die Datenschutzbestimmungen von Shopify können Sie hier einsehen:
https://www.shopify.de/legal/datenschutz
8.4
WhatsApp-Newsletter
Wenn Sie sich zu unserem WhatsApp-Newsletter anmelden, übersenden wir Ihnen regelmäßig Informationen zu unseren Angeboten per WhatsApp. Pflichtangabe für die Übersendung des Newsletters ist allein Ihre Mobilfunknummer.
Für den Versand des Newsletters nehmen Sie unsere mitgeteilte Mobilfunknummer in die Adress-Kontakte Ihres Mobilfunkgeräts auf und senden uns die Nachricht „Start“ per WhatsApp. Mit der Übersendung dieser WhatsApp-Nachricht erteilen Sie uns Ihre Einwilligung für die Nutzung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO zum Zwecke der Newsletteübersendung. Wir nehmen Sie sodann in unseren Newsletter-Verteiler auf.
Die von uns bei der Anmeldung zum Newsletter erhobenen Daten werden ausschließlich für Zwecke der werblichen Ansprache im Wege des Newsletters verarbeitet. Sie können jederzeit den Newsletter abmelden, indem Sie uns die Nachricht „Stop“ per WhatsApp senden. Nach erfolgter Abmeldung wird Ihre Mobilfunknummer unverzüglich in unserem Newsletter-Verteiler gelöscht, soweit Sie nicht ausdrücklich in eine weitere Nutzung Ihrer Daten eingewilligt haben oder wir uns eine darüberhinausgehende Datenverwendung vorbehalten, die gesetzlich erlaubt ist und über die wir Sie in dieser Erklärung informieren.
Bitte beachten Sie, dass WhatsApp Zugriff auf das Adressbuch des von uns für den Newsletterversand verwendeten mobilen Endgeräts erhält und im Adressbuch gespeicherte Telefonnummern automatisch an einen Server von Facebook in den USA überträgt.
Für den Versand unseres WhatsApp-Newsletters verwenden wir daher ein mobiles Endgerät, in dessen Adressbuch ausschließlich die WhatsApp-Kontaktdaten unserer Newsletter-Empfänger gespeichert werden. Hierdurch wird sichergestellt, dass jede Person, deren WhatsApp- Kontaktdaten in unserem Adressbuch gespeichert sind, bereits bei erstmaliger Nutzung der App auf seinem Gerät durch Akzeptanz der WhatsApp-Nutzungsbedingungen in die Übermittlung seiner WhatsApp-Telefonnummer aus den Adressbüchern seiner Chat-Kontakte gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO eingewilligt hat. Eine Übermittlung von Daten solcher Nutzer, die WhatsApp nicht verwenden und/oder uns nicht über WhatsApp kontaktiert haben, wird insofern ausgeschlossen.
Zweck und Umfang der Datenerhebung und die weitere Verarbeitung und Nutzung der Daten durch WhatsApp sowie Ihre diesbezüglichen Rechte und Einstellungsmöglichkeiten zum Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre entnehmen Sie bitte den Datenschutzhinweisen von WhatsApp:
https://www.whatsapp.com/legal/?eea=1#privacy-policy
8.5
- Werbung per Briefpost
Auf Grundlage unseres berechtigten Interesses an personalisierter Direktwerbung behalten wir uns vor, Ihren Vor- und Nachnamen, Ihre Postanschrift und - soweit wir diese zusätzlichen Angaben im Rahmen der Vertragsbeziehung von Ihnen erhalten haben - Ihren Titel, akademischen Grad, Ihr Geburtsjahr und Ihre Berufs-, Branchen- oder Geschäftsbezeichnung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO zu speichern und für die Zusendung von interessanten Angeboten und Informationen zu unseren Produkten per Briefpost zu nutzen.
Sie können der Speicherung und Nutzung Ihrer Daten zu diesem Zweck jederzeit durch eine entsprechende Nachricht an den Verantwortlichen widersprechen.
8.6
- OneSignal
Sie können sich zum Empfang von unseren Push-Benachrichtigungen anmelden. Zum Versand unserer Push-Benachrichtigungen nutzen wir den Versanddienst „OneSignal“, der von OneSignal Inc., 2850 S Delaware St #201, San Mateo, CA 94403, USA („OneSignal“), betrieben wird. Sie erhalten über unsere Push-Benachrichtigungen regelmäßig Informationen über unsere angebotenen Waren.Zur Anmeldung müssen Sie die Abfrage Ihres Browsers zum Erhalt von Benachrichtigungen bestätigen. Dieser Prozess wird von OneSignal dokumentiert und gespeichert. Hierzu gehört die Speicherung des Anmeldezeitpunkts sowie Ihre Browser-ID bzw. Ihre Geräte-ID. Die Erhebung dieser Daten ist erforderlich, damit wir im Falle eines Missbrauchs die Abläufe nachvollziehen können und dient deshalb unserer rechtlichen Absicherung. Um Ihnen die Push-Benachrichtigungen anzeigen zu können, erhebt und verarbeitet OneSignal in unserem Auftrag Ihre Browser-ID sowie im Falle des mobilen Zugriffs Ihre Geräte-ID.
Indem Sie unsere Push-Benachrichtigungen abonnieren, erklären Sie sich mit deren Empfang einverstanden. Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten nach Anmeldung zu unseren Push-Benachrichtigungen ist bei Vorliegen Ihrer Einwilligung Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
OneSignal wertet unsere Push-Benachrichtigungen zudem statistisch aus. OneSignal kann so erkennen, ob und wann unsere Push-Benachrichtigungen angezeigt und von Ihnen angeklickt wurden.
Ihre Einwilligung in die Speicherung und Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zum Erhalt unserer Push-Benachrichtigungen und der zuvor beschriebenen statistischen Erhebung können Sie jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft widerrufen. Zum Zwecke des Widerrufs der Einwilligung können Sie die dazu vorgesehene Einstellung zum Erhalt von Push Benachrichtigungen in Ihrem Browser ändern. Sofern Sie unsere Push-Benachrichtigungen auf einem Desktop-PC mit dem Betriebssystem „Windows“ nutzen, können Sie unsere Push-Benachrichtigungen auch über einen Rechtsklick auf die jeweilige Push-Benachrichtigung in der dort erscheinenden Einstellung abbestellen.
Ihre Daten werden gelöscht, sobald sie für die Erreichung des Zweckes ihrer Erhebung nicht mehr erforderlich sind. Ihre Daten werden demnach solange gespeichert, wie das Abonnement für unserer Push-Benachrichtigungen aktiv ist. Unter folgendem Link wird der Austragungsprozess detailliert erklärt:
https://onesignal.com/privacy
8.7
Warenverfügbarkeitsbenachrichtigung per E-Mail
Sofern wir in unserem Online-Shop für ausgewählte, vorübergehend nicht verfügbare Artikel die Möglichkeit anbieten, Sie per E-Mail über den Zeitpunkt der Verfügbarkeit zu informieren, können Sie sich zu unserem E-Mail-Benachrichtigungsdienst zur Warenverfügbarkeit anmelden. Wenn Sie sich zu unserem E-Mail-Benachrichtigungsdienst zur Warenverfügbarkeit anmelden, übersenden wir Ihnen per E-Mail einmalig eine Nachricht über die Verfügbarkeit des jeweils von Ihnen ausgewählten Artikels. Pflichtangabe für die Übersendung dieser Benachrichtigung ist allein Ihre E-Mailadresse. Die Angabe weiterer Daten ist freiwillig und wird ggf. verwendet, um Sie persönlich ansprechen zu können. Für den Versand dieser Benachrichtigung verwenden wir das sog. Double Opt-in Verfahren. Dies bedeutet, dass wir Ihnen erst dann eine entsprechende Benachrichtigung übermitteln werden, wenn Sie uns ausdrücklich bestätigt haben, dass Sie in den Empfang einer solchen Nachricht einwilligen. Wir schicken Ihnen dann eine Bestätigungs-E-Mail, mit der Sie gebeten werden durch Anklicken eines entsprechenden Links zu bestätigen, dass Sie eine solche Benachrichtigung erhalten wollen.
Mit der Aktivierung des Bestätigungslinks erteilen Sie uns Ihre Einwilligung für die Nutzung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO. Bei der Anmeldung zu unserem E-Mail-Benachrichtigungsdienst zur Warenverfügbarkeit speichern wir Ihre vom Internet Service-Provider (ISP) eingetragene IP-Adresse sowie das Datum und die Uhrzeit der Anmeldung, um einen möglichen Missbrauch Ihrer E-Mail- Adresse zu einem späteren Zeitpunkt nachvollziehen zu können. Die von uns bei der Anmeldung zu unserem E-Mail-Benachrichtigungsdienst zur Warenverfügbarkeit erhobenen Daten werden ausschließlich für den Zweck benutzt, Sie über die Verfügbarkeit eines bestimmten Artikels in unserem Online-Shop zu informieren. Sie können den E-Mail-Benachrichtigungsdienst zur Warenverfügbarkeit jederzeit durch entsprechende Nachricht an den eingangs genannten Verantwortlichen abbestellen. Nach erfolgter Abmeldung wird Ihre E-Mailadresse unverzüglich aus unserem hierfür eingerichteten Verteiler gelöscht, soweit Sie nicht ausdrücklich in eine weitere Nutzung Ihrer Daten eingewilligt haben oder wir uns eine darüber hinausgehende Datenverwendung vorbehalten, die gesetzlich erlaubt ist und über die wir Sie in dieser Erklärung informieren.
9. Datenverarbeitung zur Bestellabwicklung
9.1
Übermittlung von Bilddateien zur Bestellabwicklung per Upload-Funktion
Auf unserer Website bieten wir Kunden die Möglichkeit, durch die Übermittlung von Bilddateien über eine Upload-Funktion die Personalisierung von Produkten zu beauftragen. Dabei wird das eingereichte Bildmotiv als Vorlage für die Personalisierung des gewählten Produktes verwendet. Über das Upload-Formular auf der Website kann der Kunde eine oder mehrere Bilddateien aus dem Speicher des verwendeten Endgerätes unmittelbar per automatisierter, verschlüsselter Datenübertragung an uns übermitteln. Wir erfassen, speichern und verwenden die übermittelten Dateien daraufhin ausschließlich zur Anfertigung des personalisierten Produktes im Sinne der jeweiligen Leistungsbeschreibung auf unserer Website. Sofern die übermittelten Bilddateien zur Anfertigung und Abwicklung der Bestellung an spezielle Dienstleister weitergegeben werden, werden Sie hierüber in den folgenden Absätzen explizit informiert. Eine darüberhinausgehende Weitergabe erfolgt nicht. Sofern die übermittelten Dateien bzw. die digitalen Motive personenbezogene Daten (insbesondere Abbildungen von identifizierbaren Personen) enthalten, erfolgen sämtliche soeben benannten Verarbeitungsvorgänge ausschließlich zum Zwecke der Abwicklung Ihrer Online-Bestellung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO. Nach abschließender Abwicklung der Bestellung werden die übermittelten Bilddateien automatisch und vollständig gelöscht.
Übermittlung von Bilddateien zur Bestellabwicklung per E-Mail
Auf unserer Website bieten wir Kunden die Möglichkeit, durch die Übermittlung von Bilddateien per E-Mail die Personalisierung von Produkten zu beauftragen. Dabei wird das eingereichte Bildmotiv als Vorlage für die Personalisierung des gewählten Produktes verwendet. Über die auf der Website mitgeteilte Mailadresse kann der Kunde eine oder mehrere Bilddateien aus dem Speicher des verwendeten Endgerätes an uns übermitteln. Wir erfassen, speichern und verwenden die so übermittelten Dateien daraufhin ausschließlich zur Anfertigung des personalisierten Produktes im Sinne der jeweiligen Leistungsbeschreibung auf unserer Website. Sofern die übermittelten Bilddateien zur Anfertigung und Abwicklung der Bestellung an spezielle Dienstleister weitergegeben werden, werden Sie hierüber in den folgenden Absätzen explizit informiert. Eine darüberhinausgehende Weitergabe erfolgt nicht. Sofern die übermittelten Dateien bzw. die digitalen Motive personenbezogene Daten (insbesondere Abbildungen von identifizierbaren Personen) enthalten, erfolgen sämtliche soeben benannten Verarbeitungsvorgänge ausschließlich zum Zwecke der Abwicklung Ihrer Online-Bestellung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO. Nach abschließender Abwicklung der Bestellung werden die übermittelten Bilddateien automatisch und vollständig gelöscht.
9.2
Zur Abwicklung Ihrer Bestellung arbeiten wir mit dem / den nachstehenden Dienstleistern zusammen, die uns ganz oder teilweise bei der Durchführung geschlossener Verträge unterstützen. An diese Dienstleister werden nach Maßgabe der folgenden Informationen gewisse personenbezogene Daten übermittelt.
Die von uns erhobenen personenbezogenen Daten werden im Rahmen der Vertragsabwicklung an das mit der Lieferung beauftragte Transportunternehmen weitergegeben, soweit dies zur Lieferung der Ware erforderlich ist. Ihre Zahlungsdaten geben wir im Rahmen der Zahlungsabwicklung an das beauftragte Kreditinstitut weiter, sofern dies für die Zahlungsabwicklung erforderlich ist. Sofern Zahlungsdienstleister eingesetzt werden, informieren wir Sie hierüber nachstehend explizit. Rechtsgrundlage für die Weitergabe der Daten ist Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO.
9.3
Einsatz von speziellen Dienstleistern zur Bestellbearbeitung und -abwicklung
- Billbee
Die Bestellabwicklung erfolgt über den Dienstanbieter "Billbee" (Billbee GmbH, Paulinenstrasse 54, 32756 Detmold). Name, Anschrift sowie gegebenenfalls weitere personenbezogene Daten werden gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO ausschließlich zur Abwicklung der Online-Bestellung an Billbee weitergegeben. Die Weitergabe Ihrer Daten erfolgt hierbei nur, soweit dies für die Abwicklung der Bestellung tatsächlich erforderlich ist. Einzelheiten zum Datenschutz von Billbee und dessen Datenschutzerklärung sind auf der Internetseite von Billbee unter "billbee.io" einsehbar.
9.4
Weitergabe personenbezogener Daten an Versanddienstleister
- Deutsche Post
Erfolgt die Zustellung der Ware durch die Deutsche Post (Deutsche Post AG, Charles-de-Gaulle-Straße 20, 53113 Bonn), so geben wir Ihre E-Mail-Adresse gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO vor der Zustellung der Ware zum Zweck der Abstimmung eines Liefertermins bzw. zur Lieferankündigung an die Deutsche Post weiter, sofern Sie hierfür im Bestellprozess Ihre ausdrückliche Einwilligung erteilt haben. Anderenfalls geben wir zum Zwecke der Zustellung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO nur den Namen des Empfängers und die Lieferadresse an die Deutsche Post weiter. Die Weitergabe erfolgt nur, soweit dies für die Warenlieferung erforderlich ist. In diesem Fall ist eine vorherige Abstimmung des Liefertermins mit der Deutschen Post bzw. die Lieferankündigung nicht möglich.
Die Einwilligung kann jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft gegenüber dem oben bezeichneten Verantwortlichen oder gegenüber der Deutschen Post widerrufen werden.
- DHL
Erfolgt die Zustellung der Ware durch den Transportdienstleister DHL (DHL Paket GmbH, Sträßchensweg 10, 53113 Bonn), so geben wir Ihre E-Mail-Adresse gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO vor der Zustellung der Ware zum Zweck der Abstimmung eines Liefertermins bzw. zur Lieferankündigung an DHL weiter, sofern Sie hierfür im Bestellprozess Ihre ausdrückliche Einwilligung erteilt haben. Anderenfalls geben wir zum Zwecke der Zustellung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO nur den Namen des Empfängers und die Lieferadresse an DHL weiter. Die Weitergabe erfolgt nur, soweit dies für die Warenlieferung erforderlich ist. In diesem Fall ist eine vorherige Abstimmung des Liefertermins mit DHL bzw. die Lieferankündigung nicht möglich.
Die Einwilligung kann jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft gegenüber dem oben bezeichneten Verantwortlichen oder gegenüber dem Transportdienstleister DHL widerrufen werden.
- DPD
Erfolgt die Zustellung der Ware durch den Transportdienstleister DPD (DPD Deutschland GmbH, Wailandtstraße 1, 63741 Aschaffenburg), so geben wir Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und Ihre Telefonnummer vor der Zustellung der Ware gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO zum Zweck der Abstimmung eines Liefertermins bzw. zur Lieferankündigung an DPD weiter, sofern Sie hierfür im Bestellprozess Ihre ausdrückliche Einwilligung erteilt haben. Anderenfalls geben wir zum Zwecke der Zustellung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO nur den Namen des Empfängers und die Lieferadresse an DPD weiter. Die Weitergabe erfolgt nur, soweit dies für die Warenlieferung erforderlich ist. In diesem Fall ist eine vorherige Abstimmung des Liefertermins mit DPD bzw. die Lieferankündigung nicht möglich.
Die Einwilligung kann jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft gegenüber dem oben bezeichneten Verantwortlichen oder gegenüber dem Transportdienstleister DPD widerrufen werden.
9.5
Verwendung von Paymentdienstleistern (Zahlungsdiensten)
- Amazon Pay
Bei Auswahl der Zahlungsart "Amazon Pay" erfolgt die Zahlungsabwicklung über den Zahlungsdienstleister Amazon Payments Europe s.c.a., 38 avenue J.F. Kennedy, L-1855 Luxemburg (im Folgenden: „Amazon Payments“), an den wir Ihre im Rahmen des Bestellvorgangs mitgeteilten Informationen nebst den Informationen über Ihre Bestellung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO weitergeben. Die Weitergabe Ihrer Daten erfolgt ausschließlich zum Zweck der Zahlungsabwicklung mit dem Zahlungsdienstleister Amazon Payments und nur insoweit, als sie hierfür erforderlich ist. Sofern bei der Nutzung von Amazon Pay Cookies, also Kleine Textdateien, die auf dem Endgerät gespeichert werden, gesetzt werden, erfolgt dies ausschließlich auf Basis Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO. Diese Einwilligung kann jederzeit über das auf der Website implementierte „Cookie-Consent-Tool“ widerrufen werden. Unter der nachstehenden Internetadresse erhalten Sie weitere Informationen über die Datenschutzbestimmungen von Amazon Payments:
https://pay.amazon.com/de/help/201751600
- Apple Pay
Wenn Sie sich für die Zahlungsart „Apple Pay“ der Apple Distribution International (Apple), Hollyhill Industrial Estate, Hollyhill, Cork, Irland, entscheiden, erfolgt die Zahlungsabwicklung über die „Apple Pay“-Funktion Ihres mit iOS, watchOS oder macOS betriebenen Endgerätes durch die Belastung einer bei „Apple Pay“ hinterlegten Zahlungskarte. Apple Pay verwendet hierbei Sicherheitsfunktionen, die in die Hardware und Software Ihres Geräts integriert sind, um Ihre Transaktionen zu schützen. Für die Freigabe einer Zahlung ist somit die Eingabe eines zuvor durch Sie festgelegten Codes sowie die Verifizierung mittels der „Face ID“- oder „Touch ID“ – Funktion ihres Endgerätes erforderlich.
Zum Zwecke der Zahlungsabwicklung werden Ihre im Rahmen des Bestellvorgangs mitgeteilten Informationen nebst den Informationen über Ihre Bestellung in verschlüsselter Form an Apple weitergegeben. Apple verschlüsselt diese Daten sodann erneut mit einem entwicklerspezifischen Schlüssel, bevor die Daten zur Durchführung der Zahlung an den Zahlungsdienstleister der in Apple Pay hinterlegten Zahlungskarte übermittelt werden. Die Verschlüsselung sorgt dafür, dass nur die Website, über die der Einkauf getätigt wurde, auf die Zahlungsdaten zugreifen kann. Nachdem die Zahlung getätigt wurde, sendet Apple zur Bestätigung des Zahlungserfolges Ihre Geräteaccountnummer sowie einen transaktionsspezifischen, dynamischen Sicherheitscode an die Ausgangswebsite.
Sofern bei den beschriebenen Übermittlungen personenbezogene Daten verarbeitet werden, erfolgt die Verarbeitung ausschließlich zum Zwecke der Zahlungsabwicklung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO.
Apple bewahrt anonymisierte Transaktionsdaten auf, darunter der ungefähre Kaufbetrag, das ungefähre Datum und die ungefähre Uhrzeit sowie die Angabe, ob die Transaktion erfolgreich abgeschlossen wurde. Durch die Anonymisierung wird ein Personenbezug vollständig ausgeschlossen. Apple nutzt die anonymisierten Daten zur Verbesserung von „Apple Pay“ und anderen Apple-Produkten und Diensten.
Wenn Sie Apple Pay auf dem iPhone oder der Apple Watch zum Abschluss eines Kaufs verwenden, den Sie über Safari auf dem Mac getätigt haben, kommunizieren der Mac und das Autorisierungsgerät über einen verschlüsselten Kanal auf den Apple-Servern. Apple verarbeitet oder speichert keine dieser Informationen in einem Format, mit dem Ihre Person identifiziert werden kann. Sie können die Möglichkeit zur Verwendung von Apple Pay auf Ihrem Mac in den Einstellungen Ihres iPhone deaktivieren. Gehen Sie zu "Wallet & Apple Pay", und deaktivieren Sie "Zahlungen auf Mac erlauben".
Weitere Hinweise zum Datenschutz bei Apple Pay finden Sie unter der nachstehenden Internetadresse:
https://support.apple.com/de-de/HT203027
- Google Pay
Wenn Sie sich für die Zahlungsart „Google Pay“ der Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, 4 Barrow St, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Irland („Google“) entscheiden, erfolgt die Zahlungsabwicklung über die „Google Pay“-Applikation Ihres mit mindestens Android 4.4 („KitKat“) betriebenen und über eine NFC-Funktion verfügenden mobilen Endgeräts durch die Belastung einer bei Google Pay hinterlegten Zahlungskarte oder einem dort verifizierten Bezahlsystem (z.B. PayPal). Für die Freigabe einer Zahlung über Google Pay in Höhe von mehr als 25,- € ist das vorherige Entsperren Ihres mobilen Endgerätes durch die jeweils eingerichtete Verifikationsmaßnahme (etwa Gesichtserkennung, Passwort, Fingerabdruck oder Muster) erforderlich.
Zum Zwecke der Zahlungsabwicklung werden Ihre im Rahmen des Bestellvorgangs mitgeteilten Informationen nebst den Informationen über Ihre Bestellung an Google weitergegeben. Google übermittelt sodann Ihre in Google Pay hinterlegten Zahlungsinformationen in Form einer einmalig vergebenen Transaktionsnummer an die Ausgangswebsite, mit der eine erfolgte Zahlung verifiziert wird. Diese Transaktionsnummer enthält keinerlei Informationen zu den realen Zahldaten Ihrer bei Google Pay hinterlegten Zahlungsmittel, sondern wird als einmalig gültiger numerischer Token erstellt und übermittelt. Bei sämtlichen Transaktionen über Google Pay tritt Google lediglich als Vermittler zur Abwicklung des Bezahlvorgangs auf. Die Durchführung der Transaktion erfolgt ausschließlich im Verhältnis zwischen dem Nutzer und der Ausgangswebsite durch Belastung des bei Google Pay hinterlegten Zahlungsmittels.
Sofern bei den beschriebenen Übermittlungen personenbezogene Daten verarbeitet werden, erfolgt die Verarbeitung ausschließlich zum Zwecke der Zahlungsabwicklung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO.
Google behält sich vor, bei jeder über Google Pay getätigten Transaktion bestimmte vorgangsspezifische Informationen zu erheben, zu speichern und auszuwerten. Hierzu gehören Datum, Uhrzeit und Betrag der Transaktion, Händlerstandort und -beschreibung, eine vom Händler bereitgestellte Beschreibung der gekauften Waren oder Dienste, Fotos, die Sie der Transaktion beigefügt haben, der Name und die E-Mail-Adresse des Verkäufers und Käufers bzw. des Absenders und Empfängers, die verwendete Zahlungsmethode, Ihre Beschreibung für den Grund der Transaktion sowie gegebenenfalls das mit der Transaktion verbundene Angebot.
Laut Google erfolgt diese Verarbeitung ausschließlich gemäß Art. 6 Abs.1 lit. f DSGVO auf Basis des berechtigten Interesses an der ordnungsgemäßen Rechnungslegung, der Verifizierung von Vorgangsdaten und der Optimierung und Funktionserhaltung des Google Pay-Dienstes.
Google behält sich außerdem vor, die verarbeiteten Vorgangsdaten mit weiteren Informationen zusammenzuführen, die bei der Nutzung weiterer Google-Dienste durch Google erhoben und gespeichert werden.
Die Nutzungsbedingungen von Google Pay finden sich hier:
https://payments.google.com/payments/apis-secure/u/0/get_legal_document?ldo=0&ldt=googlepaytos&ldl=de
Weitere Hinweise zum Datenschutz bei Google Pay finden Sie unter der nachstehenden Internetadresse:
https://payments.google.com/payments/apis-secure/get_legal_document?ldo=0&ldt=privacynotice&ldl=de
- giropay
Bei Zahlung via „giropay“ erfolgt die Zahlungsabwicklung über die giropay GmbH, An der Welle 4, 60322 Frankfurt/Main, an die wir Ihre im Rahmen des Bestellvorgangs mitgeteilten Informationen nebst den Informationen über Ihre Bestellung weitergeben. Die Weitergabe Ihrer Daten erfolgt gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO ausschließlich zum Zwecke der Zahlungsabwicklung und nur insoweit, als sie hierfür erforderlich ist. Unter der nachstehenden Internetadresse erhalten Sie weitere Informationen über die Datenschutzbestimmungen der giropay GmbH:
https://www.giropay.de/rechtliches/datenschutzerklaerung
- Klarna
Bei Auswahl einer Klarna-Zahlungsdienstleistung erfolgt die Zahlungsabwicklung über die Klarna Bank AB (publ) [
https://www.klarna.com/de]
, Sveavägen 46, 111 34 Stockholm, Schweden (nachfolgend „Klarna“). Um die Abwicklung der Zahlung zu ermöglichen, werden Ihre persönlichen Daten (Vor- und Nachname, Straße, Hausnummer, Postleitzahl, Ort, Geschlecht, E-Mail-Adresse, Telefonnummer und IP-Adresse) sowie Daten, welche im Zusammenhang mit der Bestellung stehen (z. B. Rechnungsbetrag, Artikel, Lieferart) zum Zweck der Identitäts- und Bonitätsprüfung an Klarna weitergegeben, sofern Sie hierin gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO im Rahmen des Bestellprozesses ausdrücklich eingewilligt haben. An welche Auskunfteien Ihre Daten hierbei weitergeleitet werden können, können Sie hier einsehen:
https://cdn.klarna.com/1.0/shared/content/legal/terms/0/de_de/credit_rating_agencies
Die Bonitätsauskunft kann Wahrscheinlichkeitswerte enthalten (sog. Score-Werte). Soweit Score-Werte in das Ergebnis der Bonitätsauskunft einfließen, haben sie ihre Grundlage in einem wissenschaftlich anerkannten mathematisch-statistischen Verfahren. In die Berechnung der Score-Werte fließen unter anderem, aber nicht ausschließlich, Anschriftendaten ein. Die erhaltenen Informationen über die statistische Wahrscheinlichkeit eines Zahlungsausfalls verwendet Klarna für eine abgewogene Entscheidung über die Begründung, Durchführung oder Beendigung des Vertragsverhältnisses.
Sie können Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit durch eine Nachricht an den für die Datenverarbeitung Verantwortlichen oder gegenüber Klarna widerrufen. Jedoch bleibt Klarna ggf. weiterhin berechtigt, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zu verarbeiten, sofern dies zur vertragsgemäßen Zahlungsabwicklung erforderlich ist.
Ihre Personenangaben werden in Übereinstimmung mit den geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen und entsprechend den Angaben in Klarnas Datenschutzbestimmungen für Betroffene mit Sitz in Deutschland
https://cdn.klarna.com/1.0/shared/content/legal/terms/0/de_de/privacy
bzw. für Betroffene mit Sitz in Österreich
https://cdn.klarna.com/1.0/shared/content/legal/terms/0/de_at/privacy
behandelt.
- Paypal
Bei Zahlung via PayPal, Kreditkarte via PayPal, Lastschrift via PayPal oder – falls angeboten - "Kauf auf Rechnung" oder „Ratenzahlung“ via PayPal geben wir Ihre Zahlungsdaten im Rahmen der Zahlungsabwicklung an die PayPal (Europe) S.a.r.l. et Cie, S.C.A., 22-24 Boulevard Royal, L-2449 Luxembourg (nachfolgend "PayPal"), weiter. Die Weitergabe erfolgt gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO und nur insoweit, als dies für die Zahlungsabwicklung erforderlich ist.
PayPal behält sich für die Zahlungsmethoden Kreditkarte via PayPal, Lastschrift via PayPal oder – falls angeboten - "Kauf auf Rechnung" oder „Ratenzahlung“ via PayPal die Durchführung einer Bonitätsauskunft vor. Hierfür werden Ihre Zahlungsdaten gegebenenfalls gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO auf Basis des berechtigten Interesses von PayPal an der Feststellung Ihrer Zahlungsfähigkeit an Auskunfteien weitergegeben. Das Ergebnis der Bonitätsprüfung in Bezug auf die statistische Zahlungsausfallwahrscheinlichkeit verwendet PayPal zum Zweck der Entscheidung über die Bereitstellung der jeweiligen Zahlungsmethode. Die Bonitätsauskunft kann Wahrscheinlichkeitswerte enthalten (sog. Score-Werte). Soweit Score-Werte in das Ergebnis der Bonitätsauskunft einfließen, haben sie ihre Grundlage in einem wissenschaftlich anerkannten mathematisch-statistischen Verfahren. In die Berechnung der Score-Werte fließen unter anderem, aber nicht ausschließlich, Anschriftendaten ein. Weitere datenschutzrechtliche Informationen, unter anderem zu den verwendeten Auskunfteien, entnehmen Sie bitte der Datenschutzerklärung von PayPal:
https://www.paypal.com/de/webapps/mpp/ua/privacy-full
Sie können dieser Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten jederzeit durch eine Nachricht an PayPal widersprechen. Jedoch bleibt PayPal ggf. weiterhin berechtigt, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zu verarbeiten, sofern dies zur vertragsgemäßen Zahlungsabwicklung erforderlich ist.
- Shopify Payments
Wir verwenden den Zahlungsdienstleister "Shopify Payments", 3rd Floor, Europa House, Harcourt Building, Harcourt Street, Dublin 2. Wenn Sie sich für eine über den Zahlungsdienstleister Shopify Payments angebotene Zahlungsart entscheiden, erfolgt die Zahlungsabwicklung über den technischen Dienstleister Stripe Payments Europe Ltd., 1 Grand Canal Street Lower, Grand Canal Dock, Dublin, Irland, an den wir Ihre im Rahmen des Bestellvorgangs mitgeteilten Informationen nebst den Informationen über Ihre Bestellung (Name, Anschrift, Kontonummer, Bankleitzahl, evtl. Kreditkartennummer, Rechnungsbetrag, Währung und Transaktionsnummer) gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO weitergeben. Die Weitergabe Ihrer Daten erfolgt ausschließlich zum Zweck der Zahlungsabwicklung mit der Stripe Payments Europe Ltd. und nur insoweit, als sie hierfür erforderlich ist. Nähere Informationen zum Datenschutz von Shopify Payments finden Sie unter der nachstehenden Internetadresse:
https://www.shopify.com/legal/privacy
.
Datenschutzrechtliche Informationen zur Stripe Payments Europe Ltd. finden Sie hier:
https://stripe.com/de/privacy
- SOFORT
Bei Auswahl der Zahlungsart „SOFORT“ erfolgt die Zahlungsabwicklung über den Zahlungsdienstleister SOFORT GmbH, Theresienhöhe 12, 80339 München, Deutschland (im Folgenden „SOFORT“), an den wir Ihre im Rahmen des Bestellvorgangs mitgeteilten Informationen nebst den Informationen über Ihre Bestellung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO weitergeben. Die Sofort GmbH ist Teil der Klarna Group (Klarna Bank AB (publ), Sveavägen 46, 11134 Stockholm, Schweden). Die Weitergabe Ihrer Daten erfolgt ausschließlich zum Zweck der Zahlungsabwicklung mit dem Zahlungsdienstleister SOFORT und nur insoweit, als sie hierfür erforderlich ist. Unter der nachstehenden Internetadresse erhalten Sie weitere Informationen über die Datenschutzbestimmungen von SOFORT:
https://www.klarna.com/sofort/datenschutz
- Stripe
Wenn Sie sich für eine Zahlungsart des Paymentdienstleisters Stripe entscheiden, erfolgt die Zahlungsabwicklung über den Paymentdienstleister Stripe Payments Europe Ltd., 1 Grand Canal Street Lower, Grand Canal Dock, Dublin, Irland, an den wir Ihre im Rahmen des Bestellvorgangs mitgeteilten Informationen nebst den Informationen über Ihre Bestellung (Name, Anschrift, Kontonummer, Bankleitzahl, evtl. Kreditkartennummer, Rechnungsbetrag, Währung und Transaktionsnummer) gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO weitergeben. Nähere Informationen zum Datenschutz von Stripe finden Sie unter der URL
https://stripe.com/de/privacy#translation
.
Stripe behält sich vor, eine Bonitätsprüfung auf der Grundlage mathematisch-statistischer Verfahren durchzuführen, um das berechtigte Interesse an der Feststellung der Zahlungsfähigkeit des Nutzers zu wahren. Die für eine Bonitätsprüfung notwendigen und im Rahmen der Zahlungsabwicklung erhaltenen personenbezogenen Daten übermittelt Stripe gegebenenfalls an ausgewählte Auskunfteien, welche Stripe Nutzern auf Anfrage offenlegt. Die Bonitätsauskunft kann Wahrscheinlichkeitswerte enthalten (sog. Score-Werte). Soweit Score-Werte in das Ergebnis der Bonitätsauskunft einfließen, haben diese ihre Grundlage in einem wissenschaftlich anerkannten mathematisch-statistischem Verfahren. In die Berechnung der Score-Werte fließen unter anderem, aber nicht ausschließlich, Anschriftendaten ein. Das Ergebnis der Bonitätsprüfung in Bezug auf die statistische Zahlungsausfallwahrscheinlichkeit verwendet Stripe zum Zwecke der Entscheidung über die Nutzungsberechtigung für die gewählte Zahlungsmethode.
Sie können dieser Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten jederzeit durch eine Nachricht an Stripe oder die beauftragten Auskunfteien widersprechen.
Jedoch bleibt Stripe ggf. weiterhin berechtigt, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zu verarbeiten, sofern dies zur vertragsgemäßen Zahlungsabwicklung erforderlich ist.
10. Kontaktaufnahme zur Bewertungserinnerung
Bewertungserinnerung durch Trustpilot
Sofern Sie uns hierzu während oder nach Ihrer Bestellung Ihre ausdrückliche Einwilligung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO erteilt haben, übermitteln wir Ihre E-Mailadresse an die Bewertungsplattform Trustpilot der Trustpilot A/S, Pilestræde 58, 1112 Kopenhagen K, Dänemark (www.trustpilot.com), damit diese Ihnen eine Bewertungserinnerung per E-Mail zusendet.
Sie können Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit durch eine Nachricht an den für die Datenverarbeitung Verantwortlichen oder gegenüber der Bewertungsplattform widerrufen.
11. Verwendung von Sozialen Medien: Videos
Verwendung von Youtube-Videos
Diese Website nutzt die Youtube-Einbettungsfunktion zur Anzeige und Wiedergabe von Videos des Anbieters „Youtube“, der zu der Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, 4 Barrow St, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Irland („Google“) gehört.
Hierbei wird der erweiterte Datenschutzmodus verwendet, der nach Anbieterangaben eine Speicherung von Nutzerinformationen erst bei Wiedergabe des/der Videos in Gang setzt. Wird die Wiedergabe eingebetteter Youtube-Videos gestartet, setzt der Anbieter „Youtube“ Cookies ein, um Informationen über das Nutzerverhalten zu sammeln. Hinweisen von „Youtube“ zufolge dienen diese unter anderem dazu, Videostatistiken zu erfassen, die Nutzerfreundlichkeit zu verbessern und missbräuchliche Handlungsweisen zu unterbinden. Wenn Sie bei Google eingeloggt sind, werden Ihre Daten direkt Ihrem Konto zugeordnet, wenn Sie ein Video anklicken. Wenn Sie die Zuordnung mit Ihrem Profil bei YouTube nicht wünschen, müssen Sie sich vor Aktivierung des Buttons ausloggen. Google speichert Ihre Daten (selbst für nicht eingeloggte Nutzer) als Nutzungsprofile und wertet diese aus. Eine solche Auswertung erfolgt insbesondere gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO auf Basis der berechtigten Interessen von Google an der Einblendung personalisierter Werbung, Marktforschung und/oder bedarfsgerechten Gestaltung seiner Website. Ihnen steht ein Widerspruchsrecht zu gegen die Bildung dieser Nutzerprofile, wobei Sie sich zur Ausübung dessen an YouTube richten müssen. Im Rahmen der Nutzung von Youtube kann es auch zu einer Übermittlung von personenbezogenen Daten an die Server der Google LLC. in den USA kommen.
Unabhängig von einer Wiedergabe der eingebetteten Videos wird bei jedem Aufruf dieser Website eine Verbindung zum Google-Netzwerk aufgenommen, was ohne unseren Einfluss weitere Datenverarbeitungsvorgänge auslösen kann.
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz bei „Youtube“ finden Sie in den Youtube-Nutzungsbedingungen unter
https://www.youtube.com/static?template=terms
sowie in der Datenschutzerklärung von Google unter
https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/privacy
Soweit rechtlich erforderlich, haben wir zur vorstehend dargestellten Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Ihre Einwilligung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO eingeholt. Sie können Ihre erteilte Einwilligung jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft widerrufen. Um Ihren Widerruf auszuüben, deaktivieren Sie diesen Dienst im auf der Webseite bereitgestellten "Cookie-Consent-Tool".
12. Online-Marketing
12.1
Google AdSense
Diese Website benutzt Google AdSense, einen Webanzeigendienst Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, 4 Barrow St, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Irland ("Google"). Google AdSense verwendet sog. Cookies, also Textdateien, die auf Ihrem Computer gespeichert werden und die eine Analyse der Benutzung der Website durch Sie ermöglichen. Darüber hinaus verwendet Google AdSense zur Sammlung von Informationen auch sog. "Web-Beacons" (kleine unsichtbare Grafiken), durch deren Verwendung einfache Aktionen wie der Besucherverkehr auf der Website aufgezeichnet, gesammelt und ausgewertet werden können.
Die durch das Cookie und/ oder Web-Beacon erzeugten Informationen (einschließlich Ihrer IP-Adresse) über Ihre Benutzung dieser Website werden in der Regel an einen Server von Google übertragen und dort gespeichert. Hierbei kann es auch zu einer Übermittlung an die Server der Google LLC. in den USA kommen.
Google benutzt die so erhaltenen Informationen, um eine Auswertung Ihres Nutzungsverhaltens im Hinblick auf die AdSense-Anzeigen durchzuführen. Die im Rahmen von Google AdSense von Ihrem Browser übermittelte IP-Adresse wird nicht mit anderen Daten von Google zusammengeführt. Die von Google erhobenen Informationen werden unter Umständen an Dritte übertragen, sofern dies gesetzlich vorgeschrieben ist und/ oder soweit Dritte diese Daten im Auftrag von Google verarbeiten.
Details zu den durch Google AdSense angestoßenen Verarbeitungen und zum Umgang Googles mit Daten von Websites finden Sie hier:
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
Die beschriebene Verarbeitung von Daten erfolgt gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO zum Zweck der zielgerichteten werblichen Ansprache des Nutzers durch werbende Dritte, deren Anzeigen auf der Basis des ausgewerteten Nutzerverhalten auf dieser Website angezeigt werden. Diese Verarbeitung dient ebenfalls unserem finanziellen Interesse an der Ausschöpfung des wirtschaftlichen Potenzials unseres Internetauftritts durch entgeltliche Einblendung von personalisierten Drittwerbeinhalten.
Unter der nachstehenden Internetadresse erhalten Sie weitere Informationen über die Datenschutzbestimmungen von Google:
https://www.google.de/policies/privacy/
Sie können Cookies für Anzeigenvorgaben dauerhaft deaktivieren, indem Sie diese durch eine entsprechende Einstellung Ihrer Browser-Software verhindern oder Sie können das unter folgendem Link verfügbare Browser-Plug-in herunterladen und installieren:
https://www.google.com/settings/ads/plugin?hl=de
Bitte beachten Sie, dass bestimmte Funktionen dieser Website möglicherweise nicht oder nur eingeschränkt genutzt werden können, wenn Sie die Verwendung von Cookies deaktiviert haben.
Soweit rechtlich erforderlich, haben wir zur vorstehend dargestellten Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Ihre Einwilligung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO eingeholt. Sie können Ihre erteilte Einwilligung jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft widerrufen. Um Ihren Widerruf auszuüben, befolgen Sie bitte die vorstehend geschilderte Möglichkeit zur Vornahme eines Widerspruchs.
12.2
Google Marketing Platform
Diese Webseite nutzt das Online Marketing Tool Google Marketing Platform des Betreibers Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, 4 Barrow St, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Irland ("GMP").
GMP setzt Cookies ein, um für die Nutzer relevante Anzeigen zu schalten, die Berichte zur Kampagnenleistung zu verbessern oder um zu vermeiden, dass ein Nutzer die gleichen Anzeigen mehrmals sieht. Über eine Cookie-ID erfasst Google, welche Anzeigen in welchem Browser geschaltet werden und kann so verhindern, dass diese mehrfach angezeigt werden. Die Verarbeitung erfolgt auf Basis unseres berechtigten Interesses an der optimalen Vermarktung unserer Website gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO.
Darüber hinaus kann GMP mithilfe von Cookie-IDs sog. Conversions erfassen, die Bezug zu Anzeigenanfragen haben. Das ist etwa der Fall, wenn ein Nutzer eine GMP-Anzeige sieht und später bei Nutzung des gleichen Browsers die Website des Werbetreibenden aufruft und über diese Website etwas kauft. Laut Google enthalten GMP-Cookies keine personenbezogenen Informationen.
Aufgrund der eingesetzten Marketing-Tools baut Ihr Browser automatisch eine direkte Verbindung mit dem Server von Google auf. Wir haben keinen Einfluss auf den Umfang und die weitere Verwendung der Daten, die durch den Einsatz dieses Tools durch Google erhoben werden und informieren Sie daher entsprechend unserem Kenntnisstand wie folgt: Durch die Einbindung von GMP erhält Google die Information, dass Sie den entsprechenden Teil unseres Internetauftritts aufgerufen oder eine Anzeige von uns angeklickt haben. Sofern Sie bei einem Dienst von Google registriert sind, kann Google den Besuch Ihrem Account zuordnen. Selbst wenn Sie nicht bei Google registriert sind bzw. sich nicht eingeloggt haben, besteht die Möglichkeit, dass der Anbieter Ihre IP-Adresse in Erfahrung bringt und speichert. Im Rahmen der Nutzung von GMP kann es auch zu einer Übermittlung von personenbezogenen Daten an die Server der Google LLC. in den USA kommen.
Wenn Sie der Teilnahme an diesem Tracking-Verfahren widersprechen möchten, können Sie Cookies für Conversion-Tracking deaktivieren, indem Sie Ihren Browser so einstellen, dass Cookies von der Domain www.googleadservices.com blockiert werden, (s.
https://www.google.de/settings/ads
), wobei diese Einstellung gelöscht wird, wenn Sie Ihre Cookies deaktivieren. Alternativ können Sie sich bei der Digital Advertising Alliance unter der Internetadresse www.aboutads.info über das Setzen von Cookies informieren und Ihre gewünschten Einstellungen vornehmen. Schließlich können Sie Ihren Browser so einstellen, dass Sie über das Setzen von Cookies informiert werden und einzeln über deren Annahme entscheiden oder die Annahme von Cookies für bestimmte Fälle oder generell ausschließen. Bei der Nichtannahme von Cookies kann die Funktionalität unserer Website eingeschränkt sein.
Unter der nachstehenden Internetadresse erhalten Sie weitere Informationen über die Datenschutzbestimmungen von GMP by Google:
https://www.google.de/policies/privacy/
Soweit rechtlich erforderlich, haben wir zur vorstehend dargestellten Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Ihre Einwilligung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO eingeholt. Sie können Ihre erteilte Einwilligung jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft widerrufen. Um Ihren Widerruf auszuüben, befolgen Sie bitte die vorstehend geschilderte Möglichkeit zur Vornahme eines Widerspruchs.
13. Webanalysedienste
13.1
Google (Universal) Analytics
Diese Website benutzt Google (Universal) Analytics, einen Webanalysedienst der Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, 4 Barrow St, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Irland ("Google"). Google (Universal) Analytics verwendet sog. "Cookies", das sind Textdateien, die auf Ihrem Endgerät gespeichert werden und die eine Analyse Ihrer Nutzung der Website ermöglichen. Die durch das Cookie erzeugten Informationen über Ihre Benutzung dieser Website (einschließlich der gekürzten IP-Adresse) werden in der Regel an einen Server von Google übertragen und dort gespeichert, hierbei kann es auch zu einer Übermittlung an die Server der Google LLC. in den USA kommen.
Diese Website verwendet Google (Universal) Analytics ausschließlich mit der Erweiterung "_anonymizeIp()", die eine Anonymisierung der IP-Adresse durch Kürzung sicherstellt und eine direkte Personenbeziehbarkeit ausschließt. Durch die Erweiterung wird Ihre IP-Adresse von Google innerhalb von Mitgliedstaaten der Europäischen Union oder in anderen Vertragsstaaten des Abkommens über den Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum zuvor gekürzt. Nur in Ausnahmefällen wird die volle IP-Adresse an einen Server von Google LLC.in den USA übertragen und dort gekürzt. In unserem Auftrag wird Google diese Informationen benutzen, um Ihre Nutzung der Website auszuwerten, um Reports über die Websiteaktivitäten zusammenzustellen und um weitere mit der Websitenutzung und der Internetnutzung verbundene Dienstleistungen uns gegenüber zu erbringen. Dabei wird die im Rahmen von Google (Universal) Analytics von Ihrem Browser übermittelte IP-Adresse nicht mit anderen Daten von Google zusammengeführt.
Google Analytics ermöglicht über eine spezielle Funktion, die sog. „demografischen Merkmale“, darüber hinaus die Erstellung von Statistiken mit Aussagen über Alter, Geschlecht und Interessen der Seitenbesucher auf Basis einer Auswertung von interessenbezogener Werbung und unter Hinzuziehung von Drittanbieterinformationen. Dies erlaubt die Definition und Differenzierung von Nutzerkreisen der Webseite zum Zwecke der zielgruppenoptimierten Ausrichtung von Marketingmaßnahmen. Über die „demografischen Merkmale“ erfasste Datensätze können jedoch keiner bestimmten Person zugeordnet werden.
Details zu den durch Google Analytics angestoßenen Verarbeitungen und zum Umgang Googles mit Daten von Websites finden Sie hier:
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
Alle oben beschriebenen Verarbeitungen, insbesondere das Setzen von Google Analytics-Cookies für das Auslesen von Informationen auf dem verwendeten Endgerät, werden nur dann vollzogen, wenn Sie uns gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO dazu Ihre ausdrückliche Einwilligung erteilt haben. Ohne diese Einwilligungserteilung unterbleibt der Einsatz von Google Analytics während Ihres Seitenbesuchs.
Sie können Ihre erteilte Einwilligung jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft widerrufen. Um Ihren Widerruf auszuüben, deaktivieren Sie diesen Dienst bitte in dem auf der Webseite bereitgestellten „Cookie-Consent-Tool“. Wir haben mit Google für die Nutzung von Google Analytics einen Auftragsverarbeitungsvertrag abgeschlossen, mit dem Google verpflichtet wird, die Daten unserer Seitenbesucher zu schützen und sie nicht an Dritte weiter zu geben.
Für die Übermittlung von Daten aus der EU in die USA beruft sich Google hierbei auf sog. Standarddatenschutzklauseln der Europäischen Kommission, welche die Einhaltung des europäischen Datenschutzniveaus in den USA gewährleisten sollen.
Weitere Hinweise zu Google (Universal) Analytics finden Sie hier:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=de&gl=de
13.2
Google Analytics 4
Diese Website nutzt Google Analytics 4, einen Dienst des Unternehmens Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, 4 Barrow St, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland ("Google"), mit dem die Nutzung von Websites analysiert werden kann.
Bei der Nutzung von Google Analytics 4 werden standardmäßig sog. "Cookies" eingesetzt. Cookies sind Textdateien, die auf Ihrem Endgerät gespeichert werden und eine Analyse Ihrer Nutzung einer Website ermöglichen. Die durch Cookies erfassten Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Website (einschließlich der von Ihrem Endgerät übermittelten, um die letzten Stellen gekürzten IP-Adresse, s. dazu unten) werden in der Regel an einen Server von Google übermittelt und dort gespeichert und verarbeitet. Hierbei kann es auch zu einer Übermittlung von Informationen an die Server des Unternehmens Google LLC mit Sitz in den USA und dort zu weiteren Verarbeitungen der Informationen kommen.
Bei der Nutzung von Google Analytics 4 wird die von Ihrem Endgerät bei Ihrer Nutzung der Website übermittelte IP-Adresse standardmäßig und automatisch stets nur in anonymisierter Weise erhoben und verarbeitet, so dass eine direkte Personenbeziehbarkeit der erfassten Informationen ausgeschlossen ist. Diese automatische Anonymisierung erfolgt dadurch, dass die von Ihrem Endgerät übermittelte IP-Adresse von Google innerhalb von Mitgliedstaaten der Europäischen Union (EU) oder von anderen Vertragsstaaten des Abkommens über den Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum (EWR) um die letzten Stellen gekürzt wird.
In unserem Auftrag verwendet Google diese und andere Informationen, um Ihre Nutzung der Website auszuwerten, um Berichte (Reports) über Ihre Website-Aktivitäten bzw. Ihr Nutzungsverhalten zusammenzustellen und um weitere mit Ihrer Website-Nutzung und der Internetnutzung verbundene Dienstleistungen uns gegenüber zu erbringen. Dabei wird die im Rahmen von Google Analytics 4 von Ihrem Endgerät übermittelte und gekürzte IP-Adresse nicht mit anderen Daten von Google zusammengeführt. Die im Rahmen der Nutzung von Google Analytics 4 erfassten Daten werden für 2 Monate aufbewahrt und anschließend gelöscht.
Google Analytics 4 ermöglicht über eine spezielle Funktion, die sog. „demografischen Merkmale“, darüber hinaus die Erstellung von Statistiken mit Aussagen über Alter, Geschlecht und Interessen von Website-Nutzern auf Basis einer Auswertung von interessenbezogener Werbung und unter Hinzuziehung von Drittanbieterinformationen. Dies macht die Bestimmung und Unterscheidung von Nutzerkreisen der Website zum Zwecke der zielgruppenoptimierten Ausrichtung von Marketingmaßnahmen möglich. Über die „demografischen Merkmale“ erfasste Daten können jedoch keiner bestimmten Person und somit auch nicht Ihnen persönlich zugeordnet werden. Diese über die Funktion „demografische Merkmale“ erfassten Daten werden für zwei Monate aufbewahrt und anschließend gelöscht.
Alle oben beschriebenen Verarbeitungen, insbesondere das Setzen von Google Analytics-Cookies für die Speicherung und das Auslesen von Informationen auf dem von Ihnen für die Nutzung der Website verwendeten Endgerät, erfolgen nur dann, wenn Sie uns hierfür gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO Ihre ausdrückliche Einwilligung erteilt haben. Ohne Ihre Einwilligung unterbleibt der Einsatz von Google Analytics 4 während Ihrer Nutzung der Website. Sie können Ihre einmal erteilte Einwilligung jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft widerrufen. Um Ihren Widerruf auszuüben, deaktivieren Sie diesen Dienst bitte über das auf der Website bereitgestellte „Cookie-Consent-Tool“.
Im Zusammenhang mit dieser Website wird als Erweiterung von Google Analytics 4 auch der Dienst Google Signals eingesetzt. Mit Google Signals können wir geräteübergreifende Berichte (Reports) durch Google erstellen lassen (sog. „Cross Device Tracking“). Sofern Sie in Ihren Einstellungen in Ihrem Google-Konto die „personalisierten Anzeigen“ aktiviert und Ihre internetfähigen Endgeräte mit Ihrem Google-Konto verknüpft haben, kann Google das Nutzungsverhalten bei Erteilung Ihrer Einwilligung in den Einsatz von Google Analytics 4 gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO geräteübergreifend analysieren und hierauf basierende Datenbankmodelle erstellen. Berücksichtigt werden dabei die Anmeldungen und Gerätetypen aller Website-Nutzer, die in einem Google-Konto angemeldet waren und eine Conversion ausgeführt haben. Die Daten zeigen unter anderem, auf welchem Endgerät Sie das erste Mal auf eine Anzeige geklickt haben und auf welchem Endgerät die diesbezügliche Conversion erfolgt ist. Wir erhalten hierbei keine personenbezogenen Daten von Google, sondern lediglich auf Basis von Google Signals erstellte Statistiken. Sie haben die Möglichkeit, die Funktion „personalisierte Anzeigen“ in den Einstellungen Ihres Google-Kontos zu deaktivieren und damit die geräteübergreifende Analyse im Zusammenhang mit Google Signals abzustellen. Folgen Sie hierzu den Hinweisen auf dieser Seite:
https://support.google.com/ads/answer/2662922?hl=de
Weitergehende Informationen zu Google Signals finden Sie unter folgendem Link:
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/7532985?hl=de
Wir haben mit Google für unsere Nutzung von Google Analytics 4 einen sog. Auftragsverarbeitungsvertrag abgeschlossen, durch den Google dazu verpflichtet ist, die Daten unserer Website-Nutzer zu schützen und nicht an Dritte weiterzugeben.
Zur Gewährleistung der Einhaltung des europäischen Datenschutzniveaus auch bei der etwaigen Übermittlung von Daten aus der EU bzw. dem EWR in die USA und den möglichen weiteren Verarbeitungen dort beruft sich Google auf die sog. Standardvertragsklauseln der Europäischen Kommission, die wir mit Google vertraglich vereinbart haben.
Weitere rechtliche Hinweise zu Google Analytics 4, einschließlich einer Kopie der genannten Standardvertragsklauseln, finden Sie unter folgendem Link:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=de&gl=de
Details zu den durch Google Analytics 4 angestoßenen Verarbeitungen und zum Umgang Googles mit Daten von Websites finden Sie hier:
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
13.3
Hotjar (hotjar Ltd.)
Diese Website nutzt den Webanalysedienst Hotjar der Hotjar Ltd. Hotjar Ltd. ist ein europäisches Unternehmen mit Sitz in Malta (Hotjar Ltd, Level 2, St Julians Business Centre, 3, Elia Zammit Street, St Julians STJ 1000, Malta, Europe Tel.: +1 (855) 464-6788).
Mit diesem Tool lassen sich Bewegungen auf den Webseiten, auf denen Hotjar eingesetzt wird, nachvollziehen (sog. Heatmaps). So ist beispielsweise erkennbar, wie weit Nutzer scrollen und welche Schaltflächen die Nutzer wie oft anklicken. Weiterhin ist es mithilfe des Tools auch möglich, ein Feedback direkt von den Nutzern der Website einzuholen. Auf diese Weise erlangen wir wertvolle Informationen, um unsere Websites noch schneller und kundenfreundlicher zu gestalten. Die vorstehende Analyse erfolgt auf Basis unserer berechtigten Interessen an Optimierungs- und Marketingzwecken und der interessengerechten Ausgestaltung unserer Website gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO.Wir achten beim Einsatz dieses Tools besonders auf den Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten. So können wir nur nachvollziehen, welche Schaltflächen Sie anklicken und wie weit sie scrollen. Bereiche der Websiten, in denen personenbezogene Daten von Ihnen oder Dritten angezeigt werden, werden von Hotjar automatisch ausgeblendet, und sind somit zu keinem Zeitpunkt nachvollziehbar.
Hotjar bietet jedem Nutzer die Möglichkeit, mithilfe eines “Do Not Track-Headers” den Einsatz des Tools Hotjar zu unterbinden, sodass keine Daten über den Besuch der jeweiligen Website aufgezeichnet werden. Es handelt sich hierbei um eine Einstellung, die alle üblichen Browser in der jeweilig aktuellen Version unterstützt. Hierzu sendet Ihr Browser eine Anfrage an Hotjar, mit dem Hinweis das Tracking des jeweiligen Nutzers zu deaktivieren. Sollten Sie unsere Website mit unterschiedlichen Browsern/Rechnern nutzen, müssen Sie den “Do Not Track-Header” für jeden dieser Browser/Rechner separat einrichten.
Eine detailierte Anleitungen mit Informationen zu Ihrem Browser finden Sie unter:
https://www.hotjar.com/opt-out
Weitere Informationen über Hotjar Ltd. und über das Tool Hotjar finden Sie unter:
https://www.hotjar.com
Die Datenschutzerklärung der Hotjar Ltd. finden Sie unter:
https://www.hotjar.com/privacy
Soweit rechtlich erforderlich, haben wir zur vorstehend dargestellten Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Ihre Einwilligung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO eingeholt. Sie können Ihre erteilte Einwilligung jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft widerrufen. Um Ihren Widerruf auszuüben, befolgen Sie bitte die vorstehend geschilderte Möglichkeit zur Vornahme eines Widerspruchs.
14. Retargeting/ Remarketing/ Empfehlungswerbung
AdRoll (AdRoll Advertising Ltd.)
Diese Website verwendet Retargeting-Technologie der AdRoll Advertising Ltd, Level 6, 1, Burlington Plaza, Burlington Road, Dublin 4, Irland („AdRoll“). Diese ermöglicht es, Besucher unserer Internetseiten gezielt mit personalisierter, interessenbezogener Werbung anzusprechen, die sich bereits für unseren Shop und unsere Produkte interessiert haben. Die Einblendung der Werbemittel erfolgt dabei auf Basis einer Cookie-basierten Analyse des früheren Nutzungsverhaltens. In den Fällen der Retargeting-Technologie wird ein Cookie auf Ihrem Computer oder mobilen Endgerät gespeichert, um pseudonymisierte Daten über Ihre Interessen zu erfassen und so die Werbung individuell auf die gespeicherten Informationen anzupassen. Diese Cookies sind kleine Textdateien, die auf Ihrem Computer oder mobilen Endgerät gespeichert werden. Ihnen wird so Werbung angezeigt, die mit hoher Wahrscheinlichkeit Ihren Produkt- und Informationsinteressen entspricht. Sofern die erhobenen Informationen einen Personenbezug aufweisen, erfolgt die Verarbeitung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO auf Basis unseres berechtigten Interesses an der Einblendung personalisierter Werbung und an Marktforschung.
Sie können der Setzung von Cookies für Anzeigenvorgaben dauerhaft widersprechen, indem Sie die auf der nachstehend verlinkten Seite vorgehaltene Möglichkeit der Setzung eines Opt-Out-Cookie nutzen:
https://www.adroll.com/about/privacy
Weitergehende Informationen und die Datenschutzbestimmungen bezüglich Werbung und AdRoll Advertising Ltd („AdRoll“) können Sie hier einsehen:
https://www.adroll.com/about/privacy
Soweit rechtlich erforderlich, haben wir zur vorstehend dargestellten Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Ihre Einwilligung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO eingeholt. Sie können Ihre erteilte Einwilligung jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft widerrufen. Um Ihren Widerruf auszuüben, befolgen Sie bitte die vorstehend geschilderte Möglichkeit zur Vornahme eines Widerspruchs.
Criteo (Criteo SA)
Auf dieser Website werden durch die Technologie von Criteo SA, 32 Rue Blanche, 75009 Paris, Frankreich („Criteo“), mithilfe von Cookie-Textdateien Informationen über das Surfverhalten der Websitebesucher auf Basis unseres berechtigten Interesses an der Einblendung personalisierter Werbung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO in pseudonymisierter Form gesammelt, gespeichert und ausgewertet. Criteo analysiert anhand eines Algorithmus das Surfverhalten und kann anschließend gezielte Produktempfehlungen als personalisierte Werbebanner auf anderen Websites (sog. Publishern) anzeigen. In keinem Fall können die erfassten Daten dazu verwendet werden, den Besucher dieser Website persönlich zu identifizieren. Eine andere Verwendung oder Weitergabe an Dritte erfolgt nicht.
Um der Datenerhebung und Erstellung pseudonymisierter Benutzerprofile für die Zukunft zu widersprechen, können Sie das nachfolgende sog. Opt-Out Cookie herunterladen:
Criteo Austragung (
https://www.criteo.com/de/privacy/
)
Weitere Information zu der Technologie von Criteo erhalten Sie im Rahmen der Criteo Datenschutzbestimmungen:
https://www.criteo.com/de/privacy/
Soweit rechtlich erforderlich, haben wir zur vorstehend dargestellten Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Ihre Einwilligung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO eingeholt. Sie können Ihre erteilte Einwilligung jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft widerrufen. Um Ihren Widerruf auszuüben, befolgen Sie bitte die vorstehend geschilderte Möglichkeit zur Vornahme eines Widerspruchs.
Outbrain
Diese Website verwendet die Retargeting-Technologie der Outbrain Inc., 39 W 13th Street, New York, NY 10011, USA („Outbrain“). Diese ermöglicht es, Besucher unserer Internetseiten ausgehend vom Nutzungsverhalten gezielt auf weitere eigene oder fremde Inhalte in Form von Bannern hinzuweisen, die voraussichtlich dem jeweiligen Nutzerinteresse entsprechen. Die Einblendung dieser Inhalte erfolgt auf Basis einer Cookie-basierten Analyse des früheren Nutzungsverhaltens, wobei aber keine personenbezogenen Daten gespeichert werden. Für diese interessenorientierte Inhaltsbestimmung wird ein Cookie auf Ihrem Computer oder mobilen Endgerät gespeichert, um pseudonymisierte Daten über Ihr Surfverhalten zu erfassen und so die Inhalte individuell auf die gespeicherten Informationen anzupassen.
Sofern die erhobenen und ausgewerteten Informationen einen Personenbezug aufweisen, erfolgt die Verarbeitung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO auf Basis unseres berechtigten Interesses an der Einblendung personalisierter Seiteninhalte und an Marktforschung.
Um die Verwendung von Cookies auf Ihrem Endgerät generell zu deaktivieren, können Sie Ihren Internetbrowser so einstellen, dass zukünftig keine Cookies mehr auf Ihrem Endgerät abgelegt werden können bzw. bereits abgelegte Cookies gelöscht werden. Das Abschalten sämtlicher Cookies kann dazu führen, dass einige Funktionen auf unseren Internetseiten nicht mehr ausgeführt werden können.
Sie können der Setzung von Cookies für Anzeigenvorgaben durch Outbrain dauerhaft auch dadurch widersprechen, dass Sie die auf der nachstehend verlinkten Seite vorgehaltene Möglichkeit der Setzung eines Opt-Out-Cookies nutzen:
https://www.outbrain.com/de/legal/privacy
Unter dem bezeichneten Link finden Sie auch weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz von Outbrain.
Soweit rechtlich erforderlich, haben wir zur vorstehend dargestellten Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Ihre Einwilligung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO eingeholt. Sie können Ihre erteilte Einwilligung jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft widerrufen. Um Ihren Widerruf auszuüben, befolgen Sie bitte die vorstehend geschilderte Möglichkeit zur Vornahme eines Widerspruchs.
Outbrain Pixel
Innerhalb unseres Onlineangebotes verwenden wir das „Outbrain Pixel" der Outbrain, Inc., 39 W 13th St, New York 10011, USA („Outbrain“).Von Outbrain Pixel wird ein Cookie auf Ihrem Rechner gesetzt, sofern Sie über eine Werbeanzeige oder sonstige Kampagne auf unsere Website gelangt sind. Bei Cookies handelt es sich um kleine Textdateien, die auf Ihrem Endgerät abgelegt werden. Besucht der Nutzer bestimmte Seiten dieser Website, können wir erkennen, dass der Nutzer auf die Werbeanzeige geklickt hat und zu dieser Seite (Conversion-Seite) weitergeleitet wurde. Sofern dabei personenbezogene Daten verarbeitet werden, geschieht dies gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO aufgrund unseres berechtigten Interesses an effektivem Marketing.
Die mithilfe des Conversion-Cookies erhobenen Informationen dienen dazu, Conversion-Statistiken zu erstellen, d.h. zu erfassen, wie viele Nutzer nach Anklicken einer Anzeige auf eine Conversion-Seite gelangen. Wir erfahren hierdurch die Gesamtanzahl der Nutzer, die auf unsere Anzeige geklickt haben und zu einer mit einem Conversion-Tracking-Tag versehenen Seite weitergeleitet wurden. Wir erhalten jedoch keine Informationen, mit denen sich Nutzer persönlich identifizieren lassen. Wenn Sie nicht am Tracking teilnehmen möchten, können Sie dem widersprechen, indem Sie das Cookie von Outbrain Pixel über ihren Internet-Browser unter Nutzereinstellungen deaktivieren. überprüfen, ob Werbe-Cookies von Outbrain in Ihrem Browser gesetzt werden und diese deaktivieren.
Soweit rechtlich erforderlich, haben wir zur vorstehend dargestellten Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Ihre Einwilligung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO eingeholt. Sie können Ihre erteilte Einwilligung jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft widerrufen. Um Ihren Widerruf auszuüben, befolgen Sie bitte die vorstehend geschilderte Möglichkeit zur Vornahme eines Widerspruchs oder nutzen Sie die Deaktivierungsmöglichkeiten in den Cookie-Einstellungen dieser Webseite.
Weite Informationen zu den Datenschutzbestimmungen von Outbrain finden sich unter
https://www.outbrain.com/de/legal/privacy
.
Taboola
Diese Website verwendet die Retargeting-Technologie der Taboola Inc., 16 Madison Square West 7th Floor, New York, NY 10010, USA („Taboola“). Diese ermöglicht es, Besucher unserer Internetseiten ausgehend vom Nutzungsverhalten gezielt auf weitere eigene oder fremde Inhalte in Form von Bannern hinzuweisen, die voraussichtlich dem jeweiligen Nutzerinteresse entsprechen. Die Einblendung dieser Inhalte erfolgt auf Basis einer Cookie-basierten Analyse des früheren Nutzungsverhaltens, wobei aber keine personenbezogenen Daten gespeichert werden. Für diese interessenorientierte Inhaltsbestimmung wird ein Cookie auf Ihrem Computer oder mobilen Endgerät gespeichert, um pseudonymisierte Daten über Ihr Surfverhalten zu erfassen und so die Inhalte individuell auf die gespeicherten Informationen anzupassen.
Sofern die erhobenen und ausgewerteten Informationen einen Personenbezug aufweisen, erfolgt die Verarbeitung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO auf Basis unseres berechtigten Interesses an der Einblendung personalisierter Seiteninhalte und an Marktforschung.
Um die Verwendung von Cookies auf Ihrem Endgerät generell zu deaktivieren, können Sie Ihren Internetbrowser so einstellen, dass zukünftig keine Cookies mehr auf Ihrem Endgerät abgelegt werden können bzw. bereits abgelegte Cookies gelöscht werden. Das Abschalten sämtlicher Cookies kann dazu führen, dass einige Funktionen auf unseren Internetseiten nicht mehr ausgeführt werden können.
Sie können der Setzung von Cookies für Anzeigenvorgaben durch Taboola dauerhaft auch dadurch widersprechen, dass Sie die auf der nachstehend verlinkten Seite vorgehaltene Möglichkeit der Setzung eines Opt-Out-Cookies nutzen:
https://www.taboola.com/privacy-policy#optout
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz von Taboola können Sie hier einsehen:
https://www.taboola.com/privacy-policy
Soweit rechtlich erforderlich, haben wir zur vorstehend dargestellten Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Ihre Einwilligung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO eingeholt. Sie können Ihre erteilte Einwilligung jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft widerrufen. Um Ihren Widerruf auszuüben, befolgen Sie bitte die vorstehend geschilderte Möglichkeit zur Vornahme eines Widerspruchs.
15. Verwendung eines Live-Chat-Systems
Freshchat
Diese Webseite nutzt das Live-Chat-System „FreshChat“ der Freshworks, Inc., 2950 S. Delaware Street, Suite 201, San Mateo, California 94403, USA. Für den Betrieb dieses Live-Chat-Systems und zur Beantwortung von Live-Support-Anfragen werden anonymisierte Daten gesammelt und gespeichert. Aus diesen anonymisierten Daten können unter einem Pseudonym Nutzungsprofile erstellt werden. Hierzu können Cookies eingesetzt werden. Bei Cookies handelt es sich um kleine Textdateien, die lokal im Zwischenspeicher des Internet-Browsers des Seitenbesuchers gespeichert werden. Die Cookies ermöglichen die Wiedererkennung des Internet-Browsers. Sofern die so erhobenen Informationen einen Personenbezug aufweisen, erfolgt die Verarbeitung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO auf Basis unseres berechtigten Interesses an effektiver Kundenbetreuung und der statistischen Analyse des Nutzerverhaltens zu Optimierungszwecken.
Die mit den FreshChat -Technologien erhobenen Daten werden ohne die gesondert erteilte Zustimmung des Betroffenen nicht dazu benutzt, den Besucher dieser Website persönlich zu identifizieren und nicht mit personenbezogenen Daten über den Träger des Pseudonyms zusammengeführt. Um die Speicherung von Cookies zu vermeiden, können Sie Ihren Internetbrowser so einstellen, dass zukünftig keine Cookies mehr auf Ihrem Computer abgelegt werden können bzw. bereits abgelegte Cookies gelöscht werden. Das Abschalten sämtlicher Cookies kann jedoch dazu führen, dass einige Funktionen auf unseren Internetseiten nicht mehr ausgeführt werden können. Der Datenerhebung und –speicherung zum Zwecke der Erstellung eines pseudonymisierten Nutzungsprofils können Sie jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft widersprechen, indem Sie uns Ihren Widerspruch formlos per E-Mail an die im Impressum genannte E-Mail-Adresse schicken.
16. Verwendung eines Email-Ticketing-Systems
Freshdesk
Wir nutzen zur Bearbeitung von Kundenanfragen das E-Mail-Ticketsystem der Freshworks, Inc., 2950 S. Delaware Street, Suite 201, San Mateo, California 94403, USA („Freshdesk“). Stellen Nutzer unserer Webseite Kontaktanfragen per Mail, werden diese im Ticketsystem gespeichert und organisiert, um eine chronologische Bearbeitung zu ermöglichen und das Serviceerlebnis zu verbessern. Nutzer können über die individuell vergebene Ticket-Nummer stets den aktuellen Stand der Bearbeitung ihres Anliegens einsehen.
Ausschließlich für die Organisation der Anfragen und deren Bearbeitung werden personenbezogene Daten soweit, wie in der Anfrage bereitgestellt, jedenfalls aber Name, Vorname und E-Mail-Adresse erhoben, an Freshdesk übermittelt, dort gespeichert und ausgelesen.
Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung dieser Daten ist unser berechtigtes Interesse an der effizienten Ausgestaltung unseres Kundenservice, an der schnellstmöglichen Beantwortung Ihres Anliegens und der Optimierung unseres Service-Angebots gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO.
Wir haben mit Freshdesk einen Auftragsverarbeitungsvertrag („Data Processing Addendum“, einsehbar unter
https://www.freshworks.com/data-processing-addendum/
) abgeschlossen, mit dem wir Freshdesk verpflichten, die Daten unserer Kunden zu schützen und sie nicht an Dritte weiterzugeben. Für die Übermittlung von Daten außerhalb des Europäischen Wirtschaftsraums beruft sich Freshdesk auf sog. Standarddatenschutzklauseln der Europäischen Kommission, welche die Einhaltung des europäischen Datenschutzniveaus gewährleisten sollen.
Ihre Daten werden nach abschließender Bearbeitung Ihrer Anfrage gelöscht. Dies ist der Fall, wenn sich aus den Umständen entnehmen lässt, dass der betroffene Sachverhalt abschließend geklärt ist und sofern keine gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten entgegenstehen.
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz von Freshdesk erhalten Sie unter
https://www.freshworks.com/de/datenschutz/
17. Tools und Sonstiges
17.1
Debitoor
Für die Erledigung der Buchhaltung nutzen wir die cloudbasierten Buchhaltungssoftware der Debitoor GmbH, Grunerstr. 13, 10179 Berlin („Debitoor“). Debitoor verarbeitet Eingangs- und Ausgangsrechnungen sowie ggf. auch die Bankbewegungen unseres Unternehmens, um Rechnungen automatisch zu erfassen, zu den Transaktionen zu matchen und hieraus in einem teilautomatisierten Prozess die Finanzbuchhaltung zu erstellen.
Sofern hierbei auch personenbezogene Daten verarbeitet werden, erfolgt die Verarbeitung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO auf Basis unseres berechtigten Interesses an einer effizienten Organisation und Dokumentation unserer Geschäftsvorgänge.
Nähere Informationen zu Debitoor, der automatisierten Verarbeitung von Daten und zu den Datenschutzbestimmungen finden Sie unter
https://debitoor.de/datenschutz
- sevDesk
Für die Erledigung der Buchhaltung nutzen wir den Service sevDesk der cloudbasierten Buchhaltungssoftware der sevDesk GmbH, Hauptstraße 115, 77652 Offenburg.
SevDesk verarbeitet Eingangs- und Ausgangsrechnungen sowie ggf. auch die Bankbewegungen unseres Unternehmens, um Rechnungen automatisch zu erfassen, zu den Transaktionen zu matchen und hieraus in einem teilautomatisierten Prozess die Finanzbuchhaltung zu erstellen.
Sofern hierbei auch personenbezogene Daten verarbeitet werden, erfolgt die Verarbeitung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO auf Basis unseres berechtigten Interesses an einer effizienten Organisation und Dokumentation unserer Geschäftsvorgänge.
Nähere Informationen zur sevDesk GmbH, der automatisierten Verarbeitung von Daten und zu den Datenschutzbestimmungen finden Sie unter
https://sevdesk.de/sicherheit-datenschutz/
17.2
CookieFirst
Diese Webseite nutzt zur Einholung von Nutzereinwilligungen für einwilligungspflichtige Cookies und cookie-basierte Anwendungen das Cookie-Consent-Tool „CookieFirst“ der Digital Data Solutions B.V.. Plantage Middenlaan 42a, 1018DH, Amsterdam, Niederlade („CookieFirst“).
Das Tool setzt technisch notwendige Cookies, um Ihre Cookie-Präferenzen zu speichern. Diese Datenverarbeitung erfolgt gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO auf Grundlage unseres berechtigten Interesses an der Bereitstellung eines Cookie-Zustimmungsverwaltungsdienstes für die Website-Besucher.
17.3
Google Web Fonts
Diese Seite nutzt zur einheitlichen Darstellung von Schriftarten so genannte Web Fonts die von der Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, 4 Barrow St, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Irland („Google“) bereitgestellt werden. Beim Aufruf einer Seite lädt Ihr Browser die benötigten Web Fonts in ihren Browser-Cache, um Texte und Schriftarten korrekt anzuzeigen.
Zu diesem Zweck muss der von Ihnen verwendete Browser Verbindung zu den Servern von Google aufnehmen. Hierbei kann es auch zu einer Übermittlung von personenbezogenen Daten an die Server der Google LLC. in den USA kommen. Auf diese Weise erlangt Google Kenntnis darüber, dass über Ihre IP-Adresse unsere Website aufgerufen wurde. Die Nutzung von Google Web Fonts erfolgt im Interesse einer einheitlichen und ansprechenden Darstellung unserer Online-Angebote. Dies stellt ein berechtigtes Interesse im Sinne von Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO dar. Wenn Ihr Browser Web Fonts nicht unterstützt, wird eine Standardschrift von Ihrem Computer genutzt.
Weitere Informationen zu Google Web Fonts finden Sie unter
https://developers.google.com/fonts/faq
und in der Datenschutzerklärung von Google:
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/
17.4
Google Forms
Für die Durchführung von Umfragen oder bei Online-Formularen verwenden wir den Dienst Google Forms der Google Ireland Ltd., Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Irland („Google“). Google Forms ermöglicht es uns, Umfragen und Onlineformulare zu gestalten und auszuwerten. Neben den jeweiligen personenbezogenen Daten, die Sie in die Formulare eingeben, werden auch Informationen zu Ihrem Betriebssystem, Browser, Datum und Uhrzeit Ihres Besuchs, Referrer-URL sowie Ihre IP-Adresse erhoben, an Google übermittelt und auf Servern von Google gespeichert. Die Speicherung der von Ihnen in die Formulare eingegebenen Informationen erfolgt passwortgeschützt, damit sichergestellt ist, dass Drittzugriffe ausgeschlossen werden und nur wir die Information Daten zum im Formular jeweilig benannten Zweck auswerten können.
Bei der Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten, die zur Erfüllung eines Vertrages mit Ihnen erforderlich sind (dies gilt auch für Verarbeitungsvorgänge, die zur Durchführung vorvertraglicher Maßnahmen erforderlich sind), dient Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO als Rechtsgrundlage. Haben Sie uns eine Einwilligung für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten erteilt, erfolgt die Verarbeitung auf Grundlage des Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO. Eine erteilte Einwilligung kann jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft widerrufen werden.
Wir haben mit Google für die Nutzung von Google Forms einen Auftragsverarbeitungsvertrag abgeschlossen, mit dem Google verpflichtet wird, die Daten unserer Seitenbesucher zu schützen und sie nicht an Dritte weiter zu geben. Eine Verarbeitung findet regelmäßig innerhalb von Mitgliedstaaten der Europäischen Union oder in anderen Vertragsstaaten des Abkommens über den Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum statt. Datenübermittlungen in die USA können jedoch nicht ausgeschlossen werden.
Für die Übermittlung von Daten aus der EU in die USA beruft sich Google hierbei auf sog. Standarddatenschutzklauseln der Europäischen Kommission, welche die Einhaltung des europäischen Datenschutzniveaus in den USA gewährleisten sollen.
Weitere Informationen zu Google Forms und den Datenschutzbestimmungen von Google finden Sie unter:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=de
17.5
Google reCAPTCHA
Auf dieser Website verwenden wir auch die reCAPTCHA Funktion von Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, 4 Barrow St, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Irland („Google“). Diese Funktion dient vor allem zur Unterscheidung, ob eine Eingabe durch eine natürliche Person erfolgt oder missbräuchlich durch maschinelle und automatisierte Verarbeitung erfolgt. Der Dienst umfasst den Versand der IP-Adresse und ggf. weiterer von Google für den Dienst reCAPTCHA benötigter Daten an Google und erfolgt gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO auf Basis unseres berechtigten Interesses an der Feststellung der individuellen Eigenverantwortung im Internet und der Vermeidung von Missbrauch und Spam. Im Rahmen der Nutzung von Google reCAPTCHA kann es auch zu einer Übermittlung von personenbezogenen Daten an die Server der Google LLC. in den USA kommen.
Weiterführende Informationen zu Google reCAPTCHA sowie die Datenschutzerklärung von Google können Sie einsehen unter:
https://www.google.com/intl/de/policies/privacy/
Soweit rechtlich erforderlich, haben wir zur vorstehend dargestellten Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Ihre Einwilligung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO eingeholt. Sie können Ihre erteilte Einwilligung jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft widerrufen. Um Ihren Widerruf auszuüben, befolgen Sie bitte die vorstehend geschilderte Möglichkeit zur Vornahme eines Widerspruchs.
17.6
Google Kundenrezensionen (ehemals Google Zertifizierter-Händler-Programm)
Wir arbeiten mit Google im Rahmen des Programms „Google Kundenrezensionen“ zusammen. Der Anbieter ist Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, 4 Barrow St, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Irland (“Google”). Dieses Programm gibt uns die Möglichkeit, Kundenrezensionen von Nutzern unserer Website einzuholen. Hierbei werden Sie nach einem Einkauf auf unserer Website gefragt, ob Sie an einer E-Mail-Umfrage von Google teilnehmen möchten. Wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO erteilen, übermitteln wir Ihre E-Mail-Adresse an Google. Sie erhalten eine E-Mail von Google Kundenrezensionen, in der Sie gebeten werden, die Kauferfahrung auf unserer Website zu bewerten. Die von Ihnen abgegebene Bewertung wird anschließend mit unseren anderen Bewertungen zusammengefasst und in unserem Logo Google Kundenrezensionen sowie in unserem Merchant Center-Dashboard angezeigt. Außerdem wird Ihre Bewertung für Google Verkäuferbewertungen genutzt. Im Rahmen der Nutzung von Google Kundenrezensionen kann es auch zu einer Übermittlung von personenbezogenen Daten an die Server der Google LLC. in den USA kommen.
Sie können Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit durch eine Nachricht an den für die Datenverarbeitung Verantwortlichen oder gegenüber Google widerrufen.
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz von Google im Zusammenhang mit dem Programm Google Kundenrezensionen können Sie unter nachstehendem Link abrufen:
https://support.google.com/merchants/answer/7188525?hl=de
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz von Google Verkäuferbewertungen können Sie unter diesem Link nachlesen:
https://support.google.com/google-ads/answer/2375474
17.7
Microsoft Teams
Wir nutzen den Dienst „Microsoft Teams “ der Microsoft Corporation, One Microsoft Way, Redmond, WA 98052-6399 USA (nachfolgend „Microsoft Teams“) um Online-Meetings, Videokonferenzen und/oder Webinare durchzuführen.
Im Falle der Nutzung von Microsoft Teams werden unterschiedliche Daten verarbeitet. Hierbei hängt der Umfang der verarbeiteten Daten davon ab, welche Daten Sie vor bzw. während der Teilnahme an einem Online-Meeting bzw. einer Videokonferenz oder einem Webinar mitteilen. Im Rahmen der Nutzung von Microsoft Teams werden Daten der Kommunikationsteilnehmer verarbeitet und auf Servern von Microsoft Teams gespeichert. Zu diesen Daten können insbesondere Ihre Anmeldedaten (Name, E-Mailadresse, Telefon (optional) und Passwort) und Meeting-Daten (Thema, Teilnehmer-IP-Adresse, Geräteinformationen, Beschreibung (optional)) zählen. Darüber hinaus können visuelle und auditive Beiträge der Teilnehmer, als auch Spracheingaben in Chats verarbeitet werden.
Bei der Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten, die zur Erfüllung eines Vertrages mit Ihnen erforderlich sind (dies gilt auch für Verarbeitungsvorgänge, die zur Durchführung vorvertraglicher Maßnahmen erforderlich sind), dient Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO als Rechtsgrundlage. Haben Sie uns eine Einwilligung für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten erteilt, erfolgt die Verarbeitung auf Grundlage des Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO. Eine erteilte Einwilligung kann jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft widerrufen werden.
Im Übrigen ist die Rechtsgrundlage für die Datenverarbeitung bei der Durchführung von Online-Meetings, Videokonferenzen oder Webinaren unser berechtigtes Interesse gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO an der effektiven Durchführung des Online-Meetings, Webinars oder der Videokonferenz. Weitere Informationen zur Datennutzung durch Microsoft Teams finden Sie in der Datenschutzerklärung von Microsoft Teams unter
https://privacy.microsoft.com/de-de/privacystatement
17.8
Zoom
Wir nutzen den Dienst „Zoom“ der Zoom Video Communications Inc., 55 Almaden Blvd, Suite 600, San Jose, CA 95113, USA (nachfolgend „Zoom“) um Online-Meetings, Videokonferenzen und/oder Webinare durchzuführen.
Im Falle der Nutzung von Zoom werden unterschiedliche Daten verarbeitet. Hierbei hängt der Umfang der verarbeiteten Daten davon ab, welche Daten Sie vor bzw. während der Teilnahme an einem Online-Meeting bzw. einer Videokonferenz oder einem Webinar mitteilen. Im Rahmen der Nutzung von Zoom werden Daten der Kommunikationsteilnehmer verarbeitet und auf Servern von Zoom gespeichert. Zu diesen Daten können insbesondere Ihre Anmeldedaten (Name, E-Mailadresse, Telefon (optional) und Passwort) und Meeting-Daten (Thema, Teilnehmer-IP-Adresse, Geräteinformationen, Beschreibung (optional)) zählen. Darüber hinaus können visuelle und auditive Beiträge der Teilnehmer, als auch Spracheingaben in Chats verarbeitet werden.
Bei der Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten, die zur Erfüllung eines Vertrages mit Ihnen erforderlich sind (dies gilt auch für Verarbeitungsvorgänge, die zur Durchführung vorvertraglicher Maßnahmen erforderlich sind), dient Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO als Rechtsgrundlage. Haben Sie uns eine Einwilligung für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten erteilt, erfolgt die Verarbeitung auf Grundlage des Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO. Eine erteilte Einwilligung kann jederzeit mit Wirkung für die Zukunft widerrufen werden.
Im Übrigen ist die Rechtsgrundlage für die Datenverarbeitung bei der Durchführung von Online-Meetings, Videokonferenzen oder Webinaren unser berechtigtes Interesse gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO an der effektiven Durchführung des Online-Meetings, Webinars oder der Videokonferenz. Weitere Informationen zur Datennutzung durch Zoom finden Sie in der Datenschutzerklärung von Zoom unter
https://zoom.us/docs/de-de/privacy-and-legal.html
18. Rechte des Betroffenen
18.1
Das geltende Datenschutzrecht gewährt Ihnen gegenüber dem Verantwortlichen hinsichtlich der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten die nachstehenden Betroffenenrechte (Auskunfts- und Interventionsrechte), wobei für die jeweiligen Ausübungsvoraussetzungen auf die angeführte Rechtsgrundlage verwiesen wird:
Auskunftsrecht gemäß Art. 15 DSGVO;
Recht auf Berichtigung gemäß Art. 16 DSGVO;
Recht auf Löschung gemäß Art. 17 DSGVO;
Recht auf Einschränkung der Verarbeitung gemäß Art. 18 DSGVO;
Recht auf Unterrichtung gemäß Art. 19 DSGVO;
Recht auf Datenübertragbarkeit gemäß Art. 20 DSGVO;
Recht auf Widerruf erteilter Einwilligungen gemäß Art. 7 Abs. 3 DSGVO;
Recht auf Beschwerde gemäß Art. 77 DSGVO.
18.2
WIDERSPRUCHSRECHT
WENN WIR IM RAHMEN EINER INTERESSENABWÄGUNG IHRE PERSONENBEZOGENEN DATEN AUFGRUND UNSERES ÜBERWIEGENDEN BERECHTIGTEN INTERESSES VERARBEITEN, HABEN SIE DAS JEDERZEITIGE RECHT, AUS GRÜNDEN, DIE SICH AUS IHRER BESONDEREN SITUATION ERGEBEN, GEGEN DIESE VERARBEITUNG WIDERSPRUCH MIT WIRKUNG FÜR DIE ZUKUNFT EINZULEGEN.
MACHEN SIE VON IHREM WIDERSPRUCHSRECHT GEBRAUCH, BEENDEN WIR DIE VERARBEITUNG DER BETROFFENEN DATEN. EINE WEITERVERARBEITUNG BLEIBT ABER VORBEHALTEN, WENN WIR ZWINGENDE SCHUTZWÜRDIGE GRÜNDE FÜR DIE VERARBEITUNG NACHWEISEN KÖNNEN, DIE IHRE INTERESSEN, GRUNDRECHTE UND GRUNDFREIHEITEN ÜBERWIEGEN, ODER WENN DIE VERARBEITUNG DER GELTENDMACHUNG, AUSÜBUNG ODER VERTEIDIGUNG VON RECHTSANSPRÜCHEN DIENT.
WERDEN IHRE PERSONENBEZOGENEN DATEN VON UNS VERARBEITET, UM DIREKTWERBUNG ZU BETREIBEN, HABEN SIE DAS RECHT, JEDERZEIT WIDERSPRUCH GEGEN DIE VERARBEITUNG SIE BETREFFENDER PERSONENBEZOGENER DATEN ZUM ZWECKE DERARTIGER WERBUNG EINZULEGEN. SIE KÖNNEN DEN WIDERSPRUCH WIE OBEN BESCHRIEBEN AUSÜBEN.
MACHEN SIE VON IHREM WIDERSPRUCHSRECHT GEBRAUCH, BEENDEN WIR DIE VERARBEITUNG DER BETROFFENEN DATEN ZU DIREKTWERBEZWECKEN.
19. Dauer der Speicherung personenbezogener Daten
Die Dauer der Speicherung von personenbezogenen Daten bemisst sich anhand der jeweiligen Rechtsgrundlage, am Verarbeitungszweck und – sofern einschlägig – zusätzlich anhand der jeweiligen gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungsfrist (z.B. handels- und steuerrechtliche Aufbewahrungsfristen).
Bei der Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten auf Grundlage einer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. a DSGVO werden diese Daten so lange gespeichert, bis der Betroffene seine Einwilligung widerruft.
Existieren gesetzliche Aufbewahrungsfristen für Daten, die im Rahmen rechtsgeschäftlicher bzw. rechtsgeschäftsähnlicher Verpflichtungen auf der Grundlage von Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. b DSGVO verarbeitet werden, werden diese Daten nach Ablauf der Aufbewahrungsfristen routinemäßig gelöscht, sofern sie nicht mehr zur Vertragserfüllung oder Vertragsanbahnung erforderlich sind und/oder unsererseits kein berechtigtes Interesse an der Weiterspeicherung fortbesteht.
Bei der Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten auf Grundlage von Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO werden diese Daten so lange gespeichert, bis der Betroffene sein Widerspruchsrecht nach Art. 21 Abs. 1 DSGVO ausübt, es sei denn, wir können zwingende schutzwürdige Gründe für die Verarbeitung nachweisen, die die Interessen, Rechte und Freiheiten der betroffenen Person überwiegen, oder die Verarbeitung dient der Geltendmachung, Ausübung oder Verteidigung von Rechtsansprüchen.
Bei der Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten zum Zwecke der Direktwerbung auf Grundlage von Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. f DSGVO werden diese Daten so lange gespeichert, bis der Betroffene sein Widerspruchsrecht nach Art. 21 Abs. 2 DSGVO ausübt.
Sofern sich aus den sonstigen Informationen dieser Erklärung über spezifische Verarbeitungssituationen nichts anderes ergibt, werden gespeicherte personenbezogene Daten im Übrigen dann gelöscht, wenn sie für die Zwecke, für die sie erhoben oder auf sonstige Weise verarbeitet wurden, nicht mehr notwendig sind.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.cloudflare.com/privacypolicy/:
Solutions
By topic
By need
By industry
Public interest
Global services
Connectivity cloud
Contact sales
Products
Our products
For your employees
For apps and infrastructure
For developers
Register domain name
Free DNS resolver
Need help choosing?
Latest product news
Contact sales
Pricing
Our plans & pricing
For enterprise
For small business
For hobbyists and individuals
Compare all plans
Need help choosing?
View FAQs
Contact sales
Resources
Library
Documentation
Getting Started
Application Security
Application Services
Zero Trust Services
Developer Platform
Network Services
Insights
API
AI
Learning
Trust & compliance
Trends & insights
Blog
Cloudflare TV
Community forum
Get help
Contact sales
Partners
Partner network
Peering portal
Partner Network
Why Cloudflare
Why choose Cloudflare
Learn about Cloudflare
Comparisons
Why trust Cloudflare
Contact sales
Sign up
Sign up
Under attack?
Under attack?
Log in
Log in
Support
Community Support
Help Center
Contact Cloudflare
Lost account access?
Log in
Log in
Privacy Policy
Overview
Policy application
Information we collect
How we use information we collect
Data aggregation
Information sharing
Notice to UK and EU residents
International information transfers
Data subject rights and choices
Communication preferences
Data security, data integrity and access
Data retention
Notification of changes
Business transactions
English language controls
Dispute resolution
Notice to California residents
Contact information
Legal questions
Have Questions?
If you have questions about these terms or anything else about Cloudflare, please don't hesitate to contact us:
+1 (650) 319-8930
Cloudflare, Inc.
101 Townsend St,
San Francisco, CA 94107
USA
Cloudflare Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy is effective as of August 28, 2024.
We have updated our July 18, 2024 Privacy Policy to update the contact email of our Data Protection Officer.
This Cloudflare Privacy Policy (“Policy”) outlines the personal information that Cloudflare, Inc. (“Cloudflare”, “we”, “us” or “our”) gathers, how we use that personal information, and the options you have to access, correct, or delete such personal information.
CLOUDFLARE’S PROMISE
Our mission to help build a better Internet is rooted in the importance we place on establishing trust with our Customers, users, and the Internet community globally. To earn and maintain that trust, we commit to communicating transparently, providing security, and protecting the privacy of data on our systems.
We keep your personal information personal and private. We will not sell or rent your personal information. We will only share or otherwise disclose your personal information as necessary to provide our Services or as otherwise described in this Policy, except in cases where we first provide you with notice and the opportunity to consent.
1. POLICY APPLICATION
This Policy applies to Cloudflare’s collection, use, and disclosure of the personal information of the following categories of data subjects:
Attendees
: Those who visit our offices or provide their information to Cloudflare or Cloudflare representatives when they attend or register to attend Cloudflare-sponsored events or other events at which Cloudflare (and/or its representatives) participates, as well as those who participate in Cloudflare’s studies such as user experience research.
Website Visitors
: Those who visit our Websites, including those who may opt to provide an email address or other contact information to receive communications from Cloudflare, fill out a survey, or provide feedback. For the purposes of this Policy, “Websites” refer collectively to
www.cloudflare.com
as well as any other websites Cloudflare operates for its own behalf and that link to this Policy. For clarity, “Websites” does not include any sites owned or operated by our Customers, including where we serve as Registrar.
Customers
: Individuals or entities who enter into a subscription agreement with Cloudflare (or its authorized partner) and to whom Cloudflare provides Services pursuant to such agreement. For purposes of this Policy, “Services” shall refer to all of the cloud-based solutions offered, marketed, or sold by Cloudflare or its authorized partners that are designed to increase the performance, security, and availability of Internet properties, applications, devices, and networks, along with any software, software development kits, and application programming interfaces ("APIs") made available in connection with the foregoing.
Administrative Users
: Those with login credentials for a Cloudflare account and/or those who administer any of the Services for a Customer. In some cases, an Administrative User and Customer may be the same individual. In other cases, an Administrative User may be an agent acting on behalf of a Customer.
Public DNS Resolver Users
: Those who use Cloudflare’s 1.1.1.1 public recursive Domain Name System (“DNS”) resolver service, including 1.1.1.1 for Families ("1.1.1.1 resolver"). Learn more about the 1.1.1.1 resolver
here
.
End Users
: Those who (i) access or use our Customers’ domains, networks, websites, application programming interfaces, and applications, or (ii) Customers’ employees, agents, or contractors, who access or use Services, such as Cloudflare Zero Trust end users.
Registrants:
Users of Cloudflare’s domain registrar services. Cloudflare is an
ICANN
-accredited registrar and complies with the
2013 Registrar Accreditation Agreement
(“RAA”).
This Policy does not apply to “Application Users”—those individuals who use Cloudflare’s consumer-facing 1.1.1.1 Application. See the
1.1.1.1 Application Privacy Policy
for more information about the data collection and use practices for Cloudflare's 1.1.1.1 Application and the associated 1.1.1.1 Application Services.
This Policy also does not apply to our Customers’ domains, websites, APIs, applications, and networks, which may have their own terms and privacy policies. Our Customers are solely responsible for establishing policies for and ensuring compliance with all applicable laws and regulations, including those relating to the collection of personal information, in connection with the use of our Services by End Users with whom our Customers interact.
Cloudflare’s Websites and Services are not intended for, nor designed to attract, individuals under the age of eighteen. Cloudflare does not knowingly collect or share personal information from any person under the age of eighteen. To the extent we become aware that we have the personal information of a person under the age of eighteen, we will delete that information.
When Cloudflare is a reverse proxy, our IP addresses may appear in WHOIS and DNS records for websites using our Services. We are a conduit for information controlled by others. It is our Customers and their users who are responsible for the content transmitted across our network (e.g., images, written content, graphics, etc.).
2. INFORMATION WE COLLECT (Categories of Data Subjects)
Attendees
Name, email address, and other contact information
: We may ask for and collect personal information such as your name, address, phone number and email address when you visit our offices, register for or attend a sponsored event or other events at which Cloudflare (and/or its representatives) participates, or participate in Cloudflare’s studies such as user experience research.
Image and voice
: When you participate in a Cloudflare study, we may ask for your permission to record your voice and/or image during your participation in the study.
Website Visitors
Name, email address, and other contact information
: We ask for and—at your option—collect personal information from you when you submit web forms on our Websites, including opportunities to sign up for and agree to receive email communications from us. We may ask you to submit such personal information if you choose to use interactive features of the Websites, including participation in surveys, contests, promotions, sweepstakes, or studies, requesting customer support, submitting feedback, or otherwise communicating with us. We will send such communications in accordance with applicable law.
Log files
: Just as when you visit and interact with most websites and services delivered via the Internet, when you visit our Websites, including the Cloudflare Community Forum, we gather certain information and store it in log files. This information may include but is not limited to Internet Protocol (IP) addresses, system configuration information, URLs of referring pages, and locale and language preferences.
Cookies and other tracking technologies
: We may use cookies and other information-gathering technologies for a variety of purposes, such as providing us with information about how you interact with our Websites and assisting us in our marketing efforts. You may view a complete list of cookies and change your cookie preferences by clicking on the “Cookie Preferences” link (or, in the United States, the “Your Privacy Choices” link) in the footer of the Cloudflare homepage at cloudflare.com or in the banner displayed when you visit our Websites from certain countries (such as the European Economic Area and the UK). Note that if you disable cookies entirely, Cloudflare’s Websites may not function properly. We may also use cookies and similar technologies to provide you advertising on third-party sites based upon your browsing activities and interests. In addition to exercising cookie choices through our “Cookie Preferences” or “Your Privacy Choices” links, if you do not want to have cookies and similar technologies used for the purpose of serving you interest-based ads, you may opt-out by clicking
here
(or if located in the European Union, the United Kingdom, or Switzerland, click
here
). For more information about the cookies Cloudflare uses and your privacy choices, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Material contributed in Interactive Areas
: The Websites may offer publicly accessible blogs, community forums, comments sections, discussion forums, or other interactive features (“Interactive Areas”). If you choose to participate in any of these Interactive Areas, please be aware that any information that you post in an Interactive Area might be read, collected, and used by others who access it. If you wish to remove your personal information from any of our Interactive Areas, please see the Section 8, below.
Customers and Administrative Users
Customer Account Information
: When you register for an account, we collect contact information. Depending on subscription level, this contact information may include your Customer name, the email address(es) of your account administrator(s), telephone number, and addresses necessary to process payment and delivery of Services. In addition, when you use the Services, we collect information about how you configure your account and the Services (e.g., firewall settings for the domains you administer). We refer to all of this information collectively as “Customer Account Information” for the purposes of this Policy. Customer Account Information is required to enable your access to your Cloudflare account and Services. By providing us with any personal information, you represent that you are the owner of such personal information or otherwise have the requisite consent to provide it to us. We also maintain logs of Administrative Users’ activity (e.g., actions taken to configure settings in Customers’ account).
Payment information
: We do not require our Customers to have payment information on file with us unless they have a paid subscription to our Services. When you sign up for one of our paid Services, you must provide payment and billing information. The information you will need to submit depends on which payment method you choose. For example, if you pay with a credit card, we will collect your card information and billing address, although we do not store full credit card numbers or personal account numbers.
Crash Reports
: When our Services encounter an unexpected error, you may be asked to submit a crash report, which may contain personal information. You will have an opportunity to review the content of the report prior to submitting the report to us.
Public DNS Resolver Users
Limited DNS query data
: We will collect limited DNS query data that is sent to our 1.1.1.1 resolver. Our 1.1.1.1 resolver service does not log personal information, and the bulk of the limited non-personally identifiable query data is only stored for 25 hours. You can learn more about our 1.1.1.1 resolver commitment to privacy
here
.
Please note that our data handling practices for our 1.1.1.1 Application, which is not covered by this Policy, are somewhat different than our 1.1.1.1 resolver data handling practices and are described
here
.
End Users
Cloudflare processes End Users’ interactions with Customer’s Internet Properties and the Services. This information is processed when End Users access or use our Customers’ domains, websites, APIs, applications, devices, end points, and networks that use one or more of our Services, and when End Users access or use Services, such as Cloudflare Zero Trust. The information processed may include but is not limited to IP addresses, traffic routing data, system configuration information, and other information about traffic to and from Customers’ websites, devices, applications, and/or networks.
The End User data that we make available to our Customers via the Service dashboard or other online interface are specifically defined as “Customer Logs”.
Registrants
Contact and domain information: We collect data such as domain name and status, contact information (such as name, organization, address, phone number and email address), name server, DNSSEC, and Form of Approval (i.e., full WHOIS capture at time of transfer into our system, including the IP address that initiated the transfer).
Network Data.
Cloudflare collects and stores Network Data, which are models, observations, reports, analyses, statistics, databases and other information created, compiled, analyzed, generated or derived by Cloudflare from server, network or traffic data generated by Cloudflare in the course of providing the Service, including information required to help Cloudflare identify, analyze, mitigate, prevent, and block malicious activities on Cloudflare’s network. Examples of Network Data include service uptime and service availability metrics, request volumes, error rates, cache rates, origin and nature of malware, and IP threat scores.
3. HOW WE USE INFORMATION WE COLLECT
Cloudflare only processes personal information in a way that is compatible with and relevant to the purpose for which it was collected or authorized. As a general matter, for the categories of data described in Section 2 above, except 1.1.1.1 resolver user data as explained below, we may use your personal information to:
Provide, operate, maintain, improve, and promote the Websites and Services for all users of the Websites and Services;
Enable you to access and use the Websites and Services;
Process and complete transactions, and send you related information, including purchase confirmations and invoices;
Send transactional messages, including responses to your comments, questions, and requests; provide customer service and support; and send you technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
Comply with legal obligations as well as to investigate and prevent fraudulent transactions, unauthorized access to the Services, and other illegal activities;
For other purposes for which we obtain your consent.
In addition, we may use the information we collect from Attendees, Websites Visitors, and Registrants, as well as Customer Account Information for the following purposes:
Send commercial communications, in accordance with your communication preferences, such as providing you with information about products and services, features, surveys, newsletters, offers, promotions, contests, and events about us and our partners; and send other news or information about us and our partners. See Section 9 below for information on managing your communication preferences.
Process and deliver contest or sweepstakes entries and rewards;
Monitor and analyze trends, usage, and activities in connection with the Websites and Services and for marketing or advertising purposes;
Personalize the Websites and Services, including by providing features or content that match your interests and preferences;
To register visitors to our offices and to manage non-disclosure agreements that visitors may be required to sign, to the extent such processing is necessary for our legitimate interest in protecting our offices and our confidential information against unauthorized access; and
Public DNS Resolver Users
. We use information we collect from 1.1.1.1 resolver users to operate and improve the 1.1.1.1 resolver, such as to assist us in our debugging efforts if an issue arises. Our 1.1.1.1 resolver service does not store 1.1.1.1 resolver users’ personal information. We will not combine any information collected from DNS queries to our 1.1.1.1 resolver with any other Cloudflare or third party data in any way that can be used to identify individual end users. Cloudflare may store aggregated data, as outlined within our 1.1.1.1 resolver commitments to privacy, indefinitely in order to power Cloudflare Radar and assist Cloudflare in improving Cloudflare services, such as, enhancing the overall performance of the Cloudflare Resolver and identifying security threats. Learn more about our 1.1.1.1 resolver commitment to privacy
here
.
Information from Third Party Services
. We may combine information we collect as described in Section 2 above with personal information we obtain from third parties. For example, we may combine information entered on a Cloudflare sales submission form with information we receive from a third-party sales intelligence platform vendor to enhance our ability to market our Services to Customers or potential Customers.
4. DATA AGGREGATION
Cloudflare may aggregate data we acquire about our Customers, Administrators, and End Users. For example, we may assemble data to determine how Web crawlers index the Internet and whether they are engaged in malicious activity or to compile web traffic reports and statistics. Non-personally identifiable, aggregated data may be shared with third parties.
5. INFORMATION SHARING
We work with other companies who provide us with services that help run our business and the Cloudflare Service (“Service Providers”). These companies provide services to help us deliver customer support, process credit card payments, manage and contact our existing Customers and Administrators as well as sales leads, provide marketing support, and otherwise operate and improve our Services. These Service Providers may only process personal information pursuant to our instructions and in compliance both with this Privacy Policy, the contracts we have in place with such Service Providers, and other applicable confidentiality, data protection, and security measures and regulations.
Specifically, we do not permit our Service Providers to sell any personal information we share with them or to use any personal information we share with them for their own marketing purposes or for any purpose other than in connection with the services they provide to us.
In addition to sharing with Service Providers as described above, we also may share your information with others in the following circumstances:
Within the Cloudflare Group (defined for the purposes of this Policy as Cloudflare, Inc. (United States) and its subsidiaries listed Section 15);
With our resellers and other sales partners who may help us distribute the Services to Customers;
With an app developer when you install an app from our App Marketplace;
In the event of a merger, sale, change in control, or reorganization of all or part of our business;
When we are required to disclose personal information to respond to subpoenas, court orders, or legal process, or to establish or exercise our legal rights or defend against legal claims. (Learn more about how we handle law enforcement requests
here
);
Where we have a good-faith belief sharing is necessary to investigate, prevent or take action regarding illegal activities, suspected fraud, situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person, or violations of our Website Terms of Use, Self-Serve Subscription Agreement, and/or Enterprise Subscription Terms of Service; or as otherwise required to comply with our legal obligations; or
As you may otherwise consent from time to time.
Additional Information on Sharing
Public DNS Resolver Users.
Cloudflare does not share 1.1.1.1 resolver logs with any third parties except for anonymous logs shared with APNIC pursuant to a Research Cooperative Agreement. Learn more about information sharing specific to the 1.1.1.1 resolver
here
.
Registrants.
If you purchase a domain name from Cloudflare’s registrar service, ICANN (The Internet Corporation for Assigned Names and Numbers) and the relevant registry operators overseeing the domain’s top-level domain require us to collect registrant data for the purposes of domain registration and via the WHOIS protocol. We may also be required to share this public data with ICANN, the relevant registry operators and other such providers with whom we contract in order to provide our domain name services, and additionally upon the legitimate request of third parties. Registrant data may include the domain name, registrant name and other contact information, and domain name server information. See our Domain Registration Agreement
here
.
Marketing & Advertising Partners.
Our marketing and advertising partners may collect or receive personal information about you and/or collect certain information about your interactions with our Websites, or your email communications with Cloudflare, including through the use of cookies, beacons, and similar technologies, in order to gain insights that may help us market and advertise our services to you.  You may opt out of such sharing using our “Cookie Preferences” link (or, in the United States, the “Your Privacy Choices” link) on the cloudflare.com homepage.
In addition, we may also provide these marketing and advertising partners with your email address or other limited account information. You may opt out of such sharing by emailing us at sar@cloudflare.com.
These partners’ use of your information will be based on their own privacy policies. We share this personal information for our business purposes.
California residents can find additional information about data sharing for marketing and advertising purposes and their data subject rights in Section 16, below
6. NOTICE TO EU, UK, AND SWISS RESIDENTS
“Personal information” as referenced in this Privacy Policy means “personal data” as that term is defined under the European Union (“EU”) General Data Protection Regulations (“GDPR”) and its United Kingdom (“UK”) GDPR counterpart. Cloudflare is a data controller for the personal information collected from all categories of data subjects listed above, with the following exceptions: Cloudflare is a data processor of Customer Logs, Administrative User logs, and some account settings information. In addition, Cloudflare is a data processor for any of the content provided by Customers and End Users through the Services that transits, or in some cases, is stored on, the Cloudflare network. Where Cloudflare is a data processor, Cloudflare processes data on behalf of its Customers pursuant to their data processing instructions.
If you are an individual from the European Economic Area (the “EEA”), the UK or Switzerland, please note that our legal basis for collecting and using your personal information will depend on the personal information collected and the specific context in which we collect it. We normally will collect personal information from you only where: (a) we have your consent to do so, (b) where we need your personal information to perform a contract with you (e.g. to deliver the Cloudflare Services you have requested), or (c) where the processing is in our legitimate interests. Please note that in most cases, if you do not provide the requested information, Cloudflare will not be able to provide the requested service to you.
In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect personal information from you, or may otherwise need the personal information to protect your vital interests or those of another person. Where we rely on your consent to process your personal data, you have the right to withdraw or decline consent at any time. Where we rely on our legitimate interests to process your personal data, you have the right to object by emailing us at sar@cloudflare.com.
If you have any questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your personal information, please contact us at
privacyquestions@cloudflare.com
.
7. INTERNATIONAL INFORMATION TRANSFERS
Cloudflare is a U.S. based, global company. We primarily store your information in the United States and the European Economic Area. To facilitate our global operations, we may transfer and access such information from around the world, including from other countries in which the Cloudflare Group has operations for the purposes described in this Policy.
Whenever a Cloudflare company transfers personal information originating from one country to another Cloudflare group company or a third party service provider or partner in a different country, we will implement appropriate safeguards, consistent with the laws of the territory from which the data is exported. We describe the safeguards we implement
here
. If you have any questions about or need further information concerning the safeguards Cloudflare has in place to protect your personal information, please contact us at
privacyquestions@cloudflare.com
.
When Cloudflare transfers personal data from the EEA, Switzerland, or the United Kingdom (UK) to the United States, we rely on our certifications under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF), and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Should these certifications lapse or become otherwise invalidated, Cloudflare relies on the standard contractual clauses, including supplementary measures as necessary for transfers to the United States. We also use standard contractual clauses for other international transfers from the EEA, Switzerland, or the United Kingdom.
Self-certification to the Data Privacy Framework
Cloudflare complies with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.  Cloudflare has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.  Cloudflare has also certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern.  To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF (together, the “DPFs”), Cloudflare commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your personal information. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the DPFs should first contact us by emailing sar@cloudflare.com or via mail to: Cloudflare, Inc., 101 Townsend St., San Francisco, CA 94107, Attn: Data Protection Officer. We will respond to your inquiry within 30 days of receipt and verification of your identity.
In compliance with the DPFs, Cloudflare commits to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal information received in reliance on the DPFs to TRUSTe, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States.  If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
for more information or to file a complaint.  The services of TRUSTe, LLC are provided at no cost to you. You have the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration for complaints regarding DPF compliance not resolved by any of the other mechanisms set out in this DPF Notice or our Privacy Notice.  For more information, please see Annex 1 of the DPF Principles, available
here
.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Cloudflare’s compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF). We may be required to disclose personal information we receive under the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
Cloudflare is liable for the processing of personal information it receives under the DPF Principles and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on its behalf.  Cloudflare shall remain liable under the DPF Principles if its agent processes such personal information in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless Cloudflare proves that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
8. DATA SUBJECT RIGHTS AND CHOICES
Cloudflare  recognizes individuals’ data protection rights. You have the right to access, correct, update, port, or delete your personal information, and to restrict or object to the processing of your personal information (each of these a “Rights Request”). You may email us at sar@cloudflare.com with any Rights Request, and we will respond within thirty (30) days. Customers and Administrative Users also can access, correct, export, or update their Account Information by editing their profile or organization record at Cloudflare.com.
Please note that before we can complete your Rights Request, we will need to verify that your identity matches that of the data in which you are requesting to exercise your rights. You can expect a verification email under separate cover, to the email address associated with your personal information on file. If you are making a Rights Request on behalf of another individual as an authorized agent, we require that either (a) the data subject must verify their identity and directly confirm with Cloudflare they provided the authorized agent permission to submit the Rights Request, (b) the authorized agent must be provided power of attorney by the data subject in accordance with the law of the data subject’s jurisdiction, or (c) the Rights Request must otherwise be submitted in accordance with applicable privacy law.
For any Rights Request, we will need to verify a requestor is inquiring about their own information before we can assist. Where a Rights Request may implicate the personal information of another individual, we must balance the request against the risk of violating another person’s privacy rights. We will comply with Rights Requests to the extent required by applicable law or the Swiss-U.S. or EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework. In the event that your Rights Request is denied, residents of the U.S. states Virginia and Colorado may appeal our decision by responding to the email informing them of the denial or by submitting a Rights Request to appeal to sar@cloudflare.com, and we will respond within sixty (60) days. In the EEA, the UK, and Switzerland, you also have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority.
Please note that we do not retain any personal information about 1.1.1.1 resolver users that would be subject to the Rights Requests described above. In addition, Cloudflare has no direct relationship with End Users. Even where “Cloudflare” may be indicated as the authoritative name server for a domain, unless Cloudflare is the owner of that domain, we have no control over a domain’s content. Accordingly, we rely upon our Customers to comply with the underlying legal requirements for Rights Requests in accordance with their obligations under applicable data protection laws. If an End User requests that we fulfill a Rights Request, we will direct that End User to contact the Customer website(s) with which they interacted directly. Our Customers are solely responsible for ensuring compliance with all applicable laws and regulations with respect to their website users.
9. COMMUNICATION PREFERENCES
Cloudflare will send you commercial communications based on the communication preferences in your account settings. Cloudflare also will send you service-related communications. You may manage your receipt of commercial communications by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link located on the bottom of such emails, through your account settings if you have a Cloudflare account, or you may send a request to unsubscribe@cloudflare.com.
10. DATA SECURITY, DATA INTEGRITY AND ACCESS
We take all reasonable steps to protect information we receive from you from accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, and unauthorized disclosure or access. We have put in place appropriate physical, technical and administrative measures to safeguard and secure your information, and we make use of privacy-enhancing technologies such as encryption. If you have any questions about the security of your personal information, you can contact us at
privacyquestions@cloudflare.com
.
11. DATA RETENTION
We store your personal information for a period of time that is consistent with the business purposes set forth in Section 3 of this policy or as long as needed to fulfill and comply with legal obligations. The criteria we used to determine how long we store your personal information will vary depending on several different factors. We typically consider the following when determining data retention:
The purpose for collecting the personal information in the first place. For example, if you have an active account with us, we need to keep your contact information during the entirety of that time in order to provide you with support or contact you regarding your account;
The volume, nature, and sensitivity of the personal information we are processing;
The potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of the personal information;
Whether we can achieve the purposes for processing with less data or through other means
Legal requirements that may apply to the data, such as applicable statutes of limitation or contractual obligations.
When the data retention period expires for a given type of data, we will delete or destroy it. If, for technical reasons, we are unable to do so, we will implement appropriate security measures to prevent any further use of such data.
12. NOTIFICATION OF CHANGES
If we make changes to this Policy that we believe materially impact the privacy of your personal information, we will promptly provide notice of any such changes (and, where necessary, obtain consent), as well as post the updated Policy on this website noting the effective date of any changes.
13. BUSINESS TRANSACTIONS
We may assign or transfer this Policy, as well as information covered by this Policy, in the event of a merger, sale, change in control, or reorganization of all or part of our business.
14. ENGLISH LANGUAGE CONTROLS
Non-English translations of this Policy are provided for convenience only. In the event of any ambiguity or conflict between translations, the English version is authoritative and controls.
15. DISPUTE RESOLUTION
If you have an unresolved privacy or data-use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
16. NOTICE TO CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
This section applies only to California residents. It describes how we collect, use, and share Personal Information of California residents in operating our business, and their rights with respect to that Personal Information. For purposes of this section, “Personal Information” means information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household as defined in the CCPA. It does not include information exempted from the scope of the CCPA.
How We Collect, Use, and Share Your Personal Information under the CCPA
We may collect, use, and disclose for our business and commercial purposes, the following categories of Personal Information:
Identifiers for the categories of individuals/users defined in Section 1 of the Cloudflare Privacy Policy (e.g., email address of Customers and Administrative Users, name and contact information of Attendees);
Payment and customer records information of our Customers;
Protected classification characteristics (e.g., age, ethnicity, race, languages spoken, or gender) to the extent these characteristics are voluntarily disclosed to us or contained in any  content transmitted across or stored on our network;
Commercial information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or usage histories);
Professional or employment information;
Internet or other electronic network activity information; and
Inferences (e.g., information about your interests or preferences).
The sources from which we collect information are described in Section 2 of the Cloudflare Privacy Policy.
The business and commercial purposes for which we collect and use this information are described in Section 3 of the Cloudflare Privacy Policy.
The categories of third parties to whom we “disclose” the information for a business purpose are described in Section 5 of the Cloudflare Privacy Policy.
Your California Privacy Rights
As a California resident, you have the rights listed below. However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Knowledge
. You can request information about what personal information we have collected about you, including:
the categories of personal information;
the categories of sources from which the personal information is collected;
the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, or sharing personal information;
the categories of third parties to whom we disclose personal information;
the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected about you.
Access
. You can request a copy of the Personal Information that we have collected about you.
Deletion
. You can ask us to delete the Personal Information that we have collected from you.
Correction
. You can ask us to rectify inaccurate personal information and, taking into account the purpose of processing the personal information, ensure it is complete;
Opt-out of sales or sharing
. You can ask that we do not “sell” or “share” your Personal Information as “sell” and “share” are explicitly defined under the CCPA. For more information, please refer to the section titled “Right to Opt Out of the Sale and Sharing of Your Personal Information” below.
Nondiscrimination
. You are entitled to exercise the rights described above free from discrimination. This means that we will not penalize you for exercising your rights by taking actions such as denying you the Services; increasing the price/rate of the Services; decreasing service quality; or suggesting that we may penalize you as described above for exercising your rights.
In order to submit a request to exercise your right of information, access, or deletion pursuant to the CCPA, please follow the instructions for the submitting a Rights Request detailed in Section 8, above. Please note, we reserve the right to confirm your California residence to process your requests and may need to confirm your identity to process certain requests using the verification methods described in Section 8. For example, we take reasonable precautions to verify the identities of those California residents submitting requests to delete or access Personal Information.
Right to Opt Out of the Sale and Sharing of Your Personal Information
Cloudflare does not sell your Personal Information in the conventional sense (i.e., for money). Like many companies, however, we use services that help deliver interest-based ads to you and may transfer Personal Information to business partners for their use. Making Personal Information (such as online identifiers or browsing activity) available to these companies may be considered a “sale” or “sharing” of your Personal Information under the CCPA.
You can request to opt out of such “sale” or “sharing” of your Personal Information using the “
Your Privacy Choices”
link in the footer below
.
In addition, some internet browsers offer the option to enable opt-out signals such as Global Privacy Control that lets you tell websites that you do not want to have your online activities tracked. Cloudflare responds to these signals by processing them as a request to opt out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your Personal Information as discussed above.
Please note that you will still see some advertising, regardless of your selection. We do not impose verification protocols for processing opt out requests unless we have reason to question the authenticity of a requester’s identity, in which case we may request evidence of identity and California residency.
17. CONTACT INFORMATION
Cloudflare, Inc.
101 Townsend St.
San Francisco, CA 94107
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare (Canada) Information Technology Co., Ltd.
Suite 2600, Three Bentall Centre
595 Burrard Street, P.O. Box 49314
Vancouver, BC V7X 1L3
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare, Ltd.
County Hall/The Riverside Building
Belvedere Road
London, SE1 7PB
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Portugal, Unipessoal Lda.
Largo Rafael Bordalo Pinheiro 29
1200-369 Lisboa
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Germany GmbH
Rosental 7
80331 München
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare France SAS
6 place de la Madeleine
75008 Paris
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Netherlands B.V.
Keizersgracht 62,
1015CS Amsterdam
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Pte., Ltd.
182 Cecil Street, #35-01
Frasers Tower, Singapore 069547
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Australia Pty Ltd.
333 George St., 5th Floor
Sydney, NSW 2000
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare (Beijing) Information Technology Co., Ltd.
16 South Guangshun Street
Donghuang Building 17th Floor
Chaoyang District Beijing 100015
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Japan K.K.
Marunouchi Kitaguchi Building 9F
1-6-5 Marunouchi, Chiyoda-ku
Tokyo, 100-0005
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Middle East FZ-LLC
DIC 1 Internet City Road
Building 1, Ground Floor, Office 17
Jumeirah
Dubai UAE
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare India Private Limited
No. 215 Richmond Towers, 12 Richmond Road, Richmond Town
Banglore, Bangalore, Karnataka, India, 560025
Attention: Grievance Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Area 1 Security, LLC
838 Walker Road Suite 21-2,
Dover, DE, 19904
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Korea LLC
8-113 (Samseong-dong), Teheran-ro 507
Gangnam-gu, Seoul, South Korea, 06168
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Mexico S. de R.L de C.V.
Bosque de Ciruelos No. 180 int. PP 101, Col. Bosque de las Lomas, Miguel Hidalgo
Ciudad de México, 11700, México
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Malaysia Sdn. Bhd.
Level 21, Suite 21.01, The Gardens South Tower,
Mid Valley City,
Lingkaran Syed Putra,
Kuala Lumpur
Wilayah Persekutuan
59200
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Getting Started
Free plans
For enterprises
Compare plans
Domain name search
Get a recommendation
Request a demo
Contact sales
Resources
Learning center
Analyst reports
Cloudflare Radar
Cloudflare TV
Case studies
Webinars
White Papers
Developer docs
Architecture Center
theNET
Blog
Find an expert
Solutions
Connectivity cloud
SSE and SASE services
Application services
Network services
Developer services
Community
Community hub
Project Galileo
Athenian Project
Cloudflare for Campaigns
Critical Infrastructure Defense Project
Support
Help center
Cloudflare status
Trust-hub
Compliance
GDPR
Trust & safety
Company
About Cloudflare
Our team
Investor relations
Press
Careers
Diversity, equity, & inclusion
Impact/ESG
Network map
Logos & press kit
Become a partner
Sub-policy 1
https://www.whatsapp.com/legal/?eea=1#privacy-policy:
Skip to content
Last updated: 16 February 2024 (
archived versions
)
WhatsApp Privacy Policy
Table of Contents
Key Updates
WhatsApp Legal Info
Information We Collect
Information Shared by You and by WhatsApp with Third Parties
How We Work With Other Meta Companies
How and Why We Process Your Information and Our Legal Basis For Processing
How To Exercise Your Rights
Retention of Your Information
Deleting Your Information
Managing Your Information
Working With Authorities, Advisors And Industry Partners
Transferring information outside the EEA as part of Our Global Operations
Updates to Our Privacy Policy
Contact Us
If you live in the
UK
, WhatsApp LLC provides the Services to you under this
Terms of Service
and
Privacy Policy
.
If you live outside the
UK
or
European Region
, WhatsApp LLC provides the Services to you under this
Terms of Service
and
Privacy Policy
.
Key Updates
We’ve updated our Privacy Policy in line with new EU regulations. We’ve also made changes to our international data transfer mechanisms and changes to ensure a consistent minimum age requirement for WhatsApp globally. These updates include:
Digital Markets Act (DMA) requirements: Under the DMA, WhatsApp is required to make basic functionalities of its messaging service interoperable with other third party providers of messaging services. We’ve added information for users who choose to use the interoperable message experience to explain the new processing activities.
Digital Services Act (DSA) requirements: We've added information covering our processing in line with our regulatory obligations under the DSA.
International data transfer mechanisms: We’re making changes to our international data transfer mechanisms. For users in the European Region, we will adopt the new EU-US Data Privacy Framework.
Minimum age requirement: We’re reducing the minimum age to use WhatsApp in the European Region from 16 to 13. This ensures a consistent minimum age requirement for WhatsApp globally.
As always, your personal messages and calls are end-to-end encrypted. No one else, not even WhatsApp, can read or listen to them.
Back to top
WhatsApp Legal Info
If you live in the
European Region
, WhatsApp Ireland Limited ("WhatsApp," "our," "we," or "us") provides our
Services
to you under the
Terms of Service
and this Privacy Policy.
Respect for your privacy is coded into our DNA. Since we started WhatsApp, we've aspired to build our
Services
with a set of strong privacy principles in mind.
We are one of the
Meta Companies
. Our Privacy Policy ("Privacy Policy") explains our data practices, including the information we process to provide our
Services
.
For example, our Privacy Policy talks about what information we collect and how this affects you. It also explains the steps we take to protect your privacy, like building our Services so delivered messages aren't stored by us and giving you control over who you communicate with on our Services.
This Privacy Policy applies to all of our Services unless specified otherwise. Some products or features that we offer have supplemental privacy policies which supplement this WhatsApp Privacy Policy:
Channels Supplemental Privacy Policy
. If you are a user of another messaging service that is interoperable with WhatsApp under Article 7 of the Digital Markets Act, then this
notice
applies to you for the limited processing activities that enable interoperable messaging.
Please also read WhatsApp's
Terms of Service
("Terms"), which describe the terms under which you use and we provide our Services.
Back to top
Information We Collect
The types of information we receive and collect depend on how you use our Services. We require certain of
Your Account Information
in accordance with our Terms to deliver our Services and without this we will not be able to provide our Services to you. For example, you must provide your mobile phone number to create an account to use our Services.
Our Services have optional features which, if used by you, require us to collect additional information to provide such features. You will be notified of such a collection, as appropriate. If you choose not to provide the information needed to use a feature, you will be unable to use the feature. For example, you cannot share your
Precise Location Information
with your contacts if you do not enable location sharing on your device. Permissions can be managed through your device-based settings on both
Android
and
iOS
devices.
As always, your personal messages and calls remain end-to-end encrypted. No one else, not even WhatsApp, can read or listen to them.
Information You Provide
Your Account Information
. You must provide your mobile phone number and a profile name of your choice to create a WhatsApp account. If you don’t provide us with this information, you will not be able to create an account to use our Services. You can add other optional information to your account, such as a profile picture, and "about" information.
User Content.
Your Messages, Media within Messages, and Calls: We offer end-to-end encryption for our Services. End-to-end encryption means that your calls, messages, media within messages including content like images, audio, video, documents and files are encrypted to protect against third parties (including WhatsApp) from seeing that content. Learn more about
end-to-end encryption
and
how businesses communicate with you on WhatsApp
.
Typically your messages are stored on your device(s) and not on our servers. We temporarily store your messages in encrypted form while they are being delivered. Once your messages are delivered, they are deleted from our servers.
If a message cannot be delivered, we keep it in encrypted form on our servers for up to 30 days while we try to deliver it. If a message is still undelivered after 30 days, we delete it. We cannot see the contents of undelivered messages stored on our servers as they are encrypted.
When a user sends media within a message, we store that media for up to 30 days in encrypted form on our servers to aid in more efficient delivery, such as if recipients choose to forward the media. We cannot see the media as it is encrypted.
Status Information. You can choose to share your Status, which is also end-to-end encrypted.
Precise Location Information. We enable you to share your Precise Location Information from your device when you choose to use location-related features, like when you decide to share your current location with, or send live location to your contacts, or view locations nearby. Precise Location Information that you share with your contacts in your chats is encrypted so WhatsApp cannot see it. You can control your Precise Location Information sharing in your in-app settings (see more information for
iPhone
and
Android
) and your device-based settings.
You may also provide content that is not encrypted which means that we can see it. This includes your profile picture, your "about" information and names and descriptions of your communities and groups. When you choose to use certain avatars features, such as using a photo to enable us to suggest an avatar that more closely resembles you, we process the photo and parts of your face or body features in the photo frame. The information we use for this process is not used to identify you.
Your Connections
.
You can use contact upload and provide us with the phone numbers in your device address book on a regular basis, including those of users of our Services and your other contacts. If any of your contacts aren’t yet using our Services, we’ll manage this information in a way that is designed to ensure that those contacts cannot be identified by us. Learn more
about contact upload
and about the information we provide to people who do not use WhatsApp
here
. We also collect information on users who contact you that aren't in your device address book and any users you've blocked or who have blocked you.
Your Community and Group Information
.
You can create, join, or get added to communities, groups and broadcast lists, and such communities, groups and lists get associated with your account. You give your groups and communities a name. You can provide a community or group profile picture or description. We also collect information about when communities and groups are created or updated.
Customer Support Information And Other Communications
.
When you contact us for customer support or otherwise communicate with us (for example, through optional surveys), you may provide us with information related to your use of our Services, including copies of your messages, any other information you deem helpful in order for us to understand and resolve your query, and how to contact you (e.g., an email address). For example, you may send us an email with information relating to app performance or other issues. We also collect information on how you use our customer support features (e.g., the searches you make on our Help Center), any feedback you give us on the customer support experience and your responses to surveys or questions on a range of topics (including, for example, what you like or don't like about the Service or Meta Companies).
Account Access Information
.
When you sign up or log-in to our Service, we verify your WhatsApp account, for example, by sending you a code via SMS or calling you. You can also add a PIN to enable two-step verification and an email address that can be used to reset that PIN. Depending on the circumstances, we ask you for information to prove that you are the true owner of your WhatsApp account.
Automatically Collected Information
Usage Information
.
We collect information about your usage of our Services. This includes collecting information about your activity (including how you use our Services), how you interact with others using our Services (including when you search for and interact with a business), and the time, frequency, and duration of your activities. This also includes information about the features you use like our messaging (and integrated applications), calling, Status, avatars, communities, groups or business features; whether you are online; timestamps related to your use such as when you last used our Services (your "last seen") and the times you send and receive calls and messages; and when you last updated your "about" information.
Log and Troubleshooting Information
.
We collect information about how our Services are performing when you use them, like service related diagnostic and performance information. This information includes log files, timestamps, diagnostic or crash data, website performance logs and error messages or reports.
Device And Connection Information
.
We collect device and connection-specific information when you install, access, or use our Services. This includes information such as hardware model, operating system information, battery level, signal strength, app version, browser information, mobile network, connection information including whether you are using wifi or cellular data, mobile operator or internet service provider (ISP), language and time zone, IP address, device operations information and identifiers (including identifiers unique to
Meta Company Products
associated with the same device or account).
General Location Information
.
Even if you do not choose to use our precise location-related features (see
Information Shared by You and by WhatsApp with Third Parties
), we use IP addresses and other information like phone number area codes, to estimate your general location (e.g., country).
Cookies
.
We collect information using cookies to operate and provide our web-based Services and website.
Learn more
about how we use cookies to provide you our Services.
User Choices
.
We collect information about your in-app settings, privacy settings and records about when you accepted terms. Only you are in control of your
privacy settings
which can be used to change, for example, who can see your "last seen", profile photo, "about" information, Status updates, read receipts or add you to groups. We also collect information about whether you have enabled push notifications and whether you wish to send disappearing messages.
Authentication Information
.
To verify and grant appropriate authorisations as you use the Services (such as when you choose to use encrypted backups and create your unique password), we create and store authentication codes which are a security measure to ensure only you are accessing your account. Authentication Information also includes your public encryption keys that our end-to-end encryption protocol uses. Messages are encrypted before they reach our servers which means that we cannot see them.
Information Third Parties Provide About You
Information Others Provide About You
.
We receive information about you from other users. For example, when other users you know use our Services, they may provide your phone number if they use
contact upload
just as you may provide theirs. We require each of these users to have lawful rights to collect, use, and share your information before providing any information to us. They may also send you messages, send messages to groups to which you belong, or call you. You should keep in mind that in general any user can capture screenshots of your chats or messages or make recordings of your calls with them and send them to WhatsApp or anyone else, or post them on another platform.
User Reports
.
Just as you can report other users, other users or third parties may also choose to report to us your interactions and your messages with them or others on our Services; for example, to report possible violations of our Terms or policies. When a report is submitted to us through the reporting tools, we receive information from the reporter on both the reporting user and those reported. To find out more about the information we receive when a User Report is submitted to us and what happens when a User Report is submitted, please see
About blocking and reporting contacts
.
Businesses On WhatsApp
.
When businesses you interact with while using our Services provide us with information about their interactions with you, we require each of these businesses to act in accordance with applicable law.
When you
message with a business on WhatsApp
, keep in mind that the content you share may be visible to several people in that business. In addition, some businesses might be working with third-party service providers (which may include Meta) to help manage their communications with their customers. For example, a business may give such third-party service providers access to its communications to send, store, read, manage or otherwise process them for the business. To understand how a business processes your information, including how it might share your information with third parties or Meta, you should review that business’s privacy policy or contact the business directly.
Third-Party Services
.
WhatsApp receives information about bad actors and abuse from
Meta Companies
and app verification information from anti-abuse services to promote safety, security and integrity. For example, when Meta becomes aware of a scam encouraging individuals to contact a phone number via WhatsApp, they might share that phone number with WhatsApp so we can investigate the WhatsApp account.
We also allow you to use our Services in connection with third-party services and
Meta Company Products
. If you use our Services with such third-party services or
Meta Company Products
, we may receive information about you from them; for example, if you use the WhatsApp share button on a news service to share a news article with your WhatsApp contacts, groups, or broadcast lists on our Services.
When you choose to communicate with users of third party interoperable messaging services under Article 7 of the Digital Markets Act, we receive limited information to enable you to successfully send and receive messages, namely whether your messages are successfully delivered, information about the type of message (text or media) and when it was sent.
Please note that when you use third-party services or
Meta Company Products
, the terms and privacy policies of the company that offers those services will govern your use of those services and products.
Back to top
Information Shared by You and by WhatsApp with Third Parties
You share your information as you use and communicate through our Services, and we share your information to help us operate, provide, improve, understand, customise and support our Services.
Send Your Information To Those With Whom You Choose To Communicate
. You share
User Content
when you communicate through our Services or if you choose to communicate with users of third party interoperable messaging services. You are in control of what you are sending when you send your information to the individual or business WhatsApp users you choose to communicate with. Please be mindful that, once you have sent User Content to a WhatsApp user, they can store or reshare it with others on and off our Services.
Information Associated With Your Account
. As part of your WhatsApp messaging experience and based on your privacy settings, those users who have your phone number can see Your Account Information (phone number, profile photo, "about" information), and can add you to groups and communities where this information is then potentially visible to others in the group or community. When you send a message to another user or to a group, your chosen profile name will become visible to the recipients of the message, including users who do not have you in their contact list. Users who have your phone number can also see your "last seen" information and your message receipts, depending on your privacy settings. You can configure your privacy settings to manage group membership, and certain information (for example, your "last seen") available to other users. Please see our Help Center for more information on
how to change your privacy settings
.
Third-Party Services
. When you, or other users you interact with, use third-party services or other
Meta Company Products
that are linked through our Services, or if you choose to communicate with users on third party interoperable messaging services, the providers of those services or products may receive the information about you that you or others share with them. For example, if you use a data backup service integrated with our Services (like iCloud or Google Account), they will receive the information you share with them, such as your WhatsApp messages, and if you search the web from WhatsApp for a group profile picture, the search engine provider will receive the search term you use. If you interact with a third-party service or other
Meta Company Products
through our Services, such as when you use the in-app player to play content from a third-party platform like YouTube or Facebook, information like your IP address and technical information showing that the request comes from a WhatsApp app, may be provided to the provider of such service or products. If you choose to communicate with users of third party interoperable messaging services, your phone number and some Usage Information, Device And Connection Information and Authentication Information will be shared with the applicable third party interoperable messaging service. Please note that when you use third-party services or other
Meta Company Products
, their own terms and privacy policies will govern your use of those services and products.
Third-Party Service Providers.
We work with third-party service providers to help us provide our Services.
When we share information with third-party service providers in this capacity, we require them to use your information on our behalf in accordance with our instructions and terms.
We work with the following different types of third-party service providers:
telecommunications technology providers to send you SMS messages, or call you, to verify your account. To be able to provide these services, these providers receive Your Account Information (phone number) and Account Access Information (verification codes to enable you to verify a new phone number or device connected to your account). The providers we currently use are located in Sweden, the Netherlands, the UK and the United States.
a content safety technology service provider that helps us to maintain the safety and integrity of the Services by detecting and helping us to prioritise harmful material for our reviewers to assess. To provide these services, this provider receives certain images from User Reports (e.g. images), Your Account Information (e.g. profile picture) and Your Community and Group Information (e.g. community or group profile picture). The provider we currently use is located in the United States.
a location data provider to enable you to share your location or a nearby place with other WhatsApp users. To be able to provide these services, this provider receives Precise Location Information (your current location and other locations you choose on the map). The provider we currently use is located in the United States.
Please also see the
How We Work With Other Meta Companies
and
Working with Authorities, Advisors and Industry Partners
sections for further information we share.
Back to top
How We Work With Other Meta Companies
WhatsApp is one of the
Meta Companies
. The Meta Companies provide technology products and services for both individuals and businesses.
We work with other Meta Companies that act as our service providers and help us provide and improve our Services. When Meta Companies act as our service providers, we require them to use your information on our behalf in accordance with our instructions and terms.
We work with Meta Companies in the United States and Ireland that assist us with the operation of our Services. To receive these services we share
Information We Collect
.
We work with Meta Companies and other companies which are owned by Meta in the United States that provide data hosting and infrastructure services, including the use of
data centers
together with related services and equipment which are used to operate the Services. We share the
Information We Collect
with these companies.
We work with Meta Companies in the UK, Israel and the United States that provide us with business analytics services so that we can learn for example how many unique users we have compared to other services offered by the
Meta Companies
. We share
Your Account Information
(phone number),
Device and Connection Information
(identifiers associated with the same device or account, hardware model, operating system information and app versions, mobile country code and network code),
User Choices
(records about Terms acceptance, and user settings),
Usage Information
(when you last used WhatsApp and the date you first registered your account, time of activities) and your
Customer Support Information and Other Communications.
We work with a Meta Company in the United States that provides services to:
help carry out two factor authentication; and
provide technical engineering support and trouble-shooting in relation to our interaction with mobile phone networks.
We share Your Account Information (phone number) and Account Access Information (verification code) in order to obtain this service.
We work with other Meta Companies in:
the United States that provide us with operational, administrative and customer support services to help us:
operate, improve, and develop the Services;
develop, fix and customise the Services;
respond to user/non-user queries and provide support relating to the queries;
ensure accounts are kept safe and secure;
with contract administration, project management, planning and any related purposes; and
carry out surveys.
the UK, United States that provide us with:
product research and testing (features of) services to help us improve our Services; and
troubleshoot technical issues, and ensure the Services operate smoothly.
the UK, Ireland, Germany and United States, that provide us with legal advice and legal support services to help us:
in litigation and other dispute processes;
regulatory investigations and other statutory processes;
with handling complaints and/or requests from data subjects;
with responding to government and other legal requests;
with our legal administration;
with the management of privacy-related queries, including development of tooling and record repositories; and
with other legal support as requested from time to time.
Ireland, the United States and Singapore, that provide us with assistance when we respond pursuant to applicable law or regulations, to legal requests and government requests, including in emergency situations, with:
disclosing relevant personal information to law enforcement, government authorities, regulators or others; and
disclosing personal information to third parties in the context of civil legal proceedings.
the United States and UK, that provide administrative services to help us with our efforts to ensure that the Services are safe and secure by:
investigating any suspicious activities or violations of our policies; and
removing violating accounts.
Ireland, the United States and Singapore, that provide us with services to help us to guard against violations of our intellectual property by:
reviewing accounts for violation of WhatsApp policies;
assisting with enforcement against those accounts;
providing periodic reports to us on individual accounts that have been reviewed and enforced upon; and
escalating any cases requiring legal review to us.
For receiving the services listed above and depending on the service that is provided, we share the
Information We Collect
.
If you would like further details about the Meta Companies that currently act as our service providers, please click
here
.
Back to top
How and Why We Process Your Information and Our Legal Basis For Processing
Under applicable data protection law in the European Region (such as the GDPR), companies must have a legal basis to process information. We rely on different legal bases to process your information for the various purposes described in this Privacy Policy.
For each legal basis below, we describe the purposes of our processing (why we process your information) and our processing operations (how we process your information to achieve each purpose). We also list the categories of your information that we process for each purpose.
You also have particular rights available to you depending on which legal basis we use, and we've explained these below. You should know that no matter what legal basis applies, you always have the right to request access to, rectification of, and erasure of your information. To exercise your rights, see the
How To Exercise Your Rights
section.
Information that we process to convey your messages or calls (which includes information like your phone number, the time and date you make a call or send a message, or the duration of your calls) is subject to and handled in accordance with the specific rules and requirements under the EU Directive 2002/58/EC, where applicable.
Back to top
Processing necessary to perform our contract with you
For all users who have the legal capacity to enter into an enforceable contract (for example, by being the age of majority or above in their country of residence), we process information as necessary to conclude and perform our contract with you, our
Terms
.
The categories of information used and why and how they are processed, are set out below:
Why And How We Process Your Information
Information Categories Used
To operate, provide, customise, and support our Services
as described in the About Our Services section of our
Terms
which includes providing ways for you to connect and communicate with other WhatsApp users including businesses, WhatsApp:
Assists you in creating and managing your WhatsApp account by:
verifying your WhatsApp account by, for example, sending you a verification code via SMS or by calling you.
checking the operating system and other features of your device to set up WhatsApp correctly on your device, and running security checks to make sure you don’t already have an account or a phone number that is banned from WhatsApp.
recording your User Choices, including the terms you accepted, your privacy settings and the users you’ve blocked.
facilitating you adding additional information such as an avatar or Account Information such as a profile picture, “about” information which is displayed to people who have your phone number, in line with your privacy settings.
changing the phone number associated with your WhatsApp account when you update it.
in order to maintain security, limit data retention and protect your privacy, checking for activity every 30 days and deleting your account where your phone has not been online for 120 days (in general). Learn more in our Help Center
here
.
deleting your account, at your request (see how to delete your account on your
iPhone
and on your
Android
device) or in accordance with our Terms. We may take steps to ban your account if there is a breach of our Terms, for example a breach of our "Acceptable Use of Our Services" terms.
enabling you to re-register your account when it has been deactivated or locked.
To assist you in creating and managing your WhatsApp account:
Your Account Information
User Content (Avatars)
Your Connections
Account Access Information
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
User Choices
Authentication Information
Facilitates you using and managing your WhatsApp account on multiple devices by:
linking a new device to your account so that you can use WhatsApp on additional devices and so that we can register certain additional devices on our servers.
syncing Your Account Information and User Choices across your
devices
by sending an update to other devices linked to your account.
sending an end-to-end encrypted copy of your chat history to your new companion
devices
when you sync your chats (we temporarily store this encrypted copy to complete the sync).
For linking a device to your account:
Your Account Information
Device and Connection Information
Authentication Information
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
For syncing your Account Information and User Choices across your devices:
Your Account Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
User Choices
For syncing your chat history across your devices:
Your Account Information
User Content
(your messages, images, audio and videos are end-to-end encrypted)
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
Authentication Information
To send and receive
end-to-end encrypted
messages and broadcast your Status, we:
enable you to reply to, forward and delete messages, or to send different types of messages such as voice messages, “View Once” or disappearing messages.
if the recipient’s device is online on WhatsApp, deliver messages directly to their device. If your device or the recipient’s device is offline, we store the encrypted message for up to 30 days as we attempt to deliver the message and send a push notification to the device.
show when you are online or indicate activity to recipients in a chat, such as displaying your ‘last seen’ to recipients according to your User Choices.
enable you to search the web for images to use as a community or group profile picture or to share videos from third-party services such as YouTube. Where that link is a video, we display a preview and allow the recipient to view it within the chat.
allow you to broadcast your Status updates with contacts of your choice. Status updates disappear after 24 hours.
take precautions to ensure your messages are conveyed correctly.
optimise the sending of media files by storing them temporarily for up to 30 days in encrypted form on our servers to aid in more efficient delivery.
enable you and third parties, like businesses, to communicate and interact with each other using our services such as
catalogs for businesses
on WhatsApp where you can browse products and services and place orders.
use cookies to operate and provide our web-based Services.
To send and receive
end-to-end encrypted
messages and to broadcast your Status:
Your Account Information
User Content
(your messages, images, audio, video, documents and files are end-to-end encrypted, as is the Status you share)
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
Cookies
User Choices
Authentication Information
For showing your presence (in one-to-one chats) and last seen:
Your Connections
Usage Information
(online or offline status)
User Choices
For showing your activity indicators:
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Usage Information
(whether you are typing or pausing typing, or recording a voice note)
For sharing your Status:
User Content
(Status is end-to-end encrypted)
Your Connections
User Choices
To generally operate and provide our Services, we:
analyse log information to resolve crashes and user issues.
collect information for troubleshooting, diagnostics and debugging.
collect and aggregate activity, system events and metrics (such as messaging volume and latencies) to monitor service performance, reliability, and efficiency, so we can ensure and optimise service quality.
test out and experiment with new features to see if they work as expected
To generally operate and provide our Services:
Your Account Information
Your Community and Group Information
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
To enable you to connect with businesses, we:
enable you to search and browse for businesses on the Service.
To enable you to connect with businesses:
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
Authentication Information
For making, receiving, joining or leaving voice and video calls, we:
establish an end-to-end encrypted connection for audio/video information between you and the other call participant (or participants if you are in a group call) after checking the participant’s privacy settings to see if they have blocked you.
enable you to create and send call links.
send you a push notification if you are receiving or have missed a call.
notify participants in a group call when:
another user has been invited but has not accepted the call,
another user starts to ring,
another user joins the call,
a call participant has left, and
the call is over.
When you change your in-app settings or take certain actions in a call, we let the other call participant(s) know the following:
whether your video is on or off.
when you invite other users to switch from an audio to a video call (or vice versa).
when you have not heard from the other call participant(s).
when you turn mute on or off.
when your battery is below 5% and not charging.
when you get an incoming call that interrupts your ongoing call on WhatsApp.
To optimise call quality, we:
swap to alternative networks interfaces where your existing connection is limited, and collect aggregated call metrics (for iOS only).
track metrics such as failed calls, number of calls ended due to disconnection and measure network link conditions to identify and resolve call quality issues.
store performance information on your device after the call, so it is easier to set up a call with the same user(s) again.
collect metrics about calls and aggregate them to optimise call quality.
back up your data usage and time spent on a call.
exchange network and other information during a call to adjust audio, video and network quality.
For making, receiving, joining or leaving voice and video calls:
Your Account Information
User Content
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
User Choices
Authentication Information
For notifying call participants about changes during a call:
Device and Connection Information
For optimising call quality:
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
To help you discover if your contacts are WhatsApp users when you choose to sync your device’s address book using contact upload, we:
regularly identify other WhatsApp users in your address book, add them to your WhatsApp contact list and store cryptographic hash values of the phone numbers of your contacts who are
not WhatsApp users
, so we can quickly update your WhatsApp contacts if those contacts sign-up to WhatsApp at a later date. Learn more
here
.
remove contacts from your WhatsApp contact list if one of your contacts no longer has an account.
at your request, block phone numbers of other users to prevent them contacting you on WhatsApp.
To enable you to use contact upload:
Your Account Information
Your Connections
Log and Troubleshooting Information
User Choices
To allow you to create, join, leave and connect in communities and groups to communicate with multiple contacts at the same time, we:
check that phone numbers you are trying to add to a group are WhatsApp users and check to ensure that their admission to the group is in line with their privacy settings.
check to ensure that the community or group name and optional community or group description meets WhatsApp requirements.
store information about the community or group and its participant users (including any pending or past participant users) for example, to ensure that the appropriate privileges are applied and assign the creator of the community or group as an admin so that they can control and personalise the community's or group’s information, membership and settings.
when a community or group is active, log when you send invites to new community or group participants and for groups, expire non-accepted invitations within a set period.
notify participants in the group of certain key changes to the community or group, such as changes to the community or group name, description or profile picture or when a message is deleted. After you
exit a group
, your phone number will appear in the past participants list of the group for up to 60 days from the time you exited the group.
temporarily store information to protect you from being re-added to groups you chose to leave and store the phone numbers of participants who are banned for example, from groups to ensure that they cannot rejoin. This information is also used to help identify any suspicious users or abusive behaviour where there is a high turnover of participants.
allow you to appoint other community admins to a community you’ve created or you are a community admin of and appoint a new group admin or community admin when the current admin (or admins) leave the group or community or delete their account.
delete a group when its last member leaves.
suspend, or deactivate a community, and add or disconnect groups within the community.
For creating a group or community:
Your Account Information
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
User Choices
Authentication Information
For administering active groups or communities:
Your Account Information
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
User Choices
Authentication Information
Assists you to create backups of your chat history (and media within the chat history), when you request it by:
enabling you to upload a backup of your chat history to a third-party cloud-based service (like Google Account or iCloud).
end-to-end encrypt your chat history
with a randomly generated encryption key or password you create. You can upload these encrypted backups of your chat history to a third-party cloud-based service (like Google Account or iCloud).
using an encryption key or your password to retrieve an encryption key to decrypt your backed-up chat history.
For allowing you to create, access and restore backups and encrypted backups:
Your Account Information
Authentication Information
(authenticating an encryption key or password)
To ensure safety, security, and integrity of our Services.
We use information we have and apply automated data processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
verify accounts on an ongoing basis, and check that user sign-ups are genuine.
log events and aggregated counts about community, group and user actions on our Services (like the number of groups joined) and related sequences like patterns in registration and repetitive or identical User Reports to identify and investigate suspicious users, threats to the security of our Services or where a fake WhatsApp app or an imitation of our Services is being used.
investigate and address violations of our Terms. For example, we may ban your account when we learn that you are engaged in infringing activities.
detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behaviour which threatens the security of our users' information or the Service, such as to combat scraping by bad actors at scale, or our efforts to detect and prevent spam.
collect app verification information from anti-abuse services to aid our efforts to e.g. prevent malicious actors from trying to take over your account.
To ensure the safety, security and integrity of our Services:
Your Account Information
User Content
(if provided by a user)
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Customer Support Information and Other Communications
Account Access Information
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
Cookies
User Choices
Authentication Information
Information Others Provide About You
User Reports
Businesses on WhatsApp
Third-Party Services
Transfer, store or process your information outside the European Economic Area.
As the WhatsApp service operates globally, with users and businesses around the world, we need to share information we collect globally, both internally within the
Meta Companies
and where the
data centers
we rely on are located and externally with our Third-Party Service Providers. We carry out necessary transfers outside the European Economic Area, including to the United States and other countries to:
operate and provide our Services. We also allow you to share information and connect with your family and friends around the globe; and
allow us to fix, analyse and improve our Services.
For more information, see
Transferring information outside the EEA as part of Our Global Operations
section below.
To operate and provide our Services:
Your Account Information
User Content
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Customer Support Information and Other Communications
Account Access Information
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
Cookies
User Choices
Authentication Information
Information Others Provide About You
User Reports
Businesses on WhatsApp
Third-Party Services
Communicate with you on Services-related issues, we:
identify relevant Service-related notifications for you, send them to you on WhatsApp and keep a log when you have received the notification. For example, when our Terms are updated we’ll provide a notification about the update (as appropriate).
For sending you notifications or updates about our Services:
Your Account Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
(details of the notifications you have previously received)
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
Provide customer support by:
processing requests for support and / or searches you make within the WhatsApp Help Center, in the app or via the WhatsApp website.
responding when you request our help such as assisting with your account login or verification process.
For providing you with customer support:
Your Account Information
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Customer Support Information and Other Communications
Account Access Information
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
Cookies
When we process information you provide to us as necessary to perform our contractual relationship with you, under applicable data protection laws you have the right to port it. To exercise your rights, visit the
How To Exercise Your Rights
section of this Privacy Policy.
Back to top
The other legal bases we rely on when processing your information and the circumstances in which we rely on them are set out below:
Your Consent
We process information for the purposes described below when you have given us your consent to enable particular product features in your device-based settings. The categories of information used and why and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why And How We Process Your Information
Information Categories Used
For collecting information through the device-based settings which you have enabled, for example:
sharing your device’s
Precise Location Information
if you choose to use our location-related features. You can share your current location with, or send your live location to your contacts or view a nearby place on your map. When your live location is being shared, the live location control in your privacy settings shows which chats your live location is being shared in.
Precise Location Information
which you share in your chats is end-to-end encrypted which means that it cannot be seen by WhatsApp.
accessing your camera and / or photo gallery if you choose to share photos or media with your WhatsApp contacts or use optional features like avatars. Photos and media that you share in your personal chats are end-to-end encrypted.
User Content
When we process your information based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on such consent before the consent is withdrawn. To exercise your rights, visit your device-based settings, your in-app settings like your live location control, and the
How To Exercise Your Rights
section of this Privacy Policy.
Back to top
Compliance With A Legal Obligation
We process information to comply with a legal obligation including, for example, to access, preserve or disclose certain information if there is a valid legal request. Examples of Irish and EU laws that could give rise to a legal obligation requiring us to process information are set out below. New laws may be enacted or other obligations may become binding on our processing and we will update the list of laws from time to time.
Why And How We Process Your Information
Information Categories Used
The actual information used depends on the specific legal obligation, but could include any of the following:
For processing information when we comply with a legal obligation including, for example, to access, preserve or disclose certain information if there is a valid legal request from a regulator, law enforcement or others or to implement appropriate security measures. For example, a search warrant or production order from Irish law enforcement to provide information in relation to an investigation, such as your profile picture or IP address.
Examples of Irish and EU laws enforceable in Ireland are laws that could give rise to an obligation requiring us to process information we hold about you are:
Civil and commercial matters
: where we are in receipt of a court order to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters.
Criminal matters
: to comply with requests from Irish law enforcement to provide data in relation to an investigation, such as under Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006 or to take steps to report information to law enforcement where required.
Consumer and competition matters
: to comply with our obligations under consumer law such as the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014 such as where the Irish Competition and Consumer Protection Commission requests information and our obligations under the Digital Markets Act and Digital Services Act.
Corporate and taxation matters
: to comply with our obligations under companies legislation and tax law such as the Companies Act 2014 such as where the Irish Revenue requests information.
Regulatory matters
: to comply with our obligations to engage with regulators, such as the Data Protection Commission under the General Data Protection Regulation and the Data Protection Act 2018, the European Commission under the Digital Markets Act, and relevant regulators under the Digital Services Act.
Information security
: to implement appropriate technical and organisational security measures, such as under the General Data Protection Regulation, EU Directive 2002/58/EC and the European Electronic Communications Code established under Directive (EU) 2018/1972.
See
here
for the current list of laws which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for WhatsApp which results in the processing of information. New laws may be enacted or other obligations may become binding on our processing of your information which may require us to process your information and we will update this list from time to time.
Your Account Information
User Content
(if provided by a user)
Account Access Information
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Customer Support Information and Other Communications
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
User Reports
User Choices
Cookies
Information Others Provide About You
Businesses on WhatsApp
Third-Party Services
Back to top
Protection Of Your Vital Interests Or Those Of Another Person
Why And How We Process Your Information
Information Categories Used
The actual information used depends on the factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
For protecting your vital interests or those of another person
.
We apply automated processing techniques and conduct manual (human) review. We share information with law enforcement and others, in circumstances where someone’s vital interests require protection, such as in the case of emergencies. These vital interests include protection of your or someone else’s life, physical or mental health, wellbeing or integrity or that of others.
In protecting such vital interests we aim to combat harmful conduct and promote safety, integrity and security. For example, we investigate reports of harmful conduct and take appropriate action, such as taking action on user accounts (e.g. banning them) or sharing information with relevant authorities, where there is a risk of imminent harmful conduct such as an attack or where a person’s safety is at risk. We also compare profile pictures, community and group pictures and reported images against a database of known hashed child sexual abuse material (CSAM) and use a combination of automated processing techniques and human review to detect previously unknown CSAM in these images. If we detect apparent CSAM, we report it to the National Center for Missing & Exploited Children (learn more about how we work to help fight child exploitation
here
).
Your Account Information
User Content
(if provided by a user)
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Customer Support Information and Other Communications
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
Cookies
User Choices
Information Others Provide About You
User Reports
Businesses on WhatsApp
Third-Party Services
Back to top
Legitimate Interests
We rely on our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of a third-party, such as our users, where they are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms ("legitimate interests"):
Why And How We Process Your Information
Legitimate Interests Relied On
Information Categories Used
For users under the age of majority (under 18, in most applicable countries) who have a limited ability to enter into an enforceable contract only, where we may be unable to process your information on the grounds of contractual necessity.
Assisting you in creating and managing your WhatsApp account by
:
verifying your WhatsApp Account by, for example, sending you a verification code via SMS, email, by calling you or by using device verifiers when your operating system supports it.
checking the operating system and other features of your device to set up WhatsApp correctly on your device, and running security checks to make sure you don’t already have an account or a phone number that is banned from WhatsApp.
recording your User Choices, including the terms you accepted, your privacy settings and the users you’ve blocked.
facilitating you adding additional information such as an avatar or Account Information such as a profile picture, “about” information which is displayed to people who have your phone number, in line with your privacy settings.
changing the phone number associated with your WhatsApp account when you update it.
in order to maintain security, limit data retention and protect your privacy, checking for activity every 30 days and deleting your account where your phone has not been online for 120 days (in general). Learn more in our Help Center here.
deleting your account, at your request (see how to delete your account on your iPhone and on your Android device) or in accordance with our Terms. We may take steps to ban your account if there is a breach of our Terms, for example a breach of our "Acceptable Use of Our Services" terms.
enabling you to re-register your account when it has been deactivated or locked.
It is in our interest and in the interests of all WhatsApp users under the age of majority to be able to create and manage a secure account which is set up correctly and reflects their choices, including their privacy settings.
To assist you in creating and managing your WhatsApp account:
:
Your Account Information
User Content (Avatars)
Your Connections
Account Access Information
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
User Choices
Authentication Information
Facilitates you using and managing your WhatsApp account on multiple devices by:
.
linking a new device to your account so that you can use WhatsApp on additional devices and so that we can register certain additional devices on our servers.
syncing Your Account Information and User Choices across your devices by sending an update to other devices linked to your account.
sending an end-to-end encrypted copy of your chat history to your new companion devices when you sync your chats (we temporarily store this encrypted copy to complete the sync).
It is in the interests of all WhatsApp users under the age of majority to be able to access the WhatsApp service across multiple devices in an easy and reliable manner. It is in our interest to allow users to easily use the Service across different devices.
For linking a device to your account:
Your Account Information
Device and Connection Information
Authentication Information
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
For syncing your Account Information and User Choices across your devices:
Your Account Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
User Choices
For syncing your chat history across your devices:
Your Account Information
User Content (your messages, images, audio and videos are end-to-end encrypted)
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
Authentication Information
To send and receive end-to-end encrypted messages and broadcast your Status, we:
enable you to reply to, forward and delete messages, or to send different types of messages such as voice messages, “View Once” or disappearing messages.
if the recipient’s device is online on WhatsApp, deliver messages directly to their device. If your device or the recipient’s device is offline, we store the encrypted message for up to 30 days as we attempt to deliver the message and send a push notification to the device.
show when you are online or indicate activity to recipients in a chat, such as displaying your ‘last seen’ to recipients according to your User Choices.
enable you to search the web for images to use as a community or group profile picture or to share videos from third-party services such as YouTube. Where that link is a video, we display a preview and allow the recipient to view it within the chat.
allow you to broadcast your Status updates with contacts of your choice. Status updates disappear after 24 hours.
take precautions to ensure your messages are conveyed correctly.
optimise the sending of media files by storing them temporarily for up to 30 days in encrypted form on our servers to aid in more efficient delivery.
enable you and third parties, like businesses, to communicate and interact with each other using our services such as catalogs for businesses on WhatsApp where you can browse products and services and place orders.
use cookies to operate and provide our web-based Services.
It is in our interest to provide and maintain features that enable users to communicate. It is in the interests of all WhatsApp users under the age of majority to express themselves and communicate with other users and businesses.
To send and receive end-to-end encrypted messages and to broadcast your Status:
Your Account Information
User Content
(your messages, images, audio, video, documents and files are end-to-end encrypted, as is the Status you share)
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
Cookies
User Choices
Authentication Information
For showing your presence (in one-to-one chats) and last seen:
Your Connections
Usage Information (online or offline status)
User Choices
For showing your activity indicators
:
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Usage Information (whether you are typing or pausing typing, or recording a voice note)
For sharing your Status:
User Content (Status is end-to-end encrypted)
Your Connections
User Choices
To generally operate and provide our Services, we:
analyse log information to resolve crashes and user issues.
collect information for troubleshooting, diagnostics and debugging.
collect and aggregate activity, system events and metrics (such as messaging volume and latencies) to monitor service performance, reliability, and efficiency, so we can ensure and optimise service quality.
test out and experiment with new features to see if they work as expected.
It is in our interest and in the interests of all WhatsApp users under the age of majority that we provide and maintain a reliable Service.
To generally operate and provide our Services:
Your Account Information
Your Community and Group Information
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
To enable you to connect with businesses, we:
enable you to search and browse for businesses on the Service.
It is in our interest and in the interests of all WhatsApp users under the age of majority to provide and maintain features which enable users to search for and connect with businesses on the Service.
To enable you to connect with businesses:
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
Authentication Information
For making, receiving, joining or leaving voice and video calls, we:
establish an end-to-end encrypted connection for audio/video information between you and the other call participant (or participants if you are in a group call) after checking the participant’s privacy settings to see if they have blocked you.
enable you to create and send call links.
send you a push notification if you are receiving or have missed a call.
notify participants in a group call when:
another user has been invited but has not accepted the call,
another user starts to ring,
another user joins the call,
a call participant has left, and
the call is over.
When you change your in-app settings or take certain actions in a call, we let the other call participant(s) know the following:
whether your video is on or off.
when you invite other users to switch from an audio to a video call (or vice versa).
when you have not heard from the other call participant(s).
when you turn mute on or off.
when your battery is below 5% and not charging.
when you get an incoming call that interrupts your ongoing call on WhatsApp.
To optimise call quality, we:
swap to alternative networks interfaces where your existing connection is limited, and collect aggregated call metrics (for iOS only).
track metrics such as failed calls, number of calls ended due to disconnection and measure network link conditions to identify and resolve call quality issues.
store performance information on your device after the call, so it is easier to set up a call with the same user(s) again.
collect metrics about calls and aggregate them to optimise call quality.
back up your data usage and time spent on a call.
exchange network and other information during a call to adjust audio, video and network quality.
It is in our interest and in the interests of WhatsApp users under the age of majority to be able to make, receive, join calls or video calls reliably in order to express themselves, communicate with other users, and have their choices respected.
For making, receiving, joining or leaving voice and video calls:
Your Account Information
User Content
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
User Choices
Authentication Information
For notifying call participants about changes during a call:
Device and Connection Information
For optimising call quality:
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
To help you discover if your contacts are WhatsApp users when you choose to sync your device’s address book using contact upload, we:
regularly identify other WhatsApp users in your address book, add them to your WhatsApp contact list and store cryptographic hash values of the phone numbers of your contacts who are not WhatsApp users, so we can quickly update your WhatsApp contacts if those contacts sign-up to WhatsApp at a later date. Learn more
here
.
remove contacts from your WhatsApp contact list if one of your contacts no longer has an account.
at your request, block phone numbers of other users to prevent them contacting you on WhatsApp.
It is in our interest and in the interests of all WhatsApp users under the age of majority, in operating and providing the Service to discover and identify their contacts.
To enable you to use contact upload:
Your Account Information
Your Connections
Log and Troubleshooting Information
User Choices
To allow you to create, join, leave and connect in communities and groups to communicate with multiple contacts at the same time, we:
check that phone numbers you are trying to add to a group are WhatsApp users and check to ensure that their admission to the group is in line with their privacy settings.
check to ensure that the community or group name and optional community or group description meets WhatsApp requirements.
store information about the community or group and its participant users (including any pending or past participant users) for example, to ensure that the appropriate privileges are applied and assign the creator of the community or group as an admin so that they can control and personalise the community's or group’s information, membership and settings.
when a community or group is active, log when you send invites to new community or group participants and for groups, expire non-accepted invitations within a set period.
notify participants in the group of certain key changes to the community or group, such as changes to the community or group name, description or profile picture or when a message is deleted. After you exit a group, your phone number will appear in the past participants list of the group for up to 60 days from the time you exited the group.
temporarily store information to protect you from being re-added to groups you chose to leave and store the phone numbers of participants who are banned for example, from groups to ensure that they cannot rejoin. This information is also used to help identify any suspicious users or abusive behaviour where there is a high turnover of participants.
allow you to appoint other community admins to a community you’ve created or you are a community admin of and appoint a new group admin or community admin when the current admin (or admins) leave the group or community or delete their account.
delete a group when its last member leaves.
suspend, or deactivate a community, and add or disconnect groups within the community.
It is in our interest and in the interests of WhatsApp users (under the age of majority) to provide and maintain features that enable users to communicate and engage in groups or communities relevant to them. It is in the interests of WhatsApp users under the age of majority to respect their choices or privacy settings and ensure that such features respect WhatsApp requirements.
For creating a group or community:
Your Account Information
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Log and Troubleshooting
User Choices
Authentication Information
For administering active groups or communities:
Your Account Information
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
User Choices
Authentication Information
Assists you to create backups of your chat history (and media within the chat history), when you request it by:
enabling you to upload a backup of your chat history to a third-party cloud-based service (like Google Account or iCloud).
end-to-end encrypt your chat history with a randomly generated encryption key or password you create. You can upload these encrypted backups of your chat history to a third-party cloud-based service (like Google Account or iCloud).
using an encryption key or your password to retrieve an encryption key to decrypt your backed-up chat history.
It is in the interests of all WhatsApp users under the age of majority to be able to maintain a secure backup of their chat history. It is in our interest to provide users with the option of encrypted backups to secure their backup.
For allowing you to create, access and restore backups and encrypted backups:
Your Account Information
Authentication Information (authenticating an encryption key or password)
To ensure safety, security, and integrity of our Services.
We use information we have and apply automated data processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
verify accounts on an ongoing basis, and check that user sign-ups are genuine.
log events and aggregated counts about community, group and user actions on our Services (like the number of groups joined) and related sequences like patterns in registration and repetitive or identical User Reports to identify and investigate suspicious users, threats to the security of our Services or where a fake WhatsApp app or an imitation of our Services is being used.
investigate and address violations of our Terms. For example, we may ban your account when we learn that you are engaged in infringing activities.
detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behaviour which threatens the security of our users' information or the Service, such as to combat scraping by bad actors at scale, or our efforts to detect and prevent spam.
collect app verification information from anti-abuse services to aid our efforts to e.g. prevent malicious actors from trying to take over your account.
It is in our interest and in the interests of all WhatsApp users under the age of majority to secure WhatsApp systems, user's accounts, and detect and investigate threats, infringement, harmful or unlawful activities and promote safety, integrity and security on the Services.
To ensure the safety, security and integrity of our Services:
Your Account Information
User Content (if provided by a user)
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Customer Support Information and Other Communications
Account Access Information
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
Cookies
User Choices
Authentication Information
Information Others Provide About You
User Reports
Businesses on WhatsApp
Third-Party Services
Communicate with you on Services-related issues, we:
identify relevant Service-related notifications for you, send them to you on WhatsApp and keep a log when you have received the notification. For example, when our Terms are updated we’ll provide a notification about the update (as appropriate).
It is in our interest to send notifications and keep a record of users who have received them. It is in the interests of all WhatsApp users under the age of majority to receive these notifications.
For sending you notifications or updates about our Services:
Your Account Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
(details of the notifications you have previously received)
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
Provide customer support by:
processing requests for support and / or searches you make within the WhatsApp Help Center, in the app or via the WhatsApp website.
responding when you request our help such as assisting with your account login or verification process.
It is in our interest to provide support to our users and provide information with regard to user issues and it is in all WhatsApp users’ interests under the age of majority to receive such support and information.
For providing you with customer support:
Your Account Information
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Customer Support Information and Other Communications
Account Access Information
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
Cookies
For all users of our Services including users under the age of majority:
Business intelligence and analytics
:
we count users and events for reporting to identify how many users WhatsApp has (and similar metrics) so we can share these metrics with affiliates, regulators and the public. This includes metrics like how many unique users WhatsApp has across the Meta Companies by establishing which of our users don't use other Meta apps.
validate metrics and analyse the feedback you provide (e.g. via surveys), to understand how and how often our Services are used, and how this compares to usage across the Meta Companies, to gain insights, inform business planning and forecasting.
In our interest to measure the use of our Services and count the people who interact with the WhatsApp services in order to inform business decisions and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
Business intelligence and analytics
:
Your Account Information
User Content (Avatars)
Your Community and Group Information
Customer Support Information and Other Communications
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
User Choices
We preserve and share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to legal requests
.
This includes responding to legal requests where we are not compelled by applicable law but have a good faith belief it is required by law in the relevant jurisdiction or sharing information with law enforcement or industry partners/peers such as other online platforms and technology companies to combat abusive or illegal behaviour. For example, we preserve a snapshot of user information when requested by law enforcement where necessary for the purposes of an investigation.
We may also report illegal or infringing content to law enforcement, government or other authorities.
It is in our interest and in the interest of WhatsApp users to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of WhatsApp, violations of our Terms and policies, or other harmful or illegal activity.
It is in our interest to protect ourselves (including our rights, personnel, property or products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory inquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
The general public and industry partners/peers such as other online platforms and technology companies have a legitimate interest in having abusive or illegal behaviour investigated and combated.
The actual information used depends on the factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Your Account Information
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Customer Support Information and Other Communications
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
Usage Information
General Location Information
User Reports
We preserve and share information when we seek legal advice or seek to protect ourselves in the context of litigation and other disputes
. This includes matters such as violations of our Terms and policies.
It is in our interest and in the interest of WhatsApp users to respond to complaints, prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of WhatsApp, violations of our Terms and policies, or other harmful or illegal activity.
It is in our interest to seek legal advice and protect ourselves (including our rights, personnel, property or products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory inquiries and litigation or other disputes.
The actual information used depends on the factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Your Account Information
User Content
(if provided by a user)
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Customer Support Information and Other Communications
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
Cookies
User Choices
Information Others Provide About You
User Reports
Businesses on WhatsApp
Third-Party Services
To promote safety, integrity and security outside of the performance of our contract with you.
We use information we have and apply automated data processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
log User Reports, user’s feedback about other users, aggregated events and actions to identify and understand the techniques being used by the bad actors that may interfere with the Services, including your use of the Services.
identify, analyse and investigate patterns of suspicious, harmful or fraudulent behaviour like scams or other potential violations of our policies and Terms. We may ban your account when we learn that you are engaged in infringing activities.
check to ensure that User Reports are genuine and that community or group name, description or profile picture comply with WhatsApp’s Terms and policies.
invite you to take surveys or provide feedback and analyse your responses to resolve issues.
in limited circumstances request a copy of your id documentation or other authentication information, or ask that you take certain actions to verify you are the true owner of a specific WhatsApp account.
It is in our interest and in the interest of WhatsApp users to secure WhatsApp systems, user's accounts, and fight threats, abuse, or infringement activities and promote safety, integrity and security on the Services. It is also in our interest to ensure our Services are used in accordance with the Terms.
It is in our interest to ensure our Services are used in accordance with the Terms and policies.
For ensuring the safety, security and integrity of our Services:
Your Account Information
Account Access Information
Your Connections
Your Community and Group Information
Customer Support Information and Other Communications
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
User Reports
To improve the WhatsApp Service by developing new features or updating existing features, we:
generate and validate metrics to understand how and how often our Services are used and how this compares to usage across the Meta Companies, in order to inform and improve product direction and development and forecast future adoption of the service or features.
undertake experiments to evaluate the impact of new features.
invite you to take surveys or provide feedback and analyse your responses to gain insights into users’ views (for example, about the Service and Meta Companies).
It is in our interest and in the interest of WhatsApp users to evaluate the use of the services and adoption of new features to inform the development of future features and improve product direction and development.
Your Account Information
User Content (Avatars)
Your Community and Group Information
Customer Support Information and Other Communications
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
User Choices
To improve the WhatsApp customer support service, we:
track information about your interactions with our customer support team to understand if issues are being resolved in a timely manner and whether the information provided in our
FAQs
are helpful.
run quality assurance checks on our interactions with our customers
request and review information you provide in customer satisfaction feedback surveys.
log search queries in our Help Center to build an index of common search queries to keep our Help Center up to date with relevant content.
It is in our interest and in the interest of WhatsApp users to continuously improve and develop the customer support we provide.
To improve the WhatsApp customer support service:
Your Account Information
Customer Support Information and Other Communications
Usage Information
Log and Troubleshooting Information
Device and Connection Information
General Location Information
Cookies
User Reports
You have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, this processing. To exercise your rights, visit the
How To Exercise Your Rights
section of this Privacy Policy.
We still do not allow third-party banner ads on our Services. We have no intention to introduce them, but if we ever do, we will update this Privacy Policy.
Back to top
How To Exercise Your Rights
Under applicable data protection law, you have the right to access, rectify, port, and erase your information, as well as the right to restrict and object to certain processing of your information.
This includes the right to object to our processing of your information for direct marketing and the right to object to our processing of your information where we are pursuing our legitimate interests or those of a third-party. We will consider several factors when assessing an objection including: your reasonable expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users, third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort. Your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information, unless the processing is based on compelling legitimate grounds or is needed for legal reasons.
You have the right to object to and restrict our processing of your information. To submit an objection use
this form
and select “How can I make an objection to the processing of my information”. Learn more about submitting an objection and the way we use your information by going
here
. If we use your information for direct marketing, you can always object and opt out of future direct marketing messages using the unsubscribe link in such communications, or by using our in-app "block" feature.
You can access or port your information using our in-app Request Account Info feature (available under Settings > Account). You can access tools to rectify, update, and delete your information directly in-app as described in the
Retention of Your Information
section.
When we process information you provide to us based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time, without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal. To withdraw your consent, visit your device-based settings or in-app settings.
You have the right to lodge a complaint with WhatsApp's lead supervisory authority under the GDPR, the Irish Data Protection Commission, or any other competent data protection supervisory authority.
Back to top
Retention of Your Information
We store information for as long as necessary for the purposes identified in this Privacy Policy, including to provide our Services, or for other legitimate purposes, such as complying with legal obligations, enforcing and preventing violations of our Terms, to fight spam, or protecting or defending our rights, property and users. The storage periods are determined on a case-by-case basis that depends on the following factors:
The nature of the information and why it is collected and processed
. The length of time we will keep your information will generally be determined by how long we need that information to provide you with our Services, including any optional features you use and to provide customer support.
For example:
As described
above
, we require certain of
Your Account Information
to deliver our Services. We need to keep it for the lifetime of your account so that we can maintain your account.
We keep your
User Choices
for the lifetime of your account.
We keep
Authentication Information
for the lifetime of your account.
We only need to keep other information as long as necessary to provide optional features to you, such as
Your Connections
as long as you use contact upload.
We keep information collected using
Cookies
for 90 days.
We generally keep
customer support communications
for 30 days after they have been dealt with or 90 days after we receive them, whichever is sooner.
We generally keep
User Reports
for 90 days.
In certain cases, we need to keep your information for longer for legal reasons as described under the Legal Reasons section below.
Legal Reasons
. In certain cases, we also keep your information for legal reasons, including after your account has been deleted.
We keep your information:
To respond to a legal request or to comply with applicable law when we have a legal obligation to retain information
. For example, if we receive a valid legal request, such as a preservation order or search warrant, related to your account, we preserve your information after you delete your account.
To deal with and resolve requests and complaints
. For example, we generally retain correspondence relating to data subject requests under GDPR for a year, in case those requests are not resolved and this correspondence is required in order to handle any resulting complaints. In such cases, the correspondence is then retained while those complaints are being resolved.
For litigation or regulatory matters
. For example, we preserve your information where it is reasonably necessary for reasons related to a legal claim or complaint, such as where we are subject to a regulatory investigation or we need to defend ourselves in legal proceedings about a claim related to your information or respond to a regulator in relation to a complaint made by you or someone else.
Issues relating to the safety, security and integrity of our Services and to protect rights, property and users
. For example, we keep information where it is necessary to investigate misuse of our
Services
, such as spam and other bad experiences. If we disable an account for violating our
Terms
, we also preserve information about that user for safety, security and integrity purposes.
The actual information that we keep and how long we keep it for depends on the nature of the reason in question.
Operational Retention Needs
. We need to store information in certain cases for operational needs. For example, if a message cannot be delivered immediately, we keep it in encrypted form on our servers for up to 30 days as we try to deliver it. We also store information where necessary for troubleshooting and debugging issues with the Services. We keep the information that we store for this purpose for up to 90 days, provided longer storage is not necessary for investigating and resolving a specific issue, or for legal reasons.
Messaging
. We retain the information that we process to convey your messages or calls (which includes information like your phone number, the time and date you make a call or send a message, or the duration of your calls) in accordance with the specific rules and requirements under the EU Directive 2002/58/EC, where applicable, as long as it is needed for transmitting the communication, operating our Services, ensuring the safety and security of our Services, or to comply with legal obligations under applicable law. When we do not need the information for any of these purposes anymore, we delete or anonymise it.
Back to top
Deleting Your Information
What Happens To Your Information When Your Account Is Deleted?
When you delete your WhatsApp account or when it is deleted as a result of inactivity (see
About inactive account deletion
for information on inactive accounts), we delete the information we have about you, apart from the information listed below which we retain in limited circumstances.
Deleted Information
. Your Account Information and any undelivered messages to you are deleted from our servers. You will be removed from all WhatsApp communities and groups. Note that for technical reasons it takes up to 90 days from the beginning of the deletion process to delete or de-identify your WhatsApp information. Copies of your information may also remain after the 90 days for a limited time in the backup storage that we use to recover lost information in the event of a disaster, software error, or other information loss event.
Information We Retain After Your Account is Deleted.
If we are analysing or investigating a security incident, in order to maintain the security of our Services, we need to retain
Log and Troubleshooting Information
associated with the incident that we are reviewing past the normal 90 day deletion period.
Copies of certain log records remain in our database but are disassociated from personal identifiers which are used for example to measure performance, reliability and efficiency and to operate and improve our Services.
Your account initially was linked to these records by a randomly generated identifier. To disassociate this information when your account is deleted, we delete the link between this identifier and your account as part of the account deletion process.
Copies of your information may also be retained for legal reasons after you delete your account in the circumstances described. The information that may be retained and length of time we need to retain it will depend on the specific legal reason we need to retain it for.
For more information on how long we store information, see
Retention of Your Information
.
Back to top
Managing Your Information
If you would like to manage, change, limit, or delete your information, you can do that through the following tools:
Settings
. You can change your settings to manage certain information available to other users. You can manage your contacts, groups, and broadcast lists, or use our "block" feature to manage who you communicate with on our Services.
Changing Your Mobile Phone Number, Profile Name And Picture, And "About" Information
. If you change your mobile phone number you must update it using our in-app change number feature and transfer your account to your new mobile phone number. You can also change your profile name, profile picture, and "about" information at any time.
Deleting Your WhatsApp Account
. You can delete your WhatsApp account at any time using our in-app delete my account feature in your in-app settings. Once you initiate the deletion process for your account, that account can no longer be used (i.e. you cannot log in or re-register or access any content (including message history) as it will be deleted). See
Deleting Your Information
section for more detail on what happens to your information when you delete your account.
Be mindful that if you only delete WhatsApp from your device without selecting the in-app delete my account option in your in-app settings, the
Information We Collect
will be stored on our servers for a longer period. WhatsApp accounts are generally deleted after 120 days of inactivity. Users are not alerted when this occurs. See our Help Center article
About inactive account deletion
for more information.
Please remember that when your account is deleted, it does not affect your information related to the communities or groups you created (such as community or group names), or the information other users have relating to you, such as their copy of the messages you sent them.
Back to top
Working With Authorities, Advisors And Industry Partners
We access and share your information described in the
Information We Collect
section, including sharing with regulators, law enforcement, other government agencies, industry partners/peers such as other online platforms and technology companies, our advisors such as external lawyers who act for us, and others in accordance with the
How and Why We Process Your Information and Our Legal Basis for Processing
section if we have a good-faith belief that it is necessary to:
respond pursuant to applicable law or regulations, court orders, legal process, or government requests. For example, sharing with regulators, law enforcement, or other government agencies in response to legal requests or sharing with civil litigants pursuant to court orders;
detect, investigate, prevent, or address fraud and other illegal activity or security and technical issues. For example, we access and share information with law enforcement, other government agencies, or industry partners such as other online platforms and technology companies to identify and prevent bad actors using our Services for illegal purposes; or
protect the rights, property and safety of our users, WhatsApp, the Meta Companies, or others, including to prevent death or imminent bodily harm. For example, sharing with law enforcement, in emergency situations where we learn that a person’s life is at risk.
For more information on how we preserve your information for these purposes, please see the
Retention of Your Information
section.
The processing we carry out will depend on the circumstances. Further information on the different categories of information affected and the legal bases we rely on is set out in the
How and Why We Process Your Information and Our Legal Basis for Processing
section under the Processing necessary to perform our contract with you, Compliance with a Legal Obligation, Protection of Your Vital Interests or Those of Another Person and Legitimate Interests headings.
Back to top
Transferring information outside the EEA as part of Our Global Operations
Why is information transferred to countries outside of the European Economic Area and where?
WhatsApp shares information described in the
Information We Collect
section of this Privacy Policy globally, both internally within the
Meta Companies
, and externally with third parties in accordance with this Privacy Policy and our
Terms
. This includes places where the
data centers
we rely on are located, and where our other internal
Meta Companies
and external
Third-Party Service Providers
are located (which includes the United States). These transfers are necessary and essential to enable us to provide the Services set forth in our
Terms
and globally to operate and provide our Services which allow you to communicate with users and businesses on WhatsApp around the world.
How do we safeguard your information?
When information controlled by WhatsApp is transferred or transmitted to, or stored and processed in, the United States or other third countries outside of the European Economic Area, we rely on the following transfer mechanisms:
Adequacy Decisions
: We rely on decisions from the European Commission where they recognise that certain countries and territories outside of the European Economic Area ensure an adequate level of protection for personal information. These decisions are referred to as “adequacy decisions”. We transfer Your Account Information, Device and Connection Information, Usage Information and User Choices (see
Information We Collect
) from the European Economic Area to Israel in reliance on the European Commission’s adequacy decision for
Israel
.
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework
: WhatsApp LLC and Meta Platforms, Inc. have certified their participation in the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework. We rely on the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, and the European Commission's related
adequacy decision
, for transfers of
Information We Collect
to WhatsApp LLC and Meta Platforms, Inc. in the U.S. for the services specified in the certifications of WhatsApp LLC and Meta Platforms, Inc. For more information, see the
WhatsApp LLC Data Privacy Framework Disclosure
and the
Meta Platforms, Inc. Data Privacy Framework Disclosure
.
Standard Contractual Clauses
: We utilise standard contractual clauses approved by the European Commission for transfers to third party interoperable messaging services and to the United States, the UK and Singapore. For example, WhatsApp uses Meta’s global infrastructure and data centers, which are located around the world including in the United States, to store the information described in the
Information We Collect
section of this Privacy Policy. For a copy of the standard contractual clauses, please see our
SCC Help Center article
.
While transfers to countries that don’t have an adequacy decision typically take place on the basis of the standard contractual clauses, in certain circumstances, transfers can also take place on the basis of exemptions provided for under data protection law. For example, sharing with law enforcement, in emergency situations where we learn that a person’s life is at risk.
If you have any questions about the standard contractual clauses you can
contact us
.
Back to top
Updates to Our Privacy Policy
We may amend or update our Privacy Policy. We will provide you notice of amendments to this Privacy Policy, as appropriate, and update the “Last Updated” date at the top of this Privacy Policy. Please review our Privacy Policy from time to time.
Back to top
Contact Us
The Data Protection Officer for WhatsApp can be contacted
here
.
If you have questions about our Privacy Policy, please
contact us
or write us here:
WhatsApp Ireland Limited
Attn: Privacy Policy
Merrion Road
Dublin 4
D04 X2K5
Ireland
Back to top
Sub-policy 2
https://onesignal.com/privacy:
Javascript must be enabled for the correct page display
Skip to Content
Security and privacy
Customer privacy and data security are important to us and maintaining your trust is one of our highest priorities
View Privacy Policy
Contact Us
SOC 2 is an auditing standard created by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants (AICPA) that sets compliance standards for a company’s security controls. We’re proud to be SOC 2 Type II certified with an unqualified opinion covering controls around security, confidentiality, and privacy. Our SOC 2 Type II report is available by request on our Enterprise Plan.
HIPAA (Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act) guides the way companies handle protected health information (PHI) to ensure proper data security. OneSignal provides a platform to support HIPAA compliance. A Business Associate Agreement (BAA) is available to customers by request on our Enterprise Plan.
The EU-U.S., UK Extension, and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks were designed to provide companies on both sides of the Atlantic with a mechanism to comply with data protection requirements when transferring personal data from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland to the United States in support of transatlantic commerce.
OneSignal’s Data Privacy Framework Certification is
available on their website
.
In May of 2018, the European Union implemented a law for its citizens called the
General Data Privacy Regulations (GDPR)
. GDPR addresses the transfer of personal data outside the EU and EEA areas.
OneSignal provides the ability for all users to be GDPR compliant, however, you may need to modify your own
privacy policy
to be covered. Also, GDPR requires organizations to have a written, signed agreement to fulfill GDPR data protection obligations, as
explained by Privacy Shield
and summarized at
Supplemental Principle 10
(Obligatory Contracts for Onward Transfers).
The
California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA)
is a state statute that is intended to enhance privacy rights and consumer protection for residents of California in the United States. CCPA provides residents with the right to know and control how their personal data is being used by businesses.
OneSignal provides the ability for all users to be CCPA compliant, however,
you may need to modify your own privacy policy
to be covered.
Sub-policy 3
https://payments.google.com/payments/apis-secure/get_legal_document?ldo=0&ldt=privacynotice&ldl=de:
Datenschutzhinweise für Google Payments
Letzte Änderung: 18 November 2024
In der
Datenschutzerklärung von Google
wird erläutert, wie Google mit deinen personenbezogenen Daten umgeht, wenn du seine Produkte und Dienste nutzt. Wenn du noch nicht volljährig bist, findest du in den
Google-
Datenschutzinformationen für Jugendliche
weitere Informationen.
Google Payments ist ein Produkt, das wir Inhabern eines Google-Kontos anbieten. Daher gilt für die Nutzung von Google Payments die Datenschutzerklärung von Google. In diesen Datenschutzhinweisen wird nun zusätzlich unser Umgang mit dem Datenschutz speziell im Hinblick auf Google Payments erläutert.
Deine Nutzung von Google Payments unterliegt den Nutzungsbedingungen von Google Payments, in denen die Dienste, für die diese Datenschutzhinweise gelten, ausführlicher beschrieben sind. Feststehende Begriffe, die in diesen Datenschutzhinweisen nicht definiert werden, haben die in den Nutzungsbedingungen von Google Payments festgelegte Bedeutung.
Die Datenschutzhinweise für Google Payments gelten für Dienste, die von Google LLC oder dessen hundertprozentigen Tochtergesellschaften wie der Google Payment Corp. („GPC“) angeboten werden. Welche Tochtergesellschaft den jeweiligen Dienst anbietet, ist in den Nutzungsbedingungen von Google Payments einzusehen, die dir im Rahmen des Dienstes zur Verfügung gestellt werden.
Bei Nutzern, die in Brasilien wohnhaft sind, sind Google LLC sowie (in dem Umfang, in dem es das brasilianische Recht vorsieht) Google Brasil Pagamentos Ltda. die für ihre Daten zuständigen Datenverantwortlichen.
Bei Nutzern (außer denen, die Artikel auf einem Google-Marktplatz verkaufen), die im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum (das Vereinigte Königreich ausgenommen) wohnhaft sind, ist Google Ireland Limited der für ihre Daten zuständige Datenverantwortliche.
Bei Nutzern, die im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum (das Vereinigte Königreich ausgenommen) wohnhaft sind und Artikel auf einem Google-Marktplatz verkaufen, ist Google Payment Ireland Limited der für ihre Daten zuständige Datenverantwortliche.
Bei Nutzern (außer denen, die Artikel auf einem Google-Marktplatz verkaufen), die im Vereinigten Königreich wohnhaft sind, ist Google LLC der für ihre Daten zuständige Datenverantwortliche.
Bei Nutzern, die im Vereinigten Königreich wohnhaft sind und Artikel auf einem Google-Marktplatz verkaufen, ist Google Payment Limited der für ihre Daten zuständige Datenverantwortliche.
Von uns erhobene Informationen
Neben den in der
Datenschutzerklärung von Google
aufgeführten Informationen können wir auch folgende Daten erheben:
Registrierungsinformationen
Wenn du dich bei Google Payments registrierst, erstellst du ein Google-Zahlungsprofil, das mit deinem Google-Konto verknüpft wird. Je nachdem, welche Google Payments-Dienste du nutzt, wirst du gegebenenfalls nicht nur um die Angabe der in der Datenschutzerklärung von Google aufgeführten Informationen, sondern auch um die Angabe folgender Daten gebeten:
Kredit- oder Debitkartennummer mit Ablaufdatum
Bankverbindung
Adresse
Telefonnummer
Geburtsdatum
Sozialversicherungsnummer oder Steueridentifikationsnummer (bzw. eine andere behördlich vergebene Identifikationsnummer)
speziell bei Verkäufern oder Unternehmen: Unternehmenskategorie und bestimmte Informationen zu Umsatz- oder Transaktionsvolumen
In einigen Fällen können wir dich zusätzlich um die Angabe weiterer Informationen oder die Beantwortung zusätzlicher Fragen bitten, damit wir deine Informationen oder deine Identität prüfen können. Wenn du ein Konto für die Abrechnung über den Netzbetreiber oder Mobilfunkanbieter einrichten möchtest, benötigen wir darüber hinaus auch bestimmte Informationen zum Vertrag mit deinem Netzbetreiber oder Mobilfunkanbieter.
Deine Registrierungsdaten werden in deinem Google-Konto hinterlegt. Deine registrierte Zahlungsmethode wird auf den Servern von Google gespeichert. Bestimmte Daten können auch auf deinem Mobilgerät gespeichert werden.
Von Dritten bezogene Informationen
Wir beziehen möglicherweise von Dritten Informationen über dich, wobei auch Verifizierungsdienste von Drittanbietern verwendet werden können. Dazu zählen:
Informationen in Verbindung mit Google Payments-Transaktionen an Händlerstandorten
Angaben von Drittanbietern bezüglich der von dir verwendeten Zahlungsmethoden und Konten, die mit Google Payments verknüpft sind
die Identität deines Kartenausstellers oder deines Kreditinstituts
Angaben zu Funktionen und Vorteilen bezüglich deiner Zahlungsmethode
Informationen bezüglich des Zugriffs auf Guthaben in deinem Google-Zahlungsprofil
Informationen von Netzbetreibern oder Mobilfunkanbietern im Zusammenhang mit deren Abrechnungen
Verbraucherberichte entsprechend der Definition von „Verbraucherberichten“ („consumer reports“) des US Fair Credit Reporting Act
Informationen zu deinen Transaktionen mit Dritten (z. B. Händlern und Zahlungsdienstleistern); diese Informationen fließen in die Betrugsrisikomodellierung ein und werden in Betrugsrisiko-Scores und bei anderen Betrugspräventionsdiensten für Dritte berücksichtigt
Bei Verkäufern holen wir unter Umständen auch Informationen zu Person und Unternehmen von Kreditbüros oder Wirtschaftsauskunfteien ein.
Informationen zur Transaktion
Bei jeder Transaktion über Google Payments können wir Informationen zur Transaktion erheben. Hierzu zählen:
Datum, Uhrzeit und Betrag der Transaktion
Händlerstandort und ‑beschreibung
eine vom Verkäufer bereitgestellte Beschreibung der gekauften Waren oder Dienste
Fotos, die du der Transaktion beigefügt hast
der Name und die E‑Mail-Adresse des Verkäufers und Käufers (bzw. des Absenders und Empfängers)
die verwendete Zahlungsmethode
deine Beschreibung für den Grund der Transaktion sowie gegebenenfalls das mit der Transaktion verbundene Angebot
Wie nutzen wir die erhobenen Daten?
Neben der in der
Datenschutzerklärung von Google
erläuterten Nutzung verwenden wir die Informationen, die du uns, Google Payment Corp. (GPC) oder einer unserer anderen Tochtergesellschaften bereitgestellt hast, sowie die personenbezogenen Daten, die wir von Drittanbietern erhalten, zu folgenden Zwecken:
Google Payments-Dienste für dich zur Verfügung stellen
Gefahren für die Rechte, das Eigentum oder die Sicherheit von Google, von Google-Nutzern oder der Öffentlichkeit abwehren, u. a. als Schutz vor Betrug, Phishing und anderem Fehlverhalten
Drittanbieter bei der Bereitstellung von Produkten oder Diensten unterstützen, die du bei diesen Anbietern angefordert hast
dein Google-Zahlungsprofil prüfen und feststellen, ob du die Nutzungsbedingungen des Dienstes weiterhin erfüllst
Entscheidungen hinsichtlich deiner weiteren Google Payments-Transaktionen treffen
Betrugsrisikomodelle entwickeln und mit deinen bisherigen und aktuellen Informationen trainieren sowie Betrugsrisiko-Scores und ‑bewertungen erstellen, die an Dritte ausschließlich zur Betrugs- und Missbrauchsprävention durch diese weitergegeben werden
Informationen zu den Funktionen und Vorteilen deiner Zahlungsmethode zusammenstellen, damit du leichter die geeignete Zahlungsmethode bestimmen kannst, wenn du Google Payments verwendest
sonstige berechtigte Geschäftsanforderungen im Zusammenhang mit den von dir veranlassten Google Payments-Transaktionen erfüllen
Möglicherweise bewahren wir die von dir zur Verfügung gestellten Daten so lange auf, wie du Google Payments nutzt, im Bedarfsfall auch für einen längeren Zeitraum, um rechtliche Verfahren einzuhalten und gesetzlichen Verpflichtungen nachzukommen.
Von uns weitergegebene Informationen
Wir geben deine personenbezogenen Daten nur unter folgenden Bedingungen an andere Unternehmen oder Personen außerhalb von Google weiter:
Die Weitergabe ist gemäß der
Datenschutzerklärung von Google
zulässig.
Die Weitergabe ist gesetzlich zulässig.
Die Weitergabe ist zur Bearbeitung deiner Transaktion und zur Verwaltung deines Kontos erforderlich. Dazu gehören auch die Bereitstellung erweiterter Sicherheitsfunktionen, der Schutz deines Kontos vor Betrug und sonstige Standardgeschäftszwecke.
Die Weitergabe ist für deine angeforderte Registrierung bei einem Drittanbieterdienst erforderlich.
Die Weitergabe ist erforderlich, um einen Drittanbieter, dessen Website oder App du besuchst, darüber zu informieren, ob du ein Google-Zahlungsprofil hast, das für Zahlungen über die Website oder App dieses Händlers genutzt werden kann. Du kannst diese Einstellung deaktivieren.
Die Weitergabe ist erforderlich, um Betrugsrisiko-Scores und andere Risikobewertungen an Drittanbieter weiterzugeben, die die Risiko-Score- und Betrugspräventionsdienste von Google nutzen, um deine Transaktionen mit Dritten vor Betrug und Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die Weitergabe ist erforderlich, um die Sicherheit und Gültigkeit deiner Zahlungsmethode sicherzustellen und um dir relevante Informationen zu den Funktionen und Vorteilen deiner Zahlungsmethode zu geben; hierzu geben wir deine personenbezogenen Daten unter Umständen an den Aussteller deiner Zahlungsmethode, an dessen Zahlungsnetzwerk oder Verarbeiter oder an deren verbundene Unternehmen weiter.
Beispiele für Fälle, in denen Daten weitergegeben werden können:
Wenn du einen Kauf oder eine Transaktion über Google Payments durchführst, stellen wir dem Unternehmen oder Verkäufer, bei dem du etwas kaufst oder mit dem du ein Geschäft abwickelst, bestimmte personenbezogene Daten über dich zur Verfügung. Das beinhaltet auch die Weitergabe deiner personenbezogenen Daten an den Entwickler, wenn du bei Google Play etwas kaufst und dabei mit Google Payments bezahlst.
Wenn du einen Kauf auf einer Website oder in einer App mit Google Pay durchführst, geben wir unter Umständen deine Postleitzahl und Informationen zu deiner Zahlungsmethode an den Händler weiter, damit der Händler die Kosten deiner Bestellung (z. B. Steuern, Versandkosten und andere Preisinformationen) berechnen und entscheiden kann, ob er dein Zahlungsmittel akzeptiert und ob bestimmte zusätzliche Vorteile oder Einschränkungen mit der Verwendung des Zahlungsmittels für den konkreten Kauf verbunden sind.
Wenn du deinem Google-Zahlungsprofil die Zahlungsmethode eines Drittanbieters hinzufügst, werden möglicherweise personenbezogene Daten an den Drittanbieter weitergegeben, die zur Ausführung des Zahlungsdienstes nötig sind. Hierzu zählen dein Name, dein Profilbild, deine E‑Mail-Adresse, deine IP-Adresse und deine Rechnungsadresse, deine Telefonnummer, Informationen zu deinem Gerät, dein Standort und Aktivitäten in deinem Google-Konto.
Wenn du die Website oder App eines teilnehmenden Händlers besuchst, kann dieser prüfen, ob du ein Google-Zahlungsprofil mit einer Zahlungsmethode hast, die für Käufe über die Website oder App des Händlers verwendet werden kann. Dadurch wird es weniger wahrscheinlich, dass dir auf der Website oder in der App Funktionen angeboten werden, die du gar nicht nutzen kannst.
Wenn du eine Transaktion mit einem Drittanbieter durchführst (z. B. mit Händlern und Zahlungsdienstleistern), geben wir unter Umständen Betrugsrisiko-Scores und andere Betrugsbewertungen bezüglich deiner Zahlungstransaktion ausschließlich zur Betrugs- und Missbrauchsprävention an diese Dritten weiter.
Die von uns erhobenen Daten, einschließlich der von Drittanbietern eingeholten Informationen, stehen auch unseren Tochtergesellschaften zur Verfügung, also den Unternehmen, die sich im Besitz und unter der Kontrolle von Google LLC befinden. Unsere Tochtergesellschaften, bei denen es sich sowohl um Finanz- als auch um Nicht-Finanzunternehmen handeln kann, verwenden diese Informationen für die in diesen Datenschutzhinweisen und in der Datenschutzerklärung von Google genannten Zwecke, u. a. für ihre Standardgeschäftszwecke.
Du hast das Recht, der Weitergabe bestimmter Informationen von GPC an Tochtergesellschaften zu widersprechen, falls zutreffend. Insbesondere hast du die Möglichkeit,
dem Austausch von Informationen über deine Kreditwürdigkeit zwischen GPC und seinen Tochtergesellschaften zu Standardgeschäftszwecken zu widersprechen und/oder
abzulehnen, dass unsere Tochtergesellschaften dich als Kunde für ihre Produkte oder Dienste zu werben versuchen, wenn dies auf der Grundlage der von uns erhobenen und weitergegebenen Daten zu deiner Person geschieht. Zu diesen Daten gehört auch dein Kontoverlauf bei uns.
Du kannst auch angeben, dass Google LLC oder seine Tochtergesellschaften Drittanbietern, deren Website oder App du besuchst, keine Informationen dazu weitergeben dürfen, ob du ein Google-Zahlungsprofil hast, das für Zahlungen über die Website oder App dieses Händlers genutzt werden kann.
Wenn du dein Widerspruchsrecht ausübst, bleibt deine Entscheidung wirksam, bis du sie widerrufst.
Wenn du nicht möchtest, dass zwischen GPC und seinen Tochtergesellschaften personenbezogene Daten zu deiner Kreditwürdigkeit ausgetauscht oder von uns erhobene und weitergegebene personenbezogene Daten von unseren Tochtergesellschaften zu Vermarktungszwecken genutzt werden oder dass Google LLC oder seine Tochtergesellschaften Drittanbieter, deren Website oder App du besuchst, darüber informieren, ob du ein Google-Zahlungsprofil hast, melde dich in deinem Konto an, rufe die
Seite mit den Datenschutzeinstellungen von Google Payments
auf und ändere deine Einstellungen.
Mit Ausnahme der Fälle, die in diesen Datenschutzhinweisen oder der Datenschutzerklärung von Google beschrieben wurden, geben wir deine personenbezogenen Daten nicht an Dritte außerhalb von GPC oder an unsere Tochtergesellschaften weiter. Google Payments ist ein Produkt, das wir Inhabern eines Google-Kontos anbieten. Daten, die du Google LLC zum Zweck der Registrierung eines Google-Kontos zur Verfügung stellst, sind von den Widerspruchsbestimmungen in diesen Datenschutzhinweisen nicht betroffen.
Schutz deiner Daten
Weitere Informationen zu unseren Sicherheitsmaßnahmen findest du in der
Datenschutzerklärung von Google.
Für die Sicherheit deines Google-Zahlungsprofils ist es erforderlich, dass du deine Kontopasswörter, PINs und sonstigen Zugangsinformationen für den Dienst vertraulich behandelst:
Sobald du Informationen zu deinem Google-Konto an Dritte weitergibst, können diese auf dein Google-Zahlungsprofil und deine personenbezogenen Daten zugreifen.
Du bist dafür verantwortlich sicherzustellen, dass niemand Unbefugtes auf dein Mobilgerät und die Google Pay App auf deinem Gerät zugreifen kann. Hierzu gehört auch, deine Passwörter und/oder deine PIN vertraulich zu behandeln und sie an niemanden weiterzugeben.
Du bist auch dafür verantwortlich, Google oder den betreffenden Partner zu informieren, wenn du den Eindruck hast, dass es Sicherheitslücken in Bezug auf die Informationen in der Google Pay App gibt.
Alle Angaben, die du direkt gegenüber einem Händler als Drittanbieter, auf dessen Website oder in dessen App machst, unterliegen nicht diesen Datenschutzhinweisen. Wir übernehmen keine Verantwortung für die Datenschutz- oder Sicherheitsmaßnahmen von Händlern oder sonstigen Drittanbietern, an die du personenbezogene Daten direkt weitergibst. Wir empfehlen dir, immer die Datenschutzrichtlinien des Drittanbieters zu prüfen, an den du personenbezogene Daten direkt weitergibst.
© 2024 Google –
Google-Startseite
Google-Nutzungsbedingungen
Vorherige Datenschutzhinweise
Sub-policy 4
https://cdn.klarna.com/1.0/shared/content/legal/terms/0/de_de/privacy:
1. Wer ist für Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verantwortlich?
2. Ihre Datenschutzrechte als betroffene Person
3. Welche Arten von personenbezogenen Daten erheben wir?
4. Welche personenbezogenen Daten werden für welche Zwecke und auf welcher Rechtsgrundlage verwendet?
5. Wie können Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen?
6. Klarnas Verwendung von Profiling und automatisierte Entscheidungen, die Sie maßgeblich betreffen.
7. An wen leiten wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weiter?
8. Wann können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten außerhalb der EU/des EWR übertragen und wie schützen wir diese dann?
9. Wie lange wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten speichern
10. Wie wir Cookies und sonstige Arten von Tracking-Technologie verwenden
11. Aktualisierungen dieser Datenschutzerklärung
12. Klarnas Kontaktinformationen
13. Fusion mit SOFORT GmbH
Navigationsmenü öffnen
Navigationsmenü schließen
Damit Sie die Abschnitte, die Sie interessieren, leicht finden können, haben wir die Datenschutzerklärung in verschiedene Überschriften gegliedert. Klicken Sie einfach auf die betreffende Überschrift in der unten angegebenen Liste, um direkt zum entsprechenden Abschnitt zu gelangen.
1. Wer ist für Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verantwortlich?
Die Klarna Bank AB (publ), eingetragen im schwedischen Handelsregister unter der Firmennummer 556737-0431 und mit Sitz in Sveavägen 46, 111 34 Stockholm, die ihre Tätigkeit auch über ihre Zweigniederlassungen ausübt („Klarna“, „wir“, „unser“ oder „uns“), ist gemäß der EU-Datenschutzgrundverordnung (die „DSGVO“) für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten verantwortlich. Sollten Sie Fragen zur Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten haben, wenden Sie sich bitte an unser Datenschutzteam unter der E-mail Adresse
datenschutz@klarna.de
.
2. Ihre Datenschutzrechte als betroffene Person
Gemäß der DSGVO stehen Ihnen verschiedene Rechte im Hinblick auf die Kontrolle über Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zu. Sie können direkt von uns Informationen darüber erhalten, wie wir die Sie betreffenden Daten verarbeiten. Im Folgenden können Sie sich über Ihre Rechte informieren. Wenn Sie Informationen über die personenbezogenen Daten erhalten möchten, die Klarna über Sie speichert, eine sogenannte Auskunft über Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, bestimmte Daten löschen lassen oder uns kontaktieren möchten, um Ihre weiteren Rechte auszuüben, ist der einfachste Weg, sich in Ihr Klarna-Konto einzuloggen und Ihre Anfrage dort zu stellen. Sie können unsere Kontaktdaten auch in Abschnitt 12 für weitere Fragen finden.
Ihre Rechte
Recht auf Löschung personenbezogener Daten (“Recht auf Vergessenwerden“)
In einigen Fällen haben Sie das Recht auf Löschung der Sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten durch uns. Dies bedeutet beispielsweise, dass Sie von uns verlangen können, personenbezogene Daten, zu löschen, die wir (i) nicht mehr zur Erfüllung des Zweckes benötigen, für den sie von uns erhoben wurden oder (ii) verarbeiten auf der Grundlage Ihrer Einwilligung und bei Vorliegen eines durch Sie erfolgten Widerrufs dieser Einwilligung. Es gibt Situationen, wenn Klarna nicht in der Lage ist, Ihre Daten zu löschen, wie z.B. wenn die Daten für den Zweck, für den sie erhoben wurden, noch erforderlich sind oder das Interesse von Klarna an der Verarbeitung der Daten Ihr Interesse an der Löschung der Daten überwiegt oder weil wir einer rechtliche Verpflichtung zu ihrer Aufbewahrung unterliegen. Sie können in den Abschnitten 4 und 9 der Datenschutzerklärung mehr über unsere rechtliche Verpflichtung zur Speicherung von Daten erfahren. Die dort genannten rechtlichen Bestimmungen hindern uns daran, bestimmte Daten sofort zu löschen. Sie verfügen auch über das recht, der Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten für bestimmte Zwecke zu widersprechen, wie z.B. für Direktwerbung; mehr dazu erfahren Sie in dieser Auflistung Ihrer Rechte.
Recht auf Informationen.
Sie haben das Recht, von uns darüber informiert zu werden, wie wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verarbeiten. Dies erfolgt durch diese Datenschutzerklärung, durchdienstleistungsspezifische FAQs und durch die Beantwortung Ihrer Fragen.
Recht, Auskunft über Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zu erhalten («Auskunftsrecht der betroffenen Person»).
Sie haben das Recht, zu erfahren, ob Klarna Sie betreffende personenbezogene Daten verarbeitet und eine Kopie („Datenauszug“) dieser Daten zu erhalten, das sogenannte Auskunftsrecht der betroffenen Person. Mittels des Datenauszugs werden Sie die Information darüber erhalten, welche personenbezogenen Daten Klarna über Sie besitzt und wie wir diese verarbeiten.
Recht auf Auskunft und auf Übertragung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten an einen anderen Empfänger (“Datenübertragbarkeit“).
Dieses Recht bedeutet, dass Sie eine Kopie der Sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten, die Klarna zur Erfüllung eines mit Ihnen geschlossenen Vertrags besitzt oder auf Grundlage einer Einwilligung Ihrerseits verarbeitet, in einem maschinell lesbaren Format anfordern können. Dies wird es Ihnen erlauben, die Daten woanders zu verwenden, beispielsweise für die Übertragung an einen anderen Verantwortlichen/Empfänger.
Recht auf Berichtigung.
Sie haben das Recht, die Berichtigung Sie betreffender unrichtiger Informationen oder die Vervollständigung Sie betreffender Informationen zu verlangen, die Sie für unrichtig oder unvollständig erachten.
Recht auf Einschränkung der Verarbeitung.
Sollten Sie der Meinung sein, dass Daten unrichtig sind, unsere Verarbeitung der Daten unrechtmäßig ist oder dass wir die Daten nicht für einen bestimmten Zweck benötigen, können Sie eine Einschränkung der Verarbeitung derartiger personenbezogener Daten verlangen. Sie haben auch die Möglichkeit, zu verlangen, dass wir die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten einstellen, während wir Ihre Anfrage überprüfen. Wenn Sie gemäß Ihrem nachstehend beschriebenen Recht
Widerspruch
gegen unsere Verarbeitung einlegen, können Sie auch verlangen, dass wir die Verarbeitung dieser personenbezogenen Daten einschränken, während wir unsere Überprüfung vornehmen.
Recht auf Widerspruch gegen die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten
Sie haben das Recht, unter Bezugnahme auf Ihre persönlichen Umstände gegen die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten auf der Grundlage unseres berechtigten Interesses (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO) Widerspruch einzulegen. Darüber hinaus können Sie auch jederzeit der Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu Direktwerbungszwecken widersprechen. Wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie keine weiteren Direktwerbungs-Informationen mehr von uns erhalten möchten, werden wir das Marketing Ihnen gegenüber einstellen und Ihnen kein entsprechendes Material mehr zusenden.
Recht auf Widerspruch gegen eine automatisierte Entscheidung, die Sie erheblich beeinträchtigt
.
Sie haben das Recht, gegen eine automatisierte Entscheidung von Klarna Widerspruch einzulegen, wenn die Entscheidung Ihnen gegenüber rechtliche Wirkung entfaltet oder Sie in ähnlicher Weise erheblich beeinträchtigt. In Abschnitt 6 wird erläutert, wie Klarna automatisierte Entscheidungen nutzt.
Recht auf Widerruf Ihrer Einwilligung.
Wie in untenstehendem Abschnitt 5 beschrieben, haben Sie in Fällen, in denen wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auf der Grundlage Ihrer Einwilligung oder expliziten Einwilligung verarbeiten, das Recht, diese Einwilligung jederzeit zu widerrufen. Wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen, werden wir die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten für die entsprechenden Zwecke einstellen.
Recht auf Einreichung einer Beschwerde
.
Wenn Sie sich darüber beschweren möchten, wie Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verarbeitet, haben Sie das Recht, eine Beschwerde bei
Integritetsskyddsmyndigheten
, der schwedischen Aufsichtsbehörde für die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten durch Klarna, einzureichen. Sie erreichen
Integritetsskyddsmyndigheten
über den folgenden
Link
. Sie können auch eine Beschwerde bei Ihrer nationalen Datenschutzbehörde einreichen, die Sie in der Auflistung hier finden
können
.
Einstellungen in der mobilen Klarna App:
In der mobilen Klarna App bietet Ihnen Klarna die Möglichkeit, Ihre Präferenzen für bestimmte Dienste anzupassen, wie z. B. hinsichtlich des Erhalts aktueller Benachrichtigungen.
3. Welche Arten von personenbezogenen Daten erheben wir?
In diesem Abschnitt erläutern wir die verschiedenen Arten der von uns erhobenen oder erstellten personenbezogenen Daten. In Abschnitt 4 beschreiben wir, zu welchen Zwecken wir diese Arten personenbezogener Daten verwenden.
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten
- Name, Geburtsdatum, Geburtsort, Sozialversicherungsnummer, Titel, Beruf, Geschlecht, Rechnungs- und Lieferadresse, E-Mail-Adresse, Mobiltelefonnummer, Staatsangehörigkeit, Alter, Audioaufnahmen, Fotos und Videoaufnahmen von Ihnen und Ihrem Ausweis, Elektronische ID, qualifizierte elektronische Signaturen  usw.
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen
- Daten zu den von Ihnen gekauften oder bestellten Waren/Dienstleistungen (bzw. deren Kauf oder Bestellung Sie planen), wie z. B. Art des Artikels oder die Sendungsverfolgungsnummer.
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation
- Informationen z. B. über Ihr Einkommen, eventuelle Kredite, negatives Zahlungsverhalten und frühere Kreditgenehmigungen.
Zahlungsinformationen
- Kredit- und Debitkartendaten (Kartennummer, Gültigkeit und CVV-Code), Kontonummer, Name Ihrer Bank, Name des Kontoinhabers, Bank-Login-Daten.
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna
- Welche(n) Dienst(e) und welche Funktionen Sie bei diesen Diensten genutzt haben und wie Sie sie genutzt haben. Dazu gehören Informationen über ausstehende und frühere Schulden, Ihre Zahlungs- und Rückzahlungshistorie und Ihre persönlichen Präferenzen einschließlich abgeleiteter Interessen.
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna generiert werden
- Technische Daten wie z. B. Antwortzeit von Webseiten, Protokolle der Art und Weise, wie Sie durch unsere Dienste navigieren, Download- oder Transaktionsfehler, Datum und Uhrzeit, wann Sie den Dienst genutzt haben.
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundenservice von Klarna
- Aufgezeichnete Telefonanrufe, Chat-Konversationen und E-Mail-Korrespondenz.
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen
- Informationen darüber, wie Sie mit Händlern interagieren, z. B. ob Sie Waren erhalten haben und die Art von Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen.
Geräteinformationen
- Geräte-ID, IP-Adresse, Spracheinstellungen, Browsereinstellungen, Zeitzone, Betriebssystem, Plattform, Bildschirmauflösung und ähnliche Daten über Ihre Geräte und Geräteeinstellungen/Nutzung.
Informationen aus externen Sanktionslisten und PEP-Listen
- Sanktionslisten und Listen von politisch exponierten Personen („PEP“) enthalten Informationen wie Name, Geburtsdatum, Geburtsort, Beruf oder Position und den Grund, warum die Person auf der jeweiligen Liste steht.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten
- Sensible personenbezogene Daten sind Daten, aus denen religiöse Überzeugungen, politische oder weltanschauliche Ansichten oder die Mitgliedschaft in einer Gewerkschaft hervorgehen, die Informationen über Gesundheitszustand, das Sexualleben oder die sexuelle Orientierung darstellen, sowie biometrische Daten.
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten
- Im Rahmen unseres Klarna Shopping Services sowie in Verbindung mit den Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna, Auto- Track und Finanzielle Analysen verwenden wir weitere personenbezogene Daten, die nicht unter die oben aufgeführten Arten fallen. Informationen zu den einzelnen Diensten sind hier aufgeführt:
Die mobile Klarna App (die „Klarna App“) und Browsererweiterung (im Rahmen des Klarna Shopping Service):
Sämtliche Inhalte, die Sie hochladen oder bereitstellen (z. B. Anfragen, Fotos, Belege, Produkt- & Shop-Bewertungen oder Profil-Bilder), Standortinformationen, Geolokalisierungsinformationen, Informationen über die Verwendung des Browsers und die Websites, die Sie im Browser der App oder mit der installierten Erweiterung besuchen;
Die Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna:
Informationen über Ihre Transaktionen und Einzahlungen sowie Informationen darüber, woher Ihr Geld kommt oder wofür es verwendet wird. Klarna verarbeitet für diesen Service auch Daten über Dritte (wie Zahlungsempfänger oder Zahlender);
Auto-track:
Informationen aus dem verbundenen E-Mail-Konto über Ihre abgeschlossenen Einkäufe (wie z.B. Bestellnummer, Produkt, Preis, Kaufdatum, Mengeninformationen, verwendete Zahlungsmethode, Promotions-Codes, Sendungsverfolgungsnummern und Spediteur). Wir erheben auch Informationen im Zusammenhang mit der Lieferung (wie z.B. Lieferstatus, Lieferadresse, voraussichtliches Lieferdatum), Informationen aus E-Mails (wie z.B. Absender, Datum der E-Mail) und Informationen über Händler;
Finanzielle Analysen:
Daten von Ihren anderen Bankkonten und anderen Arten von Konten (z. B. Kartenkonten), die Sie mit dem Dienst verbinden, sowie Daten wie Kontonummer, Bank, historische Transaktionen von Ihren verbundenen Konten sowie Salden und Vermögenswerte;
Kundenkarte-Funktion
: Informationen von Ihrem hinzugefügten Membership- oder Treuekartenkonto eines Drittanbieters, wie z.B. Informationen und Berechtigungsnachweise zum Membership, Membershippunkte, Status, Level und Guthabensverlauf; und
Klarna Cashback:
Kaufbeträge und Daten von über das Klarna Cashback-Programm getätigten Käufen, unabhängig davon, ob Sie mit Klarna bezahlt haben oder nicht. Wir verarbeiten auch Informationen über die Cashback-Angebotsrate pro Kauf und den erhaltenen Cashback-Betrag.
Open Banking-Dienst
: Informationen von Ihrem Drittbankkonto, wie grundlegende Kontoinformationen (Kontoinhaber, Bankkontonummer, Bank-Login-Daten) sowie Informationen über Ihre Transaktionen, Ihren Kontostand und Ihre Überziehungslimite.
Anmeldung zu Veranstaltungen in Social Media:
Informationen über Ihr Profil aus Ihrem Social-Media-Konto und geschäftliche Daten wie Name, Adresse und Unternehmensart Ihres Arbeitgebers.
Detaillierte Informationen zu den entsprechenden personenbezogenen Daten für jeden Social-Media-Dienst finden Sie außerdem
hier
.
4. Welche personenbezogenen Daten werden für welche Zwecke und auf welcher Rechtsgrundlage verwendet?
In den nachfolgenden Tabellen erfahren Sie mehr darüber,
wofür (zu welchem Zweck) wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwenden,
welche Arten personenbezogener Daten wir für den jeweiligen Zweck nutzen und ob die personenbezogenen Daten direkt von Ihnen oder aus einer anderen Quelle stammen. Falls wir personenbezogene Daten über Sie aus einer anderen Quelle erhalten haben, geben wir die Quelle in Klammern an
welche Rechte wir nach den geltenden Datenschutzgesetzen, wie z. B. der DSGVO, haben, um die Daten über Sie zu verarbeiten, was als unsere "Rechtsgrundlage" bezeichnet wird, und
wann Klarna die Verwendung der personenbezogenen Daten für den jeweiligen Zweck einstellt.
4.1 Zwecke, für die Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
in allen Fällen
verwendet werden, unabhängig davon, welchen Service Sie nutzen.
Zweck der Verarbeitung - was wir tun und warum.
Arten von personenbezogenen Daten, die für den Zweck verwendet werden, und woher sie stammen (Quelle). Im Abschnitt 3 finden Sie weitere Informationen über die verschiedenen Arten von personenbezogenen Daten.
Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung gemäß der DSGVO.
Zu welchem Zeitpunkt der Zweck für die Nutzung der personenbezogenen Daten nicht mehr gegeben ist. Siehe Abschnitt 9 für weitere Informationen zum Zeitpunkt der Datenlöschung durch Klarna.
[1]
Um unsere Kundenbeziehung mit Ihnen für jeden von Ihnen genutzten Dienst in Übereinstimmung mit unseren Vereinbarungen zu verwalten. Dies umfasst das Erstellen und elektronische Versenden von Informationen an Sie (kein Marketing).
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Dienstleistungsspezif-ische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3).
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag mit Ihnen eingehen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Wenn der Dienst Informationen verarbeitet, die sensible personenbezogene Daten darstellen (z. B. aus Dateien, die Sie hochladen), erfolgt unsere Verarbeitung auf der Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung (Art. 9 Abs. 2 a) DSGVO).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet oder wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen.
[2]
Um Umfragen zur Kundenzufriedenheit durchführen, Verbraucherforschung betreiben sowie Bewertungen von Ihnen erbitten zu können, per E-Mail, Textnachrichten, Telefonanrufen oder über andere Kommunikationskanäle.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, solche Umfragen durchzuführen, dass die Verarbeitung zur Erreichung dieses Zwecks erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht für diesen Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Bei Anrufen basiert die Verarbeitung auf Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 a) DSGVO).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[3]
Gewährleistung der Netzwerk- und Informationssicherheit bei den Diensten von Klarna.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, die Netzwerk- und Informationssicherheit gewährleisten zu können, dass die Verarbeitung zur Erreichung dieses Zwecks erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Es ist auch in Ihrem Interesse als Kunde, dass wir eine gute Informationssicherheit gewährleisten.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen die Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Ihre Daten werden so lange verarbeitet, wie Sie einen Dienst nutzen.
[4]
Um Sie als schutzbedürftigen Kunde zu unterstützen (d. h., wenn Sie aufgrund besonderer Umstände zusätzliche Unterstützung bei der Kontaktaufnahme mit uns benötigen). Das bedeutet, dass wir Ihnen besondere Unterstützung anbieten können, z. B. wenn Sie den Kundenservice kontaktieren.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten (Informationen über Ihren Gesundheitszustand).
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Basierend auf Ihrer Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 a) und Art. 9 Abs. 2 a) DSGVO).
Wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie nicht mehr als schutzbedürftiger Kunde einzustufen sind oder Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen. Wir stellen diese Verarbeitung auch ein, wenn und sobald Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie nicht länger Kunde von Klarna sein möchten.
[5]
Um Risikoanalysen durchzuführen, Betrug zu verhindern und Risikomanagement zu betreiben.
Wir führen die Verarbeitung durch, um Ihre Identität zu bestätigen und sicherzustellen, dass die von Ihnen angegebenen Daten korrekt sind, sowie um Straftaten zu verhindern.
Diese Verarbeitung stellt ein Profiling und eine automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung dar. Wir nutzen die automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung zu diesem Zweck, um feststellen zu können, ob Sie ein Betrugsrisiko darstellen. Weitere Informationen zum Profiling und zu automatisierten Entscheidungen finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Sensible personenbezogene Daten (Ihre Ausweisdokumente)
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Sensible personenbezogene Daten werden auf Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung (Artikel 9(2)(a) DSGVO) verarbeitet, soweit Ihnen dies bei der Erhebung solcher Daten erklärt wird.
Für unsere Finanzdienstleistungen sind wir jedoch auch gesetzlich verpflichtet, die Identität unserer Kunden festzustellen (Artikel 6(1)(c) DSGVO), (Schwedisches
Gesetz (2017:630) über Maßnahmen gegen Geldwäsche und Terrorismusfinanzierung
).
Diese Verarbeitung erfolgt für die Dauer Ihrer Nutzung eines Dienstes von Klarna oder bis Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen.
Wenn Klarna allerdings ein potenzielles Risiko in der Art und Weise Ihrer Nutzung von Klarna identifiziert hat, werden wir Ihre Daten weiterhin für diesen Zweck verwenden und - sollte ein Betrugsrisiko bestehen - unsere Risikobewertung kontinuierlich aktualisieren. Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten so lange, wie wir gesetzlich zur Aufbewahrung Ihrer Daten verpflichtet sind. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[6]
Um Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zu anonymisieren, und darauf basierend unsere Dienstleistungen und Produkte zu verbessern und das Kundenverhalten zu analysieren.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Dienstleistungsspezif-ische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3).
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten für Zwecke der Produktentwicklung zu anonymisieren und das Kundenverhalten zu analysieren, um den Service und das Kundenerlebnis zu verbessern. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um den Zweck der Verarbeitung zu erreichen und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Indem wir Sie betreffende Daten anonymisieren, stellen wir sicher, dass wir personenbezogene Daten so wenig intensiv wie möglich nutzen.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen die Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Diese Verarbeitung erfolgt über den gesamten Zeitraum hinweg, in dem Klarna die Daten in seinen Systemen aufbewahren muss, zum Beispiel um den mit Ihnen abgeschlossenen Vertrag zu erfüllen oder um geltendem Recht zu entsprechen. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[7]
Zur Durchführung von Datenanalysen für die Produktentwicklung und -prüfung zur Verbesserung unserer Risiko-, Betrugs- und Kreditmodelle und zur Gestaltung und Verbesserung unserer Dienste (wenn möglich, erfolgt im ersten Schritt eine Anonymisierung der Daten, d. h. es findet im Anschluss keine Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten mehr statt).
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3).
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse an der Durchführung von Datenanalysen für Produktentwicklungs- und Testzwecke haben. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um den Zweck der Verarbeitung zu erreichen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Darüber hinaus profitieren unsere Kunden von der Verarbeitung, da sie uns hilft, fehlerfreie und nachhaltige Dienste bereitzustellen.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen die Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Diese Verarbeitung erfolgt über den gesamten Zeitraum hinweg, in dem Klarna die Daten in seinen Systemen aufbewahren muss, z. B., um den mit Ihnen abgeschlossenen Vertrag zu erfüllen oder um geltendem Recht zu entsprechen. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[8]
Zur Durchführung von Datenanalysen für die Messung und Verbesserung unserer Marketing- und Werbekanäle (wenn möglich, erfolgt im ersten Schritt eine Anonymisierung der Daten, d. h. es findet im Anschluss keine Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten mehr statt).
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3).
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse an der Durchführung von Datenanalysen für die Messung und Verbesserung unserer Marketing- und Werbekanäle haben. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um den Zweck der Verarbeitung zu erreichen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen die Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Diese Verarbeitung erfolgt über den gesamten Zeitraum hinweg, in dem Klarna die Daten in seinen Systemen aufbewahren muss, z. B., um den mit Ihnen abgeschlossenen Vertrag zu erfüllen oder um geltendem Recht zu entsprechen. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[9]
Zur Berechnung von Zahlungsprovisionen an Lieferanten (sofern möglich, anonymisieren wir die Daten zunächst, was bedeutet, dass keine Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten hiernach mehr stattfindet).
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Klarna)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna erzeugt werden.(Klarna)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse an der Berechnung von Zahlungsprovisionen haben. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um den Zweck der Verarbeitung zu erreichen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen die Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Diese Verarbeitung erfolgt bis zu 90 Tage nach Nutzung einer Dienstleistung.
[10]
Zur Erstellung von Statistiken und Berichten für wirtschaftliche Analysen oder Analysen von Zahlungstrends oder Zahlungsvolumina in bestimmten Regionen oder Branchen (wenn möglich, erfolgt im ersten Schritt eine Anonymisierung der Daten, d. h. es findet im Anschluss keine Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten mehr statt).
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Dienstleistungsspezif-ische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3).
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, statistische Daten und Berichte für diesen Zweck zu erstellen. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um den Zweck der Verarbeitung zu erreichen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen die Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Diese Verarbeitung erfolgt über den gesamten Zeitraum hinweg, in dem Klarna die Daten in seinen Systemen aufbewahren muss, z. B., um den mit Ihnen abgeschlossenen Vertrag zu erfüllen oder um geltendem Recht zu entsprechen. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[11] Zur Überprüfung und Verifizierung Ihrer Identität.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Sensible personenbezogene Daten. (Biometrische Informationen aus Ihrem vorgelegten Ausweis und hochgeladenem Bild)
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Sensible personenbezogene Daten werden auf Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung (Artikel 9(2)(a) DSGVO) verarbeitet, soweit Ihnen dies bei der Erhebung solcher Daten erklärt wird.
Solange Sie einen der Dienste von Klarna nutzen.
[12]
Zur Weitergabe Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten an die in Abschnitt 7.1 beschriebenen Kategorien von Empfängern (Lieferanten und Subunternehmer, Unternehmen der Klarna-Gruppe, Personen mit Befugnissen über Ihre Finanztransaktionen, Behörden und Käufer von Forderungen, Unternehmen oder Vermögenswerten).
Alle in Abschnitt 3 genannten Arten.
Je nach Empfänger (siehe Abschnitt 7.1) unterschiedlich.
Diese Verarbeitung erfolgt über den gesamten Zeitraum hinweg, in dem Klarna die Daten in seinen Systemen aufbewahren muss, z. B., um den mit Ihnen abgeschlossenen Vertrag zu erfüllen oder um geltendem Recht zu entsprechen. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[13]
Um zu entscheiden, welche Art von Marketing oder Marketingumfragen wir Ihnen anbieten werden.
Wenn Sie eine solche Verarbeitung nicht wünschen, kontaktieren Sie uns bitte, um uns dies mitzuteilen. Wir werden dann die Nutzung Ihrer Daten zu Marketingzwecken beenden. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Die Verarbeitung kann ein Profiling darstellen. Siehe Abschnitt 6 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3).
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, zu ermitteln, welche Art von Marketing wir Ihnen anbieten sollten. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Dies geschieht unter Berücksichtigung der Tatsache, dass Marketing in der DSGVO als ein Beispiel für ein berechtigtes Interesse aufgeführt ist.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen die Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet, oder wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie an dieser Verarbeitung nicht interessiert sind.
[14]
Um Ihnen Marketingmaterialien, Angebote und Marketingumfragen über unsere anderen Produkte und Dienste zukommen zu lassen, die denen ähnlich sind, die Sie bereits verwendet haben und die Teil von Klarnas allgemeines Verbraucherangebot sind.
Wenn Sie kein Marketing von uns erhalten möchten, kontaktieren Sie uns bitte, um uns dies mitzuteilen. Wir werden dann die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zur Zusendung von Marketingmaterial beenden. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, Ihnen Marketingmitteilungen zu unseren Diensten und Angeboten zu senden. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um dieses Interesse zu verfolgen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht überwiegt, dass Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeitet werden. Dies geschieht unter Berücksichtigung der Tatsache, dass Marketing in der DSGVO als ein Beispiel für ein berechtigtes Interesse aufgeführt ist.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen die Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet, oder wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie an dieser Verarbeitung nicht interessiert sind.
[15]
Um Ihnen Direktmarketing und Marketingumfragen über Angebote, Produkte oder Dienstleistungen von Klarna und unseren Geschäften/Partnern zur Verfügung zu stellen.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf Ihrer Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 a) DSGVO).
Wenn Sie uns entweder mitteilen, dass Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen möchten, oder wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie an dieser Verarbeitung/Opt-out kein Interesse haben.
[16]
Um Klarna vor rechtlichen Ansprüchen zu schützen und die rechtlichen Interessen von Klarna zu wahren.
Alle in Abschnitt 3 genannten Arten.
Im Falle eines Rechtsstreits kann Klarna auch andere Arten von personenbezogenen Daten über Sie erheben, wenn wir diese zur Ausübung unserer Rechte benötigen.
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, uns vor Rechtsansprüchen schützen zu können. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um den Zweck der Verarbeitung zu erreichen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen die Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten werden, wenn dies zur Geltendmachung, Ausübung oder Verteidigung von Rechtsansprüchen erforderlich ist, gemäß Artikel 9(2)(f) DSGVO verarbeitet.
Diese Verarbeitung erfolgt über den gesamten Zeitraum hinweg, in dem Klarna die Informationen in seinen Systemen aufbewahren muss, zum Beispiel um den mit Ihnen abgeschlossenen Vertrag zu erfüllen oder um geltendem Recht zu entsprechen. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
4.2 Zwecke, für die Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden, wenn Sie eine der Zahlungsmethoden von Klarna nutzen, sich mit Klarna bei einem Händler anmelden oder sich beim Bezahlvorgang in Klarnas Checkout bei einem Händler für eine Zahlung per Debit- oder Kreditkarte entscheiden.
Zweck der Verarbeitung - was wir tun und warum.
Arten von personenbezogenen Daten, die für den Zweck verwendet werden, und woher sie stammen (die Quelle). Im Abschnitt 3 finden Sie weitere Informationen über die verschiedenen Arten von personenbezogenen Daten.
Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung gemäß der DSGVO.
Zu welchem Zeitpunkt der Zweck für die Nutzung der personenbezogenen Daten nicht mehr gegeben ist. Siehe Abschnitt 9 für weitere Informationen zum Zeitpunkt der Datenlöschung durch Klarna.
[17]
Um das Recht des Händlers auf Bezahlung Ihres Einkaufs an Klarna zu übertragen („Factoring“).
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir (und der Händler) ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, Ihre ausstehenden Forderungen zu verkaufen bzw. zu kaufen. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um den Zweck der Verarbeitung zu erreichen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen die Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Zum Zeitpunkt des Kaufs.
[18]
Zur Weitergabe Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten an die in Abschnitt 7.2 beschriebenen Kategorien von Empfängern (Händler, Zahlungsdienstleister, Kassendienstleister, Kartennetzwerke und Finanzinstitute, der Betrugsprävention dienende Einrichtungen, Unternehmen, die Identitätsinformationen bereitstellen, Google und Billie).
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Je nach Empfänger (siehe Abschnitt 7.2) unterschiedlich.
Vorrangig während des Kaufs, aber auch über den gesamten Zeitraum hinweg, in dem Klarna die Daten in seinen Systemen aufbewahrt, d. h., bis die Daten gelöscht werden. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[19]
Wenn Sie bei einem Händler einkaufen, der Klarna als Zahlungsmethode anbietet oder Klarnas Checkout nutzt, legen wir die Reihenfolge fest, in der Ihnen verschiedene Zahlungsmethoden im Checkout-Vorgang des Händlers angeboten werden sollen.
Diese Verarbeitung stellt ein Profiling dar. Siehe Abschnitt 6 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Wenn Sie den Klarna Service namens „Shopping Service“, der in den Allgemeinen Geschäftsbedingungen des Services, die Sie
hier
finden, näher beschrieben ist, akzeptiert haben und nutzen, erfolgt die Verarbeitung der Daten auf der rechtlichen Grundlage der Erfüllung des Vertrags zwischen Ihnen und Klarna gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 (b) DSGVO.
Sollten Sie den „Shopping Service“-Vertrag nicht abgeschlossen haben, basiert die Verarbeitung stattdessen auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, die Reihenfolge zu prüfen, in der Ihnen verschiedene Zahlungsoptionen im Checkout-Vorgang des Händlers angeboten werden. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um den Zweck der Verarbeitung zu erreichen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen die Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Beim Anzeigen der Zahlungsarten im Checkout.
[20]
Um zu verhindern, dass die Aktivitäten von Klarna für Geldwäsche oder Terrorismusfinanzierung genutzt werden, indem Ihre Identität verifiziert wird und Transaktionen überwacht und überprüft werden. Klarna führt auch fortlaufende Risikobewertungen durch und erstellt Risikomodelle zur Bekämpfung von Geldwäsche und Terrorismusfinanzierung.
Diese Verarbeitung stellt ein Profiling und eine automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung dar. Weitere Informationen zum Profiling und zu automatisierten Entscheidungen finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen (Ihr Gerät)
Informationen aus externen Sanktionslisten und PEP-Listen. (Sanktionslisten und PEP-Listen)
Sensible personenbezogene Daten (Informationen über politische Meinungen, religiöse Überzeugungen und/oder Gesundheitsinformationen, die in den PEP-Listen enthalten sind sowie biometrische Informationen Ihres vorgelegten Personalausweises und Bildes).
Dienstleistungsspezif-ische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna).
Zur Einhaltung von Gesetzen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 c) DSGVO), (Schwedisches
Gesetz (2017:630) über Maßnahmen gegen Geldwäsche und Terrorismusfinanzierung
).
Bei sensiblen personenbezogenen Daten ist die Grundlage, dass die Verarbeitung aus Gründen des öffentlichen Interesses erforderlich ist (Art. 9 Abs. 2 g) DSGVO).
Sobald der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet oder wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen. Siehe Abschnitt 9 für weitere Informationen über unsere Verpflichtungen und unser Recht, Informationen in Übereinstimmung mit den gesetzlichen Vorschriften aufzubewahren.
[21]
Um eine Prüfung zur Betrugsprävention durchzuführen, bevor ein Kauf akzeptiert wird.
Diese Verarbeitung stellt ein Profiling und eine automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung dar. Wir nutzen die automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung zu diesem Zweck, um feststellen zu können, ob Sie ein Betrugsrisiko darstellen. Weitere Informationen zum Profiling und zu automatisierten Entscheidungen finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Siehe auch Abschnitt 7.2.3. über unsere Nutzung von der Betrugsprävention dienenden Einrichtungen und Unternehmen, an die Ihre Daten weitergegeben werden können, und unsere Rechtsgrundlage für diese Weitergabe. Wenn wir potenziell betrügerische Transaktionen feststellen, werden wir dies auch unseren der Betrugsprävention dienenden Büros laut Abschnitt 7.2.3 melden.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen (Ihr Gerät)
Sensible personenbezogene Daten (Biometrische Informationen aus Ihrem vorgelegten Personalausweis und Bild).
Darüber hinaus erhält Klarna von der Betrugsprävention dienenden Einrichtungen, Kassendienstleistern und Zahlungsdienstleistern Informationen darüber, ob Ihre Informationen auf einen Betrugsversuch hindeuten.
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Sensible personenbezogene Daten werden auf der Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung verarbeitet )Art. 9 Abs. 2 a) DSGVO).
Bei der Durchführung der Betrugsprüfung oder wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen.
[22]
Für die Buchhaltung und das Rechnungswesen im Einklang mit den anwendbaren Rechnungslegungsvorschriften sowie zur Aufbewahrung von Informationen im Rahmen der Buchhaltung und des Rechnungswesens im Einklang mit den anwendbaren Gesetzen.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Zur Einhaltung von Gesetzen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 c) DSGVO), (
Schwedisches Rechnungslegungsgesetz (1999:1078
).
Während der Rechnungslegungsperiode und 7 Jahre nach dem Ende des Jahres, in dem die Daten erfasst wurden. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[23]
Durchführung von Berechnungen in Übereinstimmung mit den Kapitaladäquanzvorschriften.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Dienstleistungsspezif-ische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna).
Zur Einhaltung von Gesetzen (Artikel 6 Abs. 1 c) DSGVO), (
Kapitaladäquanzverordnung 575/2013
und
Kapitaladäquanzrichtlinie 2013/36
)
.
Sieben Jahre nach dem Ende des Jahres, in dem die Daten erfasst wurden. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
4.3 Zwecke, für die Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden, wenn Sie eine der Zahlungsarten von Klarna nutzen, bei denen Ihnen ein Kredit gewährt wird, oder wenn Sie die Klarna-Card, Instore bezahlen, mit Klarna über digitale Geldbörsen bezahlen oder die Einmalkarte des Shopping Service verwenden.
Die folgenden Dienstleistungen beinhalten, dass Ihnen ein Kredit gewährt wird: „Pay Later“ (Rechnung), „Pay Now“ (Zahlung per Lastschrift), „Financing“ (Ratenkauf), die Klarna-Card, die Einmalkarte des Shopping Service und das Einzahlen von Geld durch die Aufladung Ihres Klarna Kontos (alle in der mobilen Klarna App verfügbar).
Zweck der Verarbeitung - was wir tun und warum.
Arten von personenbezogenen Daten, die für den Zweck verwendet werden, und woher sie stammen (Quelle). Im Abschnitt 3 finden Sie weitere Informationen über die verschiedenen Arten von personenbezogenen Daten.
Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung gemäß der DSGVO.
Zu welchem Zeitpunkt der Zweck für die Nutzung der personenbezogenen Daten nicht mehr gegeben ist. Siehe Abschnitt 9 für weitere Informationen zum Zeitpunkt der Datenlöschung durch Klarna.
[24]
Zur Durchführung einer Bonitätsprüfung
bevor ein Kredit gewährt wird.
Dies stellt ein Profiling dar und die
Entscheidung zur Freigabe oder Ablehnung des
Kredits stellt eine „automatisierte
Entscheidung“ dar. Siehe Abschnitt 6 für mehr
Informationen zum Profiling und zu automatisierten Entscheidungen.
Siehe auch Abschnitt 7.3.1 über unsere Nutzung von Kreditauskunfteien, an die Ihre Daten weitergegeben werden können, und unsere Rechtsgrundlage für diese Weitergabe.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Zum Abschluss und zur Durchführung des Kreditvertrags (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Sobald die Bonitätsprüfung abgeschlossen ist.
[25]
Zur Feststellung, welches der effizienteste Weg für die Kontaktaufnahme mit Ihnen in Bezug auf Ihre ausstehenden Forderungen ist. Dies hat keinen Einfluss auf Mitteilungen, die gemäß Verbraucherkreditgesetzen gesetzlich vorgeschrieben sind.
Bei dieser Verarbeitung handelt es sich um Profiling. Weitere Informationen über Profiling finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren und Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir (und Sie) ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, sicherzustellen, dass in effizienter Weise mit Ihnen in Bezug auf Ihre ausstehenden Forderungen Kontakt aufgenommen wird. Wir gewährleisten, dass die Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht für diesen Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Solange wie Sie noch ausstehende Forderungen bei Klarna haben.
[26]
Zum Weitergabe Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten an die in Abschnitt 7.3 beschriebenen Arten von Empfängern (Kreditauskunfteien, Inkassounternehmen und sonstige Käufer offener Forderungen sowie VISA, Forderungserwerber und Anbieter digitaler Geldbörsen).
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren und Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Je nach Empfänger (siehe Abschnitt 7.3) unterschiedlich.
Vorrangig während des Kaufs, aber auch über den gesamten Zeitraum hinweg, in dem Klarna die Daten in seinen Systemen aufbewahrt, also bis zu ihrer Löschung. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[27]
Um das Recht von Klarna auf Zahlung für Ihren Kauf auf einen neuen Forderungsinhaber zu übertragen.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, ausstehende Kredite im Rahmen der Ausübung unserer Geschäftstätigkeit zu verkaufen. Wir gewährleisten, dass die Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht für diesen Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Die Verarbeitung kann erfolgen, solange die Forderung unbezahlt ist (Sie werden benachrichtigt, wenn die Forderung übertragen wird).
[28]
Um Inkassodienstleistungen zu erbringen, d. h. überfällige Forderungen einzuziehen und zu verkaufen.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse an der Einziehung und dem Verkauf von Forderungen haben. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um den Zweck der Verarbeitung zu erreichen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Sobald die Forderung beglichen ist.
[29]
Um zu verhindern, dass die Aktiviäten von Klarna für Geldwäsche oder Terrorismusfinanzierung genutzt werden, wird Ihre Identität verifiziert und es werden Transaktionen überwacht und überprüft, Risikobewertungen durchgeführt und Risikomodelle erstellt.
Diese Verarbeitung stellt ein Profiling dar, und wenn entschieden wird, dass Sie ein Geldwäscherisiko darstellen, stellt dies eine automatisierte Entscheidung dar. Weitere Informationen zum Profiling und zu automatisierten Entscheidungen finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Informationen aus externen Sanktionslisten und PEP-Listen. (Sanktionslisten und PEP-Listen)
Sensible personenbezogene Daten (Informationen über politische Meinungen, religiöse Überzeugungen und/oder Gesundheitsinformationen, die in den PEP-Listen enthalten sind sowie biometrische Informationen Ihres vorgelegten Personalausweises und Bildes).
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna).
Zur Einhaltung von Gesetzen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 c) DSGVO), (
Schwedisches Gesetz (2017:630) über Maßnahmen gegen Geldwäsche und Terrorismusfinanzierung)
.
In Bezug auf sensible personenbezogene Daten ist die Bedingung, dass die Verarbeitung im öffentlichen Interesse erforderlich ist (Art. 9 Abs. 2 g) DSGVO).
Bis zu fünf Jahre nach Beendigung des Vertrags oder nach Beendigung der Kundenbeziehung (bis zu zehn Jahre, wenn Strafverfolgungs-behörden dies verlangen). Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[30]
Für die Archivierung und Buchhaltung im Einklang mit den anwendbaren Rechnungslegungsvorschriften.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Dienstleistungsspezif-ische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna).
Zur Einhaltung von Gesetzen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 c) DSGVO), (
Schwedisches Rechnungslegungsgesetz (1999:1078
).
Sieben Jahre nach dem Ende des Jahres, in dem die Daten erfasst wurden. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
4.4 Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten (sowie personenbezogener Daten von Dritten), um Ihnen Zugang zu Klarna Kontodiensten (Klarna Rechnungsabschluss, Spar- und Zahlungskonten) zu verschaffen.
Zweck der Verarbeitung - was wir tun und warum.
Arten von personenbezogenen Daten, die für den Zweck verwendet werden, und woher sie stammen (Quelle). Im Abschnitt 3 finden Sie weitere Informationen über die verschiedenen Arten von personenbezogenen Daten.
Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung gemäß der DSGVO.
Zu welchem Zeitpunkt der Zweck für die Nutzung der personenbezogenen Daten nicht mehr gegeben ist. Siehe Abschnitt 9 für weitere Informationen zum Zeitpunkt der Datenlöschung durch Klarna.
[31]
Klarna führt vor der Gewährung eines Klarna Kontos eine Bonitätsprüfung bei Ihnen durch, bei der unter Umständen Ihre Daten an ein Kreditauskunftsbüro weitergegeben werden (siehe Abschnitt 7.3.1. für weitere Informationen zu Kreditauskunfteien). Unter Umständen wird auch eine Bonitätsprüfung durchgeführt, wenn Sie Ihr Konto aufladen.
Hierbei handelt es sich um Profiling und bei der Entscheidung über die Bewilligung oder Ablehnung des Kredits handelt es sich um eine „automatisierte Entscheidung“. Weitere Informationen über Profiling und automatisierte Entscheidungen finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO). Die Servicebedingungen sind
hier
und
hier
verfügbar.
Bei der Kontoeröffnung.
[32]
Zur Bereitstellung der Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna).
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO). Die Servicebedingungen sind
hier
und
hier
verfügbar.
Wenn der Dienst Informationen verarbeitet, die sensible personenbezogene Daten darstellen (z. B. aus Materialien, die Sie hochladen), erfolgt unsere Verarbeitung auf der Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung (Art. 9 Abs. 2 a) DSGVO).
Bei Daten über Dritte (wie z. B. Zahlungsempfänger oder Zahlender) basiert die Verarbeitung auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir und Sie (sowie der Zahlungsempfänger/Zahlender) zur Durchführung der betreffenden Transaktionen ein berechtigtes Interesse an der Verarbeitung dieser Daten haben. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet oder wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen.
[33]
Zur Weitergabe Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten an die in Abschnitt 7.4 beschriebenen Kategorien von Empfängern (Kreditinstitute und andere Finanzinstitute).
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna).
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO). Die Servicebedingungen sind
hier
und
hier
verfügbar.
Wenn der Dienst Daten verarbeitet, die sensible personenbezogene Daten darstellen (aus Ihren Transaktionen), erfolgt unsere Verarbeitung auf Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung (Artikel 9(2)(a) DSGVO) oder, soweit erforderlich, zur Geltendmachung, Ausübung oder Verteidigung von Rechtsansprüchen (Artikel 9(2)(f) DSGVO)
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet oder wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen.
[34]
Um zu verhindern, dass die Produkte und Dienstleistungen von Klarna für Geldwäsche oder Terrorismusfinanzierung genutzt werden, werden Transaktionen überwacht und überprüft, Risikobewertungen durchgeführt und Risikomodelle erstellt.
Diese Verarbeitung stellt ein Profiling dar, und wenn entschieden wird, dass Sie ein Geldwäscherisiko darstellen, stellt dies eine automatisierte Entscheidung dar. Weitere Informationen zum Profiling und zu automatisierten Entscheidungen finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Informationen aus externen Sanktionslisten und PEP-Listen. (Sanktionslisten und PEP-Listen)
Sensible personenbezogene Daten (Informationen über politische Meinungen, religiöse Überzeugungen und/oder Gesundheitsinformationen, die in den PEP-Listen enthalten sind).
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna).
Zur Einhaltung von Gesetzen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 c) DSGVO), (
Deutsches Geldwäschegesetz
)).
In Bezug auf sensible personenbezogene Daten ist die Bedingung, dass die Verarbeitung im öffentlichen Interesse erforderlich ist (Art. 9 Abs. 2 g) DSGVO).
Bis zu fünf Jahre nach Beendigung des Vertrags oder nach Beendigung der Kundenbeziehung (bis zu zehn Jahre, wenn Strafverfolgungsbehörden dies verlangen). Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[35]
Für die Archivierung und Buchhaltung im Einklang mit dem Buchführungsgesetz.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Zur Einhaltung von Gesetzen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 c) DSGVO), (
Schwedisches Rechnungslegungsgesetz (1999:1078
).
Sieben Jahre nach dem Ende des Jahres, in dem die Informationen erstmals erfasst wurden. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
Sollte ein Produkt oder Service von unserer deutschen Niederlassung direkt angeboten werden: 10 Jahre nach dem Ende des Jahres, in dem die Daten erfasst wurden.
[36]
Durchführung von Berechnungen in Übereinstimmung mit den Kapitaladäquanzvorschriften.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna).
Einhaltung von Gesetzen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 c) DSGVO), (
Kapitaladäquanzverordnung 575/2013
und
Kapitaladäquanzrichtlinie 2013/36)
.
Sieben Jahre nach dem Ende des Jahres, in dem die Daten erfasst wurden. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[37]
Um Ihnen die Möglichkeit zu bieten, Kontakte von Ihrem Phonebook zu importieren, um die Kontakteliste mit Kontoinhabern der Klarna Bank zu befüllen, an die Sie sofortige Kreditüberweisungen von Ihrem Konto bei der Klarna Bank senden können.
Sie können diesen Dienst jederzeit beenden und hierbei den Zugang von Klarna zu Ihrem Phonebook löschen.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Dienstleistungs-spezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna).
Die Verarbeitung ist notwendig zur Erfüllung eines Vertrags mit Ihnen (Art. 6 Abs.1 b) DSGVO).
Informationen über Dritter (wie z.B. Zahlungsempfänger) beruhen auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art.6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO).
Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir und Sie (sowie der Zahlungsempfänger) zur Durchführung der betreffenden Transaktionen ein berechtigtes Interesse an der Verarbeitung dieser Daten haben. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
4.5 Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten bei Ihrer Nutzung von Klarnas Shopping Service.
Wenn Sie Klarnas Shopping-Service nutzen, verarbeitet Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten für die in der folgenden Tabelle beschriebenen Zwecke. Die Bedingungen für den Shopping Service und die Beschreibung der Funktionen, die der Shopping Service umfasst finden Sie
hier
.
Zweck der Verarbeitung - was wir tun und warum.
Arten von personenbezogenen Daten, die für den Zweck verwendet werden, und woher sie stammen (Quelle). Im Abschnitt 3 finden Sie weitere Informationen über die verschiedenen Arten von personenbezogenen Daten.
Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung gemäß der DSGVO.
Zu welchem Zeitpunkt der Zweck für die Nutzung der personenbezogenen Daten nicht mehr gegeben ist. Siehe Abschnitt 9 für weitere Informationen zum Zeitpunkt der Datenlöschung durch Klarna.
[38]
Zur Bereitstellung von Klarnas Shopping-Service und der dazugehörigen Funktionen.
Der Service umfasst die Erstellung von Profilen zur Personalisierung des Inhalts in der mobilen Klarna App und im Klarna Checkout.
Sämtliche in Abschnitt 3 genannten Arten;
Namen und Anschriften, die Sie als Lieferadressen Ihrem Nutzerkonto hinzufügen.
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3).
Sensible personenbezogene Daten.
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag (Allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen des Shopping-Services) mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Wenn der Shopping-Service auch Daten verarbeitet, die sensible personenbezogene Daten darstellen (wenn Sie diese Daten hochgeladen haben, z. B. durch Quittungen für bestimmte Einkäufe/Mitgliedschaften, durch Produkt- & Shop-Bewertungen oder wenn Sie uns anderweitig Zugang zu diesen Daten gewährt haben), erfolgt unsere Verarbeitung auf der Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung (Art. 9 Abs. 2 a) DSGVO).
Siehe Abschnitt 3 für weitere Informationen über diese Art von personenbezogenen Daten.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet oder wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen.
[39]
Ihnen steht frei, Ihren Standort und Ihre Geolokalisierungsinformationen mit uns zu teilen oder nicht. Wir verwenden diese Informationen, um Händler und Angebote in Ihrer Nähe zu finden, um sie in der Klarna App oder auf Klarna.com zu zeigen.
Sie können die Standortfreigabe und Geolokalisierungsinformationen- Freigabe auf Ihrem Gerät jederzeit deaktivieren..
Von Ihnen:
Dienstleistungsspez-ifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3, Standort und Geolokalisierungsinformationen).
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag (Allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen des Shopping-Services) mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[40]
Um Ihnen über die mobile Anwendung von Klarna einen Browser zur Verfügung zu stellen, mit dem Sie z. B. die Websites von Händlern besuchen können. Klarna sammelt Informationen darüber, wie Sie den Browser verwenden, um die Inhalte der mobilen Klarna App anzupassen.
Von Ihnen:
Sensible personenbezogene Daten.
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die mobile Klarna App).
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Klarna oder Händler, bei dem Sie einkaufen)
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag (Allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen des Shopping-Services) mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Wenn der Dienst Informationen verarbeitet, die sensible personenbezogene Daten darstellen (z. B. von Seiten, die Sie besuchen), erfolgt diese Verarbeitung auf der Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung (Art. 9 Abs. 2 a) DSGVO). Diese sensiblen Informationen werden jedoch ausschließlich dazu verwendet, Ihnen die aktuelle Website im Browser anzuzeigen.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[41]
Zur Durchführung von Bewertungen zur Betrugsprävention bei der Nutzung des Klarna Shopping Service.
Bei dieser Verarbeitung handelt es sich um Profiling und automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung. Wir verwenden automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung zu diesem Zweck zur Feststellung, ob bei Ihnen ein Betrugsrisiko besteht. Siehe Abschnitt 6 für weitere Informationen über Profiling und automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung.
Siehe auch Abschnitt 7.5.6 zu unserer Nutzung von Agenturen zur Betrugsprävention, an die Ihre Informationen weitergegeben werden können, und unsere Rechtsgrundlage für diese Weitergabe.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna generiert werden. (Klarna)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna generiert werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte zu den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Der Händler)
Geräteinformationen
Zusätzlich zu den vorgenannten Informationen erhält Klarna Informationen von Agenturen zur Betrugsprävention darüber, ob Ihre Informationen auf einen Betrugsversuch hindeuten.
Die Verarbeitung ist für Klarna zur Erfüllung eines Vertrages (Geschäftsbedingungen des Shopping Services) mit Ihnen erforderlich (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b)).
Bei Durchführung der Bewertung zum Betrug.
[42]
Zur Weitergabe Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten an die in Abschnitt 7.5 beschriebenen Kategorien von Empfängern (Affiliate-Netzwerke, Google, Partner im Rahmen des Finanzielle Analysen -Dienstes und des Angebots- und Vorteilsprogramms sowie Logistik- und Transportunternehmen, Werbedienste, Apps oder Dienste eines Drittanbieters (für SIWK), Agenturen zur Betrugsprävention und Unternehmen, die Identitätsprüfungen vornehmen und Reseller-Plattformen).
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten (wenn Sie diese hochgeladen oder uns anderweitig Zugang zu diesen Daten gewährt haben).
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die mobile Anwendung von Klarna).
Je nach Empfänger (siehe Abschnitt 7.5) unterschiedlich.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[43]
Um Ihnen relevante Klarna Werbung durch unsere
Drittwerbedienste
auf Nicht-Klarna Websites und Nicht-Klarna Werbung über digitale Werbeplattformen in der Klarna App und auf den Marketing-Kanälen von Klarna anzuzeigen.
Wir bewerten auch die Relevanz derartigerWerbung. Dies basiert auf der Grundlage Ihres Nutzerverhaltens und Ihres Klarna Profils.
Derartige relevante Werbung können Sie sehen, wenn Sie sich auf anderen Webseiten und Apps befinden, die Ihnen über diese
Drittwerbedienste
bereitgestellt werden oder in der Klarna App über die digitalen Werbeplattformen. Siehe bitte Abschnitt 7.5.5. bezüglich Informationen über die Weitergabe der Daten.
Bei dieser Verarbeitung kann es sich um Profiling handeln mit dem Ziel, das Marketing basierend darauf, wofür Sie sich unserer Meinung nach interessieren könnten, zu personalisieren. Mehr zum Thema Profiling können Sie Abschnitt 6 nachlesen.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Geräteinformationen. (Klarna)
Dies beruht auf einer von Ihnen erteilten Einwilligung (laut Art. 6 Abs. 1 a) DSGVO) oder, wenn wir ein.
Entweder, wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen möchten oder wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie an dieser Verarbeitung kein Interesse haben.
Wir stellen diese Verarbeitung auch ein, wenn und sobald Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie nicht länger Kunde von Klarna sein möchten.
[44]
Zur Feststellung Ihrer Berechtigung zum Erhalt von Cashback, wenn Sie Einkäufe über ein Cashback-Angebot in der Klarna App tätigen, und zur Berechnung des fälligen Cashback-Betrags.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Der Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Klarna)
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über Klarna Cashback).
Die Verarbeitung ist für Klarna zur Erfüllung eines Vertrages (Geschäftsbedingungen des Klarna Cashback- Programms) mit Ihnen erforderlich (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[45]
Wenn Sie sich dafür entscheiden, sich bei Klarna (durch „SIWK“) bei einer App oder einem Dienst eines Drittanbieters anzumelden, wird Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an das Geschäft oder den Online-Service weitergeben.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten (Klarna).
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen (Klarna).
Die Verarbeitung ist für Klarna notwendig, um einen Vertrag (Allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen für den Einkaufsservice) mit Ihnen zu erfüllen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b DSGVO).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
Wir stellen diese Verarbeitung auch ein, wenn und sobald Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie nicht länger Kunde von Klarna sein möchten.
[46]
Zur automatischen Verwaltung von Streitfällen beim Kauf oder von Reklamationen über Waren.
Bei dieser Verarbeitung handelt es sich um eine automatisierte Entscheidung. Wir verwenden automatisierte Entscheidungen für diesen Zweck, um zeitnahe und einheitliche Ergebnisse bei Streitfällen oder Reklamationen sicherzustellen. Weitere Informationen über automatisierte Entscheidungen finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundenservice.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna generiert werden. (Klarna)
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundenservice von Klarna. (Klarna)
Wenn Sie den Klarna-Dienst namens „Shopping Service“ akzeptiert und nutzen, wie in den Allgemeinen Geschäftsbedingungen des Dienstes näher beschrieben, die Sie
hier
finden, dann ist die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung die Erfüllung des Vertrags (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Alternativ, wenn Sie die Vereinbarung zum „Klarna Shopping Service“ nicht abgeschlossen haben oder den strittigen Kauf nicht getätigt haben, basiert die Verarbeitung auf Ihrer Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 a) DSGVO).
Wenn die Verwaltung des Streitfalles abgeschlossen ist, oder alternativ, wenn die Verarbeitung auf Einwilligung basiert, wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen möchten.
[47]
Um Ihnen relevante Inhalte und Produktempfehlungen zu präsentieren, wenn Sie unsere Funktionen Product Expert und Shopping-Assistent nutzen. Diese Assistenten stützen ihre Empfehlungen auf uns über Sie vorliegende Informationen sowie auf die von Ihnen zur Verfügung gestellten Präferenzen oder Anfragen.
Bei dieser Verarbeitung handelt es sich um Profiling. Weitere Informationen zum Profiling finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (weitere Informationen über die mobile Klarna Anwendung finden Sie in Abschnitt 3).
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Klarna und Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna generiert werden. (Klarna)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Die Verarbeitung ist für Klarna notwendig, um einen Vertrag (Allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen für den Einkaufsservice) mit Ihnen zu erfüllen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b9 DSGVO).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[48]
Zur Bereitstellung von Feedback oder neuen Ideen für unseren Feedback-Assistenten.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (weitere Informationen über die mobile Klarna Anwendung finden Sie in Abschnitt 3).
Die Verarbeitung beruht auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art.6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO).
Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, die Verarbeitung der personenbezogenen Daten durchführen zu können, die Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Zwecks erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Wenn das Feedback zur Verfügung gestellt und verwaltet wurde.
4.6 Zusätzliche Dienste, auf die Sie beispielsweise über die Klarna-Mobile-App, über Klarnas Browser Extension oder im Checkout eines Shops zugreifen können.
Zweck der Verarbeitung - was wir tun und warum.
Arten von personenbezogenen Daten, die für den Zweck verwendet werden, und woher sie stammen (Quelle). Im Abschnitt 3 finden Sie weitere Informationen über die verschiedenen Arten von personenbezogenen Daten.
Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung gemäß der DSGVO.
Zu welchem Zeitpunkt der Zweck für die Nutzung der personenbezogenen Daten nicht mehr gegeben ist. Siehe Abschnitt 9 für weitere Informationen zum Zeitpunkt der Datenlöschung durch Klarna.
[49]
Wenn Sie Ihr E-Mail-Konto mit dem Auto-Track -Service von Klarna verbunden haben, verbindet sich Klarna regelmäßig mit Ihrem(n) E-Mail-Konto(s), um Informationen über Ihre Einkäufe zu erhalten.
Sie können diesen Service jederzeit kündigen. Ab dem Zeitpunkt der Kündigung hat Klarna keinen Zugriff mehr auf Ihr E-Mail-Konto.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Sensible personenbezogene Daten. (Der Webmail-Anbieter)
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (weitere Informationen zu Auto-Track finden Sie in Abschnitt 3). (Der Webmail-Anbieter)
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag (Allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen des Shopping-Services) mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Wenn der Dienst sensible personenbezogene Daten (aus Ihren Transaktionen) verarbeitet, erfolgt diese Verarbeitung auf der Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung (Art. 9 Abs. 2 a) DSGVO). Nähere Informationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 3.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet oder wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen.
[50]
Wenn Sie sich dafür entschieden haben, Ihre Bankkonten mit dem Finanzielle Analysen-Service zu verbinden, wird Klarna Ihnen in Form von Angeboten, die auf Ihre speziellen Bedürfnisse zugeschnitten sind, Tools zur Kontrolle Ihrer Finanzen anzeigen und zur Verfügung stellen.
Bei dieser e Verarbeitung handelt es sich um  Profiling, das darauf abzielt, basierend auf einer Feststellung Ihrer potenziellen Interessen den Inhalt des Diensts entsprechend anzupassen. Weitere Informationen zum Thema Profiling finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Wenn Sie sich dafür entscheiden, Angebote und Vorteile in Anspruch zu nehmen, die Klarna im Rahmen dieses Dienstes anbietet, werden wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an den Partner weitergeben, der diese bereitstellt (siehe Abschnitt 7.5.3).
Aus anderen Quellen:
Sensible personenbezogene Daten. (Ihr verbundenes Konto)
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (weitere Informationen zu Finanzielle Analysen finden Sie in Abschnitt 3). (Ihr verbundenes Konto)
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag (Allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen für den Account Information Service) mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Wenn der Dienst sensible personenbezogene Daten (aus Ihren Transaktionen) verarbeitet, erfolgt die Verarbeitung auf der Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung (Art. 9 Abs. 2 a) DSGVO). Weitere Informationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 3.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet oder wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen.
[51]
Wenn Sie unsere Browsererweiterung nutzen, verarbeitet Klarna Ihre Daten, um den Dienst bereitzustellen; dies schließt die Verarbeitung von Informationen darüber ein, welche Websites/Webdomains Sie besuchen:
Klarna verarbeitet Informationen über die von Ihnen besuchten E-Commerce-Websites/Webdomains, um Deals zu identifizieren, und Ihnen personalisierte Angebote in der Klarna Erweiterung und der mobilen App zur Verfügung zu stellen. Diese Verarbeitung erfolgt auch, damit Sie auf Websites, auf denen dieser Dienst aktiviert ist, One-time Cards direkt in Ihrem Browser erstellen können.
Information über besuchte Non- E-Commerce-Websites/Webdomains werden nicht von Klarna gespeichert.
Um mehr darüber erfahren, wie Ihre personenbezogenen Daten in der Browsererweiterung verarbeitet werden, besuchen Sie unsere FAQ.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten.
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe bitte Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die mobile Klarna App and Browsererweiterung).
Aus anderen Quellen:
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna generiert werden. (Klarna)
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag (allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen des Klarna Shopping Service) mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Artikel 6 Abs.1 b DGSVO).
Wenn der Dienst Informationen verarbeitet, bei denen es sich um sensible personenbezogene Daten handelt (d.h. Daten über die von Ihnen besuchten Websites/Webdomains), erfolgt unsere Verarbeitung auf der Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung (Artikel 9 Abs. 2 a DSGVO). Weitere Informationen über diese Art von personenbezogenen Daten finden Sie in Abschnitt 3.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet oder wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen.
[52]
Wenn Sie ein Membership- oder Kundenkartenkonto eines Drittanbieters zu der Funktion Kundenkarten  von Klarna hinzugefügt haben, verarbeitet Klarna Ihre Daten zur Bereitstellung des Dienstes.
Dazu gehört, dass Klarna in regelmäßig eine Verbindung zu Ihrem Kartenkonto des Drittanbieters herstellt zur Importierung von Membershippunkten, Leveln und Guthabensverläufen.
Sie können diesen Dienst jederzeit kündigen und damit Klarna den Zugang zu Ihrem Membership- oder Treuekartenkonto entziehen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (weitere Informationen über die Funktion Kundenkarten finden Sie in Abschnitt 3). (Ihr verbundenes Membership- oder Kundenkartenkonto eines Drittanbieters)
Die Verarbeitung ist für Klarna zur Erfüllung eines Vertrages (Geschäftsbedingungen des Shopping Services) mit Ihnen erforderlich (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b)).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[53]
Wenn Sie sich entschieden haben, den "Accepting All Cookies"-Dienst von Klarna zu nutzen, wird Klarna Ihre Daten verarbeiten, um den Dienst bereitzustellen. Sie können diesen Dienst jederzeit beenden.
Von Ihnen:
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Klarna-Dienste (siehe Abschnitt 3 oben für weitere Informationen).
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag (Allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen für den Shopping-Dienst) mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Artikel 6(1)(b) DSGVO).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[54]
Wenn Sie sich entschieden haben, den Open Banking-Dienst von Klarna zu nutzen, wird Klarna Ihre Daten verarbeiten, um den Dienst bereitzustellen. Die Bedingungen für den Open Banking-Dienst und die Beschreibung der enthaltenen Funktionen finden Sie
hier
.
Von Ihnen:
Zahlungsinformationen.
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (Open Banking-Dienst).
Aus anderen Quellen:
Geräteinformationen (Ihr Gerät).
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Klarna-Dienste (Klarna).
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Klarna-Dienste erzeugt werden (Klarna).
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation (Ihre Drittbank).
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (Open Banking-Dienst) (Ihre Drittbank).
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag (Allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen für den Open Banking-Dienst) mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Artikel 6(1)(b) DSGVO).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
4.7 Angebote und Einladungen zu Veranstaltungen, die auf Social Media veröffentlicht werden, sowie jegliche Kontaktaufnahme mit uns über Social Media
Zweck der Verarbeitung - was wir tun und warum.
Arten von personenbezogenen Daten, die für den Zweck verwendet werden, und woher sie stammen (Quelle). Im Abschnitt 3 finden Sie weitere Informationen über die verschiedenen Arten von personenbezogenen Daten.
Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung gemäß der DSGVO.
Zu welchem Zeitpunkt der Zweck für die Nutzung der personenbezogenen Daten nicht mehr gegeben ist. Siehe Abschnitt 9 für weitere Informationen zum Zeitpunkt der Datenlöschung durch Klarna.
[55]
Wenn Sie sich für eine Veranstaltung anmelden, die auf Social Media veröffentlicht wird, verarbeiten wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, um den angeforderten Service bereitzustellen.
Sie können diese jederzeit abbestellen, indem Sie sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Anmeldungen zu Veranstaltungen in Social Media.
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag mit Ihnen (in Bezug auf Ihre Teilnahme an der Veranstaltung) erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b DSGVO).
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Sobald die Veranstaltung stattgefunden hat.
4.8 Verarbeitung von Daten durch Klarna bei Kontakt mit dem Kundendienst.
Zweck der Verarbeitung - was wir tun und warum.
Arten von personenbezogenen Daten, die für den Zweck verwendet werden, und woher sie stammen (Quelle). Im Abschnitt 3 finden Sie weitere Informationen über die verschiedenen Arten von personenbezogenen Daten.
Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung gemäß der DSGVO.
Zu welchem Zeitpunkt der Zweck für die Nutzung der personenbezogenen Daten nicht mehr gegeben ist. Siehe Abschnitt 9 für weitere Informationen zum Zeitpunkt der Datenlöschung durch Klarna:
[56]
Zur Bearbeitung sämtlicher Angelegenheiten, die an den Kundendienst von Klarna herangetragen werden.
Dies umfasst die Aufbewahrung verschiedener Formen von schriftlichen Gesprächen zur Dokumentation von Kundenproblemen sowie zu Sicherheitszwecken und zur Betrugsbekämpfung.
Von Ihnen:
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundendienst von Klarna.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundendienst von Klarna. (Klarna)
Erfüllung von Verträgen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Je nach den gesetzlichen Verjährungsvorschriften bis zu zehn Jahre. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[57]
Um Ihnen bei der Lösung von Problemen im Zusammenhang mit Ihren Einkäufen zu helfen, wenn Sie unseren Kundenservice-Assistenten nutzen.
Bei dieser Verarbeitung handelt es sich um Profiling. Weitere Informationen zum Profiling finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Lage.
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna.
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundenservice. (Klarna)
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag (allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen des Einkaufsdienstes) mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs.1 b) DGSVO).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[58]
Qualitäts- und Serviceverbesserung (zur Gewährleistung eines zufriedenstellenden Kundendienstes). Wir können Telefongespräche sowie Bildschirmfreigabe-Sitzungen zwischen Ihnen und unseren Mitarbeitern zu Qualitätszwecken aufzeichnen, um die Qualität unserer Produkte und Dienstleistungen zu verbessern.
Von Ihnen:
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundendienst von Klarna.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundendienst von Klarna. (Klarna)
Auf Grundlage Ihrer Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 a) DSGVO).
Wir verarbeiten die Aufzeichnungen von Telefongesprächen für eine Dauer bis zu 90 Tagen und von Bildschirmfreigabe-Sitzungen für eine Dauer bis zu 30 Tagen zu Qualitätssicherungszwecken.
[59]
Um zu dokumentieren, was gesagt wurde, wenn Sie mit unserem Kundendienst sprechen (damit sichergestellt wird, dass wir alles, was vereinbart oder besprochen wurde, dokumentieren). Wir nutzen aufgezeichnete Telefongespräche zwischen Ihnen und unseren Angestellten sowie manuelle oder automatisierte Anmerkungen, um zu dokumentieren, was gesagt wurde.
Von Ihnen:
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundendienst von Klarna.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundendienst von Klarna. (Klarna)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, die Kommunikationen mit Klarnas Kundendienst zu dokumentieren. Wir stellen sicher, dass die Verarbeitung zur Erreichung dieses Zwecks erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht für diesen Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Als Kunde haben Sie auch ein Interesse daran, sicherzustellen, dass unparteiische Hilfsmittel zur Verfügung stehen, um das Besprochene zu dokumentieren.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
90 Tage ab dem Tag, an dem die Aufzeichnung gemacht wurde.
[60]
Wenn Sie über Social Media wie Facebook, Instagram oder Twitter mit uns in Kontakt treten, werden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auch von diesen Unternehmen in Übereinstimmung mit deren Datenschutzerklärungen erhoben und verarbeitet. Dies gilt ebenso für die Antwort, die Sie von uns erhalten. Klarna verarbeitet diese Informationen, um Ihre Fragen zu beantworten.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundendienst von Klarna.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundendienst von Klarna. (Klarna)
Erfüllung von Verträgen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Sobald wir Ihre Frage beantwortet haben.
[61]
Zur Bearbeitung freiwilliger Sperren für die Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna, d.h. wenn Sie uns kontaktieren und uns bitten, Sie von der Nutzung der Dienste auszuschließen. Ihre freiwillige Sperre kann von Ihnen jederzeit aufgehoben werden, indem Sie uns wieder kontaktieren.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt und Identifikationsdaten.
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundenservice von Klarna.
Auf der Grundlage Ihrer Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 a)).
Wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie nicht mehr für die Dienste gesperrt werden wollen oder Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen. Wir stellen diese Verarbeitung auch dann ein, wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass sie nicht länger zu den Kunden von Klarna gehören möchten.
5. Wie können Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen?
Wenn Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auf der Grundlage Ihrer Einwilligung verwendet, können Sie Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit widerrufen. Sie können dies via E-Mail an
datenschutz@klarna.de
oder über die Kontaktinformationen in Abschnitt 12 tun.
Sie können auch hochgeladene Daten aus der mobilen Klarna App löschen oder den Dienst kündigen, in dem personenbezogene Daten verarbeitet werden. Wir werden die Daten dann löschen. Wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen oder die hochgeladenen Daten löschen, können Sie den Dienst, sollte die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten durch Klarna im Rahmen des Dienstes auf der Grundlage Ihrer Einwilligung erfolgen, möglicherweise nicht nutzen.
Zuletzt: Wie in Abschnitt 2 oben beschrieben, haben Sie auch das Recht, der Verarbeitung bestimmter personenbezogenen Daten zu widersprechen (Sie können z.B. das Marketing abstellen). Sie haben auch das Recht, bestimmte personenbezogene Daten löschen zu lassen, wie dies auch in Abschnitt 2 angegeben wird.
6. Klarnas Verwendung von Profiling und automatisierte Entscheidungen, die Sie maßgeblich betreffen.
6.1 Profiling durch Klarna hinsichtlich Ihnen als Kunde.
„Profiling“ ist eine automatisierte Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten zur Bewertung bestimmter Aspekte Ihrer Person, etwa durch die Analyse oder Vorhersage Ihrer persönlichen Präferenzen, z. B. Kaufinteressen. Gleichzeitig vergleichen wir Ihre Daten mit dem, was unsere anderen Kunden, die unserer Dienste ähnlich wie Sie nutzen, bevorzugt haben.
In Abschnitt 4 oben finden Sie detaillierte Informationen zum Zweck des Profilings durch Klarna sowie zu den Arten personenbezogener Daten, die für den jeweiligen Anlass und das jeweilige Profiling verwendet werden. Sie können die nachstehenden Beschreibungen mit den Zwecken in vorstehendem Abschnitt 4 abgleichen, indem Sie die Zahlen in Klammern „[x]“ verwenden. Das Profiling für diese Zwecke hat keine erheblichen Auswirkungen für Sie als Kunde.
Wir verwenden das Profiling für die folgenden Zwecke:
um unsere maßgeschneiderten Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen, die ihren Inhalt und Empfehlungen auf der Grundlage unserer Vermutung Ihrer potenziellen Interessen oder der für Sie relevanten Inhalte anpassen (dies gilt für die mobile Klarna App, ihre verschiedenen Funktionen, wie z.B. den Product Expert und die Shopping-Assistenten, wenn Sie mit unserem Kundenservice-Assistenten interagieren und für die Reihenfolge, in der verschiedene Zahlungsmethoden im Klarna Checkout angezeigt werden), (Zwecke [19, 38, 47, 50 und 57] in Abschnitt 4]
um festzustellen, welches der effizienteste Weg für die Kontaktaufnahme mit Ihnen in Bezug auf Ihre ausstehenden Forderungen ist (Prüfung verschiedener Kanäle, z. B. per SMS oder E-Mail, oder des Zeitpunkts einer solchen Kommunikation), (Zweck [25] in Abschnitt 4) und
um Ihnen maßgeschneidertes Marketing zur Verfügung zu stellen, sowohl über unsere eigenen als auch über externe Plattformen und Dienste. (Zwecke [13 und 43] in Abschnitt 4)
Unsere Dienste nutzen Modelle des maschinellen Lernens und Modelle der künstlichen Intelligenz, um Ihnen möglichst relevante Inhalte bereitzustellen.
Wenden Sie sich bitte an uns, wenn Sie Fragen zur Funktionsweise des Profilingverfahrens haben. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12. Sie können unserem Marketing-Profiling jederzeit widersprechen, indem Sie sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen (dann werden wir das Profiling zu Marketingzwecken einstellen). Sie können auch das Profiling für unsere Dienste beenden, indem Sie den Dienst kündigen.
6.2 Automatisierte Entscheidungen von Klarna, die Sie in erheblicher Weise betreffen.
Die Bezeichnung „automatisierte Entscheidungen, die rechtliche Wirkungen entfalten“ oder „automatisierte Entscheidungen, die Sie in ähnlicher Weise erheblich beeinträchtigen“ bedeutet, dass bestimmte Entscheidungen in unseren Diensten vollständig automatisiert sind, ohne dass unsere Mitarbeiter daran beteiligt sind. Diese Entscheidungen haben eine erhebliche Auswirkung auf Sie als Kunden und sind mit rechtlichen Wirkungen vergleichbar. Indem solche Entscheidungen automatisch getroffen werden, erhöht Klarna seine Objektivität und Transparenz bei der Entscheidung, Ihnen diese Dienste anzubieten. Gleichzeitig haben Sie jederzeit das Recht, diesen Entscheidungen zu widersprechen. Mehr darüber, wie Sie gegen diese Entscheidungen Widerspruch einlegen können, finden Sie am Ende dieses Abschnitts 6.2. Bei diesen Beurteilungen setzen wir Modelle des maschinellen Lernens und der künstlichen Intelligenz ein, um eine möglichst hohe Qualität unserer Entscheidungen sicherzustellen.
Automatisierte Entscheidungen, die Sie in erheblicher Weise beeinträchtigen, bedeuten auch, dass ein Profiling auf der Grundlage Ihrer Daten durchgeführt wird, bevor die Entscheidung getroffen wird. Dieses Profiling erfolgt, um Ihre finanzielle Situation (vor der Entscheidung über ein Angebot für eine bzw. die Kreditvergabe oder eine Zahlung einleiten) zu beurteilen,um festzustellen, ob Ihre Nutzung unserer Dienste ein Betrugs- oder Geldwäscherisiko darstellt oder um darüber zu entscheiden, ob Sie für einen Kauf haften. Wir erstellen ein Profil Ihres Nutzerverhaltens und Ihrer finanziellen Lage und vergleichen diese Daten mit Verhaltensweisen und Umständen, anhand derer wir das Risiko je nach Erheblichkeit unterschiedlich einstufen.
Die verschiedenen Nutzerverhaltensweisen und -bedingungen werden in unseren Modellen für automatisierte Entscheidungen bewertet und gewichtet, so dass wir am Ende einen Gesamtscore erhalten, der dann dazu führt, dass wir Ihre Nutzung unserer Dienstleistungen entweder zulassen oder ablehnen. Wir können auch eine weitere Identifizierung von Ihnen verlangen, wenn wir nicht sicher sind, wer Sie sind.
Wann trifft Klarna automatisierte Entscheidungen, die Sie in erheblicher Weise beeinträchtigen?
Die für die einzelnen Entscheidungen verwendeten Arten personenbezogener Daten sind in Abschnitt 4 beschrieben. Sie können die nachstehenden Beschreibungen mit den in vorstehendem Abschnitt 4 genannten Zwecken vergleichen, indem Sie die Zahlen in Klammern „[x]“ verwenden.
Wir treffen solche automatisierten Entscheidungen, wenn wir:
entscheiden, Ihren Antrag auf bzw. Ihnen anzubieten die Nutzung eines Kreditservices oder auf Eröffnung eines Klarna Kontos zu genehmigen.
entscheiden,
nicht
Ihren Antrag auf bzw. Ihnen nicht anzubieten die Nutzung eines Kreditservices oder Eröffnung eines Klarna Kontos zu genehmigen.
Diese automatisierten Kreditentscheidungen basieren auf den von Ihnen für uns bereitgestellten Daten, Daten aus externen Quellen wie den Bonitätsauskünften von Kreditauskunfteien und Klarnas eigenen internen Informationen über Sie, sofern wir Ihnen bereits zuvor schon einmal Geld geliehen haben. Zusätzlich zu den Informationen über Sie umfasst das Kreditmodell von Klarna eine Vielzahl anderer Faktoren, wie z. B. die interne Einstufung des Kreditrisikos durch Klarna und die allgemeinen Rückzahlungsquoten unserer Kunden (etwa basierend auf der entsprechenden Produktkategorie). (Zwecke [24 und 31] in Abschnitt 4).
entscheiden, ob Sie ein Betrugsrisiko darstellen, wenn unsere Verarbeitung zeigt, dass Ihr Verhalten auf ein mögliches betrügerisches Verhalten hinweist, dass Ihr Verhalten nicht mit der vorherigen Nutzung unserer Dienste übereinstimmt oder dass Sie versucht haben, Ihre wahre Identität zu verschleiern. Automatisierte Entscheidungen, mit denen wir beurteilen, ob Sie ein Betrugsrisiko darstellen, basieren auf Informationen, die Sie uns selbst zur Verfügung gestellt haben, auf Daten der Betrugsprävention dienenden Einrichtungen (siehe Abschnitt 7.2.3. für Einzelheiten dazu, welche dieser Einrichtungen wir nutzen) und auf Klarnas eigenen internen Informationen. Klarna entwickelt seine Modelle zur Betrugsprävention beständig weiter, um unsere Dienstleistungen sicher zu halten, und untersucht genaustens, wie Betrüger auf verschiedenen Märkten vorgehen (z.B. welche Kategorien von Händlern oder Produkten am häufigsten Gegenstand von Betrugsversuchen sind). (Zwecke [5, 21 und 41] in Abschnitt 4).
entscheiden, ob ein Geldwäscherisiko besteht, wenn unsere Verarbeitung Hinweise zutage bringt, denen zufolge Ihr Verhalten auf Geldwäsche hinweist. In relevanten Fällen prüft Klarna auch, ob bestimmte Kunden auf Sanktionslisten aufgeführt sind. (Zwecke [20, 29 und 34] in Abschnitt 4).
entscheiden, ob Sie für einen von Ihnen als „unberechtigt“ angefochtenen Kauf haften, je nachdem, ob die von Ihnen gemachten Angaben oder die uns vorliegenden Informationen über den Kauf auf ein mögliches betrügerisches Verhalten hindeuten oder nicht. Dies geschieht durch einen Vergleich der Vorgänge in Ihrem Fall mit anderen Transaktionen, die auf betrügerisches Verhalten hindeuten. (Zweck [46] in Abschnitt 4).
Siehe Abschnitt 7 für weitere Informationen darüber, an wen wir Daten in Verbindung mit dem Profiling bei automatisierten Entscheidungen weitergeben.
Wenn Ihr Antrag infolge der oben beschriebenen automatisierten Entscheidungen nicht genehmigt wird, haben Sie keinen Zugang zu den Dienstleistungen von Klarna bzw. können diese nicht nutzen, wie z. B. unseren Zahlungsmethoden. Klarna hat mehrere Sicherheitsmechanismen eingerichtet, um sicherzustellen, dass die Entscheidungen angemessen sind und nach Treu und Glauben erfolgen. Zu diesen Mechanismen gehört die laufende Überwachung unserer Entscheidungsmodelle sowie von Stichproben im Einzelfall. Sollten Sie Bedenken bezüglich des Ergebnisses haben, können Sie sich jederzeit an uns wenden. Wir werden daraufhin überprüfen, ob das Verfahren angemessen durchgeführt wurde. Sie können auch unter Befolgung folgender Schritte Widerspruch einlegen.
Ihr Recht auf Widerspruch gegen diese automatisierten Entscheidungen
Sie haben jederzeit das Recht, gegen eine automatisierte Entscheidung mit rechtlichen Folgen oder Entscheidungen, die Sie unter Umständen anderweitig erheblich beeinträchtigen könnten (in Zusammenhang mit dem entsprechenden Profiling), Widerspruch einzulegen, indem Sie eine E-Mail-Nachricht an
datenschutz@klarna.de
senden. Ein Mitarbeiter von Klarna wird dann die Entscheidung unter Berücksichtigung sämtlicher zusätzlichen von Ihnen zur Verfügung gestellten Informationen und der von Ihnen erläuterten Umstände überprüfen.
7. An wen leiten wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weiter?
Wenn wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weiterleiten, stellen wir sicher, dass der Empfänger sie in Übereinstimmung mit dieser Datenschutzerklärung verarbeitet, wie durch den Abschluss von Datenübermittlungsvereinbarungen oder Auftragsverarbeitungsverträgen mit den Empfängern. Diese Vereinbarungen verpflichten die Vertragspartner, sämtliche angemessene vertraglichen, rechtlichen, technischen und organisatorischen Maßnahmen zu ergreifen, um sicherzustellen, dass Ihre Daten mit einem angemessenen Schutzniveau und in Übereinstimmung mit dem geltenden Recht verarbeitet werden.
7.1 Kategorien von Empfängern, an die Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten immer weitergibt, unabhängig davon, welchen Service Sie nutzen.
7.1.1 Lieferanten und Unterauftragnehmer.
Beschreibung des Empfängers
: Lieferanten und Unterauftragnehmer sind Unternehmen, die nur berechtigt sind, die personenbezogenen Daten, die sie von Klarna erhalten, im Auftrag von Klarna, also als Auftragsverarbeiter, zu verarbeiten. Beispiele für solche Lieferanten und Unterauftragnehmer sind Software- und Datenspeicher-Anbieter, Zahlungsdienstleister und Unternehmensberater, Anbieter von Funktionen für maschinelles Lernen/künstliche Intelligenz und Unternehmen der Klarna-Gruppe.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Klarna benötigt Zugang zu Diensten und Funktionalitäten von anderen Unternehmen, wenn sie diese nicht selbst erbringen kann. Klarna hat ein berechtigtes Interesse daran, auf diese Dienste und Funktionen zugreifen zu können (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
7.1.2 Klarna-Gruppe.
Beschreibung des Empfängers
: Unternehmen der Klarna-Gruppe.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage
: Dies ist erforderlich, damit Klarna Ihnen ihre Dienste und Funktionen zur Verfügung stellen kann. Klarna hat ein berechtigtes Interesse daran, auf diese Dienste und Funktionen zugreifen und sie bereitstellen zu können (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
Wenn Sie bei einem ausländischen Händler einkaufen (dies bedeutet, bei einem Händler mit Sitz außerhalb des EU/EWR-Gebietes), der mit einem anderen Unternehmen der Klarna-Unternehmensgruppe eine Vereinbarung hat, ist die Offenlegung Ihrer personenbezogenen Informationen zwischen den Klarna-Unternehmen erforderlich, damit die beiden Klarna-Unternehmen Ihre Zahlung bearbeiten können und um es dem ausländischen Händler zu ermöglichen, Ihren Kauf durchzuführen. Die Rechtsgrundlage für diese Verarbeitung ist die Erfüllung eines Vertrages (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Das Unternehmen der Klarna-Gruppe, das Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erhält, wird sie in Übereinstimmung mit der Datenschutzerklärung verarbeiten, die auf Ihr Land Anwendung findet (siehe
Liste
). Genaueres über die Sicherheitsmaßnahmen von Klarna im Zusammenhang mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten bei einer Übermittlung außerhalb der EU/des EWR können Sie in Abschnitt 8 finden.
7.1.3 Eine Person, die eine Vollmacht für Ihre finanziellen Angelegenheiten besitzt.
Beschreibung des Empfängers
: Klarna leitet Ihre personenbezogenen Daten unter bestimmten Umständen an eine Person weiter, die aufgrund einer Vollmacht das Recht hat, auf diese Daten zuzugreifen.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Diese Verarbeitung wird durchgeführt, um Ihren Kontakt mit uns (durch Vertreter) zu erleichtern, und erfolgt auf der Grundlage Ihrer Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 a) DSGVO).
7.1.4 Behörden.
Beschreibung des Empfängers
: Klarna leitet unter bestimmten Umständen erforderliche Informationen an Behörden wie die Polizei, Finanzbehörden, Steuerbehörden oder andere Behörden sowie Gerichte weiter.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage
: Personenbezogene Daten werden an Behörden weitergegeben, wenn wir gesetzlich dazu verpflichtet sind, oder in einigen Fällen, wenn Sie uns darum gebeten haben, oder wenn dies zur Verwaltung von Steuerabzügen oder zur Kriminalitätsbekämpfung erforderlich ist. Eine solche gesetzliche Verpflichtung zur Bereitstellung von Informationen liegt zum Beispiel vor, wenn Maßnahmen zur Bekämpfung von Geldwäsche und Terrorismusfinanzierung ergriffen werden müssen. Je nach Behörde und Zweck sind die Rechtsgrundlagen die Verpflichtung zur Erfüllung rechtlicher Verpflichtungen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 c) DSGVO), die Erfüllung des Vertrags mit Ihnen (Art. 6 Abs.1 b) DSGVO) oder das berechtigte Interesse von Klarna, sich vor Kriminalität zu schützen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO).
7.1.5 Veräußerung von Unternehmen oder Vermögenswerten.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Für den Fall, dass Klarna ein Unternehmen oder Vermögenswerte verkauft, leitet Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten unter Umständen an einen potenziellen Käufer dieses Unternehmens oder Vermögenswerts weiter. Wenn Klarna oder ein wesentlicher Teil des Vermögens von Klarna von einem Dritten erworben wird, werden unter Umständen auch personenbezogene Informationen über die Kunden von Klarna weitergeleitet.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage
: Klarna hat ein berechtigtes Interesse daran, solche Transaktionen durchführen zu können (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
7.2 Kategorien von Empfängern, an die Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weitergibt, wenn Sie die Zahlungsmethoden von Klarna nutzen, Klarna bei einem Händler nutzen oder sich in Klarnas Checkout bei einem Händler für eine Zahlung per Debit- oder Kreditkarte entscheiden.
7.2.1 Händler
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Mit Händlern meinen wir die Händler, die Sie besuchen oder bei denen Sie einkaufen (was die verbundenen Unternehmen des betreffenden Händlers einschließen kann, wenn Sie dahingehend durch den Händler informiert wurden).
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Damit der Händler Ihren Einkauf und die Kundenbeziehung mit Ihnen bzw. die Beziehung zwischen Ihnen und den verbundenen Unternehmen des Händlers durchführen und verwalten kann, z. B. durch die Überprüfung Ihrer Identität, den Versand von Waren, die Bearbeitung von Fragen und dem Umgang mit Streitfällen, um Betrug vorzubeugen und ggf. zur Versendung relevanter Werbung. Die Datenschutzerklärung des Händlers gilt für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten, die dem Händler mitgeteilt wurden und die der Händler verarbeitet. In der Regel finden Sie auf der Website des Händlers einen Link zu dessen Datenschutzerklärung. Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Weitergabe von Daten an die Händler ist zum einen die Erfüllung eines Vertrags (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO), sofern die Weitergabe der Daten zur Erfüllung des Vertrags zwischen Ihnen und dem Händler erfolgt, und zum anderen das berechtigte Interesse von Klarna und dem Händler (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO) oder Ihre Einwilligung (At. 6 Abs.1 a) DSGVO). Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
7.2.2 Zahlungsdienstleister, Kassendienstleister, Kartennetzwerke und Finanzinstitute.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Zahlungsdienstleister (einschließlich digitaler Geldbörsen), Kassendienstleister, Kartennetzwerke und Finanzinstitute erbringen Dienstleistungen für Sie, Händler und Klarna, um elektronische Zahlungen über eine Vielzahl von Zahlungsmethoden zu implementieren, zu erleichtern und zu verwalten, wie z. B. Kreditkarten und bankgestützte Bezahlverfahren (z. B. Lastschrift und Überweisung).
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage
: Einige Händler nutzen Zahlungsdienstleister und Kassendienstleister, an die sie Ihre Daten zur Verwaltung Ihrer Zahlung und Ihres Kaufs weiterleiten. Diese Weitergabe erfolgt in Übereinstimmung mit den eigenen Datenschutzerklärungen der entsprechenden Händler oder Kassendienstleister. Der Händler erlaubt Klarna unter Umständen auch, Ihre Daten an den Zahlungsdienstleister weiterzugeben, den es für die Abwicklung Ihrer Zahlung nutzt. Einige Zahlungsdienstleister erhalten Ihre Daten auch von Klarna oder erheben und verwenden Ihre Daten unabhängig, in Übereinstimmung mit ihren eigenen Datenschutzerklärungen oder um Betrug zu verhindern. Dies ist z. B. bei Anbietern digitaler Geldbörsen der Fall. Darüber hinaus leitet Klarna Ihre Daten unter Umständen an Ihre Kartennetzwerke und andere Finanzinstitute weiter, wenn Ihre Zahlungsmethode verwaltet oder Transaktionen mit Ihrem Konto durchgeführt werden, um die Transaktionen abzuschließen. Die Weiterleitung an Zahlungsdienstleister, Kassendienstleister, Kartennetzwerke und Finanzinstitute erfolgt, um eine Zahlungsmethode zu ermöglichen oder um Transaktionen durchzuführen, die von Ihnen initiiert wurden, und um den Vertrag mit Ihnen zu erfüllen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
7.2.3 Der Betrugsprävention dienende Einrichtungen und Unternehmen, die Identitätsprüfungen anbieten.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Ihre personenbezogenen Daten werden an der Betrugsprävention dienende Einrichtungen und Unternehmen, die Identitätsprüfungen durchführen, weitergegeben.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Klarna leitet Ihre Informationen zur Überprüfung Ihrer Identität und der Richtigkeit der von Ihnen angegebenen Daten sowie zur Betrugs- und Kriminalitätsbekämpfung weiter. Die Unternehmen, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten, sind
hier
aufgeführt. Bitte beachten Sie, dass diese Unternehmen Ihre Daten in Übereinstimmung mit ihren eigenen Datenschutzerklärungen verarbeiten.
Klarna übermittelt Ihre Daten sowie die Information, ob eine bestimmte Transaktion einen potenziellen Betrug darstellt, auf der Grundlage des berechtigten Interesses an der Ausübung der Geschäftstätigkeit (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO), da die der Betrugsprävention dienenden Einrichtungen und die Unternehmen, die Identitätsprüfungen anbieten, über Informationen über Betrugsaktivitäten und Identitätsbestätigungen verfügen, die für Klarna wichtig sind, um die Anzahl der betrügerischen Transaktionen zu verringern. Diese Übermittlung erfolgt auch in Ihrem Interesse, da wir auf diese Weise dabei unterstützt werden, zu verhindern, dass Ihre Daten für die Tätigung betrügerischer Einkäufe verwendet werden. Wir stellen sicher, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung notwendig ist, um dieses Interesse zu verfolgen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht überwiegt, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck zu verarbeiten. Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den Umständen Ihres Einzelfalls ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 2. Sie können sich auch an die im obigen Link aufgeführten Unternehmen wenden, um die gleichen Rechte wie in Abschnitt 2 dargelegt auch gegenüber diesen Unternehmen auszuüben.
7.2.4 Google.
Beschreibung des Empfängers
: Wenn Sie Google Maps im Checkout oder in der Klarna App verwenden (z. B. indem Sie Ihre Adresse in der Adressleiste suchen, „Händler in meiner Nähe“ ansehen oder Informationen anfragen bezüglich nahegelegener Deals und Angebote), werden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an Google weitergegeben. Google verarbeitet Ihre Daten in Übereinstimmung mit den
Nutzungsbedingungen
und
Datenschutzbestimmungen
von Google Maps/Google Earth.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage
: Klarna gibt diese Informationen auf der Grundlage des berechtigten Interesses von Klarna an der Ausübung seiner Geschäftstätigkeit weiter (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO), da Google Maps die Adresssuchfunktion im Checkout bereitstellt und Karten und Deals, die für Ihren aktuellen Standort relevant sind, in der Klarna App anzeigt. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
7.2.5 Billie, wenn Sie mit Billie bezahlen
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Wenn Sie beim Checkout von Klarna mit Billie bezahlen möchten, gibt Klarna Informationen über die aktuelle Zahlung sowie Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten an Billie weiter. Billie verarbeitet die Sie betreffenden Daten in Übereinstimmung mit seiner eigenen Datenschutzerklärung.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Klarna gibt Informationen über Ihre Bezahlung mit Billie an Billie weiter, weil Billie Zahlungen an Klarna verwaltet. Die Daten werden zur Erfüllung einer von Ihnen mit Billie veranlassten Zahlung weitergegeben (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
7.3 Kategorien von Empfängern, an die Klarna Ihre Daten weitergibt, wenn Sie eine der Zahlungsmethoden von Klarna nutzen, bei denen Ihnen ein Kredit gewährt wird, oder wenn Sie die Klarna Card, Instore zahlen, mit Klarna über digitale Geldbörsen zahlen, die Einmalkarte des Shopping Services nutzen oder ein Klarna Konto eröffnen.
7.3.1 Kreditauskunfteien.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Wenn Sie eine Dienstleistung von Klarna anfragen, bei der Ihnen von uns ein Kredit gewährt wird (in Abschnitt 4.3 wird beschrieben, bei welchen Dienstleistungen von Klarna Ihnen ein Kredit gewährt wird) oder ein Klarna Konto beantragen, leiten wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an Kreditauskunfteien weiter. Wenn es sich um geringe Beträge handelt, oder sollten wir bereits über ausreichende Informationen verfügen findet keine solche Weiterleitung statt.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Ihre personenbezogenen Daten werden an Kreditauskunfteien weitergegeben, um Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit zu beurteilen, Ihre Identität und Ihre Kontaktdaten zu überprüfen und Sie und andere Kunden vor Betrug zu schützen. Diese Datenweitergabe stellt eine Kreditauskunft dar.
In Deutschland übermittelt Klarna der Auskunftei Ihren Namen, Ihre Adresse, Ihr Geburtsdatum und Ihre Telefonnummer, um die Auskunft über Sie zu erhalten. Unsere Abfrage hat keinen Einfluss auf die Bewertung Ihrer Kreditwürdigkeit (sog. Score) durch die SCHUFA, es sei denn, Sie beantragen eine Klarna Card. Wenn Sie eine Klarna-Card beantragen, wird eine sog. harte Kreditprüfung durchgeführt, die in Ihrer Kredithistorie vermerkt wird und möglicherweise Ihre zukünftige Kreditwürdigkeit beeinflussen kann.
Klarna überträgt unbezahlte Schulden unter Umständen an Inkassobüros, die wiederum unter Umständen Informationen über Ihre verspäteten Zahlungen an die Kreditauskunftei weiterleiten, was sich ggf. auf Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit auswirken kann.
Die Kreditauskunfteien verarbeiten Ihre Daten in Übereinstimmung mit ihren eigenen Datenschutzerklärungen. Informationen dazu, mit welchen Auskunfteien wir zusammenarbeiten, finden Sie
hier
.
Klarna übermittelt Ihre Daten auf der Grundlage des berechtigten Interesses an der Ausübung der Geschäftstätigkeit (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO), da die Kreditauskunfteien über Informationen zu Ihrer finanziellen Situation verfügen, die für Klarna wichtig sind, um eine korrekte Kreditwürdigkeitsprüfung zu gewährleisten und keine Kredite an Verbraucher zu vergeben, die diese nicht zurückzahlen können. Wir stellen sicher, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung notwendig ist, um dieses Interesse zu verfolgen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht überwiegt, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck zu verarbeiten. Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den Umständen Ihres Einzelfalls ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 2. Sie können sich auch an die im obigen Link aufgeführten Unternehmen wenden, um die gleichen Rechte wie in Abschnitt 2 dargelegt auch gegenüber diesen Unternehmen auszuüben.
Kreditinformationen über Sie, die wir von einer Kreditauskunftei erhalten haben, werden von Klarna ausschließlich verschlüsselt gespeichert. Wenn Sie eine lesbare Version wünschen, empfehlen wir Ihnen, sich direkt an die Kreditauskunftei zu wenden, die Sie darüber informiert hat, dass Klarna eine Kreditauskunft angefordert hat.
7.3.2 Inkassounternehmen (für überfällige Forderungen).
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Klarna muss Ihre Daten unter Umständen weiterleiten, wenn wir das Inkasso von unbezahlten, überfälligen Forderungen an einen Dritten, wie z. B. ein Inkassounternehmen, veräußern oder auslagern.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Diese Daten werden weitergegeben, um Ihre überfälligen Forderungen einzutreiben. Inkassounternehmen verarbeiten personenbezogene Daten in Übereinstimmung mit ihren eigenen Datenschutzerklärungen oder ausschließlich im Auftrag von Klarna in ihrer Eigenschaft als Auftragsverarbeiter von Klarna. Inkassounternehmen können Ihre unbezahlten Verbindlichkeiten an Kreditauskunfteien oder Behörden melden, was sich ggf. auf Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit und Ihre Fähigkeit, zukünftige Kredite zu beantragen, auswirken kann. Die Weitergabe dieser Daten erfolgt auf der Grundlage unseres berechtigten Interesses am Einzug und Verkauf von Forderungen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse an der Einziehung und dem Verkauf von Forderungen haben. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
7.3.3 VISA und Anbieter von digitalen Geldbörsen.
Beschreibung des Empfängers: Wir leiten Informationen über Sie und Ihre Einkäufe weiter, wenn Sie die Klarna Card bei VISA und Mitgliedern des VISA-Kartennetzwerks verwenden. Wenn Sie Ihre Klarna Card oder eine Instore-Karte zu Ihrer digitalen Geldbörse hinzufügen oder sich entscheiden, mit Klarna über Ihre digitale Geldbörse zu bezahlen, müssen wir Ihre Informationen unter Umständen an den Anbieter dieser Geldbörse weiterleiten. In diesem Fall werden die Daten in Übereinstimmung mit der Datenschutzerklärung dieses Anbieters verarbeitet.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage: Die Weitergabe erfolgt in dem Umfang, der erforderlich ist, um Kartentransaktionen durchzuführen, Betrug zu verhindern und die Regeln des Kartennetzwerks von VISA einzuhalten. Wenn Sie Ihre Klarna Card erneuern oder eine neue Klarna Card erhalten, übermitteln wir diese Informationen an VISA, damit VISA wiederum Dritte informieren kann, bei denen Sie Ihre Klarna-Karteninformationen zuvor gespeichert haben (z. B. für wiederkehrende Transaktionen). Die Weitergabe der Daten erfolgt, um den Vertrag mit Ihnen zu erfüllen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
7.3.4 Erwerber von Forderungen (für offene Forderungen).
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Klarna überträgt Ihre offenen Forderungen unter Umständen an Erwerber von Forderungen.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Klarna leitet Ihre Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten (Name, Geburtsdatum, Sozialversicherungsnummer, Adresse und Telefonnummer), Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation (z. B. Restguthaben, Rückzahlungen und etwaiges negatives Zahlungsverhalten in Bezug auf die aktuelle Forderung) sowie Informationen über die mit der Forderung verbundenen Waren oder Dienstleistungen bei der Übertragung Ihrer Forderung an einen Erwerber sowie fortlaufend, bis Sie diese Forderung begleichen, weiter. Der Erwerber wird Ihre personenbezogenen Daten gemäß seiner eigenen Datenschutzerklärung verarbeiten, über die Sie bei der Übertragung der Forderung in Kenntnis gesetzt werden.
Die Weitergabe personenbezogener Daten an verschiedene Erwerber basiert auf unserem berechtigten Interesse am Verkauf ausstehender Forderungen im Rahmen unserer Geschäftstätigkeit (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
7.4 Kategorien von Empfängern bei der Nutzung von Klarna Kontoservices (Klarna Rechnungsabschluss, Spar- und Girokonten).
7.4.1 Kreditinstitute und andere Finanzinstitute.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Wir geben Ihre Daten an Kreditinstitute und andere Finanzinstitute (z. B. andere Banken) weiter, wenn Sie Transaktionen oder Zahlungen auf andere Konten vornehmen.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Wenn Sie Zahlungen auf ein Klarna Konto getätigt haben, verarbeitet Klarna die Informationen, die wir von der Bank, die Sie für die Transaktion verwendet haben, erhalten (z. B. Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten und Zahlungsinformationen). Wenn Sie Transaktionen oder Zahlungen auf Konten bei anderen Banken vornehmen, gibt Klarna auch einige Ihrer Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten sowie Zahlungsinformationen an den Empfänger sowie an das Kreditinstitut oder Finanzinstitut des Empfängers weiter. Die Weitergabe der Daten erfolgt, um den Vertrag mit Ihnen zu erfüllen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
7.5 Kategorien von Empfängern, an die Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten bei Ihrer Nutzung des Klarna Shopping Service weiterleitet.
Die Bedingungen für den Shopping-Service von Klarna können Sie
hier
finden.
7.5.1 Affiliate-Netzwerke.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Wenn Sie sich entscheiden, auf einen gesponserten Link zu klicken oder einen Kauf bei einem Cashback-Angebot in der mobilen Klarna App oder auf unserer Website zu tätigen, der zu einem Händler, Produkt oder einem Dienst führt, werden Sie über einen Dritten, ein sogenanntes Affiliate-Netzwerk, auf die Website eines anderen Unternehmens weitergeleitet.
Hier
können Sie mehr darüber erfahren, welche Affiliate-Netzwerke mit Klarna kooperieren (zu finden in der linken Spalte). Das Affiliate-Netzwerk verarbeitet Ihre Geräteinformationen in Übereinstimmung mit seiner jeweiligen Datenschutzerklärung (Sie können diese Datenschutzerklärungen in der rechten Spalte des gleichen
Links
wie oben angegeben finden). Der Händler, den Sie über einen gesponserten Link besuchen, bestimmt, an welches Affiliate-Netzwerk- Prozess Ihre Daten weitergegeben werden. Üblicherweise arbeitet ein Händler nur mit einem einzigen Affiliate-Netzwerk zusammen. Mehr darüber, um welches Netzwerk es sich handelt, können Sie erfahren, indem Sie uns (oder den entsprechenden Händler) kontaktieren.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Das Affiliate-Netzwerk kann Tracking-Technologien auf Ihrem Gerät platzieren, die Informationen darüber speichert, dass Sie in der mobilen Klarna App auf diesen Link geklickt haben und die im Anschluss verwendet wird, um Ihren Besuch bei einem Händler zu dokumentieren und so eine mögliche Provision zu berechnen, die Klarna ggf. zusteht.
Diese Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, Ihnen gesponserte Links zur Verfügung zu stellen, um Händler in der mobilen Klarna App und auf unserer Website zu vermarkten. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
Darüber hinaus müssen wir Informationen an unsere Affiliate-Netzwerke weitergeben, um festzustellen, ob Sie Anspruch auf Cashback im Rahmen des Klarna Cashback-Programms haben. Dazu gehört die Bestätigung, dass Sie die in unseren Cashback-Angeboten festgelegten Kriterien erfüllt haben. Die weitergegebenen Daten dienen auch dazu, den einen etwaigen Ihnen zustehenden Cashback-Betrag festzustellen. Die Verarbeitung für unseren Cashback Service beruht auf der Erfüllung eines Vertrags (Art. 6 Absatz 1 b) DSGVO).
7.5.2 Google.
7.5.2.1 reCAPTCHA
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Wenn Sie die mobile Klarna App (auch über unser Webportal) nutzen, erhebt Google Ihre Geräteinformationen über den dort implementierten reCAPTCHA-Dienst von Google (in einigen Fällen in Kombination mit zusätzlichen Informationen, die Sie in den reCAPTCHA-Dienst eingeben), und Klarna übermittelt die zur Überprüfung verwendete Telefonnummer.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage
: Die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen erfolgt auf der Grundlage des berechtigten Interesses von Klarna an der Ausübung ihrer Geschäftstätigkeit (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO), da der reCAPTCHA-Dienst den Missbrauch unserer Dienste verhindert (z. B. indem er Bots an der Anmeldung oder an der Ausführung eines SMS-Traffic-Pumping-Betrugs hindert). Google verarbeitet diese Informationen in Übereinstimmung mit seinen
Nutzungsbedingungen
und
Datenschutzrichtlinien
. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
7.5.2.2 Google Maps
Beschreibung des Empfängers
: Um auf einer in der Klarna mobilen Anwendung integrierten Karte anzuzeigen, wo Ihr Paket zugestellt wird, übermitteln wir die entsprechenden Lieferadressendaten an Google. Google verarbeitet Ihre Daten in Übereinstimmung mit den
Geschäftsbedingungen
und der
Datenschutzregelung
von Google Maps/Google Earth.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage
: Die Weitergabe dieser Informationen basiert auf Klarnas berechtigtem Interesse an der Ausübung ihrer Geschäftstätigkeit (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Indem wir Google Maps nutzen, sind wir in der Lage, die Lieferadresse auf einer in der Klarna mobile Anwendung integrierten Karte anzuzeigen. Wir versichern Ihnen, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten und wie sie diese ausüben können.
7.5.3 Partner im Rahmen des Finanzielle Analysen-Dienstes und des Angebots- und Vorteilsprogramms.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Partner im Rahmen des Finanzielle Analysen-Dienstes und des Angebots- und Vorteilsprogramms.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage
: Wenn Sie sich dazu entscheiden, die Angebote und Vorteile von Klarna im Rahmen des Finanzielle Analysen-Dienstes oder des Angebots- und Vorteilsprogramms in Anspruch zu nehmen, wird Klarna die für die Inanspruchnahme des Angebots erforderlichen personenbezogenen Daten an unsere Geschäftspartner weiterleiten (inklusive der Information, dass Sie Klarna-Kunde sind). Beim jeweiligen Angebot wird angegeben, welche Daten weitergeleitet werden. Die Weiterleitung der Daten erfolgt, um den Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna zu erfüllen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
7.5.4 Logistik- und Transportunternehmen.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Logistik- und Transportunternehmen.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Klarna gibt Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an Logistik- und Transportunternehmen weiter, die die von Ihnen bestellten Waren liefern, wenn Sie sich für die Sendungsverfolgung angemeldet haben. Wir geben zum Beispiel Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten sowie Tracking-Nummern weiter.
Logistik- und Transportunternehmen verarbeiten Ihre Daten in Übereinstimmung mit ihren eigenen Datenschutzerklärungen. Die Weitergabe erfolgt zur Erfüllung des Vertrags zwischen Ihnen und Klarna (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
7.5.5 Werbedienste und digitale Werbeplattformen.
Beschreibung des Empfängers
:
Drittwerbedienste
und digitale Werbeplattformen
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Klarna gibt Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an
Drittwerbedienste
weiter, um Ihnen für Sie relevantere Klarna Werbung auf Nicht-Klarna-Websites und digitalen Werbeplattformen Dritter zu zeigen, um Ihnen Nicht-Klarna Werbung in der Klarna App und auf Marketingkanälen zu zeigen. Dies basiert auf Ihrer Interaktion mit Klarnas Produkten und Dienstleistungen und Ihrem Klarna Profil. Klarna wird diese Daten auch zur Messung der Leistung der Werbung weitergeben. Einige
Drittwerbedienste und digitale Werbeplattformen
verwenden die Sie betreffenden Daten für ihre eigenen Zwecke und in Übereinstimmung mit ihren eigenen Datenschutzerklärungen, die
hier
abgerufen werden
können
, wo Sie auch sehen können, welche Dritten wir nutzen. Für weiterführende Informationen über diese Weitergabe oder dazu, wie Sie Ihre Rechte in Bezug auf diese Unternehmen ausüben können, nehmen Sie bitte Kontakt mit uns auf.
Diese Verarbeitung beruht auf Ihrer Einwilligung (laut Art. 6 Abs. 1 a) DSGVO). Sie können Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit widerrufen in den Einstellungen der Tracking-Technologie in der Klarna App. Sie können dieser Verarbeitung auch widersprechen- mit der gleichen Wirkung wie sie der Widerruf Ihrer Einwilligung hat. Weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 2.
Diese Verarbeitung könnte ein Profiling darstellen, das darauf abzielt, basierend auf einer Feststellung Ihrer potenziellen Interessen den Inhalt des Marketings entsprechend anzupassen. Weitere Informationen zum Thema Profiling finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
7.5.6 SIWK-Apps und Dienste Dritter
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Wenn Sie sich mit Klarna (durch „SIWK“) bei einem App-Store oder Dienst eines Drittanbieters anmelden, gibt Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an die App oder den Dienst des Drittanbieters weiter.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Dies geschieht zur Erfüllung des Vertrags mit Ihnen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
7.5.7 Der Betrugsprävention dienende Einrichtungen und Unternehmen, die Identitätsprüfungen anbieten.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Ihre personenbezogenen Daten werden an der Betrugsprävention dienende Agenturen und Unternehmen, die Identitätsprüfungen durchführen, weitergegeben.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Klarna leitet Ihre Informationen zur Überprüfung Ihrer Identität und der Richtigkeit der von Ihnen angegebenen Daten sowie zur Betrugs- und Kriminalitätsbekämpfung weiter. Die Unternehmen, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten, sind
hier
aufgeführt. Bitte beachten Sie, dass diese Unternehmen Ihre Daten in Übereinstimmung mit ihren eigenen Datenschutzerklärungen verarbeiten.
Klarna übermittelt Ihre Daten sowie die Information, ob eine bestimmte Transaktion einen potenziellen Betrug darstellt, auf der Grundlage des berechtigten Interesses an der Ausübung der Geschäftstätigkeit (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO), da die Agenturen zur Betrugsprävention und die Unternehmen, die Identitätsprüfungen anbieten, über Informationen über Betrugsaktivitäten und Identitätsbestätigungen verfügen, die für Klarna wichtig sind, um die Anzahl der betrügerischen Transaktionen zu verringern. Diese Übermittlung erfolgt auch in Ihrem Interesse, da wir auf diese Weise dabei unterstützt werden, zu verhindern, dass Ihre Daten für die Tätigung betrügerischer Einkäufe verwendet werden. Wir stellen sicher, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung notwendig ist, um dieses Interesse zu verfolgen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht überwiegt, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck zu verarbeiten. Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den Umständen Ihres Einzelfalls ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 2. Sie können sich auch an die im obigen Link aufgeführten Unternehmen wenden, um die gleichen Rechte wie in Abschnitt 2 dargelegt auch gegenüber diesen Unternehmen auszuüben.
7.5.8 Resell-Plattformen
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Marktplätze und Plattformen, die den Wiederverkauf von Produkten ermöglichen und mit denen Klarna von Zeit zu Zeit zusammenarbeitet („Resell-Plattformen“). Die Liste der aktuell verfügbaren Resell-Plattformen finden Sie
hier
. Wir teilen Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen, die Sie weiterverkaufen möchten.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Wenn Sie sich entscheiden, ein Produkt über die Klarna App weiterzuverkaufen, leitet Klarna Sie an die Resell-Plattform weiter und füllt Ihr Verkaufsangebot vorab aus, indem Informationen über das gekaufte Produkt an die Resell-Plattform übermittelt werden. Die Resell-Plattformen verarbeiten diese Informationen gemäß ihren Nutzungsbedingungen und Datenschutzrichtlinien. Die Weitergabe erfolgt zur Erfüllung des Vertrags zwischen Ihnen und Klarna (Artikel 6(1)(b) DSGVO).
7.6 Kategorien von Empfängern, an die Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weiterleitet, wenn Sie unseren Kundenservice über Social Media kontaktieren.
7.6.1 Social Media.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Social-Media-Unternehmen wie Facebook, Instagram oder Twitter.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Wenn Sie über Social Media wie Facebook, Instagram oder Twitter mit uns in Kontakt treten, werden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auch von diesen Unternehmen in Übereinstimmung mit deren Datenschutzerklärungen erhoben und verarbeitet. Die Weitergabe der Daten erfolgt, um den Vertrag mit Ihnen zu erfüllen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
8. Wann können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten außerhalb der EU/des EWR übertragen und wie schützen wir diese dann?
Wir bemühen uns stets, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten innerhalb des Gebiets der EU/des EWR zu verarbeiten. In bestimmten Situationen, z. B. wenn wir Ihre Daten an ein Unternehmen der Klarna-Gruppe oder einen Lieferanten, Subunternehmer oder Händler, der außerhalb der EU/des EWR tätig ist, weiterleiten, werden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten unter Umständen auch außerhalb des Gebiets der EU/des EWR übermittelt. Klarna stellt immer sicher, auch dann, wenn Daten außerhalb der EU/des EWR übermittelt werden, dass dasselbe hohe Schutzniveau auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten Anwendung findet, wie es der DSGVO entspricht. Ihre Rechte bezüglich Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten (beschrieben in Abschnitt 2) werden nicht beeinträchtigt, wenn Daten außerhalb der EU/des EWR übermittelt werden. Genauere Informationen über die Empfänger, an die Klarna Ihre Daten weiterleitet, können Sie in Abschnitt 7 finden.
Wenn Sie bei einem Händler einkaufen, dessen Sitz sich in einem Land außerhalb der EU/des EWR befindet, geht mit unserer Weiterleitung Ihrer Daten an diesen Händler einher, dass Ihre Daten in dieses Land außerhalb der EU/des EWR übermittelt werden.
Bei der Übermittlung personenbezogener Daten innerhalb eigener Unternehmensgruppen außerhalb des EU/EWR-Raums verwenden einige Lieferanten von Klarna interne Unternehmensregeln (Binding Corporate Rules, „BCR“). Diese BCRs wurden von einer EU-Datenschutzbehörde genehmigt und stellen sicher, dass für Ihre personenbezogenen Daten bei der Übermittlung dasselbe hohe Schutzniveau Anwendung findet.
Wenn Sie genauere Informationen über unsere Sicherheitsmaßnahmen erhalten möchten, können Sie uns jederzeit kontaktieren. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12. Informationen darüber, für welche Länder ein "angemessenes Schutzniveau" festgestellt werden konnte finden Sie auf der Website der
Europäischen Kommission
. Zusätzliche Informationen über die Standardvertragsklauseln der Europäischen Union erhalten Sie
hier
und über die Binding Corporate Rules („BCR“)
hier
.
Von Klarna bei der Übermittlung personenbezogener Daten außerhalb der EU/des EWR angewandte Sicherheitsmaßnahmen
In Ländern außerhalb der EU/des EWR können Gesetze gelten, die es öffentlichen Behörden erlauben, Auskunft über in dem jeweiligen Land gespeicherte personenbezogene Daten zum Zweck der Kriminalitätsbekämpfung oder der Wahrung der nationalen Sicherheit zu erlangen. Unabhängig davon, ob wir oder einer unserer Anbieter Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verarbeiten, stellen wir sicher, dass bei der Übermittlung dieser Daten ein hohes Schutzniveau gewährleistet ist und dass geeignete Schutzmaßnahmen gemäß den geltenden Datenschutzanforderungen (wie etwa der DSGVO) getroffen werden. Die Sicherstellung solch angemessener Schutzmaßnahmen erfolgt unter anderem, wenn:
die Europäische Kommission entschieden hat, dass das Land außerhalb der EU/des EWR, in das Ihre personenbezogenen Daten übermittelt werden, ein angemessenes Schutzniveau aufweist, welches dem von der DSGVO gewährten Niveau entspricht. Dies bedeutet, unter anderem, dass die personenbezogenen Daten auch danach weiterhin vor nicht erlaubter Offenlegung geschützt sind und, Sie immer noch Ihre Rechte im Zusammenhang mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten ausüben können, oder
dass die Standardklauseln der Europäischen Kommission in die Vereinbarungen zwischen Klarna und dem Empfänger außerhalb der EU/des EWR aufgenommen wurden. Dies bedeutet, dass der Empfänger gewährleistet, dass das der DSGVO für Ihre personenbezogenen Daten gewährte Schutzniveau weiterhin gilt, und dass Ihre Rechte weiterhin geschützt sind. In diesen Fällen prüfen wir außerdem, ob im Land des Empfängers Gesetze gelten, die den Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten beeinträchtigen. Falls erforderlich, ergreifen wir besondere technische und organisatorische Maßnahmen, damit Ihre Daten während der Übermittlung in das entsprechende Land außerhalb der EU/des EWR geschützt bleiben.
die Übermittlung dem Datenschutzrahmen EU-USA unterliegt. Dabei handelt es sich um ein Opt-in-Zertifizierungssystem für US-Unternehmen, das vom Department of Commerce der USA verwaltet wird. Der Datenschutzrahmen umfasst eine Reihe von durchsetzbaren Grundsätzen und Anforderungen, die von dem US- amerikanischen Unternehmen zertifiziert werden müssen, um sicherzustellen, dass Ihre Daten weiterhin ausreichend geschützt sind.
Unbeschadet der obigen Angaben bedeutet unsere Datenübermittlung an den jeweiligen Händler, immer dann, wenn der Händler (und die Klarna- Stellen, mit der der Händler einen Vertrag geschlossen hat), bei dem Sie sich für einen Einkauf entscheiden, seinen Sitz in einem Land außerhalb der EU/des EWR hat, dass Ihre personenbezogenen Daten in das entsprechende Land außerhalb der EU/des EWR übermittelt und verarbeitet werden. Klicken Sie
hier
, um auf die Datenschutzerklärungen der anderen Klarna-Stellen in der Klarna Group zuzugreifen Anderenfalls wäre es nicht möglich, Ihren Kauf durchzuführen. Klarna verlässt sich in erster Linie auf die Standardvertragsklauseln der Europäischen Kommission, um den Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten bei solchen Datenübermittlungen sicherzustellen, allerdings kann es vorkommen, dass in Ländern, in denen der ausländische Händler seinen Sitz hat, Gesetze gelten, die einen wirksamen Schutz durch die Standardvertragsklauseln verhindern. Auch in einem solchen Fall werden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten trotzdem an den ausländischen Händler (oder an die örtliche Klarna-Stelle dieses Händlers) übermittelt, soweit die Datenübermittlung erforderlich ist, um Ihren jeweiligen Kauf zu durchzuführen.
9. Wie lange wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten speichern
Die Dauer der Speicherung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch Klarna hängt von den jeweiligen Zwecken ab, zu denen Klarna die personenbezogenen Daten nutzt:
Der Zeitraum, den Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, welche für das Vertragsverhältnis zwischen Ihnen und Klarna bei uns gespeichert werden, umfasst in der Regel die gesamte Dauer des Vertragsverhältnisses und darüber hinaus, aufgrund von Verjährungsfristen, eine maximale Dauer von 10 Jahren.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Klarna infolge einer gesetzlichen Pflicht speichern muss, wie z. B. aufgrund von Geldwäschebekämpfungs- oder Buchhaltungsgesetzen, werden in der Regel 5 Jahre bzw. 7 Jahre aufbewahrt.
Personenbezogene Daten, die nicht für die Zwecke des Vertragsverhältnisses zwischen Ihnen und Klarna verwendet werden, oder in deren Zusammenhang Klarna nicht gesetzlich zu einer Speicherung verpflichtet ist, dürfen nur so lange aufbewahrt werden, wie es zur Erfüllung des jeweiligen Zwecks unserer Verarbeitung erforderlich ist (in der Regel 3 Monate). Weitere Informationen hierzu finden Sie in der Tabelle in Abschnitt 4).
In einigen Ausnahmefällen ist Klarna, aufgrund von Vorgaben zur Kapitaladäquanz, unter Umständen dazu verpflichtet, Daten über den eigentlichen Zeitraum hinaus zu speichern.
Die rechtlichen Pflichten, auf die wir oben Bezug genommen haben, bedeuten, dass Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, wie in Abschnitt 2 angegeben, nicht löschen darf, auch wenn Sie von uns deren Löschung verlangen. Falls wir nicht gesetzlich zur Aufbewahrung der personenbezogenen Daten verpflichtet sind, müssen wir dennoch abwägen, ob wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten benötigen, um Klarna gegenüber Rechtsansprüchen zu schützen.
Bitte beachten Sie, dass nur weil wir einer rechtlichen Verpflichtung zur Speicherung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten unterliegen, dies nicht bedeutet, dass wir auch deren Verwendung für einen anderen Zweck berechtigt sind. Klarna wird für jeden einzelnen Zweck eine Abwägung durchführen, um zu entscheiden, wie lange Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden. Weitere Informationen hierzu finden Sie in der Tabelle in Abschnitt 4.
10. Wie wir Cookies und sonstige Arten von Tracking-Technologie verwenden
Um Ihnen ein maßgeschneidertes und smooothes Nutzungserlebnis zu bieten, verwendet Klarna Cookies und ähnliche Tracking-Technologien in den verschiedenen Webanwendungen, wie z.B. auf unserer Website, in der mobilen Klarna App und im Checkout eines Händlers, der Klarna benutzt. Informationen über die von Klarna verwendeten Tracking-Technologien sowie darüber, wie Sie die Nutzung von Tracking-Technologien akzeptieren oder ablehnen können, finden Sie im jeweiligen Interface.
11. Aktualisierungen dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Wir arbeiten ständig an der Verbesserung unserer Dienste, mit dem Ziel, Ihnen ein smooothes Nutzungserlebnis bieten zu können. Damit können Änderungen an bestehenden und zukünftigen Diensten einhergehen. Wenn diese Verbesserung nach geltendem Recht eine Benachrichtigung oder Einwilligung Ihrerseits erfordern, werden Sie darüber informiert oder erhalten die Möglichkeit, Ihre Einwilligung zu erteilen. Außerdem ist es wichtig, dass Sie diese Datenschutzerklärung vor jeder Nutzung unserer Dienste lesen, da sich die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten unter Umständen im Vergleich zu Ihrer letzten Nutzung des jeweiligen Dienstes verändert hat.
12. Klarnas Kontaktinformationen
Die Klarna Bank AB (publ) ist beim schwedischen Handelsregister unter der Firmennummer 556737-0431 eingetragen und hat ihren Sitz in Sveavägen 46, 111 34 Stockholm.
Klarna verfügt über einen Datenschutzbeauftragten und ein Team von Datenspezialisten. Außerdem beschäftigen wir mehrere Kundenservice-Teams für Datenschutzfragen. Sie erreichen diese Ansprechpartner per E-Mail an
datenschutz@klarna.de
. Wenn Sie sich an den Datenschutzbeauftragten von Klarna wenden möchten, geben Sie dies bitte in der Betreffzeile an.
Die Klarna Bank AB (publ) handelt in Übereinstimmung mit den schwedischen Datenschutzgesetzen. Weitere Informationen über Klarna finden Sie unter
www.klarna.com/de/
.
13. Fusion mit SOFORT GmbH
Am 17. Dezember 2024 fusionierte die SOFORT GmbH mit der Klarna Bank AB (publ). In Zusammenhang mit dieser Fusion erwarb Klarna die personenbezogenen Daten von Kunden, die die Dienste der SOFORT GmbH nutzen oder genutzt haben. Klarna wird diese personenbezogenen Daten verarbeiten, um vertragliche Verpflichtungen zu erfüllen, geltende Gesetze einzuhalten und im Einklang mit dem berechtigten Interesse von Klarna sein Geschäft zu betreiben.
Die erworbenen personenbezogenen Daten werden gemäß der zum Zeitpunkt der Übernahme geltenden Datenschutzerklärung und den einschlägigen Datenschutzgesetzen verarbeitet. Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie auch für diese Daten die in dieser Datenschutzerklärung festgelegten Rechte haben, wie zum Beispiel das Recht auf Auskunft (siehe Abschnitt 2). Die zum Zeitpunkt der Übernahme geltende Datenschutzerklärung finden Sie
hier
.
Sub-policy 5
https://cdn.klarna.com/1.0/shared/content/legal/terms/0/de_at/privacy:
1. Wer ist für Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verantwortlich?
2. Ihre Datenschutzrechte als betroffene Person
3. Welche Arten von personenbezogenen Daten erheben wir?
4. Welche personenbezogenen Daten werden für welche Zwecke und mit welcher Rechtsgrundlage verwendet?
5. Wie können Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen?
6. Klarnas Verwendung von Profiling und automatisierte Entscheidungen, die Sie maßgeblich betreffen.
7. An wen leiten wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weiter?
8. Wann können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten außerhalb der EU/des EWR übertragen und wie schützen wir diese dann?
9. Wie lange wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten speichern
10. Wie wir Cookies und sonstige Arten von Tracking-Technologie verwenden
11. Aktualisierungen dieser Datenschutzerklärung
12. Klarnas Kontaktinformationen
Navigationsmenü öffnen
Navigationsmenü schließen
1. Wer ist für Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verantwortlich?
Die Klarna Bank AB (publ), eingetragen im schwedischen Handelsregister unter der Firmennummer 556737-0431 und mit Sitz in Sveavägen 46, 111 34 Stockholm, die ihre Tätigkeit auch über ihre Zweigniederlassungen ausübt („Klarna“, „wir“, „unser“ oder „uns“), ist gemäß der EU-Datenschutzgrundverordnung (die „DSGVO“) für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten verantwortlich. Sollten Sie Fragen zur Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten haben, wenden Sie sich bitte per E-Mail an
datenschutz@klarna.at
an unser Datenschutzteam.
2. Ihre Datenschutzrechte als betroffene Person
Gemäß der DSGVO stehen Ihnen verschiedene Rechte im Hinblick auf die Kontrolle über Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zu. Sie können direkt von uns Informationen darüber erhalten, wie wir die Sie betreffenden Daten verarbeiten. Im Folgenden können Sie sich über Ihre Rechte informieren. Wenn Sie Informationen über die personenbezogenen Daten erhalten möchten, die Klarna über Sie speichert, eine sogenannte Auskunft über Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, bestimmte Daten löschen lassen oder uns kontaktieren möchten, um Ihre weiteren Rechte auszuüben, ist der einfachste Weg, sich in Ihr Klarna-Konto einzuloggen und Ihre Anfrage dort zu stellen. Sie können unsere Kontaktdaten auch in Abschnitt 12 für weitere Fragen finden.
Ihre Rechte
Recht auf Löschung personenbezogener Daten (“Recht auf Vergessenwerden“)
In einigen Fällen haben Sie das Recht auf Löschung der Sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten durch uns. Dies bedeutet beispielsweise, dass Sie von uns verlangen können, personenbezogene Daten, zu löschen, die wir (i) nicht mehr zur Erfüllung des Zweckes benötigen, für den sie von uns erhoben wurden oder (ii) verarbeiten auf der Grundlage Ihrer Einwilligung und bei Vorliegen eines durch Sie erfolgten Widerrufs dieser Einwilligung. Es gibt Situationen, in Lage nicht dazu in der Lage ist, Ihre Daten zu löschen, wie z.B. wenn die Daten für den Zweck, für den sie erhoben wurden, noch erforderlich sind oder das Interesse von Klarna an der Verarbeitung der Daten Ihr Interesse an der Löschung der Daten überwiegt oder weil wir eine rechtliche Verpflichtung zu ihrer Aufbewahrung unterliegen. Sie können in den Abschnitten 4 und 9 dieser Datenschutzerklärung mehr über unsere rechtliche Verpflichtung zur Speicherung von Daten erfahren. Die dort genannten rechtlichen Bestimmungen hindern uns daran, bestimmte Daten sofort zu löschen. Sie verfügen auch über das Recht, der Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten für bestimmte Zwecke zu widersprechen, wie z.B. für Direktwerbung; mehr dazu erfahren Sie in dieser Auflistung Ihrer Rechte.
Recht auf Informationen.
Sie haben das Recht, von uns darüber informiert zu werden, wie wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verarbeiten. Wir kommen dem mit dieser Datenschutzerklärung, die auf die jeweiligen Dienstleistungen bezogenen FAQs und der Beantwortung Ihrer Fragen nach.
Recht, Auskunft über Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zu erhalten («Auskunftsrecht der betroffenen Person»).
Sie haben das Recht, zu erfahren, ob Klarna Sie betreffende personenbezogene Daten verarbeitet werden und eine Kopie („Datenauszug“) dieser Daten zu erhalten, dieser Daten zu erhalten, das sogenannte Auskunftsrecht der betroffenen Person. Mittels des Datenauszugs werden Sie die Information darüber erhalten, welche personenbezogenen Daten Klarna über Sie besitzt und wie wir diese verarbeiten.
Recht auf Auskunft und auf Übertragung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten an einen anderen Empfänger („Datenübertragbarkeit“).
Dieses Recht bedeutet, dass Sie eine Kopie der Sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten, die Klarna zur Erfüllung eines mit Ihnen geschlossenen Vertrags besitzt oder auf Grundlage einer Einwilligung Ihrerseits verarbeiten, in einem maschinell lesbaren Format anfordern können. Dies wird es Ihnen erlauben, die Daten woanders zu verwenden, beispielsweise für die Übertragung an einen anderen Verantwortlichen/Empfänger.
Recht auf Berichtigung.
Sie haben das Recht, von uns die Berichtigung Sie betreffender unrichtiger Informationen zu verlangen und die Vervollständigung Sie betreffender Informationen zu verlangen, die Sie für unrichtig oder unvollständig erachten.
Recht auf Einschränkung der Verarbeitung.
Sollten Sie der Meinung sein, dass Daten unrichtig sind, unsere Verarbeitung der Daten unrechtmäßig ist oder dass wir die Daten nicht für einen bestimmten Zweck benötigen, können Sie eine Einschränkung der Verarbeitung derartiger personenbezogener Daten verlangen. Sie haben auch die Möglichkeit, zu verlangen, dass wir die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten einstellen, während wir Ihre Anfrage überprüfen. Wenn Sie gemäß Ihrem nachstehend beschriebenen Recht
Widerspruch
gegen unsere Verarbeitung einlegen, können Sie auch verlangen, dass wir die Verarbeitung dieser personenbezogenen Daten einschränken, während wir unsere Überprüfung vornehmen.
Recht auf Widerspruch gegen die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten.
Sie haben das Recht, unter Bezugnahme auf Ihre persönlichen Umstände gegen die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten auf der Grundlage unseres berechtigten Interesses (Art. 6 Abs. (1) (f) DSGVO) Widerspruch einzulegen. Darüber hinaus können Sie auch jederzeit der Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu Direktwerbungszwecken widersprechen. Wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie keine weiteren Direktwerbungs-Informationen mehr von uns erhalten möchten, werden wir das Marketing Ihnen gegenüber einstellen und Ihnen kein entsprechendes Material mehr zusenden.
Recht auf Widerspruch gegen eine automatisierte Entscheidung, die Sie erheblich beeinträchtigt
.
Sie haben das Recht, gegen eine automatisierte Entscheidung von Klarna Widerspruch einzulegen, wenn die Entscheidung Ihnen gegenüber rechtliche Wirkung entfaltet oder Sie in ähnlicher Weise erheblich beeinträchtigt. In Abschnitt 6 wird erläutert, wie Klarna automatisierte Entscheidungen nutzt.
Recht auf Widerruf Ihrer Einwilligung.
Wie in untenstehendem Abschnitt 5 beschrieben, haben Sie in Fällen, in denen wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auf der Grundlage Ihrer Einwilligung oder expliziten Einwilligung verarbeiten, das Recht, diese Einwilligung jederzeit zu widerrufen. Wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen, werden wir die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten für die entsprechenden Zwecke einstellen.
Recht auf Einreichung einer Beschwerde
.
Wenn Sie sich darüber beschweren möchten, wie Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verarbeitet, haben Sie das Recht, eine Beschwerde bei
Integritetsskyddsmyndigheten
, der schwedischen Aufsichtsbehörde für die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten durch Klarna, einzureichen. Sie erreichen
Integritetsskyddsmyndigheten
über den folgenden
Link
. Sie können auch eine Beschwerde bei Ihrer nationalen Datenschutzbehörde einreichen, die Sie in der Auflistung
hier
finden können.
Einstellungen in der mobilen Klarna App:
In der mobilen Klarna App bietet Ihnen Klarna die Möglichkeit, Ihre Präferenzen für bestimmte Dienste anzupassen, wie z. B. hinsichtlich des Erhalts aktueller Benachrichtigungen.
3. Welche Arten von personenbezogenen Daten erheben wir?
In diesem Abschnitt erläutern wir die verschiedenen Arten der von uns erhobenen oder erstellten personenbezogenen Daten. In Abschnitt 4 beschreiben wir, zu welchen Zwecken wir diese Arten personenbezogener Daten verwenden.
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten
- Name, Geburtsdatum, Geburtsort, Sozialversicherungsnummer, Titel, Beruf, Geschlecht, Rechnungs- und Lieferadresse, E-Mail-Adresse, Mobiltelefonnummer, Staatsangehörigkeit, Alter, Audioaufnahmen, Fotos und Videoaufnahmen von Ihnen und Ihrem Ausweis, Elektronische ID, qualifizierte elektronische Signaturen  usw.
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen
- Daten zu den von Ihnen gekauften oder bestellten Waren/Dienstleistungen (bzw. deren Kauf oder Bestellung Sie planen), wie z. B. Art des Artikels oder die Sendungsverfolgungsnummer.
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation
- Informationen z. B. über Ihr Einkommen, eventuelle Kredite, negatives Zahlungsverhalten und frühere Kreditgenehmigungen.
Zahlungsinformationen
- Kredit- und Debitkartendaten (Kartennummer, Gültigkeit und CVV-Code), Kontonummer, Name Ihrer Bank, Name des Kontoinhabers, Bank-Login-Daten.
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna
- Welche(n) Dienst(e) und welche Funktionen Sie bei diesen Diensten genutzt haben und wie Sie sie genutzt haben. Dazu gehören Informationen über ausstehende und frühere Schulden, Ihre Zahlungs- und Rückzahlungshistorie und Ihre persönlichen Präferenzen einschließlich abgeleiteter Interessen.
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna generiert werden
- Technische Daten wie z. B. Antwortzeit von Webseiten, Protokolle der Art und Weise, wie Sie durch unsere Dienste navigieren, Download- oder Transaktionsfehler, Datum und Uhrzeit, wann Sie den Dienst genutzt haben.
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundenservice von Klarna
- Aufgezeichnete Telefonanrufe, Chat-Konversationen und E-Mail-Korrespondenz.
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen
- Informationen darüber, wie Sie mit Händlern interagieren, z. B. ob Sie Waren erhalten haben und die Art von Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen.
Geräteinformationen
- Geräte-ID, IP-Adresse, Spracheinstellungen, Browsereinstellungen, Zeitzone, Betriebssystem, Plattform, Bildschirmauflösung und ähnliche Daten über Ihre Geräte und Geräteeinstellungen/Nutzung.
Informationen aus externen Sanktionslisten und PEP-Listen
- Sanktionslisten und Listen von politisch exponierten Personen („PEP“) enthalten Informationen wie Name, Geburtsdatum, Geburtsort, Beruf oder Position und den Grund, warum die Person auf der jeweiligen Liste steht.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten
- Sensible personenbezogene Daten sind Daten, aus denen religiöse Überzeugungen, politische oder weltanschauliche Ansichten oder die Mitgliedschaft in einer Gewerkschaft hervorgehen, die Informationen über Gesundheitszustand, das Sexualleben oder die sexuelle Orientierung darstellen, sowie biometrische Daten.
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten
- Im Rahmen unseres Klarna Shopping Services sowie in Verbindung mit den Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna, Auto- Track, Finanzielle Analysen und Open Banking-Dienst verwenden wir weitere personenbezogene Daten, die nicht unter die oben aufgeführten Arten fallen. Informationen zu den einzelnen Diensten sind hier aufgeführt:
Die mobile Klarna App (die „Klarna App“) und Browsererweiterung (im Rahmen des Klarna Shopping Service):
Sämtliche Inhalte, die Sie hochladen oder bereitstellen (z. B. Anfrage, Fotos, Belege, Produkt- & Shop-Bewertungen oder Profil-Bilder), Standortinformationen, Geolokalisierungsinformationen, Informationen über die Verwendung des Browsers und die Websites, die Sie im Browser der App oder mit der installierten Erweiterung besuchen;
Die Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna:
Informationen über Ihre Transaktionen und Einzahlungen sowie Informationen darüber, woher Ihr Geld kommt oder wofür es verwendet wird. Klarna verarbeitet für diesen Service auch Daten über Dritte (wie Zahlungsempfänger oder Zahlender);
Auto-track:
Informationen aus dem verbundenen E-Mail-Konto über Ihre abgeschlossenen Einkäufe (wie z.B. Bestellnummer, Produkt, Preis, Kaufdatum,  Mengeninformationen; verwendete Zahlungsmethode, Promotions-Codes, Sendungsverfolgungsnummern und Spediteur. Wir erheben auch Informationen im Zusammenhang mit der Lieferung (wie z.B. Lieferstatus, Lieferadresse, voraussichtliches Lieferdatum), Informationen aus E-Mails (wie z.B. Absender, Datum der E-Mail) und Informationen über Händler;
Finanzielle Analysen:
Daten von Ihren anderen Bankkonten und anderen Arten von Konten (z. B. Kartenkonten), die Sie mit dem Dienst verbinden, sowie Daten wie Kontonummer, Bank, historische Transaktionen von Ihren verbundenen Konten sowie Salden und Vermögenswerte;
Kundenkarten-Funktion
: Informationen von Ihrem hinzugefügten Membership- oder Treuekartenkonto eines Drittanbieters, wie z.B. Informationen und Berechtigungsnachweise zum Membership, Membershippunkte, Status, Level und Gutahabensverlauf; und
Klarna Cashback:
Kaufbeträge und Daten von über das Klarna Cashback-Programm getätigten Käufen, unabhängig davon, ob Sie mit Klarna bezahlt haben oder nicht. Wir verarbeiten auch Informationen über die Cashback-Angebotsrate pro Kauf und den erhaltenen Cashback-Betrag.
Open Banking-Dienst
: Informationen von Ihrem Drittbankkonto, wie grundlegende Kontoinformationen (Kontoinhaber, Bankkontonummer, Bank-Login-Daten) sowie Informationen über Ihre Transaktionen, Ihren Kontostand und Ihre Überziehungslimite.
Anmeldung zu Veranstaltungen in Social Media:
Informationen über Ihr Profil aus Ihrem Social-Media-Konto und geschäftliche Daten wie Name, Adresse und Unternehmensart Ihres Arbeitgebers.
Detaillierte Informationen zu den entsprechenden personenbezogenen Daten für jeden Social-Media-Dienst finden Sie außerdem
hier
.
4. Welche personenbezogenen Daten werden für welche Zwecke und mit welcher Rechtsgrundlage verwendet?
In den nachfolgenden Tabellen erfahren Sie mehr darüber,
wofür (zu welchem Zweck) wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwenden,
welche Arten personenbezogener Daten wir für den jeweiligen Zweck nutzen und ob die personenbezogenen Daten direkt von Ihnen oder aus einer anderen Quelle stammen. Falls wir personenbezogene Daten über Sie aus einer anderen Quelle erhalten haben, werden wir Ihnen die Quelle in Klammern zur Verfügung stellen,
welche gesetzlichen Rechte uns nach der aktuellen Datenschutzgesetzgebung, wie etwa der DSGVO, für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten zustehen, was als unsere „Rechtsgrundlage“ bezeichnet wird und
wann Klarna aufhört, die personenbezogenen Daten für den jeweiligen Zweck zu verwenden.
4.1 Zwecke, für die Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
in allen Fällen
verwendet werden, unabhängig davon, welchen Service Sie nutzen.
Zweck der Verarbeitung - was wir tun und warum.
Arten von personenbezogenen Daten, die für den Zweck verwendet werden, und woher sie stammen (Quelle). Im Abschnitt 3 finden Sie weitere Informationen über die verschiedenen Arten von personenbezogenen Daten.
Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung gemäß der DSGVO.
Zu welchem Zeitpunkt der Zweck für die Nutzung der personenbezogenen Daten nicht mehr gegeben ist. Siehe Abschnitt 9 für weitere Informationen zum Zeitpunkt der Datenlöschung durch Klarna.
[1]
Um unsere Kundenbeziehung mit Ihnen für jeden von Ihnen genutzten Dienst in Übereinstimmung mit unseren Vereinbarungen zu verwalten. Dies umfasst das Erstellen und elektronische Versenden von Informationen an Sie (kein Marketing).
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Dienstleistungsspezif-ische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3).
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Wenn der Dienst Informationen verarbeitet, die sensible personenbezogene Daten darstellen (z. B. aus Materialien, die Sie hochladen), erfolgt unsere Verarbeitung auf der Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung (Art. 9 Abs. 2 a) DSGVO).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet oder wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen.
[2]
Um Umfragen zur Kundenzufriedenheit durchführen, Verbraucherforschung betreiben sowie Bewertungen von Ihnen erbitten zu können, per E-Mail, Textnachrichten, Telefonanrufen oder über andere Kommunikationskanäle.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, solche Umfragen durchzuführen, dass die Verarbeitung zur Erreichung dieses Zwecks erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht für diesen Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie Widerspruch gegen diese Verarbeitung einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Bei Anrufen basiert die Verarbeitung auf Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 a) DSGVO).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[3]
Gewährleistung der Netzwerk- und Informationssicherheit bei den Diensten von Klarna.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, die Netzwerk- und Informationssicherheit gewährleisten zu können, dass die Verarbeitung zur Erreichung dieses Zwecks erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Es ist auch in Ihrem Interesse als Kunde, dass wir eine gute Informationssicherheit gewährleisten.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie Widerspruch gegen diese Verarbeitung einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Ihre Daten werden so lange verarbeitet, wie Sie einen Dienst nutzen.
[4]
Um Sie als schutzbedürftigen Kunde zu unterstützen (d. h., wenn Sie aufgrund besonderer Umstände zusätzliche Unterstützung bei der Kontaktaufnahme mit uns benötigen). Das bedeutet, dass wir Ihnen besondere Unterstützung anbieten können, z. B. wenn Sie den Kundenservice kontaktieren.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten (Informationen über Ihren Gesundheitszustand).
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Basierend auf Ihrer Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 a) und Art. 9 Abs. 2 a) DSGVO).
Wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie nicht mehr als schutzbedürftiger Kunde einzustufen sind oder Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen. Wir stellen diese Verarbeitung auch ein, wenn und sobald Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie nicht länger Kunde von Klarna sein möchten.
[5]
Um Risikoanalysen durchzuführen, Betrug zu verhindern und Risikomanagement zu betreiben.
Wir führen die Verarbeitung durch, um Ihre Identität zu bestätigen und sicherzustellen, dass die von Ihnen angegebenen Daten korrekt sind, sowie um Straftaten zu verhindern.
Diese Verarbeitung stellt ein Profiling und eine automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung dar. Wir nutzen die automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung zu diesem Zweck, um feststellen zu können, ob Sie ein Betrugsrisiko darstellen. Weitere Informationen zum Profiling und zu automatisierten Entscheidungen finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Sensible personenbezogene Daten. (Ihre Ausweisdokumente)
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Sensible personenbezogene Daten werden auf Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung (Artikel 9(2)(a) DSGVO) verarbeitet, soweit Ihnen dies bei der Erhebung solcher Daten erklärt wird.
Für unsere Finanzdienstleistungen sind wir jedoch auch gesetzlich verpflichtet, die Identität unserer Kunden festzustellen (Artikel 6(1)(c) DSGVO), (Schwedisches
Gesetz (2017:630) über Maßnahmen gegen Geldwäsche und Terrorismusfinanzierung
).
Diese Verarbeitung erfolgt für die Dauer Ihrer Nutzung eines Dienstes von Klarna oder bis Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen.
Wenn Klarna allerdings ein potenzielles Risiko in der Art und Weise Ihrer Nutzung von Klarna identifiziert hat, werden wir Ihre Daten weiterhin für diesen Zweck verwenden und - sollte ein Betrugsrisiko bestehen - unsere Risikobewertung kontinuierlich aktualisieren. Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten so lange, wie wir gesetzlich zur Aufbewahrung Ihrer Daten verpflichtet sind. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[6]
Um Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zu anonymisieren, und darauf basierend unsere Dienstleistungen und Produkte zu verbessern und das Kundenverhalten zu analysieren.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleist-ungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Dienstleistungsspezif-ische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3).
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten für Zwecke der Produktentwicklung zu anonymisieren und das Kundenverhalten zu analysieren, um den Service und das Kundenerlebnis zu verbessern. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um den Zweck der Verarbeitung zu erreichen und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Indem wir Sie betreffende Daten anonymisieren, stellen wir sicher, dass wir personenbezogene Daten so wenig intensiv wie möglich nutzen.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Diese Verarbeitung erfolgt über den gesamten Zeitraum hinweg, in dem Klarna die Daten in seinen Systemen aufbewahren muss, zum Beispiel um den mit Ihnen abgeschlossenen Vertrag zu erfüllen oder um geltendem Recht zu entsprechen. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[7]
Zur Durchführung von Datenanalysen für die Produktentwicklung und -prüfung zur Verbesserung unserer Risiko-, Betrugs- und Kreditmodelle und zur Gestaltung und Verbesserung  unserer Dienste (wenn möglich, erfolgt im ersten Schritt eine Anonymisierung der Daten, d. h. es findet im Anschluss keine Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten mehr statt).
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Dienstleistungsspezifi-sche personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3).
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, statistische Daten und Berichte für diesen Zweck zu erstellen. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um den Zweck der Verarbeitung zu erreichen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Diese Verarbeitung erfolgt über den gesamten Zeitraum hinweg, in dem Klarna die Daten in seinen Systemen aufbewahren muss, z. B., um den mit Ihnen abgeschlossenen Vertrag zu erfüllen oder um geltendem Recht zu entsprechen. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[8]
Zur Durchführung von Datenanalysen für die Messung und Verbesserung unserer Marketing- und Werbekanäle (wenn möglich, erfolgt im ersten Schritt eine Anonymisierung der Daten, d. h. es findet im Anschluss keine Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten mehr statt).
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3).
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse an der Durchführung von Datenanalysen für die Messung und Verbesserung unserer Marketing- und Werbekanäle haben. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um den Zweck der Verarbeitung zu erreichen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Diese Verarbeitung erfolgt über den gesamten Zeitraum hinweg, in dem Klarna die Daten in seinen Systemen aufbewahren muss, z. B., um den mit Ihnen abgeschlossenen Vertrag zu erfüllen oder um geltendem Recht zu entsprechen. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[9]
Zur Berechnung von Zahlungsprovisionen an Lieferanten (sofern möglich, anonymisieren wir die Daten zunächst, was bedeutet, dass keine Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten hiernach mehr stattfindet).
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Klarna)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna erzeugt werden.(Klarna)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse an der Berechnung von Zahlungsprovisionen haben. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um den Zweck der Verarbeitung zu erreichen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Diese Verarbeitung erfolgt bis zu 90 Tage nach Nutzung einer Dienstleistung.
[10]
Zur Erstellung von Statistiken und Berichten für wirtschaftliche Analysen oder Analysen von Zahlungstrends oder Zahlungsvolumina in bestimmten Regionen oder Branchen (wenn möglich, erfolgt im ersten Schritt eine Anonymisierung der Daten, d. h. es findet im Anschluss keine Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten mehr statt).
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Dienstleistungsspezifi-sche personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3).
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, statistische Daten und Berichte für diesen Zweck zu erstellen. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um den Zweck der Verarbeitung zu erreichen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Diese Verarbeitung erfolgt über den gesamten Zeitraum hinweg, in dem Klarna die Daten in seinen Systemen aufbewahren muss, z. B., um den mit Ihnen abgeschlossenen Vertrag zu erfüllen oder um geltendem Recht zu entsprechen. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[11] Zur Überprüfung und Verifizierung Ihrer Identität.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Sensible personenbezogene Daten. (Biometrische Informationen aus Ihrem vorgelegten Ausweis und hochgeladenem Bild)
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Sensible personenbezogene Daten werden auf Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung (Artikel 9(2)(a) DSGVO) verarbeitet, soweit Ihnen dies bei der Erhebung solcher Daten erklärt wird.
Solange Sie einen der Dienste von Klarna nutzen.
[12]
Zur Weitergabe Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten an die in Abschnitt 7.1 beschriebenen Kategorien von Empfängern (Lieferanten und Subunternehmer, Unternehmen der Klarna-Gruppe, Personen mit Befugnissen über Ihre Finanztransaktionen, Behörden und Käufer von Forderungen, Unternehmen oder Vermögenswerten).
Alle in Abschnitt 3 genannten Arten.
Je nach Empfänger (siehe Abschnitt 7.1) unterschiedlich.
Diese Verarbeitung erfolgt über den gesamten Zeitraum hinweg, in dem Klarna die Daten in seinen Systemen aufbewahren muss, z. B., um den mit Ihnen abgeschlossenen Vertrag zu erfüllen oder um geltendem Recht zu entsprechen. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[13]
Um zu entscheiden, welche Art von Marketing oder Marketingumfragen wir Ihnen anbieten werden.
Wenn Sie eine solche Verarbeitung nicht wünschen, kontaktieren Sie uns bitte, um uns dies mitzuteilen. Wir werden dann die Nutzung Ihrer Daten zu Marketingzwecken beenden. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Die Verarbeitung kann ein Profiling darstellen. Siehe Abschnitt 6 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Dienstleistungsspezifi-sche personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3).
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, zu ermitteln, welche Art von Marketing wir Ihnen anbieten sollten. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Dies geschieht unter Berücksichtigung der Tatsache, dass Marketing in der DSGVO als ein Beispiel für ein berechtigtes Interesse aufgeführt ist.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet, oder wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie an dieser Verarbeitung nicht interessiert sind.
[14]
Um Ihnen Marketingmaterialien, Angebote und Marketingumfragen über unsere anderen Produkte und Dienste zukommen zu lassen, die denen ähnlich sind, die Sie bereits verwendet haben und die Teil von Klarnas allgemeines Verbraucherangebot sind.
Wenn Sie kein Marketing von uns erhalten möchten, kontaktieren Sie uns bitte, um uns dies mitzuteilen. Wir werden dann die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zur Zusendung von Marketingmaterial beenden. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, Ihnen Marketingmitteilungen zu unseren Diensten und Angeboten zu senden. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um dieses Interesse zu verfolgen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht überwiegt, dass Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeitet werden. Dies geschieht unter Berücksichtigung der Tatsache, dass Marketing in der DSGVO als ein Beispiel für ein berechtigtes Interesse aufgeführt ist.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet, oder wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie an dieser Verarbeitung nicht interessiert sind.
[15]
Um Ihnen Direktmarketing und Marketingumfragen über Angebote, Produkte oder Dienstleistungen von Klarna und unseren Geschäften/Partnern zur Verfügung zu stellen.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf Ihrer Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 a) DSGVO).
Wenn Sie uns entweder mitteilen, dass Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen möchten, oder wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie an dieser Verarbeitung/Opt-out kein Interesse haben.
[16]
Um Klarna vor rechtlichen Ansprüchen zu schützen und die rechtlichen Interessen von Klarna zu wahren.
Alle in Abschnitt 3 genannten Arten.
Im Falle eines Rechtsstreits kann Klarna auch andere Arten von personenbezogenen Daten über Sie erheben, wenn wir diese zur Ausübung unserer Rechte benötigen.
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, uns vor Rechtsansprüchen schützen zu können. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um den Zweck der Verarbeitung zu erreichen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten werden, wenn dies zur Geltendmachung, Ausübung oder Verteidigung von Rechtsansprüchen erforderlich ist, gemäß Artikel 9(2)(f) DSGVO verarbeitet.
Diese Verarbeitung erfolgt über den gesamten Zeitraum hinweg, in dem Klarna die Informationen in seinen Systemen aufbewahren muss, zum Beispiel um den mit Ihnen abgeschlossenen Vertrag zu erfüllen oder um geltendem Recht zu entsprechen. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
4.2 Zwecke, für die Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden, wenn Sie eine der Zahlungsmethoden von Klarna nutzen, sich Klarna bei einem Händler anmelden oder sich beim Bezahlvorgang in Klarnas Checkout bei einem Händler für eine Zahlung per Debit- oder Kreditkarte entscheiden.
Zweck der Verarbeitung - was wir tun und warum.
Arten von personenbezogenen Daten, die für den Zweck verwendet werden, und woher sie stammen (die Quelle). Im Abschnitt 3 finden Sie weitere Informationen über die verschiedenen Arten von personenbezogenen Daten.
Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung gemäß der DSGVO.
Zu welchem Zeitpunkt der Zweck für die Nutzung der personenbezogenen Daten nicht mehr gegeben ist. Siehe Abschnitt 9 für weitere Informationen zum Zeitpunkt der Datenlöschung durch Klarna.
[17]
Um das Recht des Shops auf Bezahlung Ihres Einkaufs an Klarna zu übertragen („Factoring“).
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir (und der Shop) ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, Ihre ausstehenden Forderungen zu verkaufen bzw. zu kaufen. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um den Zweck der Verarbeitung zu erreichen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Zum Zeitpunkt des Kaufs.
[18]
Zur Weitergabe Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten an die in Abschnitt 7.2 beschriebenen Kategorien von Empfängern (Händler, Zahlungsdienstleister, Kassendienstleister, Kartennetzwerke und Finanzinstitute, der Betrugsprävention dienende Einrichtungen, Unternehmen, die Identitätsinformationen bereitstellen, Google und Billie).
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Je nach Empfänger (siehe Abschnitt 7.2) unterschiedlich.
Vorrangig während des Kaufs, aber auch über den gesamten Zeitraum hinweg, in dem Klarna die Daten in seinen Systemen aufbewahrt, d. h., bis die Daten gelöscht werden. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[19]
Wenn Sie bei einem Händler einkaufen, der Klarna als Zahlungsmethode anbietet oder Klarnas Checkout nutzt, legen wir die Reihenfolge fest, in der Ihnen verschiedene Zahlungsmethoden im Checkout-Vorgang des Händlers angeboten werden sollen.
Diese Verarbeitung stellt ein Profiling dar. Siehe Abschnitt 6 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Wenn Sie den Klarna Service namens „Shopping Service“, der in den Allgemeinen Geschäftsbedingungen des Services, die Sie
hier
finden, näher beschrieben ist, akzeptiert haben und nutzen, erfolgt die Verarbeitung der Daten auf der rechtlichen Grundlage der Erfüllung des Vertrags zwischen Ihnen und Klarna gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 (b) DSGVO.
Sollten Sie den „Shopping Service“-Vertrag nicht abgeschlossen haben, basiert die Verarbeitung stattdessen auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, die Reihenfolge zu prüfen, in der Ihnen verschiedene Zahlungsoptionen im Checkout-Vorgang des Händlers angeboten werden. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um den Zweck der Verarbeitung zu erreichen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Beim Anzeigen der Zahlungsarten im Checkout.
[20]
Um zu verhindern, dass die Aktivitäten von Klarna für Geldwäsche oder Terrorismusfinanzierung genutzt werden, indem Ihre Identität verifiziert wird und Transaktionen überwacht und überprüft werden. Klarna führt auch fortlaufende Risikobewertungen durch und erstellt Risikomodelle zur Bekämpfung von Geldwäsche und Terrorismusfinanzierung.
Diese Verarbeitung stellt ein Profiling und eine automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung dar. Weitere Informationen zum Profiling und zu automatisierten Entscheidungen finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen (Ihr Gerät)
Informationen aus externen Sanktionslisten und PEP-Listen. (Sanktionslisten und PEP-Listen sowie biometrische Informationen Ihres vorgelegten Personalausweises und Bildes).
Sensible personenbezogene Daten (Informationen über politische Meinungen, religiöse Überzeugungen und/oder Gesundheitsinformationen, die in den PEP-Listen enthalten sind, sowie biometrische Informationen Ihres vorgelegten Personalausweises und Bildes).
Dienstleistungsspezif-ische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna).
Zur Einhaltung von Gesetzen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 c) DSGVO), (Schwedisches
Gesetz (2017:630) über Maßnahmen gegen Geldwäsche und Terrorismusfinanzierung
).
Bei sensiblen personenbezogenen Daten ist die Grundlage, dass die Verarbeitung aus Gründen des öffentlichen Interesses erforderlich ist (Art. 9 Abs. 2 g) DSGVO).
Sobald der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet. Siehe Abschnitt 9 für weitere Informationen über unsere Verpflichtungen und unser Recht, Informationen in Übereinstimmung mit den gesetzlichen Vorschriften aufzubewahren.
[21]
Um eine Prüfung zur Betrugsprävention durchzuführen, bevor ein Kauf akzeptiert wird.
Diese Verarbeitung stellt ein Profiling und eine automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung dar. Wir nutzen die automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung zu diesem Zweck, um feststellen zu können, ob Sie ein Betrugsrisiko darstellen. Weitere Informationen zum Profiling und zu automatisierten Entscheidungen finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Siehe auch Abschnitt 7.2.3. über unsere Nutzung von der Betrugsprävention dienenden Einrichtungen und Unternehmen, an die Ihre Daten weitergegeben werden können, und unsere Rechtsgrundlage für diese Weitergabe. Wenn wir potenziell betrügerische Transaktionen feststellen, werden wir dies auch unseren der Betrugsprävention dienenden Büros laut Abschnitt 7.2.3 melden.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen (Ihr Gerät)
Sensible personenbezogene Daten (Biometrische Informationen aus Ihrem vorgelegten Personalausweis und Bild)
Darüber hinaus erhält Klarna von der Betrugsprävention dienenden Einrichtungen, Kassendienstleistern und Zahlungsdienstleistern Informationen darüber, ob Ihre Informationen auf einen Betrugsversuch hindeuten
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Sensible personenbezogene Daten werden auf der Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung verarbeitet )Art. 9 Abs. 2 a) DSGVO).
Bei der Durchführung der Betrugsprüfung.
[22]
Für die Buchhaltung und das Rechnungswesen im Einklang mit den anwendbaren Rechnungslegungsvorschriften sowie zur Aufbewahrung von Informationen im Einklang mit den anwendbaren Gesetzen.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Zur Einhaltung von Gesetzen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 c) DSGVO), (
Schwedisches Rechnungslegungsgesetz (1999:1078
).
Während der Rechnungslegungsperiode und 7 Jahre nach dem Ende des Jahres, in dem die Daten erfasst wurden. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[23]
Durchführung von Berechnungen in Übereinstimmung mit den Kapitaladäquanzvorschriften.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna).
Zur Einhaltung von Gesetzen (Artikel 6 Abs. 1 c) DSGVO), (
Kapitaladäquanzverordnung 575/2013
und
Kapitaladäquanzrichtlinie 2013/36
)
.
Sieben Jahre nach dem Ende des Jahres, in dem die Daten erfasst wurden. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
4.3 Zwecke, für die Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden, wenn Sie eine der Zahlungsarten von Klarna nutzen, bei denen Ihnen ein Kredit gewährt wird, oder wenn Sie die Klarna-Card, Instore bezahlen, mit Klarna über digitale Geldbörsen bezahlen oder die Einmalkarte des Shopping Service verwenden.
Bei den folgenden Dienstleistungen wird Ihnen ein Kredit gewährt: „Pay Later“ (Rechnung), „Pay Now“ (Zahlung per Lastschrift), „Financing“ (Ratenkauf), sowie die Klarna-Card und die Einmalkarte des Shopping Service (die beide in der mobilen Klarna App oder der Browsererweiterung angeboten werden).
Zweck der Verarbeitung - was wir tun und warum.
Arten von personenbezogenen Daten, die für den Zweck verwendet werden, und woher sie stammen (Quelle). Im Abschnitt 3 finden Sie weitere Informationen über die verschiedenen Arten von personenbezogenen Daten.
Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung gemäß der DSGVO.
Zu welchem Zeitpunkt der Zweck für die Nutzung der personenbezogenen Daten nicht mehr gegeben ist. Siehe Abschnitt 9 für weitere Informationen zum Zeitpunkt der Datenlöschung durch Klarna.
[24]
Zur Durchführung einer Bonitätsprüfung
bevor ein Kredit gewährt wird.
Dies stellt ein Profiling dar und die
Entscheidung zur Freigabe oder Ablehnung des
Kredits stellt eine „automatisierte
Entscheidung“ dar. Siehe Abschnitt 6 für mehr
Informationen zum Profiling und zu automatisierten Entscheidungen.
Siehe auch Abschnitt 7.3.1 über unsere Nutzung von Kreditauskunfteien, an die Ihre Daten weitergegeben werden können, und unsere Rechtsgrundlage für diese Weitergabe.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Zum Abschluss und zur Durchführung des Kreditvertrags (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Sobald die Bonitätsprüfung abgeschlossen ist.
[25]
Zur Feststellung, welches der effizienteste Weg für die Kontaktaufnahme mit Ihnen in Bezug auf Ihre ausstehenden Forderungen ist. Dies hat keinen Einfluss auf Mitteilungen, die gemäß Verbraucherkreditgesetzen gesetzlich vorgeschrieben sind.
Bei dieser Verarbeitung handelt es sich um Profiling. Weitere Informationen über Profiling finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren und Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir (und Sie) ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, sicherzustellen, dass in effizienter Weise mit Ihnen in Bezug auf Ihre ausstehenden Forderungen Kontakt aufgenommen wird. Wir gewährleisten, dass die Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht für diesen Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Solange wie Sie noch ausstehende Forderungen bei Klarna haben.
[26]
Zum Weitergabe Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten an die in Abschnitt 7.3 beschriebenen Arten von Empfängern (Kreditauskunfteien, Inkassounternehmen und sonstige Käufer offener Forderungen sowie VISA, Forderungserwerber und Anbieter digitaler Geldbörsen).
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren und Dienstleistungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Je nach Empfänger (siehe Abschnitt 7.2) unterschiedlich.
Vorrangig während des Kaufs, aber auch über den gesamten Zeitraum hinweg, in dem Klarna die Daten in seinen Systemen aufbewahrt, also bis zu ihrer Löschung. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[27]
Um das Recht von Klarna auf Zahlung für Ihren Kauf auf einen neuen Forderungsinhaber zu übertragen.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, ausstehende Kredite im Rahmen der Ausübung unserer Geschäftstätigkeit zu verkaufen. Wir gewährleisten, dass die Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht für diesen Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Die Verarbeitung kann erfolgen, solange die Forderung unbezahlt ist (Sie werden benachrichtigt, wenn die Forderung übertragen wird).
[28]
Um Inkassodienstleistungen zu erbringen, d. h. überfällige Forderungen einzuziehen und zu verkaufen.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse an der Einziehung und dem Verkauf von Forderungen haben. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung erforderlich ist, um den Zweck der Verarbeitung zu erreichen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Sobald die Forderung beglichen ist.
[29]
Um zu verhindern, dass die Aktivitäten von Klarna für Geldwäsche oder Terrorismusfinanzierung genutzt werden, wird Ihre Identität verifiziert und es werden Transaktionen überwacht und überprüft, Risikobewertungen durchgeführt und Risikomodelle erstellt.
Diese Verarbeitung stellt ein Profiling dar, und wenn entschieden wird, dass Sie ein Geldwäscherisiko darstellen, stellt dies eine automatisierte Entscheidung dar. Weitere Informationen zum Profiling und zu automatisierten Entscheidungen finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Informationen aus externen Sanktionslisten und PEP-Listen. (Sanktionslisten und PEP-Listen)
Sensible personenbezogene Daten (Informationen über politische Meinungen, religiöse Überzeugungen und/oder Gesundheitsinformationen, die in den PEP-Listen enthalten sind sowie biometrische Informationen Ihres vorgelegten Personalausweises und Bildes).
Zur Einhaltung von Gesetzen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 c) DSGVO), (
Schwedisches Gesetz (2017:630) über Maßnahmen gegen Geldwäsche und Terrorismusfinanzierung)
.
In Bezug auf sensible personenbezogene Daten ist die Bedingung, dass die Verarbeitung im öffentlichen Interesse erforderlich ist (Art. 9 Abs. 2 g) DSGVO).
Bis zu fünf Jahre nach Beendigung des Vertrags oder nach Beendigung der Kundenbeziehung (bis zu zehn Jahre, wenn Strafverfolgungs-behörden dies verlangen). Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[30]
Für die Archivierung und Buchhaltung im Einklang mit den anwendbaren Rechnungslegungsvorschriften.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleist-ungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Dienstleistungsspezifi-sche personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna).
Zur Einhaltung von Gesetzen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 c) DSGVO), (
Schwedisches Rechnungslegungsgesetz (1999:1078
).
Sieben Jahre nach dem Ende des Jahres, in dem die Daten erfasst wurden. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
4.4 Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten (sowie personenbezogener Daten von Dritten), um Ihnen Zugang zu Klarna Kontoservices (Klarna Rechnungsabschluss, Spar- und Zahlungskonten) zu verschaffen.
Zweck der Verarbeitung - was wir tun und warum.
Arten von personenbezogenen Daten, die für den Zweck verwendet werden, und woher sie stammen (Quelle). Im Abschnitt 3 finden Sie weitere Informationen über die verschiedenen Arten von personenbezogenen Daten.
Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung gemäß der DSGVO.
Zu welchem Zeitpunkt der Zweck für die Nutzung der personenbezogenen Daten nicht mehr gegeben ist. Siehe Abschnitt 9 für weitere Informationen zum Zeitpunkt der Datenlöschung durch Klarna.
[31]
In Ihrem Markt nicht anwendbar.
[32]
Zur Bereitstellung der Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna).
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Bei Daten über Dritte (wie z. B. Zahlungsempfänger oder Zahlender) basiert die Verarbeitung auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir und Sie (sowie der Zahlungsempfänger/Zahlender) zur Durchführung der betreffenden Transaktionen ein berechtigtes Interesse an der Verarbeitung dieser Daten haben. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[33]
Zur Weitergabe Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten an die in Abschnitt 7.4 beschriebenen Kategorien von Empfängern (Kreditinstitute und andere Finanzinstitute).
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna).
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO). Die Allgemeinen Geschäftsbedingungen des Dienstes sind
hier
verfügbar.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[34]
Um zu verhindern, dass die Aktivitäten von Klarna für Geldwäsche oder Terrorismusfinanzierung genutzt werden, wird Ihre Identität verifiziert und es werden Transaktionen überwacht und überprüft, Risikobewertungen durchgeführt und Risikomodelle erstellt.
Diese Verarbeitung stellt ein Profiling dar, und wenn entschieden wird, dass Sie ein Geldwäscherisiko darstellen, stellt dies eine automatisierte Entscheidung dar. Weitere Informationen zum Profiling und zu automatisierten Entscheidungen finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna erzeugt werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Informationen aus externen Sanktionslisten und PEP-Listen. (Sanktionslisten und PEP-Listen)
Sensible personenbezogene Daten (Informationen über politische Meinungen, religiöse Überzeugungen und/oder Gesundheitsinformationen, die in den PEP-Listen enthalten sind sowie biometrische Informationen Ihres vorgelegten Personalausweises und Bildes).
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna).
Zur Einhaltung von Gesetzen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 c) DSGVO), (Schwedisches
Gesetz (2017:630) über Maßnahmen gegen Geldwäsche und Terrorismusfinanzierung
).
In Bezug auf sensible personenbezogene Daten ist die Bedingung, dass die Verarbeitung im öffentlichen Interesse erforderlich ist (Art. 9 Abs. 2 g) DSGVO).
Bis zu fünf Jahre nach Beendigung des Vertrags oder nach Beendigung der Kundenbeziehung (bis zu zehn Jahre, wenn Strafverfolgungsbehörden dies verlangen). Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[35]
Für die Archivierung und Buchhaltung im Einklang mit dem Buchführungsgesetz.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Zur Einhaltung von Gesetzen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 c) DSGVO), (
Schwedisches Rechnungslegungsgesetz (1999:1078
).
Sieben Jahre nach dem Ende des Jahres, in dem die Informationen erstmals erfasst wurden. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
Sollte ein Produkt oder Service von unserer deutschen Niederlassung direkt angeboten werden: 10 Jahre nach dem Ende des Jahres, in dem die Daten erfasst wurden.
[36]
Durchführung von Berechnungen in Übereinstimmung mit den Kapitaladäquanzvorschriften.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna und Kreditauskunfteien)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die Spar- und Zahlungskonten von Klarna).
Einhaltung von Gesetzen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 c) DSGVO), (
Kapitaladäquanzverordnung 575/2013
und
Kapitaladäquanzrichtlinie 2013/36)
.
Sieben Jahre nach dem Ende des Jahres, in dem die Daten erfasst wurden. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[37]
In Ihrem Markt nicht anwendbar.
4.5 Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten bei Ihrer Nutzung von Klarnas Shopping Service.
Wenn Sie den Klarna Shopping Service nutzen, verarbeitet Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten für die in der folgenden Tabelle beschriebenen Zwecke. Die Bedingungen für den Shopping Service und die Beschreibung der Funktionen, die der Shopping Service umfasst, finden Sie
hier
.
Zweck der Verarbeitung - was wir tun und warum.
Arten von personenbezogenen Daten, die für den Zweck verwendet werden, und woher sie stammen (Quelle). Im Abschnitt 3 finden Sie weitere Informationen über die verschiedenen Arten von personenbezogenen Daten.
Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung gemäß der DSGVO.
Zu welchem Zeitpunkt der Zweck für die Nutzung der personenbezogenen Daten nicht mehr gegeben ist. Siehe Abschnitt 9 für weitere Informationen zum Zeitpunkt der Datenlöschung durch Klarna.
[38]
Zur Bereitstellung von Klarnas Shopping Service und der dazugehörigen Funktionen.
Der Service umfasst die Erstellung von Profilen zur Personalisierung des Inhalts in der mobilen Klarna App und im Klarna Checkout.
Sämtliche in Abschnitt 3 genannten Arten;
Namen und Anschriften, die Sie als Lieferadressen Ihrem Nutzerkonto hinzufügen.
Dienstleistungsspezif-ische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3).
Sensible personenbezogene Daten.
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag (Allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen des Shopping Services) mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Wenn der Shopping Service auch Daten verarbeitet, die sensible personenbezogene Daten darstellen (wenn Sie diese Daten hochgeladen haben, z. B. durch Quittungen für bestimmte Einkäufe/Mitgliedschaften, durch Produkt- & Shop-Bewertungen oder wenn Sie uns anderweitig Zugang zu diesen Daten gewährt haben), erfolgt unsere Verarbeitung auf der Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung (Art. 9 Abs. 2 a) DSGVO).
Siehe Abschnitt 3 für weitere Informationen über diese Art von personenbezogenen Daten.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet oder wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen.
[39]
Ihnen steht frei, Ihren Standort und Ihre Geolokalisierungsinformationen mit uns zu teilen oder nicht. Wir verwenden diese Informationen, um Händler und Angebote in Ihrer Nähe zu finden, um sie in der Klarna App oder auf Klarna.com zu zeigen.
Sie können die Standortfreigabe und Geolokalisierungsinformationen- Freigabe auf Ihrem Gerät jederzeit deaktivieren..
Von Ihnen:
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3, Standort und Geolokalisierungsinformationen).
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag (Allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen des Shopping Services) mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[40]
Um Ihnen über die mobile Anwendung von Klarna einen Browser zur Verfügung zu stellen, mit dem Sie z. B. die Websites von Händlern besuchen können. Klarna sammelt Informationen darüber, wie Sie den Browser verwenden, um die Inhalte der mobilen Klarna App anzupassen.
Von Ihnen:
Sensible personenbezogene Daten.
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die mobile Klarna App).
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Klarna oder Händler, bei dem Sie einkaufen)
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag (Allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen des Shopping Services) mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Wenn der Dienst Informationen verarbeitet, die sensible personenbezogene Daten darstellen (z. B. von Seiten, die Sie besuchen), erfolgt diese Verarbeitung auf der Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung (Art. 9 Abs. 2 a) DSGVO). Diese sensiblen Informationen werden jedoch ausschließlich dazu verwendet, Ihnen die aktuelle Website im Browser anzuzeigen.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[41]
Zur Durchführung von Bewertungen zur Betrugsprävention bei der Nutzung des Klarna Shopping Service.
Bei dieser Verarbeitung handelt es sich um Profiling und automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung. Wir verwenden automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung zu diesem Zweck zur Feststellung, ob bei Ihnen ein Betrugsrisiko besteht. Siehe Abschnitt 6 für weitere Informationen über Profiling und automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung.
Siehe auch Abschnitt 7.5.6 zu unserer Nutzung von Agenturen zur Betrugsprävention, an die Ihre Informationen weitergegeben werden können, und unsere Rechtsgrundlage für diese Weitergabe.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna generiert werden. (Klarna)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna generiert werden. (Klarna)
Ihre Kontakte zu den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen. (Der Händler)
Geräteinformationen
Zusätzlich zu den vorgenannten Informationen erhält Klarna Informationen von Agenturen zur Betrugsprävention darüber, ob Ihre Informationen auf einen Betrugsversuch hindeuten.
Die Verarbeitung ist für Klarna zur Erfüllung eines Vertrages (Geschäftsbedingungen des Shopping Services)  mit Ihnen erforderlich (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b)).
Bei Durchführung der bewertung zum Betrug.
[42]
Zur Weitergabe Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten an die in Abschnitt 7.5 beschriebenen Kategorien von Empfängern (Affiliate-Netzwerke, Google, Partner im Rahmen des Finanzielle Analysen -Dienstes und des Angebots- und Vorteilsprogramms sowie Logistik- und Transportunternehmen, Werbedienste, Apps oder Dienste eines Drittanbieters (für SIWK), Agenturen zur Betrugsprävention und Unternehmen, die Identitätsprüfungen vornehmen und Reseller-Plattformen).
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten (wenn Sie diese hochgeladen oder uns anderweitig Zugang zu diesen Daten gewährt haben).
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die mobile Anwendung von Klarna).
Je nach Empfänger (siehe Abschnitt 7.5) unterschiedlich.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[43]
Um Ihnen relevante Klarna Werbung durch unsere
Drittwerbedienste auf Nicht-Klarna Websites und Nicht-Klarna Werbung über digitale Werbeplattformen
in der Klarna App und auf den Marleting-Kanälen von Klarna anzuzeigen
Wir bewerten auch die Relevanz derartiger Werbung. Dies basiert auf der Grundlage Ihres Nutzerverhaltens und Ihres Klarna Profils.
Derartige relevante Werbung können Sie sehen, wenn Sie sich auf anderen Webseiten und Apps befinden, die Ihnen über diese
Drittwerbedienste oder in der Klarna App über die digitalen Werbeplattformen
bereitgestellt werden. Siehe bitte Abschnitt 7.5.5. bezüglich Informationen über die Weitergabe der Daten.
Bei dieser Verarbeitung kann es sich um Profiling handeln mit dem Ziel, das Marketing basierend darauf, wofür Sie sich unserer Meinung nach interessieren könnten, zu personalisieren. Mehr zum Thema Profiling können Sie Abschnitt 6 nachlesen.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienstleistungen von Klarna. (Klarna)
Geräteinformationen. (Klarna)
Dies beruht  auf einer von Ihnen erteilten Einwilligung (laut Art. 6 Abs. (1) (a) DSGVO).
Entweder, wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen wollen oder wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie an dieser Verarbeitung nicht interessiert sind.
Wir stellen diese Verarbeitung auch ein, wenn und sobald Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie nicht länger Kunde von Klarna sein möchten.
[44]
Zur Feststellung Ihrer Berechtigung zum Erhalt von Cashback, wenn Sie Einkäufe über ein Cashback-Angebot in der Klarna App tätigen, und zur Berechnung des fälligen Cashback-Betrags.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Der Händler)
Geräteinformationen. (Klarna)
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über Klarna Cashback).
Die Verarbeitung ist für Klarna zur Erfüllung eines Vertrages (Geschäftsbedingungen des Klarna Cashback- Programms) mit Ihnen erforderlich (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[45]
Wenn Sie sich dafür entscheiden, sich bei Klarna (über „SIWK“) bei einer App oder einem Dienst eines Drittanbieters anzumelden, wird Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an das Geschäft oder den Online-Service weitergeben.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten (Klarna).
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen (Klarna).
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag (Allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen für den Einkaufsservice) mit Ihnen durchführen kann (Artikel 6 Absatz 1 Buchstabe b DSGVO).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet
Wir stellen diese Verarbeitung auch ein, wenn und sobald Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie nicht länger Kunde von Klarna sein möchten.
[46]
Zur automatischen Verwaltung von Streitfällen beim Kauf oder von Reklamationen über Waren.
Bei dieser Verarbeitung handelt es sich um eine automatisierte Entscheidung. Wir verwenden automatisierte Entscheidungen für diesen Zweck, um zeitnahe und einheitliche Ergebnisse bei Streitfällen oder Reklamationen sicherzustellen. Weitere Informationen über automatisierte Entscheidungen finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundenservice.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna generiert werden. (Klarna)
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundenservice von Klarna. (Klarna)
Wenn Sie den Klarna-Dienst namens „Shopping Service“ akzeptiert und nutzen, wie in den Allgemeinen Geschäftsbedingungen des Dienstes näher beschrieben, die Sie
hier
, finden, dann ist die Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung die Erfüllung des Vertrags (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Alternativ, wenn Sie die Vereinbarung zum „Klarna Shopping Service“ nicht abgeschlossen haben oder den strittigen Kauf nicht getätigt haben, basiert die Verarbeitung auf Ihrer Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 a) DSGVO).
Wenn die Verwaltung des Streitfalles abgeschlossen ist, oder alternativ, wenn die Verarbeitung auf Einwilligung basiert, wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen möchten.
[47]
Um Ihnen relevante Inhalte und Produktempfehlungen zu präsentieren, wenn Sie unsere Funktionen Product Expert und Shopping-Assistent nutzen. Diese Assistenten stützen ihre Empfehlungen auf uns über Sie vorliegende Informationen sowie auf die von Ihnen zur Verfügung gestellten Präferenzen oder Anfragen.
Bei dieser Verarbeitung handelt es sich um Profiling. Weitere Informationen zum Profiling finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (weitere Informationen über die mobile Klarna Anwendung finden Sie in Abschnitt 3).
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen. (Klarna und Händler)
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. (Klarna)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna. (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna generiert werden. (Klarna)
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Die Verarbeitung ist für Klarna notwendig, um einen Vertrag (Allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen für den Einkaufsservice) mit Ihnen zu erfüllen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[48]
Zur Bereitstellung von Feedback oder neuen Ideen für unseren Feedback-Assistenten.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (weitere Informationen über die mobile Klarna Anwendung finden Sie in Abschnitt 3).
Die Verarbeitung beruht auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art.6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO).
Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, die Verarbeitung der personenbezogenen Daten durchführen zu können, die Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Zwecks erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Wenn das Feedback zur Verfügung gestellt und verwaltet wurde.
4.6 Zusätzliche Dienste, auf die Sie beispielsweise über die Klarna-Mobile-App, über Klarnas Browser Extension oder im Checkout eines Shops zugreifen können.
Zweck der Verarbeitung - was wir tun und warum.
Arten von personenbezogenen Daten, die für den Zweck verwendet werden, und woher sie stammen (Quelle). Im Abschnitt 3 finden Sie weitere Informationen über die verschiedenen Arten von personenbezogenen Daten.
Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung gemäß der DSGVO.
Zu welchem Zeitpunkt der Zweck für die Nutzung der personenbezogenen Daten nicht mehr gegeben ist. Siehe Abschnitt 9 für weitere Informationen zum Zeitpunkt der Datenlöschung durch Klarna.
[49]
Wenn Sie Ihr E-Mail-Konto mit dem Auto-Track von Klarna verbunden haben, verbindet sich Klarna regelmäßig mit Ihrem(n) E-Mail-Konto(s), um Informationen über Ihre Einkäufe zu erhalten.
Sie können diesen Service jederzeit kündigen. Ab dem Zeitpunkt der Kündigung hat Klarna keinen Zugriff mehr auf Ihr E-Mail-Konto.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Sensible personenbezogene Daten. (Der Webmail-Anbieter)
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen zu Auto-Track). (Der Webmail-Anbieter)
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag (Allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen des Shopping Services) mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Wenn der Dienst sensible personenbezogene Daten (aus Ihren Transaktionen) verarbeitet, erfolgt diese Verarbeitung auf der Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung (Art. 9 Abs. 2 a) DSGVO). Nähere Informationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 3.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet oder wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen.
[50]
Wenn Sie sich dafür entschieden haben, Ihre Bankkonten mit dem Finanzielle Analysen-Service zu verbinden, wird Klarna Ihnen in Form von Angeboten, die auf Ihre speziellen Bedürfnisse zugeschnitten sind, Tools zur Kontrolle Ihrer Finanzen anzeigen und zur Verfügung stellen.
Diese Verarbeitung stellt ein Profiling dar, das darauf abzielt, basierend auf einer Feststellung Ihrer potenziellen Interessen den Inhalt des Diensts entsprechend anzupassen. Weitere Informationen zum Thema Profiling finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Wenn Sie sich dafür entscheiden, Angebote und Vorteile in Anspruch zu nehmen, die Klarna im Rahmen dieses Dienstes anbietet, werden wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an den Partner weitergeben, der diese bereitstellt (siehe Abschnitt 7.5.3).
Aus anderen Quellen:
Sensible personenbezogene Daten. (Ihr verbundenes Konto)
Dienstleistungsspezif-ische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 für Informationen zuFinanzielle Analysen). (Ihr verbundenes Konto)
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag (Allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen für den Account Information Service) mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Wenn der Dienst sensible personenbezogene Daten (aus Ihren Transaktionen) verarbeitet, erfolgt die Verarbeitung auf der Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung (Art. 9 Abs. 2 a) DSGVO). Weitere Informationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 3.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet oder wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen.
[51]
Wenn Sie unsere Browsererweiterung nutzen, verarbeitet Klarna Ihre Daten, um den Dienst bereitzustellen; dies schließt die Verarbeitung von Informationen darüber ein, welche Websites/Webdomains Sie besuchen:
Klarna verarbeitet Informationen über die von Ihnen besuchten E-Commerce-Websites/Webdomains, um Deals zu identifizieren, und Ihnen personalisierte Angebote in der Klarna Erweiterung und der mobilen App zur Verfügung zu stellen. Diese Verarbeitung erfolgt auch, damit Sie auf Websites, auf denen dieser Dienst aktiviert ist, One-time Cards direkt in Ihrem Browser erstellen können.
Information über besuchte Non- E-Commerce-Websites/Webdomains werden nicht von Klarna gespeichert.
Um mehr darüber erfahren, wie Ihre personenbezogenen Daten in der Browsererweiterung verarbeitet werden, besuchen Sie unsere FAQ.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Ihre Kontakte mit den Händlern, bei denen Sie einkaufen oder die Sie besuchen.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten.
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe bitte  Abschnitt 3 für Informationen über die  mobile Klarna App and Browsererweiterung).
Aus anderen Quellen:
Geräteinformationen. (Ihr Gerät)
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna.  (Klarna)
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna generiert werden.  (Klarna)
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag (allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen des  Klarna Shopping Service) mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Artikel 6 Abs.1 b DGSVO).
Wenn der Dienst Informationen verarbeitet, bei denen es sich um sensible personenbezogene Daten handelt (d.h. Daten über die von Ihnen besuchten Websites/Webdomains), erfolgt unsere Verarbeitung auf der Grundlage Ihrer ausdrücklichen Einwilligung   (Artikel 9 Abs. 2 a DSGVO). Weitere Informationen über diese Art von personenbezogenen Daten finden Sie in Abschnitt 3.
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet oder wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen..
[52]
Wenn Sie ein Membership- oder Kundenkartekonto eines Drittanbieters zu der Funktion Kundenkarten von Klarna hinzugefügt haben, verarbeitet Klarna Ihre Daten zur Bereitstellung des Dienstes.
Dazu gehört, dass Klarna regelmäßig eine Verbindung zu Ihrem Kartenkonto des Drittanbieters herstellt zur Importierung von Membershippunkten, Leveln und Guthabensverläufen.
Sie können diesen Dienst jederzeit kündigen und damit Klarna den Zugang zu Ihrem Membership- oder Treuekartenkonto entziehen.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Dienstspezifische personenbezogene Daten (siehe Abschnitt 3 zu Informationen über die Funktion Kundenkarten). (Ihr verbundenes Membership- oder Treuekartenkonto eines Drittanbieters)
Die Verarbeitung ist für Klarna zur Erfüllung eines Vertrages (Geschäftsbedingungen des Shopping Services)  mit Ihnen erforderlich (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b)).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[53]
Wenn Sie sich entschieden haben, den "Accepting All Cookies"-Dienst von Klarna zu nutzen, wird Klarna Ihre Daten verarbeiten, um den Dienst bereitzustellen. Sie können diesen Dienst jederzeit beenden.
Von Ihnen:
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Klarna-Dienste (siehe Abschnitt 3 oben für weitere Informationen).
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag (Allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen für den Shopping-Dienst) mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Artikel 6(1)(b) DSGVO).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[54]
Wenn Sie sich entschieden haben, den Open Banking-Dienst von Klarna zu nutzen, wird Klarna Ihre Daten verarbeiten, um den Dienst bereitzustellen. Die Bedingungen für den Open Banking-Dienst und die Beschreibung der enthaltenen Funktionen finden Sie
hier
.
Von Ihnen:
Zahlungsinformationen.
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (Open Banking-Dienst).
Aus anderen Quellen:
Geräteinformationen (Ihr Gerät).
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Klarna-Dienste (Klarna).
Technische Informationen, die durch Ihre Nutzung der Klarna-Dienste erzeugt werden (Klarna).
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation (Ihre Drittbank).
Dienstleistungsspezifische personenbezogene Daten (Open Banking-Dienst) (Ihre Drittbank).
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag (Allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen für den Open Banking-Dienst) mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Artikel 6(1)(b) DSGVO).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
4.7 Angebote und Einladungen zu Veranstaltungen, die auf Social Media veröffentlicht werden, sowie jegliche Kontaktaufnahme mit uns über Social Media
Zweck der Verarbeitung - was wir tun und warum.
Arten von personenbezogenen Daten, die für den Zweck verwendet werden, und woher sie stammen (Quelle). Im Abschnitt 3 finden Sie weitere Informationen über die verschiedenen Arten von personenbezogenen Daten.
Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung gemäß der DSGVO.
Zu welchem Zeitpunkt der Zweck für die Nutzung der personenbezogenen Daten nicht mehr gegeben ist. Siehe Abschnitt 9 für weitere Informationen zum Zeitpunkt der Datenlöschung durch Klarna.
[55]
Wenn Sie sich für eine Veranstaltung anmelden, die auf Social Media veröffentlicht wird, verarbeiten wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, um den angeforderten Service bereitzustellen.
Sie können diese jederzeit abbestellen, indem Sie sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Anmeldungen zu Veranstaltungen in Social Media.
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag mit Ihnen (in Bezug auf Ihre Teilnahme an der Veranstaltung) erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b DSGVO).
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
Sobald die Veranstaltung stattgefunden hat.
4.8 Verarbeitung von Daten durch Klarna bei Kontakt mit dem Kundendienst.
Zweck der Verarbeitung - was wir tun und warum.
Arten von personenbezogenen Daten, die für den Zweck verwendet werden, und woher sie stammen (Quelle). Im Abschnitt 3 finden Sie weitere Informationen über die verschiedenen Arten von personenbezogenen Daten.
Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung gemäß der DSGVO.
Zu welchem Zeitpunkt der Zweck für die Nutzung der personenbezogenen Daten nicht mehr gegeben ist. Siehe Abschnitt 9 für weitere Informationen zum Zeitpunkt der Datenlöschung durch Klarna:
[56]
Zur Bearbeitung sämtlicher Angelegenheiten, die an den Kundendienst von Klarna herangetragen werden.
Dies umfasst die Aufbewahrung verschiedener Formen von schriftlichen Gesprächen zur Dokumentation von Kundenproblemen sowie zu Sicherheitszwecken und zur Betrugsbekämpfung.
Von Ihnen:
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundendienst von Klarna.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundendienst von Klarna. (Klarna)
Erfüllung von Verträgen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Je nach den gesetzlichen Verjährungsvorschriften bis zu zehn Jahre. Weitere Informationen zu unseren gesetzlichen Aufbewahrungspflichten und -rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 9.
[57]
Um Ihnen bei der Lösung von Problemen im Zusammenhang mit Ihren Einkäufen zu helfen, wenn Sie unseren Kundenservice-Assistenten nutzen.
Bei dieser Verarbeitung handelt es sich um Profiling. Weitere Informationen zum Profiling finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Lage.
Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen.
Zahlungsinformationen.
Informationen über Ihre Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna.
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundenservice. (Klarna)
Die Verarbeitung ist erforderlich, damit Klarna einen Vertrag (allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen des Einkaufsdienstes) mit Ihnen erfüllen kann (Art. 6 Abs.1 b) DGSVO).
Wenn der Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna endet.
[58]
Qualitäts- und Serviceverbesserung (zur Gewährleistung eines zufriedenstellenden Kundendienstes). Wir können Telefongespräche sowie Bildschirmfreigabe-Sitzungen zwischen Ihnen und unseren Mitarbeitern zu Qualitätszwecken aufzeichnen, um die Qualität unserer Produkte und Dienstleistungen zu verbessern.
Von Ihnen:
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundendienst von Klarna.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundendienst von Klarna. (Klarna)
Auf Grundlage Ihrer Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 (a) DSGVO).
Wir verarbeiten die Aufzeichnungen von Telefongesprächen für eine Dauer bis zu 90 Tagen und von Bildschirmfreigabe-Sitzungen für eine Dauer bis zu 30 Tagen zu Qualitätssicherungszwecken.
[59]
Um zu dokumentieren, was gesagt wurde, wenn Sie mit unserem Kundendienst sprechen (damit sichergestellt wird, dass wir alles, was vereinbart oder besprochen wurde, dokumentieren). Wir nutzen aufgezeichnete Telefongespräche zwischen Ihnen und unseren Angestellten sowie manuelle oder automatisierte Anmerkungen, um zu dokumentieren, was gesagt wurde.
Von Ihnen:
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundendienst von Klarna.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundendienst von Klarna. (Klarna)
Die Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, die Kommunikationen mit Klarnas Kundendienst zu dokumentieren. Wir stellen sicher, dass die Verarbeitung zur Erreichung dieses Zwecks erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht für diesen Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Als Kunde haben Sie auch ein Interesse daran, sicherzustellen, dass unparteiische Hilfsmittel zur Verfügung stehen, um das Besprochene zu dokumentieren.
Sie können sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, um weitere Informationen dazu zu erhalten, wie diese Abwägung vorgenommen wurde oder wenn Sie gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einlegen möchten. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12.
90 Tage ab dem Tag, an dem die Aufzeichnung gemacht wurde.
[60]
Wenn Sie über Social Media wie Facebook, Instagram oder Twitter mit uns in Kontakt treten, werden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auch von diesen Unternehmen in Übereinstimmung mit deren Datenschutzerklärungen erhoben und verarbeitet.
Dies gilt ebenso für die Antwort, die Sie von uns erhalten. Klarna verarbeitet diese Informationen, um Ihre Fragen zu beantworten.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten.
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundendienst von Klarna.
Aus anderen Quellen:
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundendienst von Klarna. (Klarna)
Erfüllung von Verträgen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Sobald wir Ihre Frage beantwortet haben.
[61]
Zur Bearbeitung freiwilliger Sperren für die Nutzung der Dienste von Klarna, d.h. wenn Sie uns kontaktieren und uns bitten, Sie von der Nutzung der Dienste auszuschließen. Ihre freiwillige Sperre kann von Ihnen jederzeit aufgehoben werden, indem Sie uns wieder kontaktieren.
Von Ihnen:
Kontakt und Identifikationsdaten.
Informationen über Ihre Kontakte mit dem Kundenservice von Klarna.
Z Auf der Grundlage Ihrer Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1  a)).
Wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass Sie nicht mehr für die Dienste gesperrt werden wollen oder Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen. Wir stellen diese Verarbeitung auch dann ein, wenn Sie uns mitteilen, dass sie nicht länger zu den Kunden von Klarna gehören möchten.
5. Wie können Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen?
Wenn Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auf der Grundlage Ihrer Einwilligung verwendet, können Sie Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit widerrufen. Sie können dies via E-Mail an
datenschutz@klarna.at
oder über die Kontaktinformationen in Abschnitt 12 tun.
Sie können auch hochgeladene Daten aus der mobilen Klarna App löschen oder den Dienst kündigen, in dem personenbezogene Daten verarbeitet werden. Wir werden die Daten dann löschen. Wenn Sie Ihre Einwilligung widerrufen oder die hochgeladenen Daten löschen, können Sie den Dienst, sollte die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten durch Klarna im Rahmen des Dienstes auf der Grundlage Ihrer Einwilligung erfolgen, möglicherweise nicht nutzen.
Zuletzt: Wie in Abschnitt 2 oben beschrieben, haben Sie auch das Recht, der Verarbeitung bestimmter personenbezogenen Daten zu widersprechen (Sie können z.B. das Marketing abstellen). Sie haben auch das Recht, bestimmte personenbezogene Daten löschen zu lassen, wie dies auch in Abschnitt 2 angegeben wird.
6. Klarnas Verwendung von Profiling und automatisierte Entscheidungen, die Sie maßgeblich betreffen.
6.1 Profiling durch Klarna hinsichtlich Ihnen als Kunde.
„Profiling“ ist eine automatisierte Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten zur Bewertung bestimmter Aspekte Ihrer Person, etwa durch die Analyse oder Vorhersage Ihrer persönlichen Präferenzen, z. B. Kaufinteressen. Gleichzeitig vergleichen wir Ihre Daten mit dem, was unsere anderen Kunden, die unserer Dienste ähnlich wie Sie nutzen, bevorzugt haben.
In Abschnitt 4 oben finden Sie detaillierte Informationen zum Zweck des Profilings durch Klarna sowie zu den Arten personenbezogener Daten, die für den jeweiligen Anlass und das jeweilige Profiling verwendet werden. Sie können die nachstehenden Beschreibungen mit den Zwecken in vorstehendem Abschnitt 4 abgleichen, indem Sie die Zahlen in Klammern „[x]“ verwenden. Das Profiling für diese Zwecke hat keine erheblichen Auswirkungen für Sie als Kunde.
Wir verwenden das Profiling für die folgenden Zwecke:
um unsere maßgeschneiderten Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen, die ihren Inhalt und Empfehlungen auf der Grundlage unserer Vermutung Ihrer potenziellen Interessen oder der für Sie relevanten Inhalte anpassen (dies gilt für die mobile Klarna App, ihre verschiedenen Funktionen, wie z.B. den Product Expert und die Shopping-Assistenten, wenn Sie mit unserem Kundendienst-Assistenten interagieren und für die Reihenfolge, in der verschiedene Zahlungsmethoden im Klarna Checkout angezeigt werden), (Zwecke [19, 38, 47, 50 und 57] in Abschnitt 4]
um festzustellen, welches der effizienteste Weg für die Kontaktaufnahme mit Ihnen in Bezug auf Ihre ausstehenden Forderungen ist (Prüfung verschiedener Kanäle, z. B. per SMS oder E-Mail, oder des Zeitpunkts einer solchen Kommunikation), (Zweck [25] in Abschnitt 4) und
um Ihnen maßgeschneidertes Marketing zur Verfügung zu stellen, sowohl über unsere eigenen als auch über externe Plattformen und Dienste. (Zwecke [13 und 43] in Abschnitt 4)
Unsere Dienste nutzen Modelle des maschinellen Lernens und Modelle der künstlichen Intelligenz, um Ihnen möglichst relevante Inhalte bereitzustellen.
Wenden Sie sich bitte an uns, wenn Sie Fragen zur Funktionsweise des Profilingverfahrens haben. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12. Sie können unserem Marketing-Profiling jederzeit widersprechen, indem Sie sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen (dann werden wir das Profiling zu Marketingzwecken einstellen). Sie können auch das Profiling für unsere Dienste beenden, indem Sie den Dienst kündigen.
6.2 Automatisierte Entscheidungen von Klarna, die Sie in erheblicher Weise betreffen.
Die Bezeichnung „automatisierte Entscheidungen, die rechtliche Wirkungen entfalten“ oder „automatisierte Entscheidungen, die Sie in ähnlicher Weise erheblich beeinträchtigen“ bedeutet, dass bestimmte Entscheidungen in unseren Diensten vollständig automatisiert sind, ohne dass unsere Mitarbeiter daran beteiligt sind. Diese Entscheidungen haben eine erhebliche Auswirkung auf Sie als Kunden und sind mit rechtlichen Wirkungen vergleichbar. Indem solche Entscheidungen automatisch getroffen werden, erhöht Klarna seine Objektivität und Transparenz bei der Entscheidung, Ihnen diese Dienste anzubieten. Gleichzeitig haben Sie jederzeit das Recht, diesen Entscheidungen zu widersprechen. Mehr darüber, wie Sie gegen diese Entscheidungen Widerspruch einlegen können, finden Sie am Ende dieses Abschnitts 6.2. Bei diesen Beurteilungen setzen wir Modelle des maschinellen Lernens und der künstlichen Intelligenz ein, um eine möglichst hohe Qualität unserer Entscheidungen sicherzustellen.
Automatisierte Entscheidungen, die Sie in erheblicher Weise beeinträchtigen, bedeuten auch, dass ein Profiling auf der Grundlage Ihrer Daten durchgeführt wird, bevor die Entscheidung getroffen wird. Dieses Profiling erfolgt, um Ihre finanzielle Situation (vor der Entscheidung über ein Angebot für eine bzw. die Kreditvergabe oder eine Zahlung einleiten) zu beurteilen,um festzustellen, ob Ihre Nutzung unserer Dienste ein Betrugs- oder Geldwäscherisiko darstellt oder um darüber zu entscheiden, ob Sie für einen Kauf haften. Wir erstellen ein Profil Ihres Nutzerverhaltens und Ihrer finanziellen Lage und vergleichen diese Daten mit Verhaltensweisen und Umständen, anhand derer wir das Risiko je nach Erheblichkeit unterschiedlich einstufen.
Die verschiedenen Nutzerverhaltensweisen und -bedingungen werden in unseren Modellen für automatisierte Entscheidungen bewertet und gewichtet, so dass wir am Ende einen Gesamtscoreerhalten, der dann dazu führt, dass wir Ihre Nutzung unserer Dienstleistungen entweder zulassen oder ablehnen. Wir können auch eine weitere Identifizierung von Ihnen verlangen, wenn wir nicht sicher sind, wer Sie sind.
Wann trifft Klarna automatisierte Entscheidungen, die Sie in erheblicher Weise
beeinträchtigen
?
Die für die einzelnen Entscheidungen verwendeten Arten personenbezogener Daten sind in Abschnitt 4 beschrieben. Sie können die nachstehenden Beschreibungen mit den in vorstehendem Abschnitt 4 genannten Zwecken vergleichen, indem Sie die Zahlen in Klammern „[x]“ verwenden.
Wir treffen solche automatisierten Entscheidungen, wenn wir:
entscheiden, Ihren  Antrag auf bzw. Ihnen anzubieten die  Nutzung eines Kreditservices zu genehmigen.
entscheiden,
nicht
Ihren Antrag auf bzw. Ihnen nicht anzubieten die Nutzung eines Kreditservices zu genehmigen.
Diese automatisierten Kreditentscheidungen basieren auf den von Ihnen für uns bereitgestellten Daten, Daten aus externen Quellen wie den Bonitätsauskünften von Kreditauskunfteien und Klarnas eigenen internen Informationen über Sie, sofern wir Ihnen bereits zuvor schon einmal Geld geliehen haben. Zusätzlich zu den Informationen über Sie umfasst das Kreditmodell von Klarna eine Vielzahl anderer Faktoren, wie z. B. die interne Einstufung des Kreditrisikos durch Klarna und die allgemeinen Rückzahlungsquoten unserer Kunden (etwa basierend auf der entsprechenden Produktkategorie). (Zwecke [24 und 31] in Abschnitt 4).
entscheiden, ob Sie ein Betrugsrisiko darstellen, wenn unsere Verarbeitung zeigt, dass Ihr Verhalten auf ein mögliches betrügerisches Verhalten hinweist, dass Ihr Verhalten nicht mit der vorherigen Nutzung unserer Dienste übereinstimmt oder dass Sie versucht haben, Ihre wahre Identität zu verschleiern. Automatisierte Entscheidungen, mit denen wir beurteilen, ob Sie ein Betrugsrisiko darstellen, basieren auf Informationen, die Sie uns selbst zur Verfügung gestellt haben, auf Daten der Betrugsprävention dienenden Einrichtungen (siehe Abschnitt 7.2.3. für Einzelheiten dazu, welche dieser Einrichtungen wir nutzen) und auf Klarnas eigenen internen Informationen. Klarna entwickelt seine Modelle zur Betrugsprävention beständig weiter, um unsere Dienstleistungen sicher zu halten, und untersucht genaustens, wie Betrüger auf verschiedenen Märkten vorgehen (z.B. welche Kategorien von Händlern oder Produkten am häufigsten Gegenstand von Betrugsversuchen sind). (Zwecke [5,21 und 41] in Abschnitt 4).
entscheiden, ob ein Geldwäscherisiko besteht, wenn unsere Verarbeitung Hinweise zutage bringt, denen zufolge Ihr Verhalten auf Geldwäsche hinweist. In relevanten Fällen prüft Klarna auch, ob bestimmte Kunden auf Sanktionslisten aufgeführt sind. (Zweck [45] in Abschnitt 4).
entscheiden, ob Sie für einen von Ihnen als „unberechtigt“ angefochtenen Kauf haften, je nachdem, ob die von Ihnen gemachten Angaben oder die uns vorliegenden Informationen über den Kauf auf ein mögliches betrügerisches Verhalten hindeuten oder nicht. Dies geschieht durch einen Vergleich der Vorgänge in Ihrem Fall mit anderen Transaktionen, die auf betrügerisches Verhalten hindeuten. (Zweck [46] in Abschnitt 4).
Siehe Abschnitt 7 für weitere Informationen darüber, an wen wir Daten in Verbindung mit dem Profiling bei automatisierten Entscheidungen weitergeben.
Wenn Ihr Antrag infolge der oben beschriebenen automatisierten Entscheidungen nicht genehmigt wird, haben Sie keinen Zugang zu den Dienstleistungen von Klarna bzw. können diese nicht nutzen, wie z. B. unseren Zahlungsmethoden. Klarna hat mehrere Sicherheitsmechanismen eingerichtet, um sicherzustellen, dass die Entscheidungen angemessen sind und laut Treu und Glauben erfolgen. Zu diesen Mechanismen gehört die laufende Überwachung unserer Entscheidungsmodelle sowie von Stichproben im Einzelfall. Sollten Sie Bedenken bezüglich des Ergebnisses haben, können Sie sich zu jeder Zeit an uns wenden. Wir werden daraufhin überprüfen, ob das Verfahren angemessen durchgeführt wurde. Sie können auch unter Befolgung folgender Schritte Widerspruch einlegen.
Ihr Recht auf Widerspruch gegen diese automatisierten Entscheidungen
Sie haben jederzeit das Recht, gegen eine automatisierte Entscheidung mit rechtlichen Folgen oder Entscheidungen, die Sie unter Umständen anderweitig erheblich beeinträchtigen könnten (in Zusammenhang mit dem entsprechenden Profiling), Widerspruch einzulegen, indem Sie eine E-Mail-Nachricht an
datenschutz@klarna.at
senden. Ein Mitarbeiter von Klarna wird dann die Entscheidung unter Berücksichtigung sämtlicher zusätzlichen von Ihnen zur Verfügung gestellten Informationen und der von Ihnen erläuterten Umstände überprüfen.
7. An wen leiten wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weiter?
Wenn wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weiterleiten, stellen wir sicher, dass der Empfänger sie in Übereinstimmung mit dieser Datenschutzerklärung verarbeitet, wie durch den Abschluss von Datenübermittlungsvereinbarungen oder Auftragsverarbeitungsverträgen mit den Empfängern. Diese Vereinbarungen verpflichten die Vertragspartner, sämtliche angemessene vertraglichen, rechtlichen, technischen und organisatorischen Maßnahmen zu ergreifen, um sicherzustellen, dass Ihre Daten mit einem angemessenen Schutzniveau und in Übereinstimmung mit dem geltenden Recht verarbeitet werden.
7.1 Kategorien von Empfängern, an die Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten immer weitergibt, unabhängig davon, welchen Service Sie nutzen.
7.1.1 Lieferanten und Unterauftragnehmer.
Beschreibung des Empfängers
: Lieferanten und Unterauftragnehmer sind Unternehmen, die nur berechtigt sind, die personenbezogenen Daten, die sie von Klarna erhalten, im Auftrag von Klarna, also als Auftragsverarbeiter, zu verarbeiten. Beispiele für solche Lieferanten und Unterauftragnehmer sind Software- und Datenspeicher-Anbieter, Zahlungsdienstleister und Unternehmensberater, Anbieter von Funktionen für maschinelles Lernen/künstliche Intelligenz und Unternehmen der Klarna-Gruppe.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage
: Klarna benötigt Zugang zu Diensten und Funktionalitäten von anderen Unternehmen, wenn sie diese nicht selbst erbringen kann. Klarna hat ein berechtigtes Interesse daran, auf diese Dienste und Funktionen zugreifen zu können (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
7.1.2 Klarna-Gruppe.
Beschreibung des Empfängers
: Unternehmen der Klarna-Gruppe.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage
: Dies ist erforderlich, damit Klarna Ihnen ihre Dienste und Funktionen zur Verfügung stellen kann. Klarna hat ein berechtigtes Interesse daran, auf diese Dienste und Funktionen zugreifen und sie bereitstellen zu können (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
Wenn Sie bei einem ausländischen Händler einkaufen (dies bedeutet, bei einem Händler mit Sitz außerhalb des EU/EWR-Gebietes), der mit einem anderen Unternehmen der Klarna-Unternehmensgruppe eine Vereinbarung hat, ist die Offenlegung Ihrer personenbezogenen Informationen zwischen den Klarna-Unternehmen erforderlich, damit die beiden Klarna-Unternehmen Ihre Zahlung bearbeiten können und um es dem ausländischen Händler zu ermöglichen, Ihren Kauf durchzuführen. Die Rechtsgrundlage für diese Verarbeitung ist die Erfüllung eines Vertrages (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
Das Unternehmen der Klarna-Gruppe, das Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erhält, wird sie in Übereinstimmung mit der Datenschutzerklärung verarbeiten, die auf Ihr Land Anwendung findet (siehe Liste). Genaueres über die Sicherheitsmaßnahmen von Klarna im Zusammenhang mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten bei einer Übermittlung außerhalb der EU/des EWR können Sie in Abschnitt 8 finden.
7.1.3 Eine Person, die eine Vollmacht für Ihre finanziellen Angelegenheiten besitzt.
Beschreibung des Empfängers
: Klarna leitet Ihre personenbezogenen Daten unter bestimmten Umständen an eine Person weiter, die aufgrund einer Vollmacht das Recht hat, auf diese Daten zuzugreifen.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage
: Diese Verarbeitung wird durchgeführt, um Ihren Kontakt mit uns (durch Vertreter) zu erleichtern, und erfolgt auf der Grundlage Ihrer Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 a) DSGVO).
7.1.4 Behörden.
Beschreibung des Empfängers
: Klarna leitet unter bestimmten Umständen erforderliche Informationen an Behörden wie die Polizei, Finanzbehörden, Steuerbehörden oder andere Behörden sowie Gerichte weiter.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage
: Personenbezogene Daten werden an Behörden weitergegeben, wenn wir gesetzlich dazu verpflichtet sind, oder in einigen Fällen, wenn Sie uns darum gebeten haben, oder wenn dies zur Verwaltung von Steuerabzügen oder zur Kriminalitätsbekämpfung erforderlich ist. Eine solche gesetzliche Verpflichtung zur Bereitstellung von Informationen liegt zum Beispiel vor, wenn Maßnahmen zur Bekämpfung von Geldwäsche und Terrorismusfinanzierung ergriffen werden müssen. Je nach Behörde und Zweck sind die Rechtsgrundlagen die Verpflichtung zur Erfüllung rechtlicher Verpflichtungen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 c) DSGVO), die Erfüllung des Vertrags mit Ihnen (Art. 6 Abs.1 b) DSGVO) oder das berechtigte Interesse von Klarna, sich vor Kriminalität zu schützen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO).
7.1.5 Veräußerung von Unternehmen oder Vermögenswerten.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Für den Fall, dass Klarna ein Unternehmen oder Vermögenswerte verkauft, leitet Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten unter Umständen an einen potenziellen Käufer dieses Unternehmens oder Vermögenswerts weiter. Wenn Klarna oder ein wesentlicher Teil des Vermögens von Klarna von einem Dritten erworben wird, werden unter Umständen auch personenbezogene Informationen über die Kunden von Klarna weitergeleitet.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage
: Klarna hat ein berechtigtes Interesse daran, solche Transaktionen durchführen zu können (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
7.2 Kategorien von Empfängern, an die Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weitergibt, wenn Sie die Zahlungsmethoden von Klarna nutzen, Klarna bei einem Händler nutzen oder sich in Klarnas Checkout bei einem Händler für eine Zahlung per Debit- oder Kreditkarte entscheiden.
7.2.1 Händler
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Mit Händlern meinen wir die Händler, die Sie besuchen oder bei denen Sie einkaufen (was die verbundenen Unternehmen des betreffenden Händlers einschließen kann, wenn Sie dahingehend durch den Händler informiert wurden).
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Damit der Händler Ihren Einkauf und die Kundenbeziehung mit Ihnen bzw. die Beziehung zwischen Ihnen und den verbundenen Unternehmen des Händlers durchführen und verwalten kann, z. B. durch die Überprüfung Ihrer Identität, den Versand von Waren, die Bearbeitung von Fragen und dem Umgang mit Streitfällen, um Betrug vorzubeugen und ggf. zur Versendung relevanter Werbung. Die Datenschutzerklärung des Händlers gilt für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten, die dem Händler mitgeteilt wurden und die der Händler verarbeitet. In der Regel finden Sie auf der Website des Händlers einen Link zu dessen Datenschutzerklärung. Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Weitergabe von Daten an die Händler ist zum einen die Erfüllung eines Vertrags (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO), sofern die Weitergabe der Daten zur Erfüllung des Vertrags zwischen Ihnen und dem Händler erfolgt, und zum anderen das berechtigte Interesse von Klarna und dem Händler (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO) oder Ihre Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 a) DSGVO). Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
7.2.2 Zahlungsdienstleister, Kassendienstleister, Kartennetzwerke und Finanzinstitute.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Zahlungsdienstleister (einschließlich digitaler Geldbörsen), Kassendienstleister, Kartennetzwerke und Finanzinstitute erbringen Dienstleistungen für Sie, Händler und Klarna, um elektronische Zahlungen über eine Vielzahl von Zahlungsmethoden zu implementieren, zu erleichtern und zu verwalten, wie z. B. Kreditkarten und bankgestützte Bezahlverfahren (z. B. Lastschrift und Überweisung).
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Einige Händler nutzen Zahlungsdienstleister und Kassendienstleister, an die sie Ihre Daten zur Verwaltung Ihrer Zahlung und Ihres Kaufs weiterleiten. Diese Weitergabe erfolgt in Übereinstimmung mit den eigenen Datenschutzerklärungen der entsprechenden Händler oder Kassendienstleister. Der Händler erlaubt Klarna unter Umständen auch, Ihre Daten an den Zahlungsdienstleister weiterzugeben, den es für die Abwicklung Ihrer Zahlung nutzt. Einige Zahlungsdienstleister erhalten Ihre Daten auch von Klarna oder erheben und verwenden Ihre Daten unabhängig, in Übereinstimmung mit ihren eigenen Datenschutzerklärungen oder um Betrug zu verhindern. Dies ist z. B. bei Anbietern digitaler Geldbörsen der Fall. Darüber hinaus leitet Klarna Ihre Daten unter Umständen an Ihre Kartennetzwerke und andere Finanzinstitute weiter, wenn Ihre Zahlungsmethode verwaltet oder Transaktionen mit Ihrem Konto durchgeführt werden, um die Transaktionen abzuschließen. Die Weiterleitung an Zahlungsdienstleister, Kassendienstleister, Kartennetzwerke und Finanzinstitute erfolgt, um eine Zahlungsmethode zu ermöglichen oder um Transaktionen durchzuführen, die von Ihnen initiiert wurden, und um den Vertrag mit Ihnen zu erfüllen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
7.2.3 Der Betrugsprävention dienende Einrichtungen und Unternehmen, die Identitätsprüfungen anbieten.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Ihre personenbezogenen Daten werden an der Betrugsprävention dienende Einrichtungen und Unternehmen, die Identitätsprüfungen durchführen, weitergegeben.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Klarna leitet Ihre Informationen zur Überprüfung Ihrer Identität und der Richtigkeit der von Ihnen angegebenen Daten sowie zur Betrugs- und Kriminalitätsbekämpfung weiter. Die Unternehmen, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten, sind
hier
aufgeführt. Bitte beachten Sie, dass diese Unternehmen Ihre Daten in Übereinstimmung mit ihren eigenen Datenschutzerklärungen verarbeiten.
Klarna übermittelt Ihre Daten sowie die Information, ob eine bestimmte Transaktion einen potenziellen Betrug darstellt, auf der Grundlage des berechtigten Interesses an der Ausübung der Geschäftstätigkeit (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO), da die der Betrugsprävention dienenden Einrichtungen und die Unternehmen, die Identitätsprüfungen anbieten, über Informationen über Betrugsaktivitäten und Identitätsbestätigungen verfügen, die für Klarna wichtig sind, um sie als Input für die Verringerung der Anzahl der betrügerischen Transaktionen zu verwenden. Diese Übermittlung erfolgt auch in Ihrem Interesse, da wir auf diese Weise dabei unterstützt werden, zu verhindern, dass Ihre Daten für die Tätigung betrügerischer Einkäufe verwendet werden. Wir stellen sicher, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung notwendig ist, um dieses Interesse zu verfolgen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht überwiegt, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck zu verarbeiten. Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den Umständen Ihres Einzelfalls ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 2. Sie können sich auch an die im obigen Link aufgeführten Unternehmen wenden, um die gleichen Rechte wie in Abschnitt 2 dargelegt auch gegenüber diesen Unternehmen auszuüben.
7.2.4 Google.
Beschreibung des Empfängers
: Wenn Sie Google Maps im Checkout oder in der Klarna App verwenden (z. B. indem Sie Ihre Adresse in der Adressleiste suchen, „Händler in meiner Nähe“ ansehen oder Informationen anfragen bezüglich nahegelegener Deals und Angebote), werden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an Google weitergegeben. Google verarbeitet Ihre Daten in Übereinstimmung mit den
Nutzungsbedingungen
und
Datenschutzbestimmungen
von Google Maps/Google Earth.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage
: Klarna gibt diese Informationen auf der Grundlage des berechtigten Interesses von Klarna an der Ausübung seiner Geschäftstätigkeit weiter (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO), da Google Maps die Adresssuchfunktion im Checkout bereitstellt und Karten und Deals, die für Ihren aktuellen Standort relevant sind, in der Klarna App anzeigt. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
7.2.5  Billie, wenn Sie mit Billie bezahlen
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Wenn Sie beim Checkout von Klarna mit Billie bezahlen möchten, gibt Klarna Informationen über die aktuelle Zahlung sowie Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten an Billie weiter. Billie verarbeitet die Sie betreffenden Daten in Übereinstimmung mit seiner eigenen Datenschutzerklärung.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Klarna gibt Informationen über Ihre Bezahlung mit Billie an Billie weiter, weil Billie Zahlungen an Klarna verwaltet. Die Daten werden zur Erfüllung einer von Ihnen mit Billie veranlassten Zahlung weitergegeben (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
7.3 Kategorien von Empfängern, an die Klarna Ihre Daten weitergibt, wenn Sie eine der Zahlungsmethoden von Klarna nutzen, bei denen Ihnen ein Kredit gewährt wird, oder wenn Sie die Klarna Card, Instore zahlen, mit Klarna über digitale Geldbörsen zahlen, die Einmalkarte des Shopping Services nutzen oder ein Klarna Konto eröffnen.
7.3.1 Kreditauskunfteien.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Wenn Sie eine Dienstleistung von Klarna anfragen, bei der Ihnen von uns ein Kredit gewährt wird (in Abschnitt 4.3 wird beschrieben, bei welchen Dienstleistungen von Klarna Ihnen ein Kredit gewährt wird), leiten wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an Kreditauskunfteien weiter. Wenn es sich um geringe Beträge handelt, oder sollten wir bereits über ausreichende Informationen verfügen findet keine solche Weiterleitung statt.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Ihre personenbezogenen Daten werden an Kreditauskunfteien weitergegeben, um Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit zu beurteilen, Ihre Identität und Ihre Kontaktdaten zu überprüfen und Sie und andere Kunden vor Betrug zu schützen. Diese Datenweitergabe stellt eine Kreditauskunft dar.
In Österreich sendet Klarna der Auskunftei für die Bonitätsabfrage Ihren Namen, Ihre Adresse und Ihre Telefonnummer. Unsere Bonitätsabfrage hat keinen Einfluss auf Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit.
Die Kreditauskunfteien verarbeiten Ihre Daten in Übereinstimmung mit ihren eigenen Datenschutzerklärungen. Informationen dazu, mit welchen Auskunfteien wir zusammenarbeiten, finden Sie
hier
.
Klarna übermittelt Ihre Daten auf der Grundlage des berechtigten Interesses an der Ausübung der Geschäftstätigkeit (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO), da die Kreditauskunfteien über Informationen zu Ihrer finanziellen Situation verfügen, die für Klarna wichtig sind, um eine korrekte Kreditwürdigkeitsprüfung zu gewährleisten und keine Kredite an Verbraucher zu vergeben, die diese nicht zurückzahlen können. Wir stellen sicher, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung notwendig ist, um dieses Interesse zu verfolgen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht überwiegt, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck zu verarbeiten. Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den Umständen Ihres Einzelfalls ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 2. Sie können sich auch an die im obigen Link aufgeführten Unternehmen wenden, um die gleichen Rechte wie in Abschnitt 2 dargelegt auch gegenüber diesen Unternehmen auszuüben.
Kreditinformationen über Sie, die wir von einer Kreditauskunftei erhalten haben, werden von Klarna ausschließlich verschlüsselt gespeichert. Wenn Sie eine lesbare Version wünschen, empfehlen wir Ihnen, sich direkt an die Kreditauskunftei zu wenden, die Sie darüber informiert hat, dass Klarna eine Kreditauskunft angefordert hat.
7.3.2 Inkassounternehmen (für überfällige Forderungen).
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Klarna muss Ihre Daten unter Umständen weiterleiten, wenn wir das Inkasso von unbezahlten, überfälligen Forderungen an einen Dritten, wie z. B. ein Inkassounternehmen, veräußern oder auslagern.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Diese Daten werden weitergegeben, um Ihre überfälligen Forderungen einzutreiben. Inkassounternehmen verarbeiten personenbezogene Daten in Übereinstimmung mit ihren eigenen Datenschutzerklärungen oder ausschließlich im Auftrag von Klarna in ihrer Eigenschaft als Auftragsverarbeiter von Klarna. Inkassounternehmen können Ihre unbezahlten Verbindlichkeiten an Kreditauskunfteien oder Behörden melden, was sich ggf. auf Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit und Ihre Fähigkeit, zukünftige Kredite zu beantragen, auswirken kann. Die Weitergabe dieser Daten erfolgt auf der Grundlage unseres berechtigten Interesses am Einzug und Verkauf von Forderungen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse an der Einziehung und dem Verkauf von Forderungen haben. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt. Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
7.3.3 VISA und Anbieter von digitalen Geldbörsen.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Wir leiten Informationen über Sie und Ihre Einkäufe weiter, wenn Sie die Klarna Card bei VISA und Mitgliedern des VISA-Kartennetzwerks verwenden. Wenn Sie Ihre Klarna Card oder eine Instore-Karte zu Ihrer digitalen Geldbörse hinzufügen oder sich entscheiden, mit Klarna über Ihre digitale Geldbörse zu bezahlen, müssen wir Ihre Informationen unter Umständen an den Anbieter dieser Geldbörse weiterleiten. In diesem Fall werden die Daten in Übereinstimmung mit der Datenschutzerklärung dieses Anbieters verarbeitet.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Die Weitergabe erfolgt in dem Umfang, der erforderlich ist, um Kartentransaktionen durchzuführen, Betrug zu verhindern und die Regeln des Kartennetzwerks von VISA einzuhalten. Wenn Sie Ihre Klarna Card erneuern oder eine neue Klarna Card erhalten, übermitteln wir diese Informationen an VISA, damit VISA wiederum Dritte informieren kann, bei denen Sie Ihre Klarna-Karteninformationen zuvor gespeichert haben (z. B. für wiederkehrende Transaktionen). Die Weitergabe der Daten erfolgt, um den Vertrag mit Ihnen zu erfüllen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
7.3.4 Erwerber von Forderungen (für offene Forderungen).
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Klarna überträgt Ihre offenen Forderungen unter Umständen an Erwerber von Forderungen.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Klarna leitet Ihre Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten (Name, Geburtsdatum, Sozialversicherungsnummer, Adresse und Telefonnummer), Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation (z. B. Restguthaben, Rückzahlungen und etwaiges negatives Zahlungsverhalten in Bezug auf die aktuelle Forderung) sowie Informationen über die mit der Forderung verbundenen Waren oder Dienstleistungen bei der Übertragung Ihrer Forderung an einen Erwerber sowie fortlaufend, bis Sie diese Forderung begleichen, weiter. Der Erwerber wird Ihre personenbezogenen Daten gemäß seiner eigenen Datenschutzerklärung verarbeiten, über die Sie bei der Übertragung der Forderung in Kenntnis gesetzt werden.
Die Weitergabe personenbezogener Daten an verschiedene Erwerber basiert auf unserem berechtigten Interesse am Verkauf ausstehender Forderungen im Rahmen unserer Geschäftstätigkeit (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
7.4 Kategorien von Empfängern bei der Nutzung von Klarna Kontoservices (Klarna Rechnungsabschluss, Spar- und Girokonten).
7.4.1 Kreditinstitute und andere Finanzinstitute.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Wir geben Ihre Daten an Kreditinstitute und andere Finanzinstitute (z. B. andere Banken) weiter, wenn Sie Transaktionen oder Zahlungen auf andere Konten vornehmen.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Wenn Sie Zahlungen auf ein Klarna Konto getätigt haben, verarbeitet Klarna die Informationen, die wir von der Bank, die Sie für die Transaktion verwendet haben, erhalten (z. B. Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten und Zahlungsinformationen). Wenn Sie Transaktionen oder Zahlungen auf Konten bei anderen Banken vornehmen, gibt Klarna auch einige Ihrer Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten sowie Zahlungsinformationen an den Empfänger sowie an das Kreditinstitut oder Finanzinstitut des Empfängers weiter. Die Weitergabe der Daten erfolgt, um den Vertrag mit Ihnen zu erfüllen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
7.5 Kategorien von Empfängern, an die Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten bei Ihrer Nutzung des
Shopping Service von Klarna
weiterleitet.
Die Bedingungen für den Shopping Service von Klarna können Sie
hier
finden.
7.5.1 Affiliate-Netzwerke.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Wenn Sie sich entscheiden, auf einen gesponserten Link in der mobilen Klarna App zu klicken oder einen Kauf bei einem Cashback-Angebot oder auf unserer Website zu tätigen, der zu einem Händler, Produkt oder einem Dienst führt, werden Sie über einen Dritten, ein sogenanntes Affiliate-Netzwerk, auf die Website eines anderen Unternehmens weitergeleitet.
Hier
können Sie mehr darüber erfahren, welche Affiliate-Netzwerke mit Klarna kooperieren (zu finden in der linken Spalte). Das Affiliate-Netzwerk verarbeitet Ihre Geräteinformationen in Übereinstimmung mit seiner jeweiligen Datenschutzerklärung (Sie können diese Datenschutzerklärungen in der rechten Spalte des gleichen
Links
wie obenstehend finden). Der Händler, den Sie über einen gesponserten Link besuchen, bestimmt, an welches Affiliate-Netzwerk- Prozess Ihre Daten weitergegeben werden. Üblicherweise arbeitet ein Händler nur mit einem einzigen Affiliate-Netzwerk zusammen. Mehr darüber, um welches Netzwerk es sich handelt, können Sie erfahren, indem Sie uns (oder den Händler) kontaktieren.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Das Affiliate-Netzwerk kann Tracking-Technologien auf Ihrem Gerät platzieren, die Informationen darüber speichert, dass Sie in der mobilen Klarna App auf diesen Link geklickt haben und die im Anschluss verwendet wird, um Ihren Besuch bei einem Händler zu dokumentieren und so eine mögliche Provision zu berechnen, die Klarna ggf. zusteht.
Diese Verarbeitung basiert auf einer Interessenabwägung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Im Rahmen der Interessenabwägung kam Klarna zum Schluss, dass wir ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, Ihnen gesponserte Links zur Verfügung zu stellen, um Händler in der mobilen Klarna App und auf unserer Website zu vermarkten. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
Darüber hinaus müssen wir Informationen an unsere Affiliate-Netzwerke weitergeben, um festzustellen, ob Sie Anspruch auf Cashback im Rahmen des Klarna Cashback-Programms haben. Dazu gehört die Bestätigung, dass Sie die in unseren Cashback-Angeboten festgelegten Kriterien erfüllt haben. Die weitergegebenen Daten dienen auch dazu, den einen etwaigen Ihnen zustehenden Cashback-Betrag festzustellen. Die Verarbeitung für unseren Cashback Service beruht auf der Erfüllung eines Vertrags (Art. 6 Absatz 1 b) DSGVO).
7.5.2 Google.
7.5.2.1 reCAPTCHA
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Wenn Sie die mobile Klarna App (auch über unser Webportal) nutzen, erfasst Google Ihre Geräteinformationen über den dort implementierten reCAPTCHA-Dienst von Google (in einigen Fällen in Kombination mit zusätzlichen Informationen, die Sie in den reCAPTCHA-Dienst eingeben), und Klarna übermittelt die zur Überprüfung verwendete Telefonnummer.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage
: Die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen erfolgt auf der Grundlage des berechtigten Interesses von Klarna an der Ausübung ihrer Geschäftstätigkeit (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO), da der reCAPTCHA-Dienst den Missbrauch unserer Dienste verhindert (z. B. indem er Bots an der Anmeldung oder an der Ausführung eines SMS-Traffic-Pumping-Betrugs hindert). Google verarbeitet diese Informationen in Übereinstimmung mit seinen
Nutzungsbedingungen
und
Datenschutzrichtlinien
. Wir gewährleisten, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.
Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten.
7.5.2.2 Google Maps
Beschreibung des Empfängers
: Um auf einer in der Klarna mobilen Anwendung integrierten Karte anzuzeigen, wo Ihr Paket zugestellt wird, übermitteln wir die entsprechenden Lieferadressendaten an Google. Google verarbeitet Ihre Daten in Übereinstimmung mit den
Geschäftsbedingungen
und der
Datenschutzregelung
von Google Maps/Google Earth.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage
: Die Weitergabe dieser Informationen basiert auf Klarnas berechtigtem Interesse an der Ausübung ihrer Geschäftstätigkeit (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO). Indem wir Google Maps nutzen, sind wir in der Lage, die Lieferadresse auf einer in der Klarna mobile Anwendung integrierten Karte anzuzeigen. Wir versichern Ihnen, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung zur Verfolgung dieses Interesses erforderlich ist und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck verarbeiten zu lassen, überwiegt.Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den konkreten Umständen Ihres Falles ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Siehe Abschnitt 2 für weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten und wie sie diese ausüben können.
7.5.3 Partner im Rahmen des Finanzielle Analysen-Services und des Angebots- und Vorteilsprogramms.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Partner im Rahmen des Finanzielle Analysen-Service und des Angebots- und Vorteilsprogramms.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage
: Wenn Sie sich dazu entscheiden, die Angebote und Vorteile von Klarna im Rahmen des Finanzielle Analysen-Services oder des Angebots- und Vorteilsprogramms in Anspruch zu nehmen, wird Klarna die für die Inanspruchnahme des Angebots erforderlichen personenbezogenen Daten an unsere Geschäftspartner weiterleiten (inklusive der Information, dass Sie Klarna-Kunde sind). Beim jeweiligen Angebot wird angegeben, welche Daten weitergeleitet werden. Die Weiterleitung der Daten erfolgt, um den Vertrag zwischen Ihnen und Klarna zu erfüllen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
7.5.4 Logistik- und Transportunternehmen.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Logistik- und Transportunternehmen.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Klarna gibt Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an Logistik- und Transportunternehmen weiter, die die von Ihnen bestellten Waren liefern, wenn Sie sich für die Sendungsverfolgung angemeldet haben. Wir geben zum Beispiel Kontakt- und Identifikationsdaten sowie Tracking-Nummern weiter.
Logistik- und Transportunternehmen verarbeiten Ihre Daten in Übereinstimmung mit ihren eigenen Datenschutzerklärungen. Die Weitergabe erfolgt zur Erfüllung des Vertrags zwischen Ihnen und Klarna (Art. 6 Abs. 1 (b) DSGVO).
7.5.5 Werbedienste und digitale Werbeplattformen.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Drittwerbedienste
und digitale Werbeplattformen
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Klarna gibt Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an
Drittwerbedienste
weiter, um Ihnen für Sie relevantere Klarna Werbung auf Nicht-Klarna-Websites und digitalen Werbeplattformen Dritter zu zeigen, um Ihnen Nicht-Klarna Werbung in der Klarna App und auf Marketingkanälen zu zeigen.
Dies basiert auf Ihrer Interaktion mit Klarna Produkten und Dienstleistungen und Ihrem Klarna Profil. Klarna wird diese Daten zur Messung der Leistung der Werbung weitergeben. Einige
Drittwerbedienste
und digitale Werbeplattformen verwenden die Sie betreffenden Daten für ihre eigenen Zwecke und in Übereinstimmung mit ihren eigenen Datenschutzerklärungen, die
hier
abgerufen werden können, wo Sie auch sehen können, welche Dritten wir nutzen. Für weiterführende Informationen über diese Weitergabe oder dazu, wie Sie Ihre Rechte in Bezug auf diese Unternehmen ausüben können, nehmen Sie bitte Kontakt mit uns auf.
Diese Verarbeitung beruht auf Ihrer Einwilligung (laut Art. 6 Abs. (1) (a) DSGVO). Sie können Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit widerrufen in den Einstellungen der Tracking-Technologie in der Klarna App. Sie können dieser Verarbeitung auch widersprechen- mit der gleichen Wirkung wie sie der Widerruf Ihrer Einwilligung hat. Weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 2.
Diese Verarbeitung könnte ein Profiling darstellen, das darauf abzielt, basierend auf einer Feststellung Ihrer potenziellen Interessen den Inhalt des Marketings entsprechend anzupassen. Weitere Informationen zum Thema Profiling finden Sie in Abschnitt 6.
7.5.6 SIWK-Apps und Dienste Dritter
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Wenn Sie sich mit Klarna (über „SIWK“) bei einem App-Store oder Dienst eines Drittanbieters anmelden, gibt Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an die App oder den Dienst des Drittanbieters weiter.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Dies geschieht zur Erfüllung des Vertrags mit Ihnen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 b) DSGVO).
7.5.7 Der Betrugsprävention dienende Einrichtungen und Unternehmen, die Identitätsprüfungen anbieten.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Ihre personenbezogenen Daten werden an der Betrugsprävention dienende Einrichtungen und Unternehmen, die Identitätsprüfungen durchführen, weitergegeben.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Klarna leitet Ihre Informationen zur Überprüfung Ihrer Identität und der Richtigkeit der von Ihnen angegebenen Daten sowie zur Betrugs- und Kriminalitätsbekämpfung weiter. Die Unternehmen, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten, sind
hier
aufgeführt. Bitte beachten Sie, dass diese Unternehmen Ihre Daten in Übereinstimmung mit ihren eigenen Datenschutzerklärungen verarbeiten.
Klarna übermittelt Ihre Daten sowie die Information, ob eine bestimmte Transaktion einen potenziellen Betrug darstellt, auf der Grundlage des berechtigten Interesses an der Ausübung der Geschäftstätigkeit (Art. 6 Abs. 1 f) DSGVO), da die der Betrugsprävention dienenden Einrichtungen und die Unternehmen, die Identitätsprüfungen anbieten, über Informationen über Betrugsaktivitäten und Identitätsbestätigungen verfügen, die für Klarna wichtig, um sie als Eingabe zu nutzen, die Anzahl der betrügerischen Transaktionen zu verringern. Diese Übermittlung erfolgt auch in Ihrem Interesse, da wir auf diese Weise dabei unterstützt werden, zu verhindern, dass Ihre Daten für die Tätigung betrügerischer Einkäufe verwendet werden. Wir stellen sicher, dass die damit verbundene Verarbeitung notwendig ist, um dieses Interesse zu verfolgen, und dass unser Interesse Ihr Recht überwiegt, Ihre Daten nicht zu diesem Zweck zu verarbeiten. Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus den Umständen Ihres Einzelfalls ergeben, gegen diese Verarbeitung Widerspruch einzulegen. Weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten finden Sie in Abschnitt 2. Sie können sich auch an die im obigen Link aufgeführten Unternehmen wenden, um die gleichen Rechte wie in Abschnitt 2 dargelegt auch gegenüber diesen Unternehmen auszuüben.
7.5.8 Resell-Plattformen
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Marktplätze und Plattformen, die den Wiederverkauf von Produkten ermöglichen und mit denen Klarna von Zeit zu Zeit zusammenarbeitet („Resell-Plattformen“). Die Liste der aktuell verfügbaren Resell-Plattformen finden Sie
hier
. Wir teilen Informationen über Waren/Dienstleistungen, die Sie weiterverkaufen möchten.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Wenn Sie sich entscheiden, ein Produkt über die Klarna App weiterzuverkaufen, leitet Klarna Sie an die Resell-Plattform weiter und füllt Ihr Verkaufsangebot vorab aus, indem Informationen über das gekaufte Produkt an die Resell-Plattform übermittelt werden. Die Resell-Plattformen verarbeiten diese Informationen gemäß ihren Nutzungsbedingungen und Datenschutzrichtlinien. Die Weitergabe erfolgt zur Erfüllung des Vertrags zwischen Ihnen und Klarna (Artikel 6(1)(b) DSGVO).
7.6 Kategorien von Empfängern, an die Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weiterleitet, wenn Sie unseren Kundenservice über Social Media kontaktieren.
7.6.1 Social Media.
Beschreibung des Empfängers:
Social-Media-Unternehmen wie Facebook, Instagram oder Twitter.
Zweck und Rechtsgrundlage:
Wenn Sie über Social Media wie Facebook, Instagram oder Twitter mit uns in Kontakt treten, werden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auch von diesen Unternehmen in Übereinstimmung mit deren Datenschutzerklärungen erhoben und verarbeitet. Die Weitergabe der Daten erfolgt, um den Vertrag mit Ihnen zu erfüllen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 (b) DSGVO).
8. Wann können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten außerhalb der EU/des EWR übertragen und wie schützen wir diese dann?
Wir bemühen uns stets, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten innerhalb des Gebiets der EU/des EWR zu verarbeiten. In bestimmten Situationen, z. B. wenn wir Ihre Daten an ein Unternehmen der Klarna-Gruppe oder einen Lieferanten, Subunternehmer oder Händler, der außerhalb der EU/des EWR tätig ist, weiterleiten, werden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten unter Umständen auch außerhalb des Gebiets der EU/des EWR übermittelt. Klarna stellt immer sicher, auch dann, wenn Daten außerhalb der EU/des EWR übermittelt werden, dass dasselbe hohe Schutzniveau auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten Anwendung findet, wie es der DSGVO entspricht. Ihre Rechte bezüglich Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten (beschrieben in Abschnitt 2) werden nicht beeinträchtigt, wenn Daten außerhalb der EU/des EWR übermittelt werden. Genauere Informationen über die Empfänger, an die Klarna Ihre Daten weiterleitet, können Sie in Abschnitt 7 finden.
Wenn Sie bei einem Händler einkaufen, dessen Sitz sich in einem Land außerhalb der EU/des EWR befindet, geht mit unserer Weiterleitung Ihrer Daten an diesen Händler einher, dass Ihre Daten in dieses Land außerhalb der EU/des EWR übermittelt werden.
Bei der Übermittlung personenbezogener Daten innerhalb eigener Unternehmensgruppen außerhalb des EU/EWR-Raums verwenden einige Lieferanten von Klarna interne Unternehmensregeln (Binding Corporate Rules, „BCR“). Diese BCRs wurden von einer EU-Datenschutzbehörde genehmigt und stellen sicher, dass für Ihre personenbezogenen Daten bei der Übermittlung dasselbe hohe Schutzniveau Anwendung findet.
Wenn Sie genauere Informationen über unsere Sicherheitsmaßnahmen erfahren möchten, können Sie uns immer kontaktieren. Unsere Kontaktinformationen finden Sie in Abschnitt 12. Mehr Informationen darüber, welche Länder als über ein „angemessenes Schutzniveau“ verfügend angesehen werden, finden Sie auf
der Website der Europäischen Kommission
. Mehr Informationen über die Standvertragsklauseln der Europäischen Union können Sie
hier
lesen und über die Binding Corporate Rules („BCR“) können Sie
hier
lesen.
Von Klarna bei der Übermittlung personenbezogener Daten außerhalb der EU/des EWR angewandte Sicherheitsmaßnahmen
In Ländern außerhalb der EU/des EWR können Gesetze gelten, die es öffentlichen Behörden erlauben, Auskunft über in dem jeweiligen Land gespeicherte personenbezogene Daten zum Zweck der Kriminalitätsbekämpfung oder der Wahrung der nationalen Sicherheit zu erlangen. Unabhängig davon, ob wir oder einer unserer Anbieter Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verarbeiten, stellen wir sicher, dass bei der Übermittlung dieser Daten ein hohes Schutzniveau gewährleistet ist und dass geeignete Schutzmaßnahmen gemäß den geltenden Datenschutzanforderungen (wie etwa der DSGVO) getroffen werden. Solche angemessenen Schutzmaßnahmen liegen vor, wenn unter anderem sichergestellt wird:
wenn die Europäische Kommission entschieden hat, dass das Land außerhalb der EU/des EWR, in das Ihre personenbezogenen Daten übermittelt werden, ein angemessenes Schutzniveau aufweist, das dieses dem von der DSGVO gewährten Niveau entspricht. Dies bedeutet, z. B. dass die personenbezogenen Daten auch danach weiterhin vor nicht erlaubter Offenlegung geschützt sind, dass Sie immer noch Ihre Rechte im Zusammenhang mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten ausüben können, oder
dass die Standardklauseln der Europäischen Kommission in die Vereinbarungen zwischen Klarna und dem Empfänger außerhalb der EU/des EWR aufgenommen wurden. Dies bedeutet, dass der Empfänger gewährleistet, dass das der DSGVO für Ihre personenbezogenen Daten gewährte Schutzniveau weiterhin gilt, und dass Ihre Rechte weiterhin geschützt sind. In diesen Fällen prüfen wir außerdem, ob im Land des Empfängers Gesetze gelten, die den Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten beeinträchtigen. Falls erforderlich, ergreifen wir besondere technische und organisatorische Maßnahmen, damit Ihre Daten während der Übermittlung in das entsprechende Land außerhalb der EU/des EWR geschützt bleiben.
die Übermittlung dem Datenschutzrahmen EU-USA unterliegt. Dabei handelt es sich um ein Opt-in-Zertifizierungssystem für US-Unternehmen, das vom Department of Commerce der USA verwaltet wird. Der Datenschutzrahmen umfasst eine Reihe von durchsetzbaren Grundsätzen und Anforderungen, die von dem US- amerikanischen Unternehmen zertifiziert werden müssen, um sicherzustellen, dass Ihre Daten weiterhin ausreichend geschützt sind.
Unbeschadet der obigen Angaben bedeutet unsere Datenübermittlung an den jeweiligen Händler, immer dann, wenn der Händler (und die Klarna- Stellen, mit der der Händler einen Vertrag geschlossen hat) bei dem Sie sich für einen Einkauf entscheiden, seinen Sitz in einem Land außerhalb der EU/des EWR hat, dass Ihre personenbezogenen Daten in das entsprechende Land außerhalb der EU/des EWR übermittelt und verarbeitet werden. Klicken Sie
hier
, um auf die Datenschutzerklärungen der anderen Klarna-Stellen in der Klarna Group zuzugreife. Anderenfalls wäre es nicht möglich, Ihren Kauf durchzuführen. Klarna verlässt sich in erster Linie auf die Standardklauseln der Europäischen Kommission, um den Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten bei solchen Datenübermittlungen sicherzustellen, allerdings kann es vorkommen, dass in Ländern, in denen der ausländische Händler seinen Sitz hat, Gesetze gelten, die einen wirksamen Schutz durch die Standardklauseln verhindern. Auch in einem solchen Fall werden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten trotzdem an den ausländischen Händler (oder an die örtliche Klarna-Stelle dieses Händlers) übermittelt, soweit die Datenübermittlung erforderlich ist, um Ihren jeweiligen Kauf zu durchzuführen.
9. Wie lange wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten speichern
Die Dauer der Speicherung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch Klarna hängt von den jeweiligen Zwecken ab, zu denen Klarna die personenbezogenen Daten nutzt:
Personenbezogene Daten, die für das Vertragsverhältnis zwischen Ihnen und Klarna verwendet werden, werden in der Regel für die gesamte Dauer des Vertragsverhältnis gespeichert und nach Ende des Vertragsverhältnisses aufgrund von Verjährungsfristen für einen maximale Dauer von 10 Jahren.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Klarna infolge einer gesetzlichen Pflicht speichern muss, wie z. B. aufgrund von Geldwäschebekämpfungs- oder Buchhaltungsgesetzen, werden in der Regel 5 Jahre bzw. 7 Jahre aufbewahrt.
Personenbezogene Daten, die nicht für die Zwecke des Vertragsverhältnisses zwischen Ihnen und Klarna verwendet werden, oder in deren Zusammenhang Klarna nicht gesetzlich zu einer Speicherung verpflichtet ist, dürfen nur so lange aufbewahrt werden, wie es zur Erfüllung des jeweiligen Zwecks unserer Verarbeitung erforderlich ist (in der Regel 3 Monate). Weitere Informationen hierzu finden Sie in der Tabelle in Abschnitt 4).
In einigen beschränkten Fällen müssen die Daten aufgrund von Kapitaladäquanzvorschriften, die Klarna einhalten muss, unter Umständen länger gespeichert werden.
Die rechtlichen Pflichten, auf die wir oben Bezug genommen haben, bedeuten, dass Klarna Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht löschen darf, auch wenn Sie von uns deren Löschung verlangen, wie dies Abschnitt 2 angegeben ist. Falls wir nicht gesetzlich zur Aufbewahrung der personenbezogenen Daten verpflichtet sind, müssen wir stattdessen dennoch eine Abwägung durchführen, wenn wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zu verwenden beabsichtigen, um Klarna gegenüber von Rechtsansprüchen zu schützen.
Bitte beachten Sie, dass nur weil wir einer rechtlichen Verpflichtung zur Speicherung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten unterliegen, dies nicht bedeutet, dass wir auch deren Verwendung für einen anderen Zweck berechtigt sind . (z. B. wenn für Klarna eine entsprechende gesetzliche Pflicht besteht), werden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten von uns nicht für andere Zwecke verwendet. Klarna wird für jeden einzelnen Zweck eine Abwägung durchführen, um zu entscheiden, wie lange Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden. Weitere Informationen hierzu finden Sie in der Tabelle in Abschnitt 4.
10. Wie wir Cookies und sonstige Arten von Tracking-Technologie verwenden
Um Ihnen ein maßgeschneidertes und smooothes Nutzungserlebnis zu bieten, verwendet Klarna in den verschiedenen Interfaces, wie z. B. auf unserer Website, in der mobilen Klarna App und im Checkout eines Händlers, der Klarna nutzt, Cookies und ähnliche Tracking-Technologien. Informationen über die von Klarna verwendeten Tracking-Technologien sowie darüber, wie Sie die Nutzung von Tracking-Technologien akzeptieren oder ablehnen können, finden Sie im jeweiligen Interface.
11. Aktualisierungen dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Wir arbeiten ständig an der Verbesserung unserer Dienste, mit dem Ziel, Ihnen ein smooothes Nutzungserlebnis bieten zu können. Damit können Änderungen an bestehenden und zukünftigen Diensten einhergehen. Wenn diese Verbesserung nach geltendem Recht eine Benachrichtigung oder Einwilligung Ihrerseits erfordern, werden Sie darüber informiert oder erhalten die Möglichkeit, Ihre Einwilligung zu erteilen. Außerdem ist es wichtig, dass Sie diese Datenschutzerklärung vor jeder Nutzung unserer Dienste lesen, da sich die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten unter Umständen im Vergleich zu Ihrer letzten Nutzung des jeweiligen Dienstes verändert hat.
12. Klarnas Kontaktinformationen
Die Klarna Bank AB (publ) ist beim schwedischen Handelsregister unter der Firmennummer 556737-0431 eingetragen und hat ihren Sitz in Sveavägen 46, 111 34 Stockholm.
Klarna verfügt über einen Datenschutzbeauftragten und ein Team von Datenspezialisten. Außerdem beschäftigen wir mehrere Kundenservice-Teams für Datenschutzfragen. Sie erreichen diese Ansprechpartner per E-Mail an
datenschutz@klarna.at
. Wenn Sie sich an den Datenschutzbeauftragten von Klarna wenden möchten, geben Sie dies bitte in der Betreffzeile an.
Die Klarna Bank AB (publ) handelt in Übereinstimmung mit den schwedischen Datenschutzgesetzen. Weitere Informationen über Klarna finden Sie unter
www.klarna.at
.
Sub-policy 6
https://www.paypal.com/de/webapps/mpp/ua/privacy-full:
Zurück zur Startseite
PayPal-Datenschutzerklärung
1. Übersicht
2. Die Aufgaben von PayPal als Datenverantwortlicher
3. Nutzer ohne Konto
4. Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über Sie erheben
5. Welche personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden und auf welchen Rechtsgrundlagen dies beruht
6. Unter welchen Umständen geben wir personenbezogene Daten weiter
7. Wie lange Ihre personenbezogenen Daten von PayPal gespeichert werden
8. Internationale Übermittlung von personenbezogenen Daten
9. Wie wir Cookies und Tracking-Technologien verwenden
10. Ihre Datenschutzrechte
11. Nähere Informationen zu automatisierter Entscheidungsfindung und Profiling
12. Warum wir personenbezogene Daten an Kreditauskunfteien weitergeben
13. Wie wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten schützen
14. Können Kinder unsere Dienste nutzen?
15. Aktualisierungen dieser Datenschutzerklärung
16. Hinweis zu Bankvorschriften für Nutzer im EWR und in Großbritannien
17. Begriffsbestimmungen
18. Unsere Kontaktdaten
Druckfähige PDF-Datei herunterladen
PayPal-Datenschutzerklärung
Letzte Aktualisierung 15. April 2024
Bitte kontaktieren Sie uns, wenn Sie Fragen zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung oder allgemeine Fragen zu Ihren personenbezogenen Daten haben. Ihre Daten werden verwendet, damit wir die Dienste bereitstellen können. Dies erfolgt im Einklang mit dieser Datenschutzerklärung und den maßgeblichen
PayPal-Nutzungsbedingungen
.
1. Übersicht
Diese Datenschutzerklärung zielt darauf ab, Ihnen ausreichende Informationen über die Nutzung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu bieten, wenn Sie unsere Website besuchen und unsere Dienste nutzen (zusammenfassend die „
Dienste“)
. Wir empfehlen Ihnen, diese Datenschutzerklärung zu lesen und sie zu nutzen, um fundierte Entscheidungen zu treffen.
Die Erläuterung wichtiger Begriffe, die in der Datenschutzerklärung ansonsten nicht definiert werden, finden Sie in Abschnitt 17 (
Begriffsbestimmungen
) am Ende dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
2. Die Aufgaben von PayPal als Datenverantwortlicher
Innerhalb des Europäischen Wirtschaftsraums (EWR) ist
PayPal (Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A.
Datenverantwortlicher für personenbezogene Daten, die beim Besuch unserer Website, während des Anmelde- und Antragsverfahrens sowie während Ihrer fortgesetzten Nutzung der Dienste erhoben und verarbeitet werden.
Bezugnahmen auf "wir", "unser", "uns", "
PayPal
" oder "
PayPal-Unternehmen
" in dieser Datenschutzerklärung bezeichnen PayPal (Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A. sowie die Gruppe der Unternehmen, die jeweils die einzelnen Unternehmen direkt oder indirekt kontrolliert, von ihnen kontrolliert wird oder sich mit ihnen in gemeinsamem Besitz befindet.
Einige der Dritten, an die wir personenbezogene Daten weitergeben, sind unabhängige Datenverantwortliche. Das bedeutet, dass wir nicht diejenigen sind, die bestimmen, wie die von uns weitergegebenen Daten verarbeitet werden. Beispiele sind Behörden, Kreditauskunfteien, Erwerber und andere Finanzinstitute. Wenn Ihre Daten an unabhängige Datenverantwortliche weitergegeben werden, gelten deren Datenrichtlinien. Wir empfehlen Ihnen, ihre Datenschutzerklärungen zu lesen und Ihre Datenschutzrechte zu kennen, bevor Sie mit ihnen interagieren.
Weitere Informationen darüber, wie wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten bei der Übermittlung außerhalb des EWR, Großbritanniens und der Schweiz schützen, finden Sie in Abschnitt 8 (
Internationale Übermittlung von personenbezogenen Daten
)
3. Nutzer ohne Konto
Der Zugriff auf unsere Dienste ist auch für Personen ohne PayPal-Konto oder PayPal-Profil möglich. Auch wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, ohne Inhaber eines Kontos zu sein, erheben wir personenbezogene Daten von Ihnen. Dies kann beispielsweise der Fall sein bei der Nutzung der Funktion "Zahlung ohne PayPal-Konto", von markenlosen Zahlungsdiensten (wie z.B. Braintree) oder beim Empfang von Zahlungen von Kontoinhabern über unsere Dienste. Der Begriff "Nutzer" bezieht sich daher gleichermaßen auf Personen mit und ohne Konto. Haben Sie kein Konto, erfolgt die Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zur Bereitstellung der Dienste und nach Maßgabe dieser Datenschutzerklärung und den jeweiligen
PayPal-Nutzungsbedingungen
.
4. Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über Sie erheben
Wir erheben die folgenden Datenkategorien über Sie, um unsere Dienste bereitzustellen, Ihre Benutzererfahrung kontinuierlich zu verbessern und unser Geschäft zu betreiben und weiterzuentwickeln. Die Arten von personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über Sie erheben, werden nachstehend erläutert.
Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten, die
von Ihnen
erhoben werden, einschließlich durch Ihre Interaktionen mit uns und Ihre Nutzung der Dienste:
Anmelde- und Kontaktdaten
. Je nach den von Ihnen gewählten Diensten erheben wir Ihren Namen, Ihre Postanschrift, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, Ihr Einkommen, Ihre Telefonnummer, Ihre Steuernummer, Ihre Zahlungsinformationen, Informationen über Ihren Beruf, Ihr Beschäftigungsverhältnis oder Ihr Geschäft sowie sonstige Informationen, die zur Einrichtung eines Kontos erforderlich sind.
Identifizierungs- und Unterschriftsdaten
. Je nach den von Ihnen gewählten Diensten erheben wir Daten, um Ihren Namen, Ihre Adresse, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, Ihre Telefonnummer, Ihren amtlichen Ausweis, Ihr Alter und Ihre biometrischen Daten zu überprüfen sowie um Ihre elektronische Unterschrift zu erstellen und auszustellen.
Zahlungsinformationen
. Informationen, wie etwa der von Ihnen gesendete oder angeforderte Betrag, Ihr Zahlungsinstrument, Ihre in Verbindung mit den Diensten verwendete Karte oder Zahlungsquelle, einschließlich der Bezeichnung des Ausstellers, des Kartentyps, des Ländercodes, der Kontonummer des Zahlungskontos, des CVV, des Benutzernamens sowie IBAN-Informationen.
Informationen zu Ihren importierten Kontakten
. Wenn Sie sich entscheiden, Ihre Kontaktlisten zu importieren, erfassen wir Informationen, die Sie über Ihre Kontakte eingeben oder importieren, wie Name, Adresse, Telefonnummer, Bilder, E-Mail-Adresse oder Benutzernamen, die mit den importierten oder manuell eingegebenen Kontakten verknüpft sind.
Daten in Ihrem Kontoprofil.
Informationen, die Sie freiwillig eingeben, wie etwa Ihren Benutzernamen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, Ihre Mobiltelefonnummer, Ihr Profilbild, Ihre bevorzugte Sprache oder die Beschreibung Ihrer Person, die sensible personenbezogene Daten enthalten kann, welche Aufschluss über religiöse Überzeugungen, politische oder philosophische Ansichten, Behinderungen, sexuelle Orientierung sowie biometrische Daten geben. Sie können Ihr Profil jederzeit als "privat" kennzeichnen.
Informationen, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie uns kontaktieren
. Informationen, die Sie offenlegen, wenn Sie an Umfragen teilnehmen oder unsere Kundendienstteams kontaktieren, wie z. B. von Ihnen genutzte Dienste, aufgezeichnete Gespräche, Chat-Gespräche mit uns, E-Mail-Korrespondenz mit uns, Kontostatus, Rückzahlungsverlauf, Spracherkennung. Dies kann Informationen über andere beinhalten, wenn Sie diese mit uns teilen.
Gerätedaten.
Dies sind Daten, die automatisch von einem beliebigen Gerät erhoben werden können, das für den Zugriff auf die Seite oder die Dienste genutzt wird. Zu diesen Daten gehören unter anderem der Typ, die Netzwerkverbindungen, der Name, die IP-Adresse und Informationen zum Webbrowser Ihres Geräts sowie Informationen zur Internetverbindung, mit denen Sie auf die Seiten oder Dienste zugreifen, Geolokalisierungsdaten, Informationen zu Apps, die auf Ihr Gerät heruntergeladen wurden, sowie biometrische Daten.
Abgeleitete Daten.
Wenn Sie die Dienste nutzen, können wir aus Ihren Transaktionen und personenbezogenen Daten gegebenenfalls weitere Daten ableiten. Dies erfolgt unter anderem, um Ihr Konto zu schützen und Sie bei der Nutzung der Dienste vor Betrug zu bewahren. Zu den abgeleiteten Daten können beispielsweise Verhaltensmuster und persönliche Vorlieben, Browsing- und Kaufgewohnheiten sowie Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit gehören.
Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten, die
von Dritten
erhoben werden, einschließlich von Identitätsprüfern, Datenbrokern, Anbietern, die uns bei der Betrugserkennung helfen, Ihrer Bank, Händlern oder Drittanbieterplattformen, über die Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Daten aus den von Ihnen verknüpften Drittkonten
. Wenn Sie ein Finanzkonto oder ein Konto ohne Finanzbezug verknüpfen, wie z.B. Ihr persönliches E-Mail-Konto, Ihre Konten in sozialen Medien oder Ihre Bank- oder Kreditkonten, erheben wir Informationen, die mit dem angegebenen Zweck in Verbindung stehen, zu dem die Verknüpfung erfolgt ist. Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise für die Teilnahme an
Open Banking
entscheiden, erheben wir von Ihren verknüpften Konten die Kontoanmeldedaten, Kontostände, Kontotransaktionen und Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. Sie können Ihre Entscheidung zur Nutzung dieser Funktion jederzeit ändern und die Verknüpfung mit den betreffenden Konten aufheben.
Informationen von Auskunfteien
. Soweit gesetzlich zulässig, erfassen wir im Rahmen Ihrer Nutzung unserer Dienste kreditbezogene Informationen wie ausstehende und historische Schulden, Rückzahlungshistorie, frühere Kreditgenehmigungen, aktuelle Arbeitsverhältnisse und Beziehungen zu anderen Finanzinstituten.
Transaktionsdaten
. Informationen zu Ihren Bestelldetails und Einkäufen, wie z.B. Artikelbeschreibung, Menge, Preis, Währung, Lieferadresse, Online-Warenkorbinformationen, Verkäufer- und Käuferinformationen und Zahlungsinformationen. Dazu gehören Informationen aus Ihren Transaktionen, bei denen Sie unsere Dienste ohne ein PayPal-Konto nutzen (z. B. Zahlen ohne PayPal-Konto).
Informationen zu den gesetzlichen Vorschriften
. In Übereinstimmung mit geltendem Recht (u.a. Gesetz zur Geldwäscheprävention) können dies Informationen aus externen Sanktionslisten wie Name, Geburtsdatum, Geburtsort, Beruf und der Grund, warum die betreffende Person auf der betreffenden Liste steht, umfassen.
Anwendungen von Drittanbietern
. Informationen von anderen aus Ihrer Nutzung von Anwendungen von Drittanbietern, wie dem Apple App Store oder Google Play Store, sozialen Netzwerken, wie Name, Ihre soziale Netzwerk-ID, Standortinformationen, E-Mail, Geräte-ID, Browser-ID und Profilbild. Ihre Nutzung von Anwendungen Dritter unterliegt der Datenschutzerklärung und den Nutzungsbedingungen für solche Anwendungen.
Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten, die durch Cookies und ähnliche Tracking-Technologien sowie von Ihren Geräten automatisch über Sie erhoben werden, einschließlich durch Ihren Zugriff auf unsere Website oder PayPal-App:
Technische Nutzungsdaten
. Informationen über die Antwortzeit für Webseiten, Download-Fehler und Datum und Uhrzeit Ihrer Nutzung des Dienstes, wie z. B. Ihre IP-Adresse, Statistiken darüber, wie Seiten geladen oder angezeigt werden, die Websites, die Sie besucht haben, bevor Sie auf die Websites gelangten, und andere Nutzungs- und Browsing-Informationen, die durch Cookies erhoben werden ("
Technische Nutzungsdaten
").
Informationen von Ihrem Gerät
. Informationen über Ihre Spracheinstellungen, IP-Adresse, Browser-ID, Geräte-ID, Cookie-Einstellungen, Zeitzone, Betriebssystem, Plattform, Bildschirmauflösung und ähnliche Informationen über Ihre Geräteeinstellungen sowie Daten, die von Cookies oder anderen Tracking-Technologien erfasst werden,
Standortinformationen
. Informationen aus IP-basierter Geolokalisierung wie Breiten- und Längengraddaten und Global Positioning System (GPS)-Informationen, wenn Sie uns über Ihre Geräteeinstellungen die Erlaubnis erteilen.
Abgeleitete Daten
. Rückschlüsse, die gezogen werden, um ein Profil über Sie zu erstellen, das Verhaltensmuster und persönliche Vorlieben wie Geschlecht, Einkommen, Surf- und Kaufgewohnheiten und Kreditwürdigkeit widerspiegeln kann.
5. Welche personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden und auf welchen Rechtsgrundlagen dies beruht
Die
Verarbeitung
Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten kann aus einer Vielzahl von Gründen erfolgen, die nach dem maßgeblichen Datenschutzrecht der Europäischen Union (EU), Großbritanniens und der Schweiz und unter Beachtung der nachstehenden Rechtsgrundlagen zulässig sind:
Wir erheben die folgenden personenbezogenen Daten, die wir für
erforderlich halten, um unsere vorvertraglichen und vertraglichen Verpflichtungen
Ihnen gegenüber zu erfüllen, und ohne die Sie die Dienste nicht nutzen können.
Zu diesen erforderlichen Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten gehören:
Informationen zu Ihrer Registrierung und Kontaktinformationen
Identifizierungs- und Unterschriftsdaten
Zahlungsinformationen
Informationen zu den gesetzlichen Vorschriften
Informationen, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie uns kontaktieren
Transaktionsdaten
Tracking von Paketen
Dienstspezifische personenbezogene Daten
Informationen von Auskunfteien und Finanzinstituten
Informationen aus Ihren verbundenen Finanzkonten
Daten aus Ihrer Nutzung der Dienste
Technische Nutzungsdaten
Gerätedaten
Standortdaten
Zu diesen Aktivitäten gehört
:
die Erbringung unserer Dienstleistungen, die Erfüllung unserer gegenüber Ihnen bestehenden vertraglichen Verpflichtungen und die sonstige Betreuung unserer Geschäftsbeziehung zu Ihnen;
Ihre Zahlung für Produkte und die Kundenbeziehung zu verwalten.
Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer Bewerbung zu beurteilen, Ihre Identität und Ihre Kontaktdaten zu bestätigen und Sie und andere vor Betrug zu schützen.
die Bestätigung Ihrer Identität, auch durch Verwendung von elektronischen Signaturen, und die Verifizierung Ihrer persönlichen Angaben und Kontaktdaten;
nachzuweisen, dass Transaktionen ausgeführt wurden.
die Begründung, Ausübung oder Verteidigung eines Rechtsanspruchs oder von Inkassoverfahren.
die Einhaltung interner Verfahren.
zu beurteilen, welche Zahlungsmöglichkeiten und Dienstleistungen wir Ihnen anbieten, beispielsweise durch die Durchführung interner und externer Bonitätsprüfungen.
Kundenanalyse, Verwaltung unserer Dienste und interne Vorgänge, z.B. Fehlerbehebung, Datenanalyse, Tests, Forschung und statistische Zwecke.
mit Ihnen in Bezug auf unsere Dienste zu kommunizieren.
geltende Gesetze der EU und der Mitgliedstaaten einzuhalten, wie z.B. Gesetze zur Geldwäscheprävention und Buchungsaufbewahrung sowie Vorschriften, die von unseren benannten Banken und relevanten Kartennetzwerken herausgegeben werden.
Wir haben ein berechtigtes Interesse daran, sicherzustellen, dass PayPal ein sicherer Finanzdienstleister bleibt und weiterhin Dienstleistungen anbietet, die innovativ und von Interesse für Sie sind. Wir tun dies,
sofern unsere berechtigten Interessen nicht durch Ihr Recht auf Nichtverarbeitung Ihrer Daten zu diesem Zweck überwiegen
.
Zu diesen Aktivitäten gehört:
sicherzustellen, dass Inhalte auf die für Sie und Ihr Gerät effektivste Weise dargestellt werden.
den Missbrauch unserer Dienste im Rahmen unserer Bemühungen, unsere Plattform sicher und geschützt zu halten, zu verhindern.
die Ermittlung Ihrer Berechtigung zur Inanspruchnahme von Diensten, die für Sie von Interesse sein könnten, z.B. durch Vornahme interner Bonitätsprüfungen, und die damit verbundene Kommunikation mit Ihnen;
Risikoanalysen, Betrugsprävention und Risikomanagement durchzuführen.
die Weiterentwicklung unserer Dienste sowie allgemeine Geschäftsentwicklungszwecke, wie z.B. die Optimierung von Risikomodellen zur Betrugsreduzierung, die Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Funktionen und die Erschließung neuer Geschäftsmöglichkeiten;
die fortlaufende Aktualisierung Ihrer Konto- und Finanzdaten;
Marketing-, Produkt- und Kundenanalysen, einschließlich Tests, dazu gehören beispielsweise die Verbesserung unserer Produktpalette und die Optimierung unseres Kundenangebots.
Einhaltung des geltenden Rechts, wie z.B. der Gesetze zu Geldwäscheprävention und Buchführungspflichten sowie der aufsichtsrechtlichen Vorschriften über die Eigenkapitalanforderungen und der von unseren zuständigen Banken und relevanten Kartennetzwerken erlassenen Regeln. Zum Beispiel, wenn wir personenbezogene Daten zur Einhaltung der Know-Your-Customer-Voraussetzungen ("KYC") verarbeiten, um Geldwäsche, Terrorismusfinanzierung und Betrug zu vermeiden, zu erkennen und zu untersuchen. Wir führen auch Sanktionsprüfungen durch, melden Steuerbehörden, Polizeivollzugsbehörden, Vollstreckungsbehörden und Aufsichtsbehörden, wenn wir nicht durch EU-Recht und das Recht der Mitgliedstaaten dazu verpflichtet sind, aber wir nach Treu und Glauben davon ausgehen, dass die Weitergabe der Informationen erforderlich ist, um die geltenden Vorschriften einzuhalten.
die Ermöglichung Ihrer Teilnahme an Wettbewerben, Angeboten und Veranstaltungen;
Durchführung von Verpflichtungen zum Risikomanagement wie Kreditleistung und Qualität, Versicherungsrisiken und Erfüllung der Eigenkapitalanforderungen nach geltendem Recht.
die Verarbeitung von Daten über Ihre Kontakte, um Ihnen das Auffinden dieser Kontakte zu erleichtern und sich mit ihnen in Verbindung zu setzen, sowie die Verbesserung der Zahlungssicherheit;
indem Sie uns Daten über Ihre Kontakte übermitteln, erklären Sie, dass Sie befugt sind, diese Daten für die in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen Zwecke an PayPal weiterzugeben;
Ihnen Informationen, Nachrichten und Werbung über unsere Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen, einschließlich wo wir uns mit anderen zusammengetan haben, um ähnliche Dienstleistungen anzubieten.
Informationen über Sie zu assoziieren, um Ihre Nutzung der Dienste ohne PayPal-Konto zu identifizieren (z. B. Zahlung ohne PayPal-Konto) oder Markenlose Dienste (z.B. Braintree) und um solche Transaktionen mit Ihrem Konto zu verknüpfen, wenn Sie ein Konto haben oder später ein Konto einrichten.
die Speicherung Ihrer Präferenzen für die nächste Nutzung der Dienste, z.B. Ihre bevorzugte Zahlungsmethode oder ob Sie beim Bezahlen digitale Quittungen per E-Mail oder SMS erhalten möchten;
Wir sind nach dem EU- und dem Mitgliedstaaten-Recht gesetzlich dazu verpflichtet, bestimmte Verarbeitungstätigkeiten durchzuführen.
Wir tun dies, wenn dies erforderlich ist, um geltende Gesetze einzuhalten
.
Zu diesen Aktivitäten gehört:
die Bereitstellung unserer Dienste und Produkte;
die Bestätigung Ihrer Identität, auch zu Unterschriftszwecken, und die Überprüfung Ihrer persönlichen Angaben und Kontaktdaten;
die Begründung, Ausübung oder Verteidigung eines Rechtsanspruchs oder von Inkassoverfahren.
den Missbrauch unserer Dienste im Rahmen unserer Bemühungen, unsere Plattform sicher und geschützt zu halten, zu verhindern.
Risikoanalysen, Betrugsprävention und Risikomanagement durchzuführen.
geltendes Recht einzuhalten, wie z.B. die Gesetze zu Geldwäscheprävention und Buchführungspflichten sowie die aufsichtsrechtlichen Vorschriften über die Eigenkapitalanforderungen und die von unseren zuständigen Banken und relevanten Kartennetzwerken erlassenen Regeln. Zum Beispiel, wenn wir personenbezogene Daten zur Einhaltung der Know-Your-Customer-Voraussetzungen ("KYC") verarbeiten, um Geldwäsche, Terrorismusfinanzierung und Betrug zu vermeiden, zu erkennen und zu untersuchen. Ebenso führen wir Sanktionsprüfungen durch und machen Meldungen an Steuerbehörden, Polizeibehörden, Strafverfolgungsbehörden und Aufsichtsbehörden.
Wir stützen uns bei der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten auf Ihre ausdrückliche und freiwillige Einwilligung,
damit Sie in den Genuss bestimmter Funktionen kommen können, die zwar für die Nutzung der Dienste nicht notwendig, für Sie jedoch möglicherweise von Interesse sind, wie z.B. die Synchronisierung Ihrer Kontaktliste mit Ihrem Konto, die Bereitstellung von biometrischen Daten, gezielte Werbung, die Verknüpfung Ihres E-Mail-Kontos für das Tracking von Paketen oder die Verbindung mit einer Plattform Dritter. Sie können Ihre Entscheidung über die Nutzung dieser Funktionen jederzeit in Ihren Kontoeinstellungen ändern. Bitte beachten Sie, dass der Widerruf Ihrer Einwilligung die Rechtmäßigkeit einer von uns vor dem Widerruf durchgeführten Verarbeitung nicht berührt. Weitere Informationen über Ihr Recht auf Widerruf Ihrer Einwilligung finden Sie in Abschnitt 10 (“
Ihre Datenschutzrechte
”).
6. Unter welchen Umständen geben wir personenbezogene Daten weiter
Wir geben Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an Dritte weiter, wenn eine Rechtsgrundlage dafür besteht.
Dies umfasst:
Andere PayPal-Unternehmen
, um Ihnen die Dienste bereitzustellen, sowie in unserem berechtigten Interesse an der Ausübung unserer Geschäftstätigkeit. Diese Interessen werden in Abschnitt 5 (
Welche personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden und auf welchen Rechtsgrundlagen dies beruht
)
näher erläutert. Das PayPal-Unternehmen, das Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erhält, verarbeitet diese in Einklang mit dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Behörden
, soweit wir rechtlich dazu verpflichtet sind. Dazu zählen Steuerbehörden, Polizeibehörden, Strafverfolgungsbehörden und Aufsichtsbehörden in den jeweils maßgeblichen Ländern. Wir können auch verpflichtet sein, zuständigen Behörden, wie beispielsweise den Finanzbehörden, Informationen über Ihre Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen. Dies kann Ihren Namen, Ihre Adresse und Informationen zu Kartentransaktionen umfassen, die wir in Ihrem Auftrag über unsere Dienste abwickeln. Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Einhaltung von Offenlegungspflichten, die sich aus dem Recht der EU und der Mitgliedstaaten ergeben, ist die bestehende rechtliche Verpflichtung. Soweit die Offenlegung nicht auf dem Recht der EU und der Mitgliedstaaten beruht, ist die Rechtsgrundlage unser berechtigtes Interesse und die Einhaltung geltender Vorschriften zur Verhinderung widerrechtlichen Verhaltens.
Andere Finanzinstitute und Kartennetzwerke
, um die Zahlungsabwicklung zu erleichtern, gemeinsam ein Produkt anzubieten oder Karten Ihrer E-Börse hinzuzufügen. Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Offenlegung ist die Erfüllung des zwischen Ihnen und uns bestehenden Vertrags. Die betreffenden Parteien können auch für andere berechtigte Zwecke auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zugreifen, wie etwa Identitätsprüfung, Betrugsprävention und Risikomanagement. Die Rechtsgrundlage für diese Verarbeitung ist das berechtigte Interesse von uns und unseren Partnern, betrügerisches und rechtswidriges Verhalten zu verhindern.
Betrugsbekämpfungs- und Identitätsprüfungsbehörden
, zum Beispiel, um uns bei der Erkennung von Aktivitäten zu unterstützen, die auf Betrug hindeuten. Die Rechtsgrundlage für diese Verarbeitung ist das berechtigte Interesse von uns und unseren Partnern, betrügerisches und rechtswidriges Verhalten zu verhindern.
Inkassobüros
, beispielsweise um unbezahlte überfällige Forderungen durch Dritte wie ein Inkassobüro einzuziehen. Wir tun dies auf der Grundlage unseres berechtigten Interesses, Geschäfte zu tätigen und Schulden einzutreiben. Bitte beachten Sie, dass die Datenschutzerklärung dieser Parteien für die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten gilt, die Sie ihnen direkt mitteilen, und dass sie Ihre unbezahlten Schulden Kreditauskunfteien melden können, was Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit oder Ihre Fähigkeit zur Sicherung zukünftiger Kredite beeinträchtigen kann.
Dienstanbieter
, die in unserem Auftrag und nach unseren Weisungen Dienstleistungen erbringen, die wir an sie ausgelagert haben, wie z.B. Marketing, IT-Entwicklung, Wartung, Hosting und Support sowie Kundenserviceleistungen. Die Rechtsgrundlage für diese Verarbeitung ist die Erfüllung unserer gegenüber Ihnen bestehenden Vertragspflichten.
Andere Nutzer, soweit dies ausweislich Ihrer Kontoeinstellungen zulässig ist
. Über Ihre Kontoeinstellungen können Sie anderen Nutzern bestimmte Informationen wie Ihr Profilfoto, Ihren Vor- und Nachnamen, Ihren Benutzernamen oder Ihren Wohnort anzeigen oder zugänglich machen. Die Rechtsgrundlage für diese Verarbeitung ist Ihre Einwilligung. Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie Ihre Profileinstellungen jederzeit und kostenfrei ändern können.
Finanzinstitute in Verbindung mit Ihrer Teilnahme an Open Banking
, z.B. wenn Sie eine Kontoverbindung mit einer anderen Bank, einem Kartenkonto oder einem Aggregator einleiten. Wir prüfen daher, ob Sie über genügend Geld verfügen, oder bestätigen, dass Sie der Inhaber des Kontos sind. Wenn Sie Ihr Konto verknüpfen, ist die Rechtsgrundlage für den Zugriff auf Ihre Kontodaten die Erfüllung unserer vertraglichen Verpflichtungen gegenüber Ihnen.
Partner und Händler, deren Dienstanbieter und sonstige Transaktionsbeteiligte
. Wenn Sie beispielsweise die Dienste nutzen, um Online-Einkäufe zu tätigen, Zahlungen an andere Nutzer vorzunehmen oder Waren zurückzugeben, können wir Informationen über Sie und Ihr Konto an die anderen Parteien weitergeben, die an der Abwicklung Ihrer Transaktionen beteiligt sind. Die Rechtsgrundlage für diese Verarbeitung ist die Erfüllung unserer gegenüber Ihnen bestehenden Vertragspflichten sowie unser berechtigtes Interesse. Bitte beachten Sie, dass für personenbezogene Daten, die an Partner und Händler (oder deren Dienstanbieter) weitergegeben werden, welche an einer Transaktion beteiligt sind, die eigenen Datenschutzerklärungen und Verfahren der Partner und Händler gelten.
Externe, unabhängige Datenverantwortliche
, wenn wir beispielsweise personenbezogene Daten an Kreditauskunfteien, Erwerber und andere Finanzinstitute weitergeben oder an Sicherheitsprodukte, um zu verhindern, dass Bots auf unsere Dienste zugreifen können.
Bitte beachten Sie, dass für die Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten, die Sie direkt an diese Parteien weitergeben, deren Datenschutzerklärungen gelten
. So verwenden wir beispielsweise reCAPTCHA von Google, um Missbrauch unserer Dienste zu verhindern, wenn Sie auf unsere PayPal-App zugreifen. Die
Datenschutzerklärung
und die
Nutzungsbedingungen
von Google gelten für die Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten, die Sie an Google weitergeben. Weitere Informationen zu Kreditauskunfteien, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten, um Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit zu bewerten, finden Sie in Abschnitt 12 (
Warum wir personenbezogene Daten an Kreditauskunfteien weitergeben
).
Käufer oder sonstige Weitergabe in Verbindung mit einer Geschäftsübertragung
. Wenn wir beispielsweise ein Geschäft oder Vermögenswerte veräußern, können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an einen Käufer dieses Geschäfts oder dieser Vermögenswerte weitergeben. Ebenso können personenbezogene Daten weitergegeben werden, wenn PayPal oder ein wesentlicher Teil des PayPal-Vermögens von einer dritten Partei erworben wird. PayPal hat ein berechtigtes Interesse daran, derartige Transaktionen durchführen zu können.
7. Wie lange Ihre personenbezogenen Daten von PayPal gespeichert werden
Wir speichern personenbezogene Daten so lange, wie es im Rahmen des Zwecks, für den sie erhoben wurden, und in Übereinstimmung mit dem geltenden Recht benötigt oder zulässig ist.
Die Kriterien für die Bestimmung der Aufbewahrungsfrist lauten:
Personenbezogene Daten, die für die laufende Beziehung zwischen Ihnen und PayPal genutzt werden, werden für die Dauer der Beziehung zuzüglich eines Zeitraums von zehn Jahren gespeichert
Personenbezogene Daten in Bezug auf eine rechtliche Verpflichtung, der wir unterliegen, werden im Einklang mit geltendem Recht aufbewahrt, wie z.B. gemäß geltendem Insolvenzrecht und AML-Verpflichtungen.
Wir speichern personenbezogene Daten so lange wie nötig, wenn die Aufbewahrung angesichts von Rechtsstreitigkeiten, Ermittlungen, Audit- und Compliance-Praktiken oder zum Schutz vor Rechtsansprüchen ratsam ist.
8. Internationale Übermittlung von personenbezogenen Daten
Da wir in zahlreichen Ländern tätig sind, kann es vorkommen, dass wir (oder unsere Dienstanbieter) Ihre Daten außerhalb des Landes, in dem Sie leben, übermitteln und verarbeiten. Um Ihre Daten in den Vereinigten Staaten und anderen Ländern zu verarbeiten und zu speichern, setzen wir externe Dienstanbieter ein. In den betreffenden Ländern ist nicht immer ein gleichwertiger Datenschutz gegeben. Wir haben daher konkrete Maßnahmen in Übereinstimmung mit dem Datenschutzrecht der EU und Großbritanniens getroffen, um Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zu schützen. Bei der Übermittlung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zwischen PayPal-Unternehmen stützen wir uns auf von den zuständigen Aufsichtsbehörden genehmigte bindende Unternehmensregeln (abrufbar
hier
). Andere Übermittlungen erfolgen auf der Grundlage von Standardvertragsklauseln, die von der Europäischen Kommission genehmigt wurden, damit gewährleistet ist, dass Ihre Daten einen hohen Schutzstandard genießen und Ihre Datenschutzrechte gewahrt bleiben.
9. Wie wir Cookies und Tracking-Technologien verwenden
Wenn Sie mit unseren Diensten interagieren, E-Mails öffnen, die wir Ihnen senden, oder eine Website eines Drittanbieters besuchen, für die wir Dienste bereitstellen, verwenden wir und unsere Partner Cookies und andere Tracking-Technologien wie Pixel-Tags, Web-Beacons und Widgets (zusammen „
Cookies
“), um Sie als Benutzer zu erkennen, Ihre Online-Erfahrungen und Online-Inhalte anzupassen, einschließlich um Ihnen interessenbezogene Werbung bereitzustellen, Analysen durchzuführen, Risiken zu mindern und potenziellen Betrug zu verhindern und Vertrauen und Sicherheit auf unseren Websites und Diensten zu fördern. Bestimmte Aspekte und Funktionen unserer Dienste und Websites sind nur durch die Verwendung von Cookies verfügbar. Wenn Sie also bestimmte Cookies ablehnen, kann Ihre Nutzung der Websites und Dienste eingeschränkt oder nicht möglich sein.
Wir verwenden Cookies, um Ihre Geräteinformationen, Informationen zu Internetaktivitäten und Rückschlüsse wie oben beschrieben zu sammeln.
Cookies helfen uns, Folgendes zu tun:
Ihre Daten zu speichern, damit Sie sie nicht erneut eingeben müssen
Zu verfolgen und verstehen, wie Sie unsere Online-Dienste und E-Mails nutzen und mit ihnen interagieren
Unsere Online-Dienste an Ihre Einstellungen anzupassen
Zu messen, wie nützlich und effektiv unsere Dienste und Kommunikation für Sie sind
Unsere Produkte und Dienste zu verwalten und zu verbessern
Do Not Track (DNT) ist eine optionale Browser-Einstellung, mit der Sie Ihre Präferenzen bezüglich der Nachverfolgung Ihrer Handlungen im Internet durch Werbetreibende und andere Dritte festlegen können. Derzeit sind unsere Websites nicht darauf ausgelegt, auf DNT-Signale oder ähnliche Mechanismen von Browsern zu reagieren.
Näheres zu unserer Verwendung von Cookies erfahren Sie in unserer
Erklärung zu Cookies und Tracking-Technologien
.
10. Ihre Datenschutzrechte
Nach geltendem Datenschutzrecht haben Sie bestimmte Rechte, unsere Erfassung und Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu kontrollieren. Zu Ihren Rechten gehören:
Zugriff, Berichtigung, Löschung, Widerspruch, Übertragbarkeit und Einschränkung Ihrer Informationen
Wir erkennen an, wie wichtig es ist, dass Sie die Kontrolle über die Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten haben. Daher bieten wir Ihnen verschiedene Möglichkeiten, Ihre Rechte auf Zugriff, Auskunft, Berichtigung (durch Korrektur oder Aktualisierung), Löschung, Widerspruch, Übertragbarkeit und Einschränkung der Verarbeitung ganz oder teilweise auszuüben.
Wenn Sie ein Konto haben, können Sie Ihre Datenschutzrechte ausüben, indem Sie in den Kontoeinstellungen der PayPal-App auf "Daten und Datenschutz" zugreifen. Auch ohne Konto (z.B. wenn Sie die Funktion "Zahlung ohne PayPal-Konto" nutzen) können Sie in Bezug auf Daten zu Transaktionen, die mit der Funktion "Zahlung ohne PayPal-Konto" durchgeführt wurden, Auskunft, Änderung, Berichtigung oder Löschung verlangen. Ersuchen zu den Daten einer anderen Person können Sie einreichen, indem Sie sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, sofern Sie ordnungsgemäß bevollmächtigt sind. Bitte beachten Sie, dass wir von Ihnen gegebenenfalls zusätzliche Verifizierungsinformationen anfordern.
Ihr Recht, den automatisierten Entscheidungen und der Profilerstellung zu widersprechen
Falls Sie im Rahmen der unten beschriebenen automatisierten Entscheidungen nicht zugelassen sind, haben Sie keinen Zugang zu unseren Dienstleistungen, wie beispielsweise unseren Zahlungsmethoden. PayPal verfügt über verschiedene Sicherheitsmechanismen, um die Angemessenheit der Entscheidungen zu gewährleisten. Zu diesen Mechanismen gehören laufende Überprüfungen unserer Entscheidungsmodelle und fallweise Stichproben. Wenn Sie bezüglich des Ergebnisses Bedenken haben, können Sie uns
kontaktieren
. Wir werden dann überprüfen, ob das Verfahren korrekt durchgeführt wurde.
Sie haben das Recht, einer automatisierten Entscheidung zu widersprechen, wenn deren Rechtsfolgen oder Ergebnisse geeignet sind, (zusammen mit dem entsprechenden Profiling) in sonstiger Weise erhebliche Auswirkungen auf Sie zu haben, indem Sie uns
kontaktieren
. Wir prüfen die Entscheidung sodann unter Berücksichtigung der zusätzlichen Umstände.
Zustimmung
Wenn wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten mit Ihrer Zustimmung verwenden, haben Sie im Allgemeinen das Recht, Ihre Zustimmung jederzeit zu widerrufen, ohne die Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung aufgrund der Zustimmung vor ihrem Widerruf zu beeinträchtigen.
Die Rechtmäßigkeit einer Verarbeitung, die vor Ihrem Widerruf stattgefunden hat, wird durch den Widerruf Ihrer Einwilligung nicht berührt. Das gleiche gilt für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten auf der Grundlage eines anderen Rechtsgrundes als Ihrer Einwilligung.
Widerspruchsrecht gegen Direktmarketing
Sofern wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten für Direktmarketingzwecke verwenden, können Sie jederzeit Ihre Berechtigungseinstellungen ändern, widersprechen und sich über den Abmeldelink in elektronischen Mitteilungen bzw. über Ihre Kontoeinstellungen von zukünftigen Direktmarketingnachrichten abmelden.
Widerspruchsrecht gegen die Verarbeitung berechtigter Interessen
Verwenden wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zur Verfolgung berechtigter Interessen von uns oder einem Dritten, haben Sie das Recht, der Verwendung für diesen Zweck zu widersprechen. Näheres dazu finden Sie in Abschnitt 5 (
Welche personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden und auf welchen Rechtsgrundlagen dies beruht
)
Wie nehmen Sie Ihre Rechte wahr, und wie können Sie uns oder die Datenschutzbehörde kontaktieren?
Wenn Sie aus irgendeinem Grund mit unserer Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten unzufrieden sind, haben Sie das Recht, eine Beschwerde bei der Aufsichtsbehörde für den Datenschutz in Ihrem Land einzureichen.
Unseren Datenschutzbeauftragten erreichen Sie online oder per Post unter PayPal (Europe) S.à.r.l. et Cie, S.C.A, 22-24 Boulevard Royal L-2449, Luxemburg.
Wenn Sie glauben, dass Ihre Rechte verletzt wurden, können Sie auch bei
den örtlichen Gerichten
Rechtsmittel einlegen.
Sie können auch bei der für uns zuständigen
führenden Aufsichtsbehörde für den Datenschutz
, der Nationalen Kommission für Datenschutz des Großherzogtums Luxemburg (CNPD), eine Beschwerde einreichen. Die betreffende Postanschrift lautet: Commission nationale pour la protection des données, Service des plaints, 15, Boulevard du Jazz, L-4370 Belvaux, Luxemburg.
Der Vertreter im Vereinigten Königreich kann per Post für alle Anfragen zum Datenschutz in Großbritannien bei Bird & Bird GDPR Representative UK, 12 New Fetter Lane, Holburn, London EC4A 1JP kontaktiert werden.
11. Nähere Informationen zu automatisierter Entscheidungsfindung und Profiling
"
Automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung
" ist der Prozess der vollautomatischen Entscheidungsfindung ohne menschliche Beteiligung. In einigen Fällen könnten diese Entscheidungen
rechtliche oder ähnlich erhebliche Auswirkungen
auf Sie als natürliche Person haben. "
Profiling
" bezeichnet Analysen der Persönlichkeit, des Verhaltens, des Interesses und der Gewohnheiten einer Person, um Vorhersagen oder Entscheidungen über sie zu treffen. Soweit dies nach dem Recht der EU oder der Mitgliedstaaten zulässig oder für den Abschluss oder die Erfüllung eines Vertrags erforderlich ist, können wir in einigen Fällen automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung oder Profiling für Entscheidungen verwenden. Ein Beispiel für unseren Einsatz automatisierter Entscheidungsfindung ist die Bewertung Ihrer Kreditwürdigkeit, um Ihre Eignung für bestimmte Kreditprodukte zu beurteilen.
Wir glauben, dass PayPal durch das automatische Treffen solcher Entscheidungen seine Objektivität und Transparenz bei der Entscheidung, welche Dienste Ihnen angeboten werden, erhöht. Wir setzen mehrere Sicherheitsmechanismen ein, um sicherzustellen, dass die Entscheidungen angemessen sind. Zu diesen Mechanismen gehören laufende Übersichten unserer Entscheidungsmodelle und Stichproben im Einzelfall. Sie können stattdessen jederzeit eine manuelle Entscheidungsfindung verlangen, Ihre Meinung äußern oder eine Entscheidungsfindung anfechten, die ausschließlich auf einer automatisierten Verarbeitung, einschließlich Profiling, beruht, wenn eine solche Entscheidung
rechtliche Wirkung entfaltet oder Sie in ähnlicher Weise erheblich beeinträchtigt
. Weitere Informationen darüber, wie Sie diesen Entscheidungen widersprechen können, finden Sie in Abschnitt 10
("Ihre Datenschutzrechte")
.
Wenden Sie sich
online
an unseren Datenschutzbeauftragten, wenn Sie mehr über die Nutzung von automatisierter Entscheidungsfindung oder Profiling erfahren möchten.
12. Warum wir personenbezogene Daten an Kreditauskunfteien weitergeben
Haben Sie einen Kredit beantragt oder nutzen Sie unsere Kreditdienste, können wir zur Bearbeitung Ihres Antrags Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an Kreditauskunfteien weitergeben, die uns Informationen über Sie geben, wie z.B. Ihre Finanzhistorie. Dies geschieht, um Kreditwürdigkeit und Produkteignung zu beurteilen, Ihre Identität zu überprüfen, offene Forderungen zu ermitteln und einzuziehen sowie kriminelle Handlungen zu verhindern.
Die Rechtsgrundlagen für diese Übermittlungen finden sich in Art. 6 Abs. 1 Buchstabe b (vertraglich) und Art. 6 Abs. 1 Buchstabe f (berechtigtes Interesse) der EU-Datenschutzgrundverordnung ("EU-DSGVO").
Wir werden auch weiterhin laufend Informationen über Sie mit Kreditauskunfteien austauschen, einschließlich über Ihre beglichenen Konten und alle Schulden, die nicht rechtzeitig vollständig zurückgezahlt wurden. Diese Informationen können von CRAs an andere Organisationen weitergegeben werden, um ähnliche Überprüfungen durchzuführen und Ihren Aufenthaltsort zu ermitteln und Schulden einzutreiben.
Ihre Daten werden auch mit den Daten aller gemeinsamen Bewerber oder anderer Finanzpartner verknüpft.
So erfahren Sie mehr
Wenden Sie sich
online
an unseren Datenschutzbeauftragten, wenn Sie mehr darüber erfahren möchten, welche Kreditauskunfteien wir für eine bestimmte Suche eingesetzt haben.
Hier
finden Sie die Liste der in Großbritannien und dem EWR genutzten Kreditauskunfteien, einschließlich der Identitäten der in den jeweiligen Ländern genutzten Kreditauskunfteien und eines Links zu deren Datenschutzerklärung, aus der Sie entnehmen können, wie diese personenbezogene Daten verwenden und weitergeben, einschließlich der Dauer der Speicherung dieser personenbezogenen Daten. Sie können sich an die Kreditauskunfteien, die im Land Ihres Wohnsitzes tätig sind, direkt wenden, wenn Sie Fragen zu deren Dienstleistungen, Ihrem Kreditscore oder zu den über Sie gespeicherten Daten haben. Das gleiche gilt, wenn Sie gegenüber den Kreditauskunfteien Ihre Rechte als betroffene Person ausüben möchten.
13. Wie wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten schützen
Wir führen technische, physische und administrative Sicherheitsmaßnahmen durch, um Ihre personenbezogenen Daten angemessen vor Verlust, Missbrauch, unbefugtem Zugriff, Weitergabe und Änderung zu schützen. Zu diesen Sicherheitsmaßnahmen gehören Firewalls, Datenverschlüsselung, physische Zugangsbeschränkungen für unsere Rechenzentren und Berechtigungskontrollen für den Zugriff auf Daten. Wir sorgen für die Sicherung unserer Systeme und Dienste. Für die Sicherheit und die Geheimhaltung Ihres Passworts bzw. Ihrer Passwörter und Ihres Kontoprofils bzw. Ihrer Anmeldedaten sind Sie jedoch selbst verantwortlich. Darüber hinaus liegt es in Ihrer Verantwortung zu prüfen, dass die personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über Sie besitzen, richtig und auf dem aktuellen Stand sind. Wir haften nicht für den Schutz personenbezogener Daten, die wir auf Grundlage einer von Ihnen autorisierten Kontoverknüpfung an Dritte weitergeben.
14. Können Kinder unsere Dienste nutzen?
Wir erfassen wissentlich keine Informationen, einschließlich personenbezogener Daten, von Kindern unter 16 Jahren oder anderen Personen, die rechtlich nicht in der Lage sind, unsere Websites und Dienste zu nutzen. Wenn wir tatsächliche Kenntnis davon erhalten, dass wir personenbezogene Daten von jemandem erhoben haben, der unsere Dienste nicht nutzen darf, werden wir diese unverzüglich löschen, es sei denn, wir sind gesetzlich verpflichtet, diese Daten aufzubewahren.
Bitte
kontaktieren Sie uns
, wenn Sie glauben, dass wir irrtümlich oder unbeabsichtigt Daten von jemandem erhoben haben, der zur Nutzung unserer Dienste nicht berechtigt ist.
15. Aktualisierungen dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Diese Datenschutzerklärung wird von Zeit zu Zeit überarbeitet, um Änderungen an unserer Geschäftstätigkeit, unseren Diensten oder den geltenden Gesetzen Rechnung zu tragen. Wenn nach geltendem Recht auf die überarbeitete Fassung hinzuweisen ist, informieren wir Sie 30 Tage im Voraus durch Bekanntgabe der Änderung auf der Seite
AGB-Aktualisierungen
oder der Seite
Datenschutzerklärung
. Andernfalls wird die überarbeitete Datenschutzerklärung ab dem angegebenen Startdatum wirksam.
16. Hinweis zu Bankvorschriften für Nutzer im EWR und in Großbritannien
In der Regel verlangt das luxemburgische Recht, dem PayPal (in Bezug auf Datenschutz und Bankgeheimnis) unterliegt, einen höheren Grad an Transparenz als die meisten anderen Rechtsordnungen in der EU. Im Gegensatz zu den meisten Anbietern von Internet- oder Finanzdienstleistungen in der EU listen wir daher in dieser Datenschutzerklärung die Drittanbieter und Geschäftspartner, die Dienstleistungen für uns erbringen und denen gegenüber wir Ihre Daten offenlegen, sowie den Zweck der Offenlegung und die Art der offengelegten Daten auf. Einen Link zu diesen Drittanbietern finden Sie
hier
. Dadurch, dass Sie diese Datenschutzerklärung annehmen und ein Konto bei PayPal haben, willigen Sie ausdrücklich in die Übermittlung Ihrer Daten an diese Drittanbieter für die aufgeführten Zwecke ein.
PayPal kann die oben genannte Drittanbieterliste am ersten Werktag eines jeden Quartals (d.h. im Januar, April, Juli und Oktober) aktualisieren. PayPal beginnt erst 30 Tage nach dem Datum der Veröffentlichung der Liste innerhalb der Datenschutzerklärung mit der Übermittlung von Daten an eines der in der jeweiligen Aktualisierung neu aufgeführten Unternehmen oder für die dort neu aufgeführten Zwecke oder Datentypen. Sie sollten sich in jedem Quartal zu den oben genannten Terminen auf der PayPal-Website erneut mit der Liste vertraut machen. Wenn Sie der neuen Form der Datenübertragung nicht innerhalb von 30 Tagen nach Veröffentlichung der aktualisierten Drittanbieterliste widersprechen, gelten die Änderungen der Liste und dieser Datenschutzerklärung als von Ihnen angenommen. Sind Sie mit den Änderungen nicht einverstanden, steht es Ihnen frei, Ihr Konto zu schließen und unsere Dienste nicht mehr zu nutzen.
Um die PayPal-Dienste bereitstellen zu können, müssen wir möglicherweise bestimmte Daten, die wir (wie in dieser Datenschutzerklärung dargelegt) erhoben haben, an andere mit PayPal verbundene Unternehmen oder sonstige Stellen übermitteln, einschließlich solcher, die gemäß diesem Abschnitt eine Funktion als Zahlungsdienstleister, Zahlungsanbieter oder Kontoinhaber (oder ähnliche Funktionen) erfüllen. Sie erkennen an, dass diese Stellen in ihren jeweiligen Rechtsordnungen Gesetzen, Vorschriften, Untersuchungen, Ermittlungen oder Anordnungen unterworfen sein können, durch die sie zur Weitergabe von Daten an die zuständigen Behörden des betreffenden Landes verpflichtet sind. Durch die Nutzung der PayPal-Dienste willigen Sie in die Übermittlung solcher Daten durch uns zum Zweck der Bereitstellung der PayPal-Dienste an Sie ein.
Insbesondere stimmen Sie allen folgenden Datenverarbeitungsmaßnahmen zu und weisen PayPal an, diese vorzunehmen:
a. Offenlegung notwendiger Informationen gegenüber der Polizei und anderen Strafverfolgungsbehörden, Sicherheitskräften, zuständigen staatlichen, zwischenstaatlichen oder überstaatlichen Stellen, zuständigen Behörden, Abteilungen, Aufsichtsbehörden, Selbstregulierungsbehörden oder -organisationen (einschließlich der
hier
im Abschnitt "Behörden" der Drittanbieterliste genannten Stellen) und anderen Dritten, einschließlich Unternehmen der PayPal-Gruppe, (i) deren Weisungen wir gesetzlich verpflichtet und befugt sind, einzuhalten, unter anderem aufgrund der luxemburgischen Gesetze vom 24. Juli 2015 über das US-amerikanische Gesetz zur Einhaltung der Steuervorschriften für Auslandskonten ("FATCA-Gesetz") und vom 18. Dezember 2015 über die einvernehmlich festgelegten Standards für die Berichterstattung der OECD ("CRS-Gesetz"), (ii) bei denen wir Grund zu der Annahme haben, dass die Kooperation mit ihnen bei der Untersuchung von Betrugsfällen oder sonstigen tatsächlichen oder mutmaßlichen widerrechtlichen Aktivitäten geboten ist, oder (iii) zur Ermittlung von Verstößen gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen (dies gilt auch für Ihre Zahlungsquelle oder Ihren Kredit- oder Debitkartenanbieter).
Wenn Sie in den Geltungsbereich des FATCA- oder des CRS-Gesetzes fallen, sind wir dazu verpflichtet, Sie über die Weitergabe von Daten an die jeweiligen Behörden zu unterrichten. Informieren Sie sich über die Verpflichtungen von PayPal nach dem FATCA- und dem CRS-Gesetz sowie darüber, welche Auswirkungen diese Verpflichtungen für Sie haben können und welche Informationen wir gegebenenfalls im Zuge dieser Verpflichtungen weitergeben.
Wir und weitere Organisationen, einschließlich von Unternehmen, die Zahlungen über PayPal akzeptieren, können notwendige Daten (darunter auch Daten, die von Betrugsbekämpfungsstellen aufgezeichnet wurden, und Daten aus anderen Ländern) zum Zwecke der Bewertung und Verwaltung von Risiken (wie z.B. zur Verhinderung von Betrug, Geldwäsche und Terrorismusfinanzierung) weitergeben, nutzen und auf sie zugreifen. Bitte wenden Sie sich an uns, wenn Sie weitere Informationen über die jeweiligen Betrugsbekämpfungsstellen wünschen. Klicken Sie
hier
, um weitere Informationen zu diesen Behörden, den Betrugsbekämpfungsstellen und sonstigen Dritten zu erhalten.
b. Offenlegung von Kontoinformationen gegenüber Inhabern von geistigem Eigentum, wenn diese nach dem maßgeblichen nationalen Recht eines EU-Mitgliedstaates einen außergerichtlichen Auskunftsanspruch gegen PayPal aufgrund einer Verletzung ihrer geistigen Eigentumsrechte haben, bei der PayPal-Dienste genutzt wurden (zum Beispiel § 19, Absatz 2, Unterabsatz 3 des deutschen Markengesetzes oder § 101, Absatz 2, Unterabsatz 3 des deutschen Urheberrechtsgesetzes).
c. Obligatorische Offenlegung aufgrund von Kreditkartenbestimmungen oder in straf- oder zivilrechtlichen Verfahren.
d. Offenlegung Ihres Namens und PayPal-Links im PayPal-Benutzerverzeichnis. Ihre Daten werden anderen PayPal-Kunden angezeigt, wenn diese eine Suche anhand Ihres Namens, Ihrer E-Mail-Adresse oder Telefonnummer oder eines Teils dieser Angaben durchführen. Dadurch soll sichergestellt werden, dass Zahlungen an den richtigen Empfänger erfolgen. Diese Funktion kann in den PayPal-Profileinstellungen deaktiviert werden.
e. Nutzen Sie als Händler einen Dritten für den Zugriff auf PayPal oder die Integration von PayPal, können wir notwendige Informationen an diesen Dritten zur Umsetzung und Verwaltung der betreffenden Vereinbarungen weitergeben (darunter den Status Ihrer PayPal-Integration, ob Sie ein aktives PayPal-Konto haben und ob Sie bereits mit einem anderen PayPal-Integrationspartner arbeiten).
f. Offenlegung notwendiger Daten gegenüber Zahlungsanbietern, Wirtschaftsprüfern, Kundenservice-Anbietern, Kreditauskunfteien und Betrugsbekämpfungsstellen, Anbietern von Finanzprodukten, Handelspartnern, Marketing- und PR-Unternehmen, Anbietern von operativen Dienstleistungen, Konzerngesellschaften, Agenturen, Marktplätzen und sonstigen Dritten, die
hier
aufgeführt sind. Zweck der Offenlegung ist die Bereitstellung der PayPal-Dienste an Sie. In der Drittanbieterliste haben wir außerdem unter jeder Kategorie nicht abschließende Beispiele von Drittanbietern (einschließlich deren Abtretungsempfängern und Rechtsnachfolgern) aufgeführt, gegenüber denen eine Offenlegung Ihrer Kontoinformationen derzeit tatsächlich stattfindet oder in Betracht gezogen werden kann. Neben dem Zweck der Offenlegung haben wir auch die offengelegten Informationen angegeben (soweit nicht anders angegeben, ist es diesen Drittanbietern gesetzlich bzw. vertraglich untersagt, die Informationen für einen anderen als den vorgesehenen Zweck zu nutzen).
g. Offenlegung erforderlicher Daten gegenüber Ihren Vertretern bzw. Verfahrensbevollmächtigten (z.B. dem Inhaber einer von Ihnen erteilten Vollmacht oder einem für Sie bestellten Vormund).
h. Offenlegung von zusammengefassten Statistikdaten an unsere Geschäftspartner oder PR-Partner. Wir können beispielsweise offenlegen, dass ein bestimmter Prozentsatz unserer Kunden in einer bestimmten Stadt lebt. Diese zusammengefassten Daten enthalten keine personenbezogenen Daten.
i. Weitergabe notwendiger Kontoinformationen an nicht mit uns verbundene (
hier
aufgeführte) Drittanbieter zu folgenden Zwecken:
Betrugsprävention und Risikosteuerung: Prävention von Betrug sowie Bewertung und Steuerung von Risiken.
Kundenservice: zu Zwecken des Kundenservice, einschließlich der Betreuung Ihrer Konten oder zur Klärung von Konflikten (z.B. in Bezug auf Rechnungen oder Transaktionen).
Versand: im Zusammenhang mit dem Versand und darauf bezogenen Dienstleistungen bei Käufen, die mit PayPal getätigt wurden.
Einhaltung gesetzlicher Vorschriften: zur Unterstützung der Verifizierungsanforderungen bei der Bekämpfung von Geldwäsche und Terrorismusfinanzierung.
Dienstleister: um die mit uns vertraglich verbundenen Dienstleister in die Lage zu versetzen, uns bei geschäftlichen Vorgängen wie z.B. Betrugsprävention, Inkassomaßnahmen, Marketing, Kundenservice und Technologiedienstleistungen zu unterstützen. Diese Dienstleister werden von uns vertraglich verpflichtet, Ihre Daten nur für die Dienstleistungen zu verwenden, die sie für uns erbringen, nicht jedoch zu ihrem eigenen Nutzen.
17. Begriffsbestimmungen
Gerätedaten bezieht sich auf Daten, die automatisch von einem beliebigen Gerät erfasst werden können, das für den Zugriff auf die Seite oder Dienste verwendet wird. Zu diesen Daten gehören unter anderem Ihr Gerätetyp, die Netzwerkverbindungen Ihres Geräts, Name und IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, Informationen zum Webbrowser Ihres Geräts und zur Internetverbindung, mit denen Sie auf die Seiten oder Dienste zugreifen, Geolokalisierungsdaten, Informationen zu Apps, die auf Ihr Gerät heruntergeladen wurden, sowie biometrische Daten.
Geolokalisierungsinformationen sind Informationen, die Ihren Standort mit präziser Genauigkeit identifizieren, indem sie beispielsweise Längen- und Breitengradkoordinaten verwenden, die Sie über Ihr GPS oder Ihre Geräteeinstellungen erhalten.
Standortinformationen sind Informationen, die mit angemessener Genauigkeit Ihren ungefähren Standort identifizieren, indem beispielsweise Längen- und Breitengradkoordinaten verwendet werden, die durch GPS oder Wi-Fi oder Triangulation von Mobilfunkstandorten erhalten werden.
Partner bezeichnet den Händler oder das Unternehmen, mit dem unsere Benutzer Geschäfte tätigen, um Waren oder Dienstleistungen zu erhalten.
Bezahlen ohne PayPal-Konto hat dieselbe Bedeutung wie in den
Nutzungsbedingungen für Zahlungen ohne PayPal-Konto
.
PayPal-Unternehmen bedeuten Unternehmen, die Sich im Besitz von PayPal befinden und personenbezogene Daten gemäß ihren Nutzungsbedingungen und Datenschutzrichtlinien verarbeiten. PayPal Unternehmen sind Honey Science LLC, Paidy Inc., Happy Returns, LLC, HyperWallet und Braintree.
Personenbezogene Daten bezeichnet Informationen, die einer identifizierten oder direkt oder indirekt identifizierbaren natürlichen Person zugeordnet werden können. Zu "personenbezogenen Daten" zählen beispielsweise Name, Postanschrift (einschließlich Rechnungs- und Lieferadresse), Telefonnummer, E-Mail-Adresse, Zahlungskartennummer, sonstige Kontoinformationen, Kontonummer, Geburtsdatum, Daten aus amtlichen Ausweisen (z.B. Führerscheinnummer, Personalausweisnummer, Reisepassnummer) und biometrische Daten.
Verarbeitung bezeichnet jede Methode oder Art und Weise, wie wir mit personenbezogenen Daten oder Sätzen personenbezogener Daten umgehen, sei es durch automatisierte Mittel, wie z.B. durch Erhebung, Aufzeichnung, Kategorisierung, Strukturierung, Speicherung, Anpassung oder Änderung, Abruf und Konsultation, Verwendung, Offenlegung durch Übertragung, Verbreitung oder anderweitige Bereitstellung, Abgleich oder Kombination, Einschränkung, Löschung oder Vernichtung von personenbezogenen Daten.
Dienste bezeichnet alle Zahlungsdienste mit oder ohne die Markenbezeichnung "PayPal", die Funktion "Bezahlen ohne PayPal-Konto", Kreditprodukte und -dienste, Inhalte, Merkmale, Technologien oder Funktionen sowie alle zugehörigen Websites, Anwendungen und Dienste, die Ihnen von PayPal angeboten werden. Zur Nutzung der Dienste zählt auch die Nutzung unserer Website.
Seiten bezieht sich auf die Websites, mobilen Apps, offiziellen Social-Media-Plattformen oder andere Online-Tools, über die PayPal die Dienste anbietet und die diese Datenschutzerklärung veröffentlicht haben oder mit ihr verlinkt sind.
Markenlose Zahlungsdienste bedeutet, dass Sie mit Händlern interagieren und Zahlungen an diese leisten, indem Sie unsere Kartenzahlungsdienste verwenden, die nicht die Marke PayPal tragen.
Nutzer ist jede Person, die die Dienste als Verbraucher für den persönlichen oder Haushaltsgebrauch nutzt. Für die Zwecke dieser Mitteilung enthält "Benutzer" "Sie" und "Ihr".
18. Unsere Kontaktdaten
Unseren Datenschutzbeauftragten erreichen Sie
online
oder offline unter PayPal (Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A, 22-24 Boulevard Royal L-2449, Luxemburg.
Wenn Sie
Einwohner des Vereinigten Königreichs
sind, wenden Sie sich an unseren Vertreter bei Bird & Bird GDPR Representative UK, 12 New Fetter Lane, Holburn, London EC4A 1JP.
Klicken Sie
hier
, um uns wegen Ihres PayPal-Kontos oder des PayPal-Kundenservices zu kontaktieren.
Klicken Sie
hier
, um uns wegen Ihres Xoom-Kontos oder des Xoom-Kundenservices zu kontaktieren.
Sub-policy 7
https://www.shopify.com/legal/privacy:
Skip to Content
Updated March 2, 2023
Privacy Policy
How Shopify handles your data
Table of Contents
Introduction
Our values
Why we process your information
Your rights over your information
Where we send your information
How long do we retain your information
Our use of Machine Learning
How we protect your information
How we use “cookies” and other tracking technologies
How you can reach us
United States Regional Privacy Notice
Introduction
In our mission to make commerce better for everyone at Shopify, we collect and use information about you, our
merchants using Shopify
to power your business
customers
who shop at a Shopify-powered business
partners
who develop apps for merchants to use, build stores on behalf of merchants, refer potential entrepreneurs to Shopify, or otherwise help merchants operate or improve their Shopify-powered business
users of Shopify apps
and services like
Shop
or
Shop Pay
visitors to
Shopify’s websites
, or anyone contacting
Shopify support
This Privacy Policy will help you better understand how we collect, use, and share your personal information. If we change our privacy practices, we may update this privacy policy. If any changes are significant, we will let you know (for example, through the Shopify admin or by email).
Our values
Trust is the foundation of the Shopify platform and includes trusting us to do the right thing with your information. Three main values guide us as we develop our products and services. These values should help you better understand how we think about your information and privacy.
Your information belongs to you
We carefully analyze what types of information we need to provide our services, and we try to limit the information we collect to only what we really need. Where possible, we delete or anonymize this information when we no longer need it. When building and improving our products, our engineers work closely with our privacy and security teams to build with privacy in mind. In all of this work our guiding principle is that your information belongs to you, and we aim to only use your information to your benefit.
We protect your information from others
If a third party requests your personal information, we will refuse to share it unless you give us permission or we are legally required. When we are legally required to share your personal information, we will tell you in advance, unless we are legally forbidden.
We help merchants and partners meet their privacy obligations
Many of the merchants and partners using Shopify do not have the benefit of a dedicated privacy team, and it is important to us to help them meet their privacy obligations. To do this, we try to build our products and services so they can easily be used in a privacy-friendly way. We also provide detailed FAQs and documentation covering the most important privacy topics, and respond to privacy-related questions we receive.
Why we process your information
We generally process your information when we need to do so to fulfill a contractual obligation (for example, to process your subscription payments to use the Shopify platform), or where we or someone we work with needs to use your personal information for a reason related to their business (for example, to provide you with a service). Laws in the European Economic Area (“EEA”) and in the United Kingdom (“UK”) call these reasons “legitimate interests.” These “legitimate interests” include:
preventing risk and fraud
answering questions or providing other types of support
helping merchants find and use apps through our app store
providing and improving our products and services
providing reporting and analytics
testing out features or additional services
assisting with marketing, advertising, or other communications
We only process personal information for these “legitimate interests” after considering the potential risks to your privacy and balancing any risks with certain measures—for example, by providing clear transparency into our privacy practices, offering you control over your personal information where appropriate, limiting the information we keep, limiting what we do with your information, who we send your information to, how long we keep your information, or the technical measures we use to protect your information.
We may also process your personal information where you have provided your consent. In particular, where we cannot rely on an alternative legal basis for processing, where you direct us to transfer information to a third party, where we receive your data from a third party is sourced and it already comes with consent or where we are required by law to ask for your consent (including in the context of some of our sales and marketing activities). At any time, you have a right to withdraw your consent by changing your communication choices, opting out from our communications or by contacting us.
Depending on whether you are a merchant, customer, partner, user or visitor, please refer to our supplemental privacy policies, as relevant, to understand our purposes for processing, categories of recipients and legal basis for processing for each type of personal data.
Your rights over your information
We believe you should be able to access and control your personal information no matter where you live. Depending on how you use Shopify, you may have the right to request access to, correct, amend, delete, port to another service provider, restrict, or object to certain uses of your personal information. We will not charge you more or provide you with a different level of service if you exercise any of these rights. Please note that a number of these rights apply only in certain circumstances, and all of these rights may be limited by law.
If you buy something from or otherwise provide your information to a Shopify-powered store and wish to exercise these rights over information about your purchase or interaction, you need to directly contact the merchant you interacted with. We are a processor and process information on their behalf. We will of course help our merchants to fulfill these requests to the extent required by law, such as by giving them the tools to do so and by answering their questions.
If you are a merchant, partner, Shop user, Shopify employee, website visitor or other individual that Shopify has a direct relationship with, please submit your data subject request through our
online portal
. Please note that if you send us a request relating to your personal information, we have to make sure that it is you before we can respond. In order to do so, we may use a third party to collect and verify identification documents. Further information about rights available to US residents can be found below under the header “United States Regional Privacy Notice”.
If you are not happy with our response to a request, you can contact us to resolve the issue. If you are located in the EEA or UK, you also have the right to lodge a complaint with your local data protection or privacy authority at any time.
Finally, because there is no common understanding about what a
“Do Not Track”
signal is supposed to mean, we don’t respond to those signals in any particular way.
Where we send your information
We are a Canadian company, but we work with and process data about individuals across the world. To operate our business, we may send your personal information outside of your state, province, or country, including to the United States. This data may be subject to the laws of the countries where we send it. We take steps to protect your information when we send your information across borders.
Depending on whether you are a merchant, customer, partner, user or visitor, please refer to our supplemental privacy policies, as relevant.
Transfers outside of Europe and Switzerland
If you are located in the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland, your personal information is controlled by our Irish affiliate, Shopify International Ltd. Your information is then sent to other Shopify locations and to service providers who may be located in other regions, including Canada (where we are based) and the United States. When we send your personal information outside of the EEA, UK or Switzerland, we do so in accordance with applicable law.
If you are in the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland, when we send your personal information to Canada it is protected under Canadian law, which the European Commission has found adequately protects your information. If we then send this personal information outside of Canada (for example, when we send this information to our
Subprocessors
), this information is protected by contractual commitments that are comparable to those provided in the
Standard Contractual Clauses.
Finally, while we do what we can to protect your information, we may at times be legally required to disclose your personal information (for example, if we receive a valid court order). For information about how we respond to such orders, please review our
Guidelines for Legal Requests
.
How long do we retain your information
We will retain your personal data only for as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which we have collected it. To determine the appropriate retention period, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of your personal data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your personal data, the purposes for which we process your personal data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means and the applicable legal requirements. We will also retain and use your personal information to the extent necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes and enforce our policies. If you stop using our services or if you delete your account with us, we will delete your information or store your information in an aggregated and anonymized format.
Depending on whether you are a merchant, customer, partner, user or visitor, please refer to our supplemental privacy policies, as relevant, for further details on the retention of your personal information.
Our use of Machine Learning
One of the ways in which we are able to help merchants using Shopify is by using techniques like “machine learning” (some laws, including certain EEA and UK laws, may refer to this as “automated decision-making”) to help us improve our services. When we use machine learning, we either: (1) still have a human being involved in the process (and so are not fully automated); or (2) use machine learning in ways that don’t have legal or similarly significant effects (for example, reordering how apps might appear when you visit the app store).
How we protect your information
Our teams work tirelessly to protect your information, and to ensure the security and integrity of our platform. We also have independent auditors assess the security of our data storage and systems that process financial information. However, we all know that no method of transmission over the Internet, and method of electronic storage, can be 100% secure. This means we cannot guarantee the absolute security of your personal information. You can find more information about our security measures at
/ie/security
.
How we use “cookies” and other tracking technologies
We use
cookies
and similar tracking technologies on our website and when providing our services. For more information about how we use these technologies, including a list of other companies that place cookies on our sites, a list of cookies that we place when we power a merchant’s store, and an explanation of how you can opt out of certain types of cookies, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
How you can reach us
If you would like to ask about, make a request relating to, or complain about how we process your personal information, please contact
Shopify Support
, or mail us at one of the addresses below. If you would like to submit a legally binding request to demand someone else’s personal information (for example, if you have a subpoena or court order), please review our
Guidelines for Legal Requests
.
If you are a merchant, partner, Shop user, Shopify employee, website visitor or other individual that Shopify has a direct relationship with and you are located in the EEA or UK, Shopify International Ltd is the controller of your personal data. If you buy something from or otherwise provide your information to a Shopify-powered store, the merchant is your data controller and we are acting as a processor on their behalf.
If you have questions about how a merchant or store processes your personal information, you should contact the merchant or visit their privacy policy.
Shopify Commerce Singapore Pte. Ltd.
Attn: Data Protection Officer
77 Robinson Road,
#13-00 Robinson 77,
Singapore 068896
If you are located in the EEA, the UK, the Middle East, South America, or Africa:
Shopify International Ltd.
Attn: Data Protection Officer
c/o Intertrust Ireland
2nd Floor 1-2 Victoria Buildings
Haddington Road
Dublin 4, D04 XN32
Ireland
If you are located in Asia, Australia, or New Zealand:
Shopify Commerce Singapore Pte. Ltd.
Attn: Data Protection Officer
77 Robinson Road,
#13-00 Robinson 77,
Singapore 068896
United States Regional Privacy Notice
This United States Regional Privacy Notice (“US Notice”) supplements our Privacy Policy and all supplemental privacy policies on
www.shopify.com
(together, the “Shopify Privacy Policies”).
This US Notice is for individuals residing in certain US states and is designed to help you better understand how we collect, use, and disclose your personal information and, depending on how you use Shopify and where you reside, how to exercise available rights under various applicable privacy laws in the US, specifically the California Consumer Privacy Act, the Colorado Privacy Act, the Connecticut Act Concerning Personal Data Privacy and Online Monitoring, the Utah Consumer Privacy Act, and the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (collectively, the “US Privacy Laws”).
What information we collect and share about you
To provide our apps and services to you, we must process information about you, including personal information.
We do not “sell” your personal information as that term is defined under US Privacy Laws.
Here is a summary of the categories of personal information we may have collected about you over the past 12 months and with whom we may have disclosed that information to, depending on how you use Shopify.
Categories of personal information collected
Recipients of personal information
Identifiers, including name, email address, mailing address, phone number;
Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute, including name, mailing and billing address, phone number, credit or debit card information;
Commercial information, including products you purchase, place in your shopping cart, favorite or review (if you are a customer) and information you provide us about you and your business (if you are a merchant);
Photos and videos, which may include face imagery, if you choose to provide them.
Internet or other electronic network activity information, including information regarding the device and browser you use, network connection, IP address, and how you browse through our apps and sites;
Geolocation data, including your mailing and billing address;
Inferences, or information derived from other personal information about you, which could include your preferences, interests, and other information used to personalize your experience;
Other information you provide; and
Sensitive personal information, which may include:
Government-issued identifiers, including social security, driver’s license, state identification card, or passport number;
Your account access credentials (such as account log-in, financial account, debit or credit card number in combination with any required security access code, password, or credentials allowing access to an account);
Your device’s precise location (if you are a Shop App user, but only when you allow Shop to access this information);
Information you voluntarily disclose that may reveal certain characteristics about you such as your racial or ethnic origin or sexual orientation
The contents of email messages in the email inboxes that you connect to your Shop account, and information from email messages you transfer to the app to be included in your order history (if you use Shop).
Companies who help us provide you with our services, including cloud storage providers, payment processors, fulfillment partners, security vendors, email providers, marketplaces and data analytics vendors;
Advertisers and marketing vendors;
Merchants whose shops you visit or make purchases from;
Partners who provide a range of services to merchants, such as by developing apps or themes for use by merchants, serving as an affiliate that refers potential merchants to us, or helping merchants build or manage stores;
Law enforcement or other third parties in connection with legal requests, to comply with applicable law or to prevent harm.
Why we collect and share your Personal Information
We use and share your personal information for the purposes set out in the Shopify Privacy Policies. For categories of sensitive personal information that we collect, we only use or disclose such information either with your specific consent when required, or as otherwise permitted by law.
Sources of Personal Information
To make commerce better for everyone at Shopify, we collect and use personal information provided by:
You: We collect the information you provide when you use our platform, including when you sign up for Shopify as a merchant, visit a Shopify-powered store, fill in order information, visit one of Shopify’s websites or contact Shopify support. We collect account and payment information you provide to us (including information about your business if you are a merchant), Shopify stores or items you save to favorites, purchases you make, reviews you post, and how you otherwise interact or communicate with stores or other users on our apps or services. We also collect information about how you browse through our apps and sites, including search terms you may enter.
Your device(s): We collect information from and about the devices you use, including computers, phones, and other web-connected devices you use to access our apps or services, and we combine this information across different devices you use.
Third parties: We receive information from partners who help us provide you with our services including the following:
Email providers. If you use the Shop App and you connect your third party inboxes, such as Gmail or Outlook (according to their terms and policies and as permitted by applicable law), we receive information to identify shopping-related emails and display within Shop information about specific orders you have made, stores you have engaged with in the past, and other related information.
Service Providers. We receive information from our service providers, who help us provide services to our merchants, like reviewing accounts for fraud or other concerns.
Marketplaces. If you use the Shop App, we receive information about purchases you have made from other marketplaces or platforms, such as Amazon, that you choose to connect through Shop. This information helps us to provide and improve Shop, to personalize your experience using our apps and services, and to determine if you are eligible for specific offers or payment methods.
Subprocessors. We work with third party subprocessors for cloud hosting, content delivery, data analysis, internal logging, fulfillment services and email transmission, among others, to provide you with our services. For more information, see Shopify’s subprocessors.
Analytics and cookie providers. We receive information through our use of cookies, social plugins (such as the Facebook “like” button), pixels and tags for business purposes, such as providing information to help measure how users interact with our website content. For more information about how we use these technologies, see our Cookie Policy.
How long we keep your information
Because we need your personal information to provide Shopify services, we generally keep your personal information, including sensitive personal information, while you use Shopify products or services or until you tell us to delete your information. We may also keep personal information to comply with legal obligations or protect our or other’s interests.
If you are a merchant operating a Shopify-powered store, and you close the store, stop paying your subscription fees, or we terminate your account, we retain store information for two years before we begin the deletion process.
When you visit or make a purchase from a merchant’s Shopify-powered store, we act as a service provider or processor for the merchant, and the merchant, not Shopify, decides how long your information is retained.
Your rights over your information
Depending on where you live, how you use Shopify, and subject to certain exceptions, you may have some or all of the following rights:
Right to Know: The right to request that we disclose to you the personal information we collect, use, or disclose about you, and information about our data practices.
Right to Request Correction: The right to request that we correct inaccurate personal information that we maintain about you.
Right to Request Deletion: The right to request that we delete personal information that we have collected about you.
To exercise your rights, including the “right to know” and “right to delete,” please submit a request through our online portal. If you use Shop or Shop Pay, please visit
https://shop.app/delete-account
for instructions on how to request deletion of your information.
If you have visited or made a purchase from a merchant’s Shopify-powered store, please contact the specific merchant directly. If you make a request to us, we will forward your request to the relevant merchant.
Please note that to protect your information and the integrity of our products and services, we may need to verify your identity before processing your request. In some cases we may need to collect additional information to verify your identity, such as your email address or a government issued ID.
Under US Privacy Laws, you may also designate an authorized agent to make these requests on your behalf. If you use an authorized agent to submit a request, we may need to collect additional information, such as a government issued ID, to verify your identity before processing your request to protect your information.
For information on the CCPA requests we have received, please see here. In certain states, you may have the right to appeal our decision regarding a request related to these rights. If you wish to appeal a decision, please contact Shopify Support.
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of these rights.
How you can reach us
If you would like to ask about or have concerns about how we process your personal information, please contact Shopify Support. If you want to make a request relating to your personal information, please contact us using the methods set out in the section immediately above.
We use cookies (and other similar technologies) for many purposes, including to improve your experience on our site and for ads and analytics. Click "Accept all" to accept these uses. Read more in our
Cookie Policy
.
Reject all
Accept all
Sub-policy 8
https://stripe.com/de/privacy:
Stripe-Rahmenvertrag
Stripe Connect
Plattformvereinbarung
Kontovereinbarung
Produkte und Programme
Stripe Atlas
Stripe Adaptive Pricing
Stripe Climate
Climate-Nutzungsbedingungen
Stripe Corporate Card
Stripe-Kundenportal
Stripe Data Pipeline
Stripe Financial Connections
Stripe Identity
Stripe Issuing
Stripe Tax
Stripe-Ecosystem für Partner
Stripe Radar
Stripe-Prämien
Stripe-Verifizierungen
Stripe Shop
Stripe Terminal
Terminal-Einkaufskonditionen
Terminal-Konditionen für Wiederverkäufer
EULA für Stripe Terminal-Gerät
Stripe Treasury – verbundene Konten
Stripe Treasury – Plattformen
Stripe Tresor und Forward
Finanzbedingungen
Offenlegung durch Acquirer (Händlerbank)
Stripe Payments Company
PNC Bank
Konditionen für Zahlungsmethoden
Eingeschränkte und untersagte Geschäfte
Datenschutz
Datenschutzerklärung
Cookie-Richtlinie
Datenschutz-Framework
Dienstanbieterliste
Datenverarbeitungsvereinbarung
Internationale Datenübermittlung – Nachtrag
Datenschutzcenter von Stripe
Geistiges Eigentum
Geistiges Eigentum – Hinweis
Marks-Nutzung
Stripe-Apps
Vereinbarung für App-Entwickler/innen
App-Marktplatz-Vereinbarung
Lizenzen
Bedingungen für Verbraucher/innen
Dies ist eine ausschließlich zu Informationszwecken bereitgestellte Übersetzung der Datenschutzerklärung. Rechtliche Gültigkeit besitzt einzig und allein die Originalerklärung, die in englischer Sprache vorliegt.
Zuletzt aktualisiert:  16. Januar 2024.
Unsere Zusammenfassung der Aktualisierungen finden Sie hier.
Diese Datenschutzrichtlinie enthält wichtige Informationen über Ihre personenbezogenen Daten und wir empfehlen Ihnen, diese sorgfältig zu lesen.
Willkommen
Wir stellen die Finanzinfrastruktur für das Internet bereit. Einzelpersonen und Unternehmen jeder Größe nutzen unsere Technologie und Dienstleistungen, um Einkäufe zu vereinfachen, Zahlungen zu akzeptieren, Auszahlungen vorzunehmen und das Online-Geschäft zu verwalten.
Diese Datenschutzerklärung („Erklärung“) beschreibt die personenbezogenen Daten, die wir erheben, wie wir sie verwenden und weitergeben, sowie Einzelheiten darüber, wie Sie sich bei Fragen zum Datenschutz an uns wenden können. Darüber hinaus werden in der Erklärung Ihre Rechte als betroffene Person und die Ihnen zur Verfügung stehenden Wahlmöglichkeiten dargelegt, einschließlich des Rechts, bestimmten Verwendungen Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch uns zu widersprechen. Weitere Informationen über unsere Datenschutzpraktiken, einschließlich unserer ergänzenden US-Hinweise, finden Sie in unserem
Datenschutzcenter
.
In dieser Erklärung bezieht sich „Stripe“, „wir“, „unser“ oder „uns“ auf das Stripe-Unternehmen, das für die Erhebung, Nutzung und Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten wie in diesem Dokument beschrieben verantwortlich ist. Das für Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verantwortliche Stripe-Unternehmen kann je nach Rechtsordnung variieren.
Mehr erfahren
.
„Personenbezogene Daten“ bezieht sich auf alle Informationen, die mit einer identifizierten oder identifizierbaren Person assoziiert sind, einschließlich der Daten, die Sie uns zur Verfügung stellen und die wir über Sie während Ihrer Interaktion mit unseren Diensten erheben (beispielsweise Geräteinformationen, IP-Adresse usw.).
„Dienste“ bezieht sich auf die von Stripe gemäß dem Stripe-Rahmenvertrag und den Nutzungsbedingungen für Verbraucher/innen bereitgestellten Produkte und Dienste. Dies kann Geräte und Anwendungen umfassen, die von Stripe bereitgestellt werden. Unsere „Geschäftsdienstleistungen“ sind Dienstleistungen, die wir für Unternehmen („Geschäftskunden“) erbringen, die uns direkt und indirekt personenbezogene Daten von „Endkundinnen“ und „Endkunden“ in Verbindung mit ihren eigenen Geschäftsabläufen und Aktivitäten liefern. Unsere „Endkundendienste“ richten sich direkt an Einzelpersonen zur persönlichen Nutzung. „Websites“ bezieht sich auf Stripe.com, Link.com und andere Websites, Anwendungen und Online-Dienste von Stripe. Zusammenfassend bezeichnen wir Websites, Geschäftsdienstleistungen und Endkundendienste als „Dienste“.
„Finanzpartner“ sind Finanzinstitute, Banken und andere Partner wie Acquirer von Zahlungsmethoden, Zahlungsdienstleister und Kartennetzwerke, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten, um Dienste bereitzustellen.
Je nach Kontext bedeutet „Sie“ Endkundin/Endkunde, Endnutzer/in, Vertreter/in oder Besucher/in:
Wenn Sie einen Endkundendienst für Ihren persönlichen Gebrauch nutzen, beispielsweise wenn Sie sich für Link anmelden, bezeichnen wir Sie als „Endnutzer/in”.
Wenn Sie mit einem Geschäftskunden in Geschäftsbeziehung treten oder anderweitig eine Transaktion mit einem Geschäftskunden durchführen, indem Sie beispielsweise ein Paar Schuhe von einem Geschäftskunden kaufen, der Stripe Checkout für die Zahlungsabwicklung nutzt, aber keine direkte Transaktion mit Stripe durchführen, bezeichnen wir Sie als „Endkundin/Endkunde.”
Wenn Sie im Namen eines bestehenden oder potenziellen Geschäftskunden handeln (beispielsweise als Unternehmensgründer, Kontoverwalter für einen Geschäftskunden oder als Empfänger einer Mitarbeiter-Kreditkarte eines Geschäftskunden über Stripe Issuing), kategorisieren wir Sie als „Vertreter/in”.
Wenn Sie mit Stripe durch den Besuch einer Website interagieren, ohne in einem Stripe-Konto angemeldet zu sein, oder wenn Sie an Ihrer Interaktion mit Stripe nicht als Endnutzer/in, Endkunde/Endkundin oder Vertreter/in beteiligt sind, betrachten wir Sie als „Besucher/in“. Sie sind zum Beispiel Besucher/in, wenn Sie eine Nachricht an Stripe senden und um weitere Informationen über unsere Dienstleistungen bitten.
In dieser Erklärung bezieht sich „Transaktionsdaten“ auf Daten, die von Stripe erhoben und verwendet werden, um von Ihnen gewünschte Transaktionen auszuführen. Bei bestimmten Transaktionsdaten handelt es sich um personenbezogene Daten, die Folgendes umfassen können: Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, Ihre Kontaktnummer, Ihre Rechnungs- und Versandadresse, Informationen zur Zahlungsmethode (beispielsweise Kredit- oder Debitkartennummer, Bankverbindung oder das von Ihnen gewählte Zahlungskartenbild), Angaben zum Händler und zum Standort, Betrag und Datum des Kaufs sowie in einigen Fällen Informationen über den gekauften Artikel.
Je nach Aktivität übernimmt Stripe die Rolle eines „Datenverantwortlichen“ und/oder „Auftragsverarbeiters“ (oder „Dienstleisters“) aufgrund dieser Aktivität. Zusätzliche Informationen zu unserer Rolle, zu dem für diese Erklärung verantwortlichen Stripe-Unternehmen und zu unseren Rechtsgrundlagen für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten finden Sie in unserem
Datenschutzcenter
.
Personenbezogene Daten, die wir erheben, und wie wir sie verwenden und weitergeben
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
Rechtsgrundlagen für die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten
Ihre Rechte und Wahlmöglichkeiten
Sicherheit und Aufbewahrung
Internationale Datenübermittlung
Aktualisierungen und Benachrichtigungen
Zuständigkeitsabhängige Bestimmungen
Kontakt
Datenschutzhinweise für US-Verbraucher/innen
1. Personenbezogene Daten, die wir erheben, und wie wir sie verwenden und weitergeben
Unsere Erhebung und Verwendung personenbezogener Daten unterscheidet sich je nachdem, ob Sie Endnutzer/in, Endkundin/Endkunde, Vertreter/in oder Besucher/in sind, und je nachdem, welchen Dienst Sie in Anspruch nehmen. Wenn Sie beispielsweise Einzelunternehmer/in sind und unsere Geschäftsdienstleistungen in Anspruch nehmen möchten, können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erheben, um Ihr Unternehmen zum Onboarding einzuladen; gleichzeitig könnten Sie auch Endkundin/Endkunde sein, wenn Sie Waren von einem anderen Geschäftskunden gekauft haben, der unsere Dienste zur Zahlungsabwicklung nutzt. Sie könnten Endnutzer/in sein, wenn Sie unseren Endkundendienst, wie beispielsweise Link, für diese Transaktionen genutzt haben.
1.1 Endnutzer/innen
Wir erbringen Endkundendienste, wenn wir Ihnen unsere Dienste direkt für Ihre persönliche Nutzung zur Verfügung stellen (beispielsweise Link). Weitere Einzelheiten zu unserer Erhebung, Verwendung und Weitergabe personenbezogener Daten von Endnutzerinnen und Endnutzern, einschließlich der
Rechtsgrundlagen
, auf die wir uns bei der Verarbeitung solcher Daten stützen, finden Sie in unserem
Datenschutzcenter
.
a. Personenbezogene Daten, die wir über Endnutzer/innen erheben
Verwendung von Link oder Verbindung mit Ihrem Bankkonto.
Stripe bietet Ihnen den Dienst „Link“ an, mit dem Sie Ihre Zahlungsmethoden bei Stripe hinterlegen können, um sie bequem zur Zahlung bei unseren Geschäftskunden zu nutzen. Wenn Sie sich bei Link anmelden, erklären Sie sich damit einverstanden, dass Ihre personenbezogenen Daten (wie Name, Kontaktinformationen, Zahlungsmethode) bei Stripe gespeichert werden. Dies ermöglicht effizientere Kauferfahrungen bei der künftigen Nutzung von Link. Wenn Sie sich für die Bezahlung mit Link entscheiden, erheben wir auch die mit Ihren Transaktionen assoziierten Transaktionsdaten.
Mehr erfahren
.
Wenn Sie sich dafür entscheiden, uns Ihre Bankverbindung mitzuteilen (auch um Zahlungen über Ihr Bankkonto via Link zu leisten), erhebt und verarbeitet Stripe in regelmäßigen Abständen Ihre Kontoinformationen (beispielsweise Angaben zu Bankkontoinhaber/in, Kontostände, Kontonummer und -daten, Kontotransaktionen und in einigen Fällen auch Anmelde-/Zugangsdaten). Sie können uns jederzeit auffordern, die Erhebung dieser Daten einzustellen.
Mehr erfahren
.
Sie können auch Ausweisdokumente (beispielsweise Ihren Führerschein) bei Link hinterlegen, um diese künftig an andere Geschäftskunden weiterzugeben.
Bezahlung von Stripe.
Wenn Sie Waren oder Dienstleistungen direkt bei Stripe kaufen, erhalten wir Ihre Transaktionsdaten. Wenn Sie beispielsweise eine Zahlung an Stripe Climate leisten, erheben wir Informationen zur Transaktion, sowie Ihre Kontaktdaten und Angaben zur Zahlungsmethode.
Identitäts-/Verifizierungsdienste.
Wir bieten einen Dienst zur Identitätsverifizierung an, der den Abgleich Ihres Ausweisdokuments (z. B. Führerschein) mit Ihrem Bild (z. B. Selfie) automatisiert. Sie können der Verwendung Ihrer biometrischen Daten zur Verbesserung unserer Verifizierungstechnologie separat zustimmen, was Sie jederzeit widerrufen können.
Mehr erfahren
.
Sonstiges.
Weitere Informationen über sonstige Arten personenbezogener Daten, die wir über Endnutzer erheben können, einschließlich Ihrer Online-Aktivitäten und Ihrer Nutzung unserer Endkundendienste, finden Sie im folgenden Abschnitt
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
.
b. Wie wir personenbezogene Daten unserer Endnutzer/innen verwenden und weitergeben
Dienste
Wir verwenden und geben Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weiter, um Ihnen die Endkundendienste bereitzustellen. Dazu gehören Support, Personalisierung (beispielsweise Sprachpräferenzen und Einstellungsmöglichkeiten) und Mitteilungen über unsere Endkundendienste (beispielsweise Benachrichtigung über Richtlinienaktualisierungen und Informationen über unsere Dienste). Beispielsweise könnte Stripe Cookies und vergleichbare Technologien oder die Daten, die Sie unseren Geschäftskunden zur Verfügung stellen (beispielsweise wenn Sie Ihre E-Mail-Adresse auf der Website eines Geschäftskunden eingeben), verwenden, um Sie zu erkennen und Ihnen zu helfen, Link beim Besuch der Website unseres Geschäftskunden zu verwenden. Weitere Informationen zu unserer Verwendung von Cookies und vergleichbaren Technologien finden Sie in der
Cookie Policy
von Stripe.
Unsere Geschäftskunden.
Wenn Sie Link für Zahlungen verwenden, geben wir Ihre Transaktionsdaten an die Geschäftskunden weiter, mit denen Sie in Geschäftsbeziehung treten möchten.
Mehr erfahren
. Darüber hinaus können Sie Ihr Bankkonto mit Stripe verbinden, und Stripe anweisen, Ihre Kontodaten an Geschäftskunden weiterzugeben, mit denen Sie in Geschäftsbeziehung stehen. Bitte beachten Sie, dass diese Geschäftskunden über eigene Datenschutz-Erklärungen verfügen, in denen sie beschreiben, wie sie die an sie weitergegebenen Informationen verwenden.
Transaktionen.
Wenn Sie Link für Zahlungen nutzen, verwenden wir Ihre bei uns gespeicherten personenbezogenen Daten (wie Name, Kontaktinformationen, Zahlungsmethode), um Transaktionen mit Geschäftskunden von Stripe durchzuführen. Wir stellen diese Daten Geschäftskunden und anderen, mit denen Sie in Geschäftsbeziehung stehen, zur Verfügung und verarbeiten sie gemäß Abschnitt 1.2 dieser Erklärung als Datenverarbeiter für diese Geschäftskunden.
Betrugserkennung und Verlustprävention.
Wir verwenden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über unsere Dienste (beispielsweise Stripe Radar) erheben, um Betrug zu erkennen und um finanziellen Verlusten für Sie, uns und unsere Geschäftskunden und Finanzpartner vorzubeugen, einschließlich der Erkennung nicht autorisierter Käufe. Wir können Geschäftskunden und Finanzpartnern, die unsere Geschäftsdienstleistungen zur Betrugsprävention nutzen, personenbezogene Daten über Sie (einschließlich Ihrer versuchten Transaktionen) zur Verfügung stellen, damit diese das mit der Transaktion verbundene Betrugs- oder Verlustrisiko beurteilen können. Weitere Informationen zu unserem Einsatz von Technologien zur Beurteilung des mit einer versuchten Transaktion verbundenen Betrugsrisikos und zu den Informationen, die wir an Geschäftskunden und Finanzpartner weitergeben, finden Sie
hier
und
hier
.
Werbung.
Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwenden, um Ihre Eignung für weitere Endnutzer-Dienste zu prüfen und Ihnen diese anzubieten oder bestehende Endkundendienste zu bewerben. Soweit gesetzlich zulässig (einschließlich Ihrer gegebenenfalls erforderlichen Einwilligung), verwenden wir personenbezogene Daten von Endnutzerinnen und Endnutzern und geben diese an andere weiter, damit wir unsere Endkundendienste an Sie vermarkten können, auch durch interessenbasierte Werbung. Wir geben Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht gegen Zahlung an Dritte weiter, aber wir können Ihre Daten an Drittparteien weitergeben, beispielsweise an Werbepartner, Analyseanbieter und soziale Netzwerke, die uns bei der Werbung für unsere Dienste unterstützen.
Mehr erfahren
.
Sonstiges.
Weitere Informationen über zusätzliche Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten über Endnutzer/innen verwenden und weitergeben können, finden Sie im folgenden Abschnitt
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
.
1.2 Endkundinnen und Endkunden
Stripe erbringt verschiedene Geschäftsdienstleistungen für seine Geschäftskunden. Dazu zählen persönliche oder Online-Zahlungen oder Auszahlungen für diese Geschäftskunden. Wenn wir als Dienstleister eines Geschäftskunden agieren (auch „Datenverarbeiter“ genannt), verarbeiten wir personenbezogene Daten von Endkundinnen und Endkunden gemäß unserer Vereinbarung mit dem Geschäftskunden und seinen rechtmäßigen Anweisungen. Dies geschieht zum Beispiel, wenn wir eine Zahlung für einen Geschäftskunden abwickeln, weil Sie etwas bei ihm gekauft haben oder wenn er uns anweist, Ihnen Gelder zu schicken.
Geschäftskunden sind für die Einhaltung der Datenschutzrechte ihrer Endkunden verantwortlich, einschließlich der Einholung angemessener Einwilligungen und der Offenlegung ihrer eigenen Datenerhebung und -verwendung im Zusammenhang mit ihren Produkten und Dienstleistungen. Wenn Sie Endkundin/Endkunde sind, lesen Sie bitte die Datenschutzerklärung des Geschäftskunden, mit dem Sie in Geschäftsbeziehung stehen, um sich über seine Datenschutzpraktiken, Wahlmöglichkeiten und Kontrollen zu informieren.
Weitere umfassende Informationen über die Erhebung, Verwendung und Weitergabe personenbezogener Daten von Endkunden und Endkundinnen finden Sie in unserem
Datenschutzcenter
, einschließlich der
Rechtsgrundlagen
, auf die wir uns bei der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten stützen.
a. Personenbezogene Daten, die wir über Endkundinnen und Endkunden erheben
Transaktionsdaten.
Wir erhalten Ihre Transaktionsdaten, wenn Sie als Endkundin oder Endkunde Zahlungen an unseren Geschäftskunden leisten, Rückerstattungen von ihm erhalten, einen Kauf oder eine Spende veranlassen oder anderweitig mit unserem Geschäftskunden in Geschäftsbeziehung stehen, ob persönlich oder online. Wir können auch Ihren Transaktionsverlauf vom Geschäftskunden erhalten.
Mehr erfahren
. Außerdem können wir die Daten erheben, die Sie bei einem Bezahlvorgang eingeben, auch wenn Sie sich dafür entscheiden, das Ausfüllen des Formulars abzubrechen oder keine Transaktion mit dem Geschäftskunden vorzunehmen.
Mehr erfahren
. Ein Geschäftskunde, der den Terminal-Dienst von Stripe nutzt, um seine Waren oder Dienstleistungen an Endkundinnen und Endkunden zu vertreiben, kann den Terminal-Dienst nutzen, um personenbezogene Daten der Endkundinnen und Endkunden (wie Name, E-Mail, Telefonnummer, Adresse, Unterschrift oder Alter) entsprechend seiner eigenen Datenschutzerklärung zu erheben.
Identitäts-/Verifizierungsdaten.
Stripe bietet einen Verifizierungs- und Betrugspräventionsdienst an, den unsere Geschäftskunden nutzen können, um personenbezogene Daten über Sie zu verifizieren, wie beispielsweise Ihre Autorisierung zur Nutzung einer bestimmten Zahlungsmethode. Während dieses Prozesses werden Sie aufgefordert, uns bestimmte personenbezogene Daten mitzuteilen (beispielsweise Ihren Personalausweis und ein Selfie zur biometrischen Verifizierung, von Ihnen eingegebene personenbezogene Daten oder personenbezogene Daten, die aus der physischen Zahlungsmethode hervorgehen, wie das Bild auf der Kreditkarte). Zum Schutz vor Betrug und um festzustellen, ob jemand versucht, Ihre Identität vorzutäuschen, können wir diese Daten mit Informationen über Sie abgleichen, die wir von Geschäftskunden, Finanzpartnern, verbundenen Unternehmen, Identitätsprüfungsdiensten, öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen und anderen Dienstleistern und Quellen von Drittparteien erheben.
Mehr erfahren
.
Sonstiges.
Weitere Informationen über sonstige Arten personenbezogener Daten, die wir über Endkundinnen und Endkunden erheben können, einschließlich Ihrer Online-Aktivitäten, finden Sie im folgenden Abschnitt
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
.
b. Wie wir personenbezogene Daten von Endkundinnen und Endkunden verwenden und weitergeben
Um unsere Geschäftsdienstleistungen für unsere Geschäftskunden zu erbringen, nutzen wir personenbezogene Daten von Endkundinnen und Endkunden und geben diese an sie weiter. Soweit zulässig, verwenden wir personenbezogene Daten von Endkundinnen und Endkunden auch für eigene Zwecke von Stripe, beispielsweise zur Stärkung der Sicherheit, zur Verbesserung und zum Angebot unserer Geschäftsdienstleistungen sowie zur Verhinderung von Betrug, Verlust und anderen Schäden, wie weiter unten beschrieben.
Zahlungsabwicklung und Buchhaltung.
Wir verwenden Ihre Transaktionsdaten, um für Geschäftskunden zahlungsbezogene Geschäftsdienstleistungen zu erbringen, darunter die Abwicklung von Online-Zahlungen, die Berechnung der Verkaufssteuer, die Bearbeitung von Rechnungen und Durchführung von Abrechnungen, sowie die Unterstützung bei der Ermittlung von Umsatzzahlen, der Begleichung von Rechnungen und der Erledigung von Buchhaltungsaufgaben.
Mehr erfahren
. Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auch verwenden, um unsere Geschäftsdienstleistungen zu erbringen und zu verbessern.
Bei Zahlungstransaktionen werden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten im Zuge der Abwicklung Ihrer Transaktion an verschiedene Stellen weitergegeben. Als Dienstleister oder Auftragsverarbeiter geben wir personenbezogene Daten weiter, um Transaktionen auf Weisung von Geschäftskunden abzuwickeln. Wenn Sie beispielsweise eine Zahlungsmethode für Ihre Transaktion wählen, sei es eine Kreditkarte, eine Debitkarte, „Jetzt kaufen, später bezahlen“ oder ein Lastschriftverfahren, kann Ihr Zahlungsmethodenanbieter die Transaktionsdaten Ihrer über Stripe abgewickelten Transaktionen erhalten. Der Geschäftskunde, mit dem Sie in Geschäftsbeziehung treten möchten, erhält ebenfalls Transaktionsdaten und kann diese Daten an andere weitergeben. Weitere Informationen über die Verwendung und Weitergabe Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch Geschäftskunden entnehmen Sie bitte deren Datenschutzerklärungen
Finanzdienstleistungen.
Einige Geschäftskunden nutzen unsere Dienste, um Ihnen Finanzdienstleistungen über Stripe oder unsere Finanzpartner anzubieten. Beispielsweise kann ein Geschäftskunde ein Kartenprodukt ausgeben, mit dem Sie Waren und Dienstleistungen kaufen können. Solche Karten könnten die Marke von Stripe, vom Bankpartner und/oder vom Geschäftskunden tragen. Zusätzlich zu den Transaktionsdaten, die wir durch die Verwendung dieser Karten bei Käufen generieren oder empfangen, erheben und verwenden wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auch, um diese Produkte bereitzustellen und zu verwalten, einschließlich der Unterstützung unserer Geschäftskunden bei der Verhinderung des Missbrauchs der Karten. Bitte lesen Sie die Datenschutzerklärungen des Geschäftskunden und, falls zutreffend, die Datenschutzerklärungen unserer mit der Finanzdienstleistung assoziierten Bankpartner (deren Marken möglicherweise auf der Karte angegeben sind), um weitere Informationen zu erhalten.
Identitäts-/Verifizierungsdienste.
Wir verwenden personenbezogene Daten Ihrer Identität, einschließlich der von Ihnen und unseren Dienstleistern bereitgestellten Informationen, um Verifizierungsdienste für Stripe oder für die Geschäftskunden, mit denen Sie in Geschäftsbeziehung stehen, zu erbringen, um Betrug verhindern und die Sicherheit zu erhöhen. Falls Sie ein Selfie zusammen mit einem Foto Ihres Ausweisdokuments übermitteln, setzen wir biometrische Technologien zum Abgleich und zur Berechnung der Übereinstimmung ein, um Sie zu verifizieren.
Mehr erfahren
.
Betrugserkennung und Verlustprävention.
Wir verwenden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über unsere Dienste erheben, um Verluste für Sie, uns, unsere Geschäftskunden und Finanzpartner zu erkennen und zu verhindern. Wir können Geschäftskunden und Finanzpartnern, die unsere Geschäftsdienstleistungen zur Betrugsprävention nutzen, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten (einschließlich Ihrer versuchten Transaktionen) zur Verfügung stellen, damit diese das mit der Transaktion verbundene Betrugs- oder Verlustrisiko beurteilen können. Weitere Informationen zu unserem Einsatz von Technologien zur Beurteilung des mit einer versuchten Transaktion verbundenen Betrugsrisikos und zu den Informationen, die wir an Geschäftskunden und Finanzpartner weitergeben, finden Sie
hier
und
hier
.
Unsere Geschäftskunden (und deren autorisierte Drittparteien).
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten von Endkundinnen und Endkunden an ihre jeweiligen Geschäftskunden und an Parteien weiter, die von diesen Geschäftskunden direkt autorisiert wurden, solche Daten zu erhalten. Hier einige Beispiele für eine solche Weitergabe:
Wenn ein Geschäftskunde Stripe anweist, einem anderen Geschäftskunden über Stripe Connect Zugang zu seinem Stripe-Konto, einschließlich der Daten seiner Endkunden, zu gewähren.
Weitergabe von Informationen, die Sie uns zur Verfügung gestellt haben, damit wir im Namen eines Geschäftskunden Zahlungen an Sie senden können.
Weitergabe von Informationen, Dokumenten oder Bildern, die von Endkunden zur Verfügung gestellt werden, an Geschäftskunden, wenn letztere Stripe Identity, unseren Identitätsverifizierungsdienst zur Überprüfung der Identität des Endkunden, nutzen.
Die Geschäftskunden, mit denen Sie in Geschäftsbeziehung treten, können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auch an Dritte weitergeben (beispielsweise an andere Dienstleister als Stripe). Bitte lesen Sie die Datenschutzerklärung der Geschäftskunden, um weitere Informationen zu erhalten.
Werbung durch Geschäftskunden.
Wenn Sie einen Kauf bei einem Geschäftskunden einleiten, erhält der Geschäftskunde von uns Ihre personenbezogenen Daten im Zusammenhang mit der Erbringung unserer Dienstleistungen, auch wenn Sie Ihren Kauf nicht abschließen. Dieser Geschäftskunde kann Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwenden, um seine Produkte oder Dienste zu vermarkten und zu bewerben, und zwar gemäß den Bedingungen seiner Datenschutzerklärung. Bitte lesen Sie die Datenschutzerklärung des Geschäftskunden, um weitere Informationen zu erhalten, einschließlich Ihrer Rechte, die Nutzung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu Marketingzwecken zu unterbinden.
Sonstiges.
Weitere Informationen über weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten über Endkundinnen und Endkunden verwenden und weitergeben können, finden Sie im folgenden Abschnitt
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
.
1.3 Vertreter/innen
Wir erheben, verwenden und teilen personenbezogene Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern von Geschäftskunden (beispielsweise von Unternehmensinhabern), um unsere Geschäftsdienstleistungen zu erbringen. Weitere Informationen darüber, wie wir personenbezogene Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern erheben, verwenden und weitergeben, sowie über die
Rechtsgrundlagen
, auf die wir uns bei der Verarbeitung dieser personenbezogenen Daten stützen, finden Sie in unserem
Datenschutzcenter
.
a. Welche personenbezogenen Daten wir über Vertreter/innen erheben
Anmeldung und Kontaktinformationen.
Wenn Sie sich für ein Stripe-Konto für einen Geschäftskunden (einschließlich Unternehmensgründung) registrieren, erheben wir Ihren Namen und Ihre Zugangsdaten. Wenn Sie sich für eine von Stripe organisierte Veranstaltung registrieren oder daran teilnehmen oder sich für den Erhalt von Benachrichtigungen von Stripe anmelden, erheben wir Ihre Registrierungs- und Profildaten. Über Sie als Vertreter/in können wir unter Umständen personenbezogene Daten von Drittparteien, einschließlich Datenanbietern, erheben, um Ihnen Werbung und Angebote zukommen zu lassen und um mit Ihnen zu kommunizieren, wie im folgenden Abschnitt
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
beschrieben. Darüber hinaus können wir möglicherweise einen Standort mit Ihnen verknüpfen, um die Dienste oder Informationen effektiv auf Ihre Bedürfnisse zuzuschneiden.
Mehr erfahren
.
Identifizierungsinformationen
Als aktueller oder potenzieller Geschäftskunde, als Inhaber/in eines Geschäftskunden oder als Anteilseigner/in, leitende(r) Angestellte(r) oder Vorstandsmitglied eines Geschäftskunden benötigen wir Ihre Kontaktdaten, beispielsweise Name, Postanschrift, Telefonnummer und E-Mail-Adresse, um die Anforderungen unserer Finanzpartner und die gesetzlichen Vorschriften zu erfüllen, Ihre Identität zu verifizieren und betrügerische Aktivitäten und Schäden an der Stripe-Plattform zu verhindern. Wir erheben Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, wie beispielsweise Eigentumsanteile am Geschäftskunden, Geburtsdatum, Ausweispapiere und zugehörige Identifikatoren sowie etwaige Betrugs- oder Missbrauchsfälle direkt von Ihnen und/oder von Drittparteien wie Kreditauskunfteien und über die von uns angebotenen Dienste.
Mehr erfahren
. Sie haben auch die Möglichkeit, uns Ihre Bankverbindung mitzuteilen.
Sonstiges.
Weitere Informationen über sonstige Arten personenbezogener Daten, die wir über Vertreter/innen erheben können, einschließlich Ihrer Online-Aktivitäten, finden Sie im folgenden Abschnitt
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
.
b. Wie wir personenbezogene Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern verwenden und weitergeben
Im Allgemeinen verwenden wir die personenbezogenen Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern, um die Geschäftsdienstleistungen für die entsprechenden Geschäftskunden zu erbringen. Die Art und Weise, wie wir diese Daten verwenden und weitergeben, wird weiter unten beschrieben.
Geschäftsdienstleistungen.
Wir verwenden personenbezogene Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern und geben sie an Geschäftskunden weiter, um die von Ihnen oder von dem von Ihnen vertretenen Geschäftskunden angeforderten Dienstleistungen zu erbringen.
In bestimmten Fällen müssen wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an eine staatliche Stelle übermitteln, um unsere Geschäftsdienstleistung zu erbringen, beispielsweise für die Unternehmensgründung oder die Berechnung und Zahlung der geltenden Verkaufssteuer. Für unsere steuerbezogenen Geschäftsdienstleistungen können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwenden, um im Namen des Geschäftskunden, den Sie vertreten, Steuererklärungen einzureichen. Für unsere Atlas-Geschäftsgründungsdienste können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwenden, um in Ihrem Namen Formulare bei der US-Steuerbehörde IRS und Dokumente bei anderen Regierungsbehörden einzureichen, beispielsweise die Gründungsurkunde im Gründungsstaat.
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern an Parteien weiter, die vom jeweiligen Geschäftskunden ausdrücklich autorisiert wurden, beispielsweise an Finanzpartner, die ein Finanzprodukt vertreiben, oder Drittpartei-Apps oder -Dienste, die der Geschäftskunde neben unseren Geschäftsdienstleistungen nutzen möchte. Hier einige Beispiele für eine solche Weitergabe:
Anbieter von Zahlungsmethoden wie Visa oder WeChat Pay benötigen Informationen über Geschäftskunden und ihre Vertreter, die ihre Zahlungsmethoden akzeptieren. Diese Informationen werden in der Regel während des Onboarding-Prozesses oder zur Bearbeitung von Transaktionen für diese Geschäftskunden benötigt.
Mehr erfahren
.
Ein Geschäftskunde kann Stripe autorisieren, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an andere Geschäftskunden weiterzugeben, um die Bereitstellung von Dienstleistungen über Stripe Connect zu erleichtern.
Die Verwendung personenbezogener Daten durch eine von einem Geschäftskunden autorisierte Drittpartei unterliegt der Datenschutzerklärung der Drittpartei.
Wenn Sie ein Geschäftskunde sind und Ihr Unternehmen einen Namen trägt, der personenbezogene Daten enthält (beispielsweise ein Einzelunternehmen oder einen Familiennamen als Firmennamen), werden wir diese Daten für die Bereitstellung unserer Dienste in der gleichen Weise verwenden und weitergeben, wie wir es mit jedem anderen Firmennamen tun. Dies kann bedeuten, dass er auf Quittungen und anderen Transaktionsbeschreibungen erscheint.
Betrugserkennung und Verlustprävention.
Wir verwenden personenbezogene Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern, um Risiken zu erkennen und zu steuern, wonach unsere Geschäftsdienstleistungen für betrügerische Aktivitäten genutzt werden könnten, die Stripe, Endnutzer/innen, Endkunden, Geschäftskunden, Finanzpartner und andere schädigen. Darüber hinaus verwenden wir Informationen über Sie, die wir von Drittparteien wie Kreditauskunfteien und von unseren Diensten erhalten, um solche Risiken zu vermeiden, einschließlich der Ermittlung von Missbrauchsmustern und der Überwachung von Verstößen gegen die Nutzungsbedingungen. Stripe kann personenbezogene Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern an Geschäftskunden, unsere Finanzpartner und Drittpartei-Dienstleister weitergeben, um die von Ihnen bereitgestellten Informationen zu überprüfen und Risikoindikatoren zu identifizieren.
Mehr erfahren
. Wir verwenden personenbezogene Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern auch zur Durchführung von Due-Diligence-Prüfungen, einschließlich der Durchführung von Anti-Geldwäsche- und Sanktionsprüfungen in Übereinstimmung mit geltendem Recht, und geben sie weiter.
Werbung.
Soweit nach geltendem Recht zulässig, nutzen wir personenbezogene Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern und geben diese an Drittparteien weiter, damit wir unsere Dienste bewerben und vermarkten können. Vorbehaltlich geltenden Rechts – einschließlich etwaiger Einwilligungserfordernisse – können wir mit interessenbezogener Werbung werben und die Wirksamkeit derartiger Werbung verfolgen. Werfen Sie einen Blick in unsere
Cookie Policy
. Wir geben Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht gegen Zahlung an Drittparteien weiter. Allerdings können wir Ihre Daten an Drittparteien weitergeben, beispielsweise an Werbepartner, Analyseanbieter und soziale Netzwerke, die uns bei der Werbung für unsere Dienste unterstützen.
Mehr erfahren
. Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, einschließlich der Aktivitäten in Ihrem Stripe-Konto, auch dazu verwenden, Ihre Eignung für Geschäftsdienstleistungen zu beurteilen und Ihnen diese anzubieten oder bestehende Geschäftsdienstleistungen zu bewerben.
Mehr erfahren
.
Sonstiges.
Weitere Informationen über zusätzliche Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten über Vertreter/innen verwenden und weitergeben können, finden Sie im folgenden Abschnitt
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
.
1.4 Besucher/innen
Wir erheben, verwenden und teilen personenbezogene Daten von Besucher/innen. Weitere Einzelheiten darüber, wie wir personenbezogene Daten von Besucherinnen und Besuchern erheben, verwenden und weitergeben, sowie über die
Rechtsgrundlagen
, auf die wir uns bei der Verarbeitung dieser personenbezogenen Daten stützen, finden Sie in unserem
Datenschutzcenter
.
a. Welche personenbezogenen Daten wir über Besucher/innen erfassen
Wenn Sie auf unseren Websites surfen, erhalten wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten entweder direkt von Ihnen oder durch die Verwendung von Cookies und vergleichbaren Technologien. Werfen Sie einen Blick in unsere
Cookie Policy
, um mehr zu erfahren. Wenn Sie sich dafür entscheiden, ein Formular auf unserer oder auf der Website Dritter auszufüllen, auf denen unsere Werbeanzeigen erscheinen (wie LinkedIn oder Facebook), erheben wir die Informationen, die Sie in das Formular eingeben. Dies kann Ihre Kontaktinformationen und andere Informationen zu Ihren Fragen über unsere Dienstleistungen umfassen. Wir können Ihren Besuch auch mit einem Standort assoziieren.
Mehr erfahren
.
Sonstiges.
Weitere Informationen über sonstige Arten personenbezogener Daten, die wir von Besucher/innen erheben können, einschließlich Ihrer Online-Aktivitäten, finden Sie im folgenden Abschnitt
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
.
b. Wie wir personenbezogene Daten von Besucherinnen und Besuchern verwenden und weitergeben
Personalisierung.
Wir verwenden die Daten, die wir mit Hilfe von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien über Sie erheben, um das Nutzer/innen-Engagement bezüglich der Inhalte der Websites zu messen, die Relevanz und Navigation zu verbessern, Ihre Erfahrungen anzupassen (beispielsweise Sprachpräferenzen und regionsspezifische Inhalte) und auf Sie zugeschnittene Inhalte über Stripe und unsere Dienste zu erstellen. Da zum Beispiel nicht alle unsere Dienste global verfügbar sind, können wir unsere Antworten auf Ihre Region abstimmen.
Werbung.
Soweit nach geltendem Recht zulässig, nutzen wir personenbezogene Daten von Besucherinnen und Besuchern und geben diese an Drittparteien weiter, damit wir unsere Dienste bewerben und vermarkten können. Vorbehaltlich geltenden Rechts – einschließlich etwaiger Einwilligungserfordernisse – können wir mit interessenbezogener Werbung werben und die Wirksamkeit derartiger Werbung verfolgen. Werfen Sie einen Blick in unsere
Cookie Policy
. Wir geben Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht gegen Zahlung an Drittparteien weiter. Allerdings können wir Ihre Daten an Drittparteien weitergeben, beispielsweise an Werbepartner, Analyseanbieter und soziale Netzwerke, die uns bei der Werbung für unsere Dienste unterstützen.
Mehr erfahren
.
Engagement
. Bei Ihrer Interaktion mit unseren Websites verwenden wir die Daten, die wir über Ihre Geräte erheben, um Ihnen Möglichkeiten für weitere Interaktionen zu bieten, beispielsweise Diskussionen über Dienste oder Interaktionen mit Chatbots, um Ihre Fragen zu beantworten.
Sonstiges.
Weitere Informationen über zusätzliche Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten von Besucher/innen verwenden und weitergeben können, finden Sie im folgenden Abschnitt
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
.
2. Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
Zusätzlich zu den oben beschriebenen Arten verarbeiten wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten folgendermaßen:
a. Erhebung personenbezogener Daten
Online-Aktivität.
Abhängig vom genutzten Dienst und der Art und Weise, wie unsere Geschäftsdienstleistung von den Geschäftskunden implementiert wird, können wir Daten erheben, die sich auf Folgendes beziehen:
Die Geräte und Browser, die Sie auf unseren Websites und für Websites, Apps und sonstige Online-Dienste von Drittparteien („Drittpartei-Websites“) verwenden.
Nutzungsdaten, die mit diesen Geräten und Browsern und Ihrer Nutzung unserer Dienste assoziiert sind, einschließlich Daten wie IP-Adresse, Plug-ins, Spracheinstellungen, auf den Websites und den Websites Dritter verbrachte Zeit, besuchte Seiten, angeklickte Links, verwendete Zahlungsmethoden und die Seiten, die Sie zu unseren Websites und den Websites Dritter geführt haben. Wir sammeln auch Aktivitätsindikatoren, wie zum Beispiel Mausaktivitätsindikatoren, die uns helfen, Betrug aufzudecken.
Mehr erfahren
. Werfen Sie einen Blick in unsere
Cookie Policy
.
Informationen zu Kommunikation und Nutzung.
Des Weiteren erheben wir Informationen, die Sie uns über verschiedene Kanäle zur Verfügung stellen, beispielsweise über Support Tickets, E-Mails oder Social Media. Wenn Sie auf E-Mails oder Umfragen von Stripe antworten, erheben wir Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, Ihren Namen und alle anderen Daten, die Sie in Ihrer E-Mail oder Ihren Antworten angeben. Wenn Sie telefonisch mit uns Kontakt aufnehmen, zeichnen wir Ihre Telefonnummer und alle weiteren Informationen, die Sie im Laufe des Gesprächs angeben, auf. Darüber hinaus erheben wir Daten über Ihre Nutzung, wie beispielsweise Ihre Anmeldung für, Anwesenheit bei oder Besuch von Stripe-Veranstaltungen und alle weiteren Interaktionen mit Mitarbeitern und Mitarbeiterinnen von Stripe.
Foren und Diskussionsgruppen.
Sofern unsere Websites das Posten von Inhalten gestatten, erheben wir personenbezogene Daten, die Sie im Zusammenhang mit ihrem Beitrag bereitstellen.
b. Verwendung personenbezogener Daten.
Zusätzlich zu der oben beschriebenen Verwendung personenbezogener Daten verwenden wir diese auf die im Folgenden aufgeführten Arten:
Verbesserung und Entwicklung unserer Dienstleistungen.
Auf unseren Websites verwenden wir Analysewerkzeuge zum Verständnis Ihrer Nutzung unserer Websites und Dienste und zur Diagnose technischer Probleme. Weitere Informationen zu Ihrer Kontrolle über die Verwendung von Cookies und Drittpartei-Analysen finden Sie in unserer
Cookie Policy
. Darüber hinaus erfassen und verarbeiten wir personenbezogene Daten auch über unsere verschiedenen Dienste, unabhängig davon, ob Sie Endnutzer/in, Endkundin oder Endkunde, Vertreter/in oder Besucher/in sind, um unsere Dienste zu verbessern, neue Dienste zu entwickeln und um uns dabei zu unterstützen, unsere Dienste für Sie relevanter und sinnvoller zu gestalten.
Mehr erfahren
.
Kommunikation.
Wir verwenden Ihre Kontaktinformationen zur Erbringung unserer Dienstleistungen, was auch den Versand von Codes per SMS zu Ihrer Authentifizierung beinhalten kann.
Mehr erfahren
. Wenn Sie Endnutzer/in, Vertreter/in oder Besucher/in sind, werden wir mit Ihnen mit Hilfe der Kontaktdaten, die uns über Sie vorliegen, kommunizieren, um Ihnen Informationen über unsere Dienstleistungen und die unserer Partner zukommen zu lassen, Sie zur Teilnahme an unseren Veranstaltungen, Umfragen oder Nutzer-Research einzuladen oder anderweitig mit Ihnen in Übereinstimmung mit geltendem Recht für Marketingzwecke zu kommunizieren, einschließlich jeglicher Zustimmungs- oder Opt-out-Erfordernisse. Wenn Sie uns beispielsweise Ihre Kontaktdaten zur Verfügung stellen oder wenn wir Ihre geschäftlichen Kontaktdaten durch Ihre Teilnahme an Messen oder anderen Veranstaltungen erheben, können wir diese Daten verwenden, um mit Ihnen bezüglich einer Veranstaltung in Kontakt zu treten, Ihnen die angeforderten Informationen über unsere Dienstleistungen zur Verfügung zu stellen und Sie in unsere Marketing-Informationskampagnen einzubeziehen. Soweit nach geltendem Recht zulässig, können wir unsere Gespräche mit Ihnen aufzeichnen, um unsere Dienste zu erbringen, unseren rechtlichen Verpflichtungen nachzukommen, Forschung und Qualitätssicherung zu betreiben und darüber hinaus zu Schulungszwecken.
Social Media und Werbeaktionen
. Wenn Sie personenbezogene Daten übermitteln, um ein Angebot, ein Programm oder eine Werbeaktion in Anspruch zu nehmen, verwenden wir die von Ihnen bereitgestellten personenbezogenen Daten zur Verwaltung des Angebots, des Programms oder der Werbeaktion. Wir verwenden die von Ihnen bereitgestellten personenbezogenen Daten zusammen mit den personenbezogenen Daten, die Sie auf Social-Media-Plattformen zur Verfügung stellen, auch für Marketingzwecke, es sei denn, wir sind dazu nicht berechtigt.
Betrugsprävention und Sicherheit.
Wir erheben und verwenden personenbezogene Daten, um betrügerische oder schädigende Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten zu erkennen und zu steuern, unsere Geschäftsdienstleistungen zur Betrugserkennung bereitzustellen und um unsere Dienste und Transaktionen vor unbefugtem Zugriff, unbefugter Nutzung, Manipulation oder Veruntreuung von personenbezogenen Daten, Informationen und Geldern zu schützen. Wir erheben Daten von Dritten (beispielsweise Kreditauskunfteien) und über die von uns angebotenen Dienste im Rahmen der Betrugsprävention, Betrugserkennung, Sicherheitsüberwachung und Compliance-Maßnahmen für Stripe und seine Geschäftskunden. In bestimmten Fällen können wir auch Daten über Sie direkt von Ihnen oder von unseren Geschäftskunden, Finanzpartnern und anderen Dritten zu denselben Zwecken erheben. Darüber hinaus können wir zum Schutz unserer Dienste Informationen wie IP-Adressen und andere identifizierende Daten über potenzielle Sicherheitsbedrohungen von Drittparteien beziehen.
Mehr erfahren
. Derartige Informationen helfen uns bei Identitätsverifizierungen und Bonitätsprüfungen, soweit dies gesetzlich zulässig ist, sowie bei der Betrugsprävention. Darüber hinaus können wir Technologien einsetzen, um das potenzielle Betrugsrisiko bei Personen zu bewerten, die unsere Geschäftsdienstleistungen in Anspruch nehmen wollen, oder das Risiko, das sich aus versuchten Transaktionen von Endkundinnen/Endkunden oder Endnutzerinnen/Endnutzern mit unseren Geschäftskunden oder Finanzpartnern ergibt.
Einhaltung gesetzlicher Verpflichtungen.
Wir verwenden personenbezogene Daten, um unsere vertraglichen und gesetzlichen Verpflichtungen zur Geldwäschebekämpfung, zur KYC-Gesetzgebung (Know-Your-Customer), zur Terrorismusbekämpfung, zum Schutz gefährdeter Kunden, zur Exportkontrolle und zum Verbot von Geschäften mit eingeschränkten Personen oder in bestimmten Geschäftsbereichen sowie andere gesetzliche Verpflichtungen zu erfüllen. Zum Beispiel können wir Transaktionsmuster und andere Online-Signale analysieren und diese Erkenntnisse nutzen, um Betrug, Geldwäsche und andere unlautere Aktivitäten zu erkennen, die Stripe, unsere Finanzpartner, Endnutzer/innen, unsere Geschäftskunden und andere betreffen könnten.
Mehr erfahren
. Sicherheit und Rechtskonformität unserer Dienste haben für uns oberste Priorität. Die Erhebung und Verwendung personenbezogener Daten ist für diese Zwecke unerlässlich.
Minderjährige.
Unsere Dienste richten sich nicht an Kinder unter 13 Jahren. Deshalb bitten wir diese, keine personenbezogenen Daten an uns zu übermitteln, um Dienste direkt von Stripe zu beziehen. In bestimmten Ländern können wir nach geltendem Recht auch höhere Altersgrenzen festlegen.
c. Weitergabe personenbezogener Daten.
Zusätzlich zu der oben beschriebenen Weitergabe personenbezogener Daten geben wir diese auf die im Folgenden aufgeführten Arten weiter:
Mit Stripe verbundene Unternehmen.
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an andere mit Stripe verbundene Unternehmen für die in dieser Erklärung genannten Zwecke weiter.
Dienstleister oder Auftragsverarbeiter.
Um unsere Dienste bereitstellen, bekannt machen, vermarkten und bewerben zu können, arbeiten wir mit Dienstleistern zusammen. Diese Dienstleister erbringen wichtige Leistungen – von der Bereitstellung der Cloud-Infrastruktur über die analytische Auswertung von Geschwindigkeit, Genauigkeit und/oder Sicherheit unserer Dienste und die Identitätsverifizierung bis hin zu Kundenservice und Audit-Funktionen. Diesen Dienstleistern ist die Verwendung oder Offenlegung der von uns bereitgestellten personenbezogenen Daten gestattet, um Dienstleistungen in unserem Namen zu erbringen und die einschlägigen rechtlichen Verpflichtungen zu erfüllen. Zudem werden diese Dienstleister von uns vertraglich verpflichtet, die Sicherheit und Vertraulichkeit der personenbezogenen Daten, die sie in unserem Auftrag verarbeiten, zu gewährleisten. Die Mehrheit der Dienstleister, deren Dienste wir in Anspruch nehmen, befindet sich in der EU, den Vereinigten Staaten und in Indien.
Mehr erfahren
.
Finanzpartner.
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an bestimmte Finanzpartner weiter, um Geschäftskunden, die solche Dienste in Anspruch nehmen möchten, Dienste anbieten zu können, und um bestimmte Dienste in Verbindung mit diesen Finanzpartnern anzubieten. So geben wir beispielsweise bestimmte personenbezogene Daten über Vertreter/innen, wie Kreditrückzahlungsdaten und Kontaktinformationen, an institutionelle Anleger weiter, die Kredite kaufen oder anbieten, die durch die von uns gewährten Kapitaldarlehen an die Geschäftskunden, mit denen sie assoziiert sind, gesichert sind.
Andere mit Einwilligung.
In manchen Fällen bieten wir eine Dienstleistung nicht an, sondern verweisen Sie stattdessen an andere (wie beispielsweise professionelle Dienstleistungsunternehmen, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten, um den Atlas-Dienst zu realisieren). In diesen Fällen werden wir die Identität der Drittpartei und die Informationen, die an diese weitergegeben werden sollen, offenlegen und Sie um Ihre Einwilligung bitten, diese Informationen weiterzugeben.
Unternehmenstransaktionen.
Im Rahmen einer vollständigen oder teilweisen tatsächlichen oder beabsichtigten Umstrukturierung unseres Unternehmens durch Sanierung, Fusion, Verkauf, Joint-Venture, Abtretung, Übertragung oder Führungswechsel oder im Fall einer vollständigen oder teilweisen Veräußerung unseres Unternehmens, unserer Vermögenswerte oder Aktienbestände können wir personenbezogene Daten an Dritte weitergeben. Wird Stripe ganz oder teilweise von einem anderen Unternehmen erworben, ist dieses Unternehmen dazu berechtigt, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weiterhin zu verwenden. Dies darf jedoch nur in Einklang mit dieser Datenschutzerklärung geschehen.
Einhaltung gesetzlicher Vorschriften und Schadensabwehr.
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten weiter, wenn wir der Meinung sind, dass dies notwendig ist, um geltendes Recht einzuhalten, um die von den Finanzpartnern im Zusammenhang mit der Nutzung ihrer Zahlungsmethode auferlegten Regeln einzuhalten, um unsere vertraglichen Rechte durchzusetzen, um die Dienste, Rechte, den Datenschutz, die Sicherheit und das Eigentum von Stripe, Ihnen und anderen zu sichern und zu schützen, einschließlich gegen unlautere oder betrügerische Aktivitäten, und um auf rechtmäßige Anfragen von Gerichten, Strafverfolgungsbehörden, Aufsichtsbehörden und anderen öffentlichen und staatlichen Stellen zu reagieren, zu denen auch Stellen außerhalb Ihres Wohnsitzlandes gehören können.
3. Rechtsgrundlagen für die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten
Für die Zwecke der Datenschutz-Grundverordnung und anderer geltender Datenschutzgesetze stützen wir uns bei der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten auf eine Reihe von Rechtsgrundlagen.
Mehr erfahren
. In bestimmten Rechtsordnungen können zusätzliche Rechtsgrundlagen gelten, die im Abschnitt
Zuständigkeitsabhängige Bestimmungen
weiter unten erläutert werden.
a. Vertragliche und vorvertragliche Geschäftsbeziehungen.
Wir verarbeiten personenbezogene Daten, um Geschäftsbeziehungen mit potenziellen Geschäftskunden und Endnutzerinnen/Endnutzern einzugehen und unsere jeweiligen vertraglichen Verpflichtungen mit ihnen zu erfüllen. Zu diesen Verarbeitungstätigkeiten zählen:
Erstellung und Verwaltung von Stripe-Konten und Anmeldedaten für Stripe-Konten, einschließlich der Prüfung von Anfragen zur erstmaligen oder erweiterten Nutzung der von uns erbrachten Dienste;
Erstellung und Verwaltung von Stripe Checkout-Konten;
Aktivitäten im Rahmen von Buchhaltung, Auditing und Abrechnung; sowie
Zahlungsabwicklung und damit zusammenhängende Aktivitäten wie Betrugserkennung, Verlustprävention, Transaktionsoptimierung, Mitteilungen über solche Zahlungen und damit zusammenhängende Kundendienstaktivitäten.
b. Rechtskonformität.
Wir verarbeiten personenbezogene Daten, um die Identität von natürlichen und juristischen Personen zu verifizieren, um Verpflichtungen im Zusammenhang mit Betrugsüberwachung, -prävention und -erkennung, Gesetzen im Zusammenhang mit der Identifizierung und Meldung illegaler und rechtswidriger Aktivitäten, beispielsweise im Rahmen der Vorschriften zur Geldwäschebekämpfung (AML – Anti-Money Laundering) und zur Kundenidentifizierung (KYC – Know-Your-Customer), sowie Finanzberichterstattungspflichten nachzukommen. So kann es beispielsweise erforderlich sein, die Identität eines Geschäftskunden zu erfassen und zu überprüfen, um Vorschriften zur Verhinderung von Geldwäsche, Betrug und Finanzkriminalität einzuhalten. Diese Rechtsvorschriften können uns dazu verpflichten, Rechenschaft gegenüber Dritten abzulegen und uns Prüfungen durch Dritte zu unterziehen.
c. Berechtigte Interessen.
Soweit nach geltendem Recht zulässig, stützen wir uns bei der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten auf unsere berechtigten Geschäftsinteressen. Die folgende Liste enthält Beispiele für Geschäftszwecke, für die wir ein berechtigtes Interesse an der Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten haben:
Erkennung, Verfolgung und Verhinderung von betrügerischen Handlungen und nicht autorisierten Zahlungsvorgängen;
Minimierung finanzieller Verluste, Ansprüche, Verbindlichkeiten oder anderer Schäden für Endkundinnen/Endkunden, Endnutzer/innen, Geschäftskunden, Finanzpartner und Stripe;
Feststellung der Eignung für neue Stripe-Dienstleistungen sowie deren Angebot (
Mehr erfahren
);
Beantwortung von Anfragen, Zustellung von Servicemeldungen und Erbringung von Kundensupport;
Vermarktung, Analyse, Änderung und Verbesserung unserer Dienste, Systeme und Tools sowie die Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Dienste, einschließlich der Verbesserung der Zuverlässigkeit der Dienste;
Verwaltung, Betrieb und Verbesserung der Leistung unserer Websites und Dienste mithilfe von Informationen über ihre Effektivität und die Optimierung unserer digitalen Ressourcen;
Analyse und Werbung für unsere Dienste und damit verbundene Verbesserungen;
Gesamtanalysen und Entwicklung von Business-Intelligence-Lösungen, die uns dabei unterstützen, unsere Geschäftstätigkeiten auszuführen und zu schützen, fundierte Entscheidungen zu treffen und über die Leistung unseres Unternehmens zu berichten;
Weitergabe personenbezogener Daten an die Drittpartei-Dienstleister, die in unserem Namen Dienste anbieten, und an Geschäftspartner, die uns bei der Ausübung und Optimierung unserer Geschäftstätigkeit unterstützen (
Mehr erfahren
);
Gewährleistung der Netzwerk- und Informationssicherheit bei Stripe und den von Stripe erbrachten Diensten; sowie
Weitergabe personenbezogener Daten an unsere verbundenen Unternehmen.
d. Einwilligung.
Bei der Erhebung und Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten in Bezug auf unsere Interaktionen mit Ihnen und die Bereitstellung unserer Dienste wie Link, Financial Connections, Atlas und Identity können wir uns auf Ihre Einwilligung bzw. ausdrückliche Einwilligung stützen. Wenn wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auf Grundlage Ihrer Einwilligung verarbeiten, haben Sie das Recht, Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit zu widerrufen, ohne dass dies Auswirkungen auf die Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung hat, die auf der Grundlage der Einwilligung vor deren Widerruf erfolgt ist.
e. Erhebliches öffentliches Interesse.
Wir können besondere Kategorien personenbezogener Daten im Sinne der DSGVO verarbeiten, wenn eine solche Verarbeitung aus Gründen eines wichtigen öffentlichen Interesses und im Einklang mit geltendem Recht erforderlich ist, beispielsweise wenn wir Überprüfungen politisch exponierter Personen vornehmen. Ferner können wir auch personenbezogene Daten im Zusammenhang mit strafrechtlichen Verurteilungen und Straftaten verarbeiten, wenn eine solche Verarbeitung durch geltendes Recht autorisiert ist, beispielsweise wenn wir ein Sanktionsscreening durchführen, um den AML- und KYC-Verpflichtungen nachzukommen.
4. Ihre Rechte und Wahlmöglichkeiten
Je nach Standort und geltendem Recht haben Sie im Hinblick auf unsere Erhebung, Verwendung und Offenlegung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten bestimmte Wahlmöglichkeiten:
a. Abmeldung von der elektronischen Kommunikation mit uns.
Wenn Sie keine marketingbezogenen E-Mails mehr von uns erhalten möchten, können Sie sich abmelden, indem Sie auf den in diesen E-Mails enthaltenen Abmeldelink klicken oder wie
hier
beschrieben. Wir werden versuchen, Ihre Anfrage schnellstmöglich zu bearbeiten. Bitte beachten Sie, dass wir uns das Recht vorbehalten, mit Ihnen über die von Ihnen in Anspruch genommenen Dienste zu kommunizieren (beispielsweise über Support und wichtige rechtliche Hinweise), auch wenn Sie sich gegen den Erhalt marketingbezogener E-Mails von uns entscheiden. Trotzdem können Geschäftskunden Ihnen Nachrichten schicken oder uns anweisen, Ihnen in ihrem Namen Nachrichten zu schicken.
b. Ihre Datenschutzrechte.
Je nach Ihrem Standort und den dort geltenden Gesetzen haben Sie unter Umständen folgende Rechte in Bezug auf die personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über Sie gespeichert haben:
Das Recht auf Auskunft darüber, ob Stripe personenbezogene Daten verarbeitet, die mit Ihnen assoziiert sind, und wenn ja, Zugang zu diesen personenbezogenen Daten zu verlangen (
Mehr erfahren
);
Das Recht darauf, Stripe zur Berichtigung und Aktualisierung von falschen, unvollständigen oder veralteten personenbezogenen Daten aufzufordern;
Das Recht darauf, unter bestimmten, gesetzlich festgelegten Umständen von Stripe die Löschung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu verlangen (
Mehr erfahren
);
Das Recht darauf, Stripe unter bestimmten Umständen (beispielsweise während der Bearbeitung eines anderen von Ihnen eingebrachten Antrags wie etwa eines Antrags auf Berichtigung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten) zur Einschränkung der Nutzung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten aufzufordern;
Das Recht darauf, dass wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, die wir vorhalten, an ein anderes Unternehmen exportieren, sofern dies technisch möglich ist;
Das Recht, Ihre Einwilligung zu widerrufen, wenn die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten auf der Grundlage Ihrer früheren Einwilligung erfolgt;
Das Recht, der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu widersprechen, wenn wir Ihre Daten auf der Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen verarbeiten; sofern keine zwingenden berechtigten Gründe vorliegen oder die Verarbeitung aus rechtlichen Gründen erforderlich ist, werden wir die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten nach Erhalt Ihres Widerspruchs einstellen (
Mehr erfahren
);
Das Recht darauf, wegen der Ausübung dieser Rechte nicht diskriminiert zu werden; und
Das Recht darauf, gegen jede diese Rechte betreffende Entscheidung von Stripe Widerspruch einzulegen, indem Sie sich an die Datenschutzbeauftragten von Stripe („DSB“) unter
dpo@stripe.com
wenden.
Je nach geltendem Recht haben Sie möglicherweise weitergehende Rechte in Bezug auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten. Beispiele finden Sie im Abschnitt „Zuständigkeitsabhängige Bestimmungen“ unter „Vereinigte Staaten“ weiter unten.
c. Verfahren zur Ausübung Ihrer Datenschutzrechte
Besuchen Sie zur Ausübung Ihrer Datenschutzrechte unser
Datenschutzcenter
oder kontaktieren Sie uns wie unten beschrieben.
5. Sicherheit und Aufbewahrung
Wir treffen geeignete Vorkehrungen, um ein Schutzniveau zu gewährleisten, das dem Risiko bei der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten angemessen ist. Dazu setzen wir organisatorische, technische und administrative Maßnahmen ein, um die personenbezogenen Daten, die unter diese Erklärung fallen, vor unbefugtem Zugriff, Zerstörung, Verlust, Veränderung oder Missbrauch zu schützen.
Mehr erfahren
. Leider ist kein Datenübertragungs- oder Speichersystem absolut sicher.
Wir empfehlen, uns beim Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu unterstützen. Wenn Sie ein Stripe-Konto besitzen, können Sie dies durch die Verwendung eines sicheren Passworts, den Schutz Ihres Passworts vor unbefugter Nutzung und die Vermeidung der mehrfachen Verwendung der Anmeldedaten für Ihr Stripe-Konto auch bei anderen Diensten oder Konten tun. Wenn Sie den Verdacht haben, dass Ihre Interaktionen mit uns nicht mehr sicher sind (z. B. wenn Sie glauben, dass die Sicherheit Ihres Stripe-Kontos nicht mehr gewährleistet ist),
kontaktieren Sie uns
bitte umgehend.
Wir halten Ihre personenbezogenen Daten so lange vor, wie wir Ihnen oder unseren Geschäftskunden die Dienste zur Verfügung stellen, oder für einen Zeitraum, bei dem wir vernünftigerweise davon ausgehen, dass wir die Dienste weiterhin anbieten. Auch nachdem wir die Bereitstellung von Diensten für Sie oder einen Geschäftskunden, mit dem Sie in Geschäftsbeziehung stehen, eingestellt haben, und auch nachdem Sie Ihr Stripe-Konto geschlossen oder eine Transaktion mit einem Geschäftskunden abgeschlossen haben, können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weiterhin aufbewahren, um:
unseren rechtlichen und regulatorischen Verpflichtungen nachzukommen,
Aktivitäten zur Betrugsüberwachung, -aufdeckung und Verlustprävention zu ermöglichen, und
zur Erfüllung unserer steuerlichen, buchhalterischen und finanzwirtschaftlichen Berichtspflichten, einschließlich der Fälle, in denen eine solche Aufbewahrung durch unsere vertraglichen Vereinbarungen mit unseren Finanzpartnern vorgeschrieben ist (und in denen die Aufbewahrung von Daten durch die von Ihnen verwendeten Zahlungsmethoden vorgeschrieben ist).
In den Fällen, in denen wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten aufbewahren, tun wir dies in Übereinstimmung mit allen Verjährungsfristen und Aufzeichnungspflichten, die uns durch geltendes Recht auferlegt werden.
Mehr erfahren
.
6. Internationale Datenübermittlung
Für uns als globales Unternehmen ist es manchmal notwendig, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten in andere Länder als Ihr eigenes zu übermitteln, einschließlich der Vereinigten Staaten. In diesen Ländern gelten unter Umständen andere Datenschutzbestimmungen als in Ihrem Land. Bei der grenzüberschreitenden Übermittlung von Daten ergreifen wir Maßnahmen zur Einhaltung geltender Datenschutzrechte in Bezug auf eine solche Übermittlung. In bestimmten Situationen kann es erforderlich sein, dass wir personenbezogene Daten auf rechtmäßige Anfrage von Behörden (beispielsweise Strafverfolgungs- oder Sicherheitsbehörden) hin offenlegen müssen.
Mehr erfahren
.
Wenn Sie im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum („EWR“), im Vereinigten Königreich („UK“) oder in der Schweiz ansässig sind, finden Sie weitere Informationen in unserem
Datenschutzcenter
. Wenn das geltende Recht einen Datenübertragungsmechanismus verlangt, verwenden wir einen oder mehrere der folgenden Mechanismen:
Übermittlungen in bestimmte Länder oder an Empfänger, die nach geltendem Recht anerkanntermaßen ein angemessenes Schutzniveau für personenbezogene Daten bieten.
Die von der Europäischen Kommission genehmigten EU-Standardvertragsklauseln und das vom UK Information Commissioner's Office herausgegebene Zusatzprotokoll zum internationalen Datentransfer. Sie können ein Exemplar der einschlägigen Standardvertragsklauseln erhalten. Weitere Informationen.
Mehr erfahren
.
Weitere rechtmäßige Methoden, die uns nach geltendem Recht zur Verfügung stehen.
Stripe, Inc. hält sich an das EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework („EU-U.S. DPF“), die UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF und das Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, wie vom U.S. Department of Commerce festgelegt und soweit anwendbar.
Mehr erfahren
.
7. Aktualisierungen und Benachrichtigungen
Wir können diese Richtlinie von Zeit zu Zeit ändern, um neue Dienste, Änderungen unserer Datenschutzpraktiken oder der relevanten Gesetze widerzuspiegeln. Die Legende „Letzte Aktualisierung“ oben in dieser Richtlinie zeigt an, wann diese Richtlinie zuletzt überarbeitet wurde. Alle Änderungen treten in Kraft, sobald wir die überarbeitete Richtlinie zu den Diensten veröffentlicht oder auf andere Weise über die Aktualisierung informiert haben, wie dies gesetzlich vorgeschrieben ist, je nachdem, welcher der Zeitpunkt später ist.
Wir können Ihnen Offenlegungen und Warnungen bezüglich der Richtlinie oder erhobener personenbezogener Daten durch Veröffentlichung auf unserer Website und, wenn Sie ein Endnutzer oder Vertreter sind, durch Kontaktaufnahme mit Ihnen über Ihr Stripe Dashboard, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und/oder die in Ihrem Stripe-Konto angegebene physische Adresse zukommen lassen.
8. Zuständigkeitsabhängige Bestimmungen
Australien.
Sollten Sie in Australien ansässig sein und mit unserer Bearbeitung von Beschwerden, die Sie im Rahmen dieser Datenschutzerklärung vorbringen, unzufrieden sein, können Sie sich an das Office of the Australian Information Commissioner wenden.
Brasilien.
Zur Wahrnehmung Ihrer Rechte können Sie sich an unsere Datenschutzbeauftragten unter
dpo@stripe.com
wenden. In Brasilien ansässige Personen, für die das Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais („LGPD“) gilt, haben die in Artikel 18 des LGPD festgelegten Rechte.
Kanada.
In dieser Erklärung umfasst der Begriff „geltendes Recht“ den Federal Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (PIPEDA), den Personal Information Protection Act, SBC 2003 c 63 in British Columbia, den Personal Information Protection Act, SA 2003 c P-6.5 in Alberta und den Act Respecting the Protection of Personal Data in the Private Sector, CQLR c P-39-1 (Quebec Private Sector Act) in Quebec. „Personenbezogene Daten“ umfasst „persönliche Informationen“ gemäß der Definition in diesen Gesetzen.
Quebec.
Der Chief Privacy Officer von Stripe ist für personenbezogene Daten im Sinne des Quebec Private Sector Act verantwortlich. Sie können per E-Mail unter privacy@stripe.com mit ihm Kontakt aufnehmen. Wenn wir personenbezogene Daten von in Quebec ansässigen Personen erheben, können wir diese Daten an Datenzentren in den Vereinigten Staaten übertragen. Dienstleister, die wir zur Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten einsetzen, können auch außerhalb von Quebec ansässig sein.
Sie haben das Recht, Zugang zu den personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über Sie speichern, sowie ihre Berichtigung zu verlangen oder Ihre Einwilligung in die Verarbeitung dieser personenbezogenen Daten zu widerrufen. Sie können diese Rechte ausüben, indem Sie sich unter privacy@stripe.com an den Chief Privacy Officer von Stripe wenden. Wenn Sie ein Endkunde sind, sollten Sie sich zur Wahrnehmung Ihrer Rechte an den Geschäftskunden wenden, mit dem Sie Geschäfte getätigt haben.
EWR und Vereinigtes Königreich.
Zur Wahrnehmung Ihrer Rechte können Sie sich an unsere Datenschutzbeauftragten unter
dpo@stripe.com
wenden. Wenn Sie im EWR ansässig sind oder wenn Stripe Payments Europe Limited als Ihr Datenverantwortlicher identifiziert wird und Sie glauben, dass unsere Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten der Datenschutz-Grundverordnung (DSGVO) widerspricht, können Sie Ihre Fragen oder Beschwerden an die irische Datenschutzkommission richten. Wenn Sie im Vereinigten Königreich ansässig sind, richten Sie Ihre Fragen oder Bedenken an das UK Information Commissioner's Office. Wenn personenbezogene Daten für regulierte Finanzaktivitäten in Europa verwendet werden, gelten Stripe Payments Europe Limited und die lokalen regulierten Unternehmen von Stripe als gemeinsam Verantwortliche.
Mehr erfahren
. Außerdem haben Sie zusätzliche Rechte gemäß EU-U.S. DPF und UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.
Mehr erfahren
.
Indien.
In dieser Erklärung umfasst der Begriff „geltendes Recht“ den Digital Personal Data Protection Act (DPDPA), sobald dieser in Kraft getreten ist. Darüber hinaus schließt der Begriff „Datenverantwortlicher“ auch „Datentreuhänder“ und der Begriff „betroffene Person“ auch „Auftraggeber“ ein, jeweils gemäß der Definition im DPDPA.
In einigen Fällen können wir uns auf die „berechtigte Verwendung“ als Rechtsgrundlage berufen, sofern dies nach DPDPA zulässig ist. Dies ist zum Beispiel der Fall, wenn Sie uns Ihre personenbezogenen Daten freiwillig zur Verfügung stellen. „Consent Manager“ im Sinne des DPDPA können einen Antrag auf Widerruf oder Erteilung der Einwilligung stellen, indem sie die im folgenden Abschnitt „Kontakt“ beschriebenen Methoden verwenden, oder wie im folgenden Absatz beschrieben, oder über andere Mittel, die Stripe in Zukunft zur Verfügung stellt. Bevor wir eine solche Anfrage bearbeiten, können wir einen Autorisierungs- und Identitätsnachweis verlangen.
In bestimmten Fällen können Sie aufgefordert werden, der Erhebung und Verarbeitung Ihrer Aadhaar-Nummer durch Stripe India Private Limited und/oder seine(n) Verifizierungspartner zuzustimmen. Der Zweck dieser Erhebung besteht darin, das nach geltendem Recht vorgeschriebene Identifikationsverifizierungsverfahren zu erleichtern. Die Angabe Ihrer Aadhaar-Daten ist freiwillig. Sie können auch andere Identifikationsdokumente bereitstellen, sofern diese von uns akzeptiert werden. Ihnen wird kein Dienst verweigert werden, wenn Sie keine Aadhaar-Angaben machen.
Wenn Sie Fragen oder Beschwerden bezüglich der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten in Indien haben oder wenn Sie diese Erklärung erhalten oder mit uns über den Datenschutz in einer der indischen Amtssprachen kommunizieren möchten,
wenden Sie sich bitte an unseren Nodal and Grievance Officer
.
Mehr erfahren
. Alternativ können Sie sich an unsere Datenschutzbeauftragten unter
dpo@stripe.com
wenden. Falls wir nicht in der Lage sind, auf Ihre Beschwerde oder Ihr Anliegen einzugehen, haben Sie das Recht, die Angelegenheit zum Data Protection Board of India weiterzuleiten.
Indonesien.
In dieser Datenschutzerklärung umfasst der Begriff „geltendes Recht“ das Gesetz Nr. 11 aus dem Jahr 2008, geändert durch das Gesetz Nr. 19 aus dem Jahr 2016 über elektronische Informationen und Transaktionen, die Regierungsverordnung Nr. 71 aus dem Jahr 2019 über die Einführung elektronischer Systeme und Transaktionen sowie die Verordnung des Ministers für Kommunikation und Informatik Nr. 20 aus dem Jahr 2016 über den Schutz personenbezogener Daten in elektronischen Systemen und ab September 2024 das Gesetz Nr. 27 aus dem Jahr 2022 über den Schutz personenbezogener Daten (PDP-Gesetz). Wenn Sie Fragen oder Beschwerden zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung haben, wenden Sie sich bitte unter
dpo@stripe.com
an unsere Datenschutzbeauftragten.
Japan.
In dieser Datenschutzerklärung umfasst der Begriff „geltendes Recht“ den Act on the Protection of Personal Information (APPI). Wenn wir personenbezogene Daten betroffener Personen in Japan in Länder übermitteln, die von der Kommission für den Schutz personenbezogener Daten nicht als „angemessen“ anerkannt sind, schließen wir schriftliche Verträge mit Drittparteien ab, die sich außerhalb Japans befinden. Diese schriftlichen Verträge sehen Rechte und Pflichten vor, die denen des japanischen Act on the Protection of Personal Information entsprechen. Weitere Informationen darüber, wie wir sicherstellen, dass Drittparteien Ihre Daten schützen und wo sich Ihre Daten befinden, erhalten Sie oben oder von uns wie unten beschrieben. Eine Beschreibung ausländischer Systeme und Rahmenwerke, welche die Implementierung gleichwertiger Maßnahmen durch die Drittpartei beeinflussen können, finden Sie
hier
.
In einigen Fällen und soweit nach dem APPI zulässig, können wir uns auf das „öffentliche Interesse“ als Rechtsgrundlage berufen, wie beispielsweise bei der Aufdeckung von Betrug und der Verhinderung von Verlusten.
Malaysia.
Wenn Sie Fragen oder Beschwerden zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung haben, wenden Sie sich bitte unter
dpo@stripe.com
an unsere Datenschutzbeauftragten.
Singapur.
In dieser Datenschutzerklärung umfasst der Begriff „geltendes Recht“ den Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (PDPA) (Nr. 26 von 2012) in seiner jeweils gültigen Fassung. In einigen Fällen und soweit nach dem PDPA zulässig, können wir uns auf eine „mutmaßliche Einwilligung“ als Rechtsgrundlage stützen. Dies ist zum Beispiel der Fall, wenn Sie uns Ihre personenbezogenen Daten freiwillig zur Verfügung stellen.
Wenn Sie Fragen oder Beschwerden zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung haben, wenden Sie sich bitte unter
dpo@stripe.com
an unsere Datenschutzbeauftragten.
Schweiz.
In dieser Datenschutzerklärung umfasst der Begriff „geltendes Recht“ das Bundesgesetz über den Datenschutz (DSG) in seiner revidierten Fassung. Zur Ausübung Ihrer Rechte nach dem DSG wenden Sie sich bitte unter
dpo@stripe.com
an unsere Datenschutzbeauftragten. Möglicherweise haben Sie auch zusätzliche Rechte im Rahmen des Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, sobald dieses in Kraft tritt.
Mehr erfahren
.
Thailand.
In dieser Datenschutzerklärung umfasst der Begriff „anwendbares Recht“ den Personal Data Protection Act 2019 (PDPA). Sind wir auf bestimmte Rechtsgrundlagen angewiesen (beispielsweise „gesetzliche Verpflichtung“ oder „vertragliche Notwendigkeit“) und stellen Sie uns Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht zur Verfügung, können wir Ihnen möglicherweise unsere Dienste nicht rechtmäßig anbieten. Wenn Sie Fragen oder Beschwerden zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung haben, wenden Sie sich bitte unter
dpo@stripe.com
an unsere Datenschutzbeauftragten.
Vereinigte Staaten.
Wenn Sie ein/e in den Vereinigten Staaten („USA“) ansässige/r Verbraucher/in sind, verarbeiten wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten gemäß den US-amerikanischen Datenschutzgesetzen, einschließlich des California Consumer Privacy Act („CCPA“), Colorado Privacy Act, Connecticut Act Concerning Personal Data Privacy and Online Monitoring, Florida Digital Bill of Rights, Montana Consumer Data Privacy Act, Oregon Consumer Privacy Act, Texas Data Privacy and Security Act, Utah Consumer Privacy Act sowie des Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act. Weitere Einzelheiten finden Sie
hier
. Die Verwendung von Cookies durch Stripe, einschließlich Werbe-Cookies, ist in unserer
Cookie Policy
beschrieben.
Ihre Rechte und Wahlmöglichkeiten.
Als Verbraucher in den Vereinigten Staaten haben Sie – vorbehaltlich bestimmter Einschränkungen durch die Datenschutzgesetze der Vereinigten Staaten – gegebenenfalls Wahlmöglichkeiten in Bezug auf die Verwendung und Offenlegung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch uns (
Weitere Informationen
über die Metriken für die Rechte betroffener Personen). Zusätzlich zu den
oben genannten Rechten
:
Ausübung des Auskunftsrechts: Sie haben das Recht, zusätzliche Informationen über die Kategorien personenbezogener Daten anzufordern, die erhoben, verkauft, offengelegt oder weitergegeben wurden; über die Zwecke, für die diese personenbezogenen Daten erhoben, verkauft oder weitergegeben wurden; über die Kategorien der Quellen personenbezogener Daten; und über die Kategorien von Drittparteien, denen gegenüber wir diese personenbezogenen Daten offengelegt oder an sie weitergegeben haben.
Ausübung des Rechts, den Verkauf oder die Weitergabe abzulehnen: Wir geben Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht gegen Zahlung an Drittparteien weiter. Allerdings können wir Ihre Daten, wie oben angemerkt, an Drittparteien weitergeben, beispielsweise an Werbepartner, Analyseanbieter und soziale Netzwerke, die uns bei der Werbung für unsere Produkte und Dienste unterstützen. Da diese Drittparteien die von Stripe gelieferten Daten für ihre eigenen Zwecke verwenden können, könnte die Lieferung von Daten durch Stripe an diese Parteien als „Verkauf“ oder „Weitergabe“ von Daten im Sinne des CCPA und anderer geltender US-Datenschutzgesetze betrachtet werden. Sie können sich
hier
gegen gezielte Werbung und den damit verbundenen „Verkauf“ bzw. die „Weitergabe“ von Daten entscheiden.
Ausübung des Rechts, die Nutzung oder Weitergabe sensibler personenbezogener Daten einzuschränken: Wir verkaufen keine sensiblen personenbezogenen Daten im Sinne der US-Datenschutzgesetze und haben dies auch in den letzten 12 Monaten nicht getan. Weitere Informationen zu unserer Erhebung und Verwendung sensibler personenbezogener Daten in den letzten 12 Monaten finden Sie
hier
.
Um einen Antrag zur Ausübung eines der oben beschriebenen Rechte zu stellen, kontaktieren Sie uns bitte anhand der im Abschnitt „Kontakt“ unten beschriebenen Methoden. Bitte beachten Sie, dass die Rechte nach einigen Gesetzen der US-Bundesstaaten nicht für personenbezogene Daten gelten, die wir erheben, verarbeiten und weitergeben, wenn Sie als Verbraucher/in handeln, um Finanzprodukte oder -dienstleistungen von Stripe für private Zwecke zu beziehen. Der bundesweite Gramm-Leach Bliley Act kann regeln, wie Stripe diese Daten stattdessen weitergibt und schützt. Weitere Informationen finden Sie in unserer
Datenschutzerklärung für US-Verbraucher/innen
.
Wir werden Ihre Anfrage verifizieren, indem wir Sie bitten, sie von der in Ihrem Konto hinterlegten E-Mail-Adresse aus zu senden, oder indem wir Informationen von Ihnen verlangen, die zur Überprüfung Ihrer Identität erforderlich sind, einschließlich Name, Adresse, Transaktionshistorie, Lichtbildausweis und sonstige mit Ihrem Konto verbundene Informationen.
Sie können schriftlich oder durch eine Vollmacht eine bevollmächtigte Vertreterin/einen bevollmächtigten Vertreter benennen, die/der in Ihrem Namen Anfragen einreicht, um Ihre Rechte gemäß dem CCPA auszuüben. Ihre Vertreterin/Ihr Vertreter kann eine Anfrage in Ihrem Namen einreichen, indem er/sie sich mit uns über die im Abschnitt „Kontaktaufnahme“ beschriebenen Wege in Verbindung setzt. Wir können Sie trotzdem auffordern, Ihre Identität direkt zu verifizieren und zu bestätigen, dass Sie der bevollmächtigten Vertreterin/dem bevollmächtigten Vertreter die Berechtigung erteilt haben, Ihre Anfrage zu übermitteln.
Global-Privacy-Control-Signale.
Stripe beachtet die Signale der Global Privacy Control (GPC) zur Opt-out-Einstellung.
Mehr erfahren
9. Kontakt
Wenn Sie Fragen oder Beschwerden zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung haben,
kontaktieren Sie uns
bitte. Wenn Sie eine Endkundin oder ein Endkunde sind (d. h. eine Einzelperson, die mit einem Geschäftskunden geschäftlich zu tun hat oder Transaktionen tätigt), lesen Sie bitte die Datenschutzerklärungen oder -hinweise des Geschäftskunden, um sich über seine Datenschutzpraktiken, Wahlmöglichkeiten und Kontrollen zu informieren, oder wenden Sie sich direkt an den Geschäftskunden.
10. Datenschutzhinweise für US-Verbraucher/innen
Die folgenden Datenschutzhinweise für Verbraucher/innen gelten für Sie, wenn Sie eine natürliche Person mit Wohnsitz in den Vereinigten Staaten sind und Finanzdienstleistungen von Stripe in erster Linie für Ihre eigenen privaten Zwecke in Familie und Haushalt nutzen.
Letzte Aktualisierung: 16. Januar 2024
FAKTEN
WAS MACHT STRIPE MIT IHREN PERSONENBEZOGENEN DATEN?
Warum?
Finanzunternehmen entscheiden, wie sie Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weitergeben.  Bundesgesetze berechtigen Verbraucher/innen, einige, aber nicht alle Formen der Weitergabe einzuschränken.  Darüber hinaus sind wir durch Bundesgesetze dazu verpflichtet, Sie darüber zu informieren, wie wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erheben, weitergeben und schützen.  Bitte lesen Sie diese Hinweise sorgfältig durch, um sich über unsere Tätigkeit zu informieren.
Was?
Die Arten personenbezogener Daten, die wir erheben und weitergeben, hängen vom Produkt oder Dienst ab, den Sie bei uns in Anspruch nehmen. Diese Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Sozialversicherungsnummer
Kontaktangaben
Kontostand und Transaktionsverlauf
Details und Verlauf von Zahlungen, Transaktionen und Käufen
Wenn Sie
nicht länger
unsere Kundin/unser Kunde sind, geben wir Ihre Daten weiterhin wie in diesen Hinweisen beschrieben weiter.
Wie?
Alle Finanzunternehmen müssen zur Abwicklung ihrer Geschäfte personenbezogene Daten ihrer Kunden weitergeben. Im folgenden Abschnitt führen wir die Gründe auf, aus denen Finanzunternehmen personenbezogene Daten ihrer Kunden weitergeben können, die Gründe, aus denen Stripe sich für eine Weitergabe entscheidet, und ob Sie diese Weitergabe einschränken können.
Gründe, aus denen wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weitergeben können
Weitergabe durch Stripe?
Können Sie die Weitergabe einschränken?
Für unsere laufenden Geschäftszwecke, z. B. um Ihre Transaktionen zu bearbeiten, Ihre Konten zu führen, auf gerichtliche Anordnungen und Ermittlungen zu reagieren oder um an Kreditauskunfteien zu berichten
Ja
Nein
Für unsere Marketingzwecke: um Ihnen unsere Produkte und Dienstleistungen anzubieten
Ja
Nein
Für die gemeinsame Vermarktung mit weiteren Unternehmen der Finanzbranche
Ja
Nein
Für die laufenden Geschäftszwecke unserer verbundenen Unternehmen: Informationen über Ihre Transaktionen und Erfahrungen
Ja
Nein
Für die laufenden Geschäftszwecke unserer verbundenen Unternehmen: Informationen über Ihre Bonität
Nein
Keine Weitergabe durch uns
Für unsere verbundenen Unternehmen, um an Sie zu vermarkten
Nein
Keine Weitergabe durch uns
Für nicht verbundene Unternehmen, um an Sie zu vermarkten, wenn Sie Link-Nutzer/in sind
Ja
Ja
Für nicht verbundene Unternehmen, um an Sie zu vermarkten, wenn Sie Nutzer/in von Financial Connections sind
Nein
Keine Weitergabe durch uns
Zur Einschränkung unserer Weitergabe
Besuchen Sie uns online unter
https://support.link.com
Bitte beachten Sie:
Wenn Sie eine Neukundin/ein Neukunde sind, dürfen wir mit der Weitergabe Ihrer Daten 30 Tage nach dem Versand dieser Hinweise beginnen. Wenn Sie nicht länger unsere Kundin/unser Kunde sind, setzen wir die Weitergabe Ihrer Daten wie in diesen Hinweisen beschrieben fort.
Sie können sich jedoch jederzeit an uns wenden, um unsere Weitergabe einzuschränken.
Fragen?
Sie können uns jederzeit unter
privacy@stripe.com
kontaktieren oder auf
https://support.link.com
besuchen
Wer wir sind
Wer gibt diese Hinweise?
Stripe, Inc. und Stripe Payments Company sowie deren verbundene Unternehmen, die in den USA Zahlungen für Verbraucher/innen anbieten.
Was wir tun
Wie schützt Stripe meine personenbezogenen Daten?
Um Ihre personenbezogenen Daten vor unbefugtem Zugriff, Zerstörung, Verlust, Veränderung oder Missbrauch zu schützen, setzen wir im Einklang mit dem US-Bundesrecht entsprechende Sicherheitsmaßnahmen ein.  Zu diesen Maßnahmen zählen Computerschutzmaßnahmen sowie gesicherte Unterlagen und Gebäude.  Wir kontrollieren den Zugang und führen eine ständige Überwachung durch, um Datenmissbrauch zu verhindern. Von unseren Dienstleistern verlangen wir, dass sie vergleichbare Maßnahmen zum Schutz Ihrer Daten ergreifen.
Wie erhebt Stripe meine personenbezogenen Daten?
Wir erheben Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zum Beispiel, wenn Sie
ein Link-Konto eröffnen;
Stripe mit der Abwicklung einer Zahlung für Waren oder Dienstleistungen beauftragen;
Stripe über Financial Connections Bankkontodaten zur Verfügung stellen.
Wir erheben Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auch von anderen, beispielsweise von verbundenen oder anderen Unternehmen.
Warum kann ich nicht die gesamte Weitergabe einschränken?
Das Bundesrecht erlaubt Ihnen nur,
die Weitergabe von Bonitätsangaben für die laufenden Geschäfte der verbundenen Unternehmen zu beschränken,
die Verwendung Ihrer Daten durch verbundene Unternehmen zu beschränken, die an Sie vermarkten,
die Weitergabe an nicht verbundene Unternehmen einzuschränken, die an Sie vermarkten.
Bundesstaatliche Gesetze und einzelne Unternehmen können Ihnen zusätzliche Rechte zur Einschränkung der Weitergabe einräumen. Im nachfolgenden Abschnitt „Weitere wichtige Informationen“ finden Sie weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten nach bundesstaatlichem Recht.
Was geschieht, wenn ich die Weitergabe für ein Konto einschränke, das ich gemeinsam mit einer anderen Person unterhalte?
Die von Ihnen getroffenen Entscheidungen gelten für alle Kontoinhaber/innen.
Definitionen
Verbundene Unternehmen
Unternehmen, die durch gemeinsames Eigentum oder gemeinsame Beherrschung verbunden sind. Dies können sowohl Finanz- als auch Nichtfinanz-Unternehmen sein.
Zu unseren verbundenen Unternehmen zählen solche, die unter dem Namen Stripe agieren, wie Stripe Payments Europe, Limited und Stripe Payments UK Ltd.
Nicht verbundene Unternehmen
Unternehmen, die nicht durch gemeinsames Eigentum oder gemeinsame Beherrschung verbunden sind.  Dies können sowohl Finanz- als auch Nichtfinanz-Unternehmen sein.
Zu den nicht verbundenen Unternehmen, an die wir personenbezogene Daten weitergeben, gehören Dienstleister, die in unserem Auftrag Dienste oder Funktionen erbringen, Geschäftskunden, mit denen Sie Transaktionen durchführen, Partner, mit denen wir Daten austauschen, um Ihnen Dienste bereitzustellen, sowie Werbepartner, Analyseanbieter und soziale Netzwerke, die uns bei der Werbung für unsere Dienste unterstützen.
Gemeinsames Marketing
Eine förmliche Vereinbarung zwischen nicht verbundenen Finanzunternehmen, die gemeinsam Finanzprodukte oder -dienstleistungen an Sie vermarkten.
Zu unseren Partnern für gemeinsames Marketing gehören Unternehmen aus der Finanzbranche, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten, um Ihnen Finanzdienstleistungen anzubieten.
Weitere wichtige Informationen
Vermont: Wenn Ihr Konto bei uns mit einer Rechnungsadresse in Vermont verknüpft ist, werden wir keine Informationen über Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit an unsere verbundenen Unternehmen weitergeben und Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, Ihre Kreditauskunft oder Ihre Gesundheitsinformationen nicht an nicht verbundene Dritte weitergeben, um an Sie zu vermarkten – es sei denn, dies ist nach dem Gesetz von Vermont zulässig, oder Sie ermächtigen uns, diese Offenlegungen vorzunehmen.  Für gemeinsames Marketing geben wir nur Ihren Namen, Ihre Kontaktinformationen und Informationen über Ihre Transaktionen weiter.  Weitere Informationen zu unseren Datenschutzbestimmungen finden Sie in unserer
Datenschutzerklärung
und
Datenschutzcenter
.
Kalifornien: Wenn Ihr Konto bei uns mit einer Rechnungsadresse in Kalifornien verknüpft ist, geben wir personenbezogene Daten, die wir über Sie erheben, nur in dem Umfang weiter, der nach kalifornischem Recht zulässig ist.  Beispielsweise können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten offenlegen, soweit dies erforderlich ist, um Transaktionen zu verarbeiten oder von Ihnen angeforderte Produkte und Dienstleistungen auf Ihre Anfrage hin bereitzustellen, wenn dies zur Risikokontrolle des Finanzinstituts erforderlich ist, und um uns gegen Betrug, Identitätsdiebstahl und nicht autorisierte Transaktionen zu schützen.
Weitere Informationen über unsere Datenschutzpraktiken finden Sie im
Stripe-Datenschutzcenter
.
Sub-policy 9
https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/privacy:

Sub-policy 10
https://www.google.de/policies/privacy/:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Sub-policy 11
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=de&gl=de:
Datenschutzerklärung & Nutzungsbedingungen
Übersicht
Datenschutzerklärung
Nutzungsbedingungen
Technologien
Häufig gestellte Fragen
Google-Konto
Datenschutzerklärung
Einführung
Von Google erhobene Daten
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Datenweitergabe
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Anforderungen in Europa
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Rahmenbedingungen für Datenübermittlungen
Wichtige Begriffe
Partner
Aktualisierungen
Google-Datenschutzerklärung
Wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, vertrauen Sie uns Ihre Daten an. Wir sind uns bewusst, dass dies eine große Verantwortung ist und setzen alles daran, Ihre Daten zu schützen und zu gewährleisten, dass Sie die Kontrolle darüber behalten.
In dieser Datenschutzerklärung erfahren Sie, welche Daten von uns erhoben werden, welche Zwecke wir damit verfolgen und wie Sie Ihre Daten aktualisieren, verwalten, exportieren und löschen können.
Wenn das Datenschutzrecht der Europäischen Union oder des Vereinigten Königreichs auf die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Anwendung findet, finden Sie unten im Abschnitt
Anforderungen in Europa
weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten sowie zur Einhaltung dieser Gesetze durch Google.
Privatsphärecheck
Sie möchten Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen ändern?
Privatsphärecheck machen
Wirksam ab dem 16. September 2024
|
Archivierte Versionen
|
PDF herunterladen
Inhalt
Einführung
Von Google erhobene Daten
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Datenweitergabe
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Anforderungen in Europa
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Wir entwickeln eine Vielzahl von Diensten, die Millionen von Menschen Tag für Tag helfen, die Welt ganz neu zu entdecken und mit ihr zu interagieren. Zu unseren Diensten zählen:
Google-Apps, -Websites und -Geräte, wie die Google-Suche, YouTube und Google Home
Plattformen wie der Chrome-Browser und das Android-Betriebssystem
Produkte, die in Apps und Websites von Drittanbietern integriert sind, wie Werbe- und Analyseprodukte und das eingebettete Google Maps
Sie können unsere Dienste auf vielfältige Weise nutzen, um Ihre Privatsphäre zu verwalten. So haben Sie beispielsweise die Möglichkeit, sich für ein Google-Konto zu registrieren, wenn Sie Inhalte wie E-Mails und Fotos erstellen und verwalten oder relevantere Suchergebnisse erhalten möchten. Sie können auch zahlreiche Google-Dienste nutzen, ohne sich anzumelden oder ein Konto zu erstellen, beispielsweise wenn Sie die Google Suche verwenden oder sich YouTube-Videos ansehen. Außerdem ist es möglich, in einem privaten Modus im Web zu surfen, etwa im
Inkognitomodus von Chrome
, sodass andere Personen, die Ihr Gerät verwenden, nicht sehen können, welche Inhalte Sie aufgerufen haben. Bei allen unseren Diensten können Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen ändern und so festlegen, ob wir manche Arten von Daten erheben und wie wir sie verwenden.
Um Ihnen unsere Datenschutzerklärung möglichst verständlich zu machen, haben wir Beispiele, Videos und Definitionen für
Schlüsselbegriffe
angefügt. Wenn Sie dennoch Fragen dazu haben,
können Sie uns gern kontaktieren
.
Von Google erhobene Daten
Im Folgenden erklären wir Ihnen, welche Arten von Daten wir erheben, während Sie unsere Dienste nutzen
Wir erheben Daten, um allen unseren Nutzern bessere Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen – von der Feststellung grundlegender Informationen wie zum Beispiel Ihrer Sprache bis hin zu komplexeren Fragen wie zum Beispiel
Werbung, die Sie besonders nützlich finden
, den
Personen, mit denen Sie online am häufigsten zu tun haben
, oder den YouTube-Videos, die Sie interessant finden. Welche Daten Google erhebt und wie diese verwendet werden hängt davon ab, wie Sie unsere Dienste nutzen und wie Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen verwalten.
Wenn Sie nicht in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, speichern wir die von uns erhobenen Daten mit
eindeutigen Kennungen
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem
Gerät
verknüpft sind, welche Sie verwenden. Auf diese Weise können wir verschiedene Dinge tun, wie beispielsweise Ihre Einstellungen über Browsersitzungen hinweg beibehalten, zum Beispiel Ihre bevorzugte Sprache oder ob Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse oder Werbung auf Grundlage Ihrer Aktivitäten sehen möchten.
Wenn Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, erheben wir auch Daten, die wir in Ihrem Google-Konto speichern und als
personenbezogene Daten
erachten.
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste bereitstellen
Wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen, stellen Sie uns
personenbezogene Daten
zur Verfügung, darunter Ihren Namen und ein Passwort. Sie können Ihrem Konto auch eine
Telefonnummer
oder
Zahlungsinformationen
hinzufügen. Selbst wenn Sie nicht bei einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, können Sie uns Daten zur Verfügung stellen, etwa eine E-Mail-Adresse, um mit Google zu kommunizieren oder Benachrichtigungen zu unseren Diensten zu erhalten.
Wir erheben auch die Inhalte, die Sie bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste erstellen, hochladen oder von anderen erhalten. Dazu gehören beispielsweise E-Mails, die Sie verfassen und empfangen, Fotos und Videos, die Sie speichern, Dokumente und Tabellen, die Sie erstellen, und Kommentare, die Sie zu YouTube-Videos schreiben.
Daten, die wir bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste erheben
Ihre Apps, Browser und Geräte
Wir erheben Daten über die Apps, Browser und
Geräte
, die Sie beim Zugriff auf Google-Dienste verwenden. Das hilft uns, Funktionen wie automatische Produktupdates anzubieten oder Ihren Bildschirm zu dimmen, wenn Ihr Akku schwach ist.
Zu den von uns erhobenen Daten zählen
eindeutige Kennungen
, der Typ und die Einstellungen des Browsers, der Typ und die Einstellungen des Geräts, das Betriebssystem, Informationen zum Mobilfunknetz wie der Name des Mobilfunkanbieters und die Telefonnummer sowie die Versionsnummer der App. Wir erheben auch Daten über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten. Hierzu zählen u. a. die
IP-Adresse
, Absturzberichte, Systemaktivitäten sowie das Datum, die Uhrzeit und die Verweis-URL Ihrer Anfrage.
Wir erheben diese Daten, wenn ein Google-Dienst auf Ihrem Gerät unsere Server kontaktiert, beispielsweise wenn Sie eine App vom Play Store installieren oder wenn ein Dienst automatische Updates abfragt. Wenn Sie ein
Android-Gerät mit Google Apps
verwenden, kontaktiert Ihr Gerät regelmäßig die Google-Server, um Daten über Ihr Gerät und die Verbindung zu unseren Diensten bereitzustellen. Zu diesen Daten zählen beispielsweise
der Typ Ihres Geräts und der Name Ihres Mobilfunkanbieters
, Absturzberichte, die von Ihnen installierten Apps und, abhängig von den Einstellungen auf Ihrem Gerät,
weitere Informationen dazu, wie Sie Ihr Android-Gerät verwenden
.
Ihre Aktivitäten
Wir erheben in unseren Diensten Daten zu Ihren Aktivitäten. Diese Daten verwenden wir beispielsweise, um Ihnen ein YouTube-Video zu empfehlen, das Ihnen gefallen könnte. Unter anderem könnten folgende Aktivitätsdaten erhoben werden:
Begriffe, nach denen Sie suchen
Videos, die Sie sich ansehen
Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen, die Sie sich ansehen und mit denen Sie interagieren
Sprach- und Audiodaten
Kaufaktivitäten
Personen, mit denen Sie kommunizieren oder Inhalte austauschen
Aktivitäten auf Websites und Apps von Drittanbietern, die unsere Dienste nutzen
Der Chrome-Browserverlauf, den Sie
mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisiert
haben
Wenn Sie unsere
Dienste nutzen, um Anrufe zu tätigen und zu erhalten oder um Nachrichten zu senden und zu empfangen
, erheben wir möglicherweise Anruf- und Nachrichteninformationen wie Ihre Telefonnummer, die Anrufernummer, die Nummer des Angerufenen, Weiterleitungsnummern, die E-Mail-Adressen von Sender und Empfänger, das Datum und die Uhrzeit von Anrufen und Nachrichten, die Dauer von Anrufen, Routing-Informationen und die Art und Anzahl von Anrufen und Nachrichten.
Die in Ihrem Konto gespeicherten Aktivitätsdaten können Sie sich in Ihrem Google-Konto ansehen und sie dort auch verwalten.
Zum Google-Konto
Ihre Standortdaten
Wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, erheben wir Standortinformationen. Dadurch können wir Ihnen Funktionen wie Wegbeschreibungen, Suchergebnisse für Dinge in Ihrer Nähe und Werbung auf Grundlage Ihres Standorts anbieten.
Je nachdem, welche Produkte Sie nutzen und welche Einstellungen Sie auswählen, kann Google verschiedene Arten von Standortinformationen verwenden, um bestimmte Dienste und Produkte hilfreicher zu gestalten. Dazu gehören unter anderem:
GPS- und andere
Sensordaten von Ihrem Gerät
IP-Adresse
Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten
, zum Beispiel von Ihren Suchanfragen oder
Orte, die Sie mit einem Label versehen, etwa Ihr Zuhause oder Ihr Arbeitsplatz
Informationen über Objekte in der Nähe Ihres Geräts
, wie etwa WLAN-Zugriffspunkte, Funkmasten und Bluetooth-fähige Geräte
Die durch uns erhobenen Arten von Standortdaten und wie lange wir diese speichern hängen zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab. Zum Beispiel können Sie mit der App „Einstellungen“ auf Ihrem Android-Gerät
die Standorterfassung Ihres Geräts aktivieren oder deaktivieren
. Wenn Sie eine private Karte mit Orten erstellen möchten, die Sie mit Ihren angemeldeten Geräten besuchen, können Sie auch den
Standortverlauf
aktivieren. Und wenn die Einstellung „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert ist, werden Ihre Suchanfragen und anderen Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten, die möglicherwiese ebenfalls Standortinformationen enthalten, in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert. Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden,
finden Sie hier
.
In manchen Fällen erhebt Google auch Daten über Sie aus
öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
. Wenn beispielsweise Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird, kann die Google-Suchmaschine diesen Artikel indexieren und anderen Personen zeigen, wenn sie nach Ihrem Namen suchen. Unter Umständen erhalten wir auch Daten über Sie von vertrauenswürdigen Partnern. Dazu zählen Verzeichnisdienste, die uns in Google-Diensten anzuzeigende Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, Marketingpartner, die uns Daten über potenzielle Kunden unserer Geschäftsdienste bereitstellen, und Sicherheitspartner, die uns Daten liefern, mit denen wir uns
vor Missbrauch schützen
können. Wir erhalten auch Daten von
Partnern, damit wir in deren Auftrag Werbung und Recherchedienste zur Verfügung stellen können
.
Zum Erheben und Speichern von Daten verwenden wir verschiedene Technologien. Dazu zählen
Cookies
,
Pixel-Tags
, die lokale Speicherung wie etwa
Browser-Webspeicher
oder
Anwendungsdaten-Caches
, Datenbanken und
Serverprotokolle
.
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Wir verwenden Daten zur Verbesserung unserer Dienste
Wir nutzen die von uns im Rahmen unserer Dienste erhobenen Daten für folgende Zwecke:
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
Wir nutzen Ihre Daten zur
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
. Hierzu zählen beispielsweise die Verarbeitung Ihrer Suchbegriffe, um Suchergebnisse einzublenden, oder das Vorschlagen von Empfängern aus Ihren Kontakten, wenn Sie Inhalte teilen möchten.
Wartung und Verbesserung unserer Dienste
Wir verwenden Ihre Daten,
um zu gewährleisten, dass unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
. Beispielsweise verwenden wir sie zur Überprüfung von Störungen oder zur Beseitigung von Problemen, die Sie uns gemeldet haben. Außerdem nutzen wir Ihre Daten, um
unsere Dienste zu verbessern
. Dazu zählt beispielsweise die Feststellung, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die in unseren Diensten verwendete Rechtschreibprüfung verbessern können.
Entwicklung neuer Dienste
Wir nutzen die im Rahmen unserer bestehenden Dienste erhobenen Daten zur Entwicklung neuer Dienste. Beispielsweise halfen uns Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, organisiert haben, bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos.
Bereitstellung personalisierter Dienste, einschließlich Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen
Wir nutzen die von uns erhobenen Daten zur Personalisierung unserer Dienste. Dazu zählen die Bereitstellung von Empfehlungen, von personalisierten Inhalten und
von personalisierten Suchergebnissen
. Beispielsweise erhalten Sie im
Sicherheitscheck
Sicherheitstipps, die auf Ihre persönliche Nutzung von Google-Produkten zugeschnitten sind. Je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen kann Google Play Daten nutzen, etwa über Apps, die Sie installiert haben, und Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, um neue Apps zu empfehlen, die Ihnen gefallen könnten.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen zeigen wir Ihnen möglicherweise auch auf Ihre Interessen und Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten bezogene
personalisierte Werbung
. Wenn Sie beispielsweise nach „Mountainbikes“ suchen, kann auf YouTube Werbung für Sportausrüstung eingeblendet werden. In Ihren Einstellungen für Werbung unter
Mein Anzeigen-Center
können Sie festlegen, welche Daten wir zur Auswahl der präsentierten Werbung verwenden.
Wir zeigen Ihnen keine personalisierte Werbung, die auf
sensiblen Kategorien
, wie der ethnischen Zugehörigkeit, Religion, sexuellen Orientierung oder Gesundheit beruht.
Wir zeigen Ihnen keine personalisierte Werbung auf Grundlage von Ihren Inhalten aus Google Drive, Gmail oder Google Fotos.
Wir geben Daten, durch die Sie persönlich identifizierbar sind, wie beispielsweise Ihren Namen oder Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, nur dann an Werbetreibende weiter, wenn Sie uns dazu auffordern. Wenn Sie beispielsweise Werbung für einen Blumenladen in Ihrer Nähe sehen und die Schaltfläche "Zum Anrufen tippen" auswählen, verbinden wir Ihren Anruf und geben Ihre Telefonnummer möglicherweise an den Blumenladen weiter.
Zu „Mein Anzeigen-Center“
Messung der Leistung
Wir nutzen die Daten zur Analyse und Messung, um zu verstehen, wie unsere Dienste verwendet werden. Beispielsweise analysieren wir Daten über Ihre Besuche auf unseren Websites, um das Design unserer Produkte zu optimieren. Zusätzlich nutzen wir Daten der Werbeanzeigen, mit denen Sie interagieren, einschließlich Ihrer zugehörigen Aktivitäten in der Google Suche, um Werbetreibenden ein besseres Verständnis ihrer Werbekampagnen zu ermöglichen. Dazu nutzen wir verschiedene Tools, wie z. B. Google Analytics. Wenn Sie Websites besuchen oder Apps verwenden, bei denen Google Analytics eingesetzt wird, kann ein Google Analytics-Kunde sich dafür entscheiden, es Google zu ermöglichen,
Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten auf dieser Website oder in dieser App mit Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites oder in anderen Apps zu verknüpfen
, bei denen ebenfalls unsere Werbedienste genutzt werden.
Kommunikation mit Ihnen
Wir nutzen die von uns erhobenen Daten, wie Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, um uns direkt mit Ihnen in Verbindung zu setzen. So könnten wir Ihnen beispielsweise eine Benachrichtigung senden, wenn wir verdächtige Aktivitäten feststellen, wie einen Versuch, sich von einem ungewöhnlichen Standort aus in Ihrem Google-Konto anzumelden. Außerdem könnten wir Sie auch über bevorstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen in Bezug auf unsere Dienste informieren. Und wenn Sie Google kontaktieren, zeichnen wir Ihre Anfrage auf, um Ihnen bei der Lösung etwaiger Probleme behilflich zu sein.
Schutz von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit
Wir nutzen Daten, um die Verbesserung der
Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit
unserer Dienste zu unterstützen. Dazu zählen das Erkennen, Verhindern und Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsrisiken und technischen Problemen, die Google, unseren Nutzern oder
der Öffentlichkeit
schaden könnten.
Um Ihre Daten zu diesen Zwecken zu verarbeiten, verwenden wir verschiedene Technologien. Wir nutzen automatisierte Systeme, die Ihre Inhalte analysieren, sodass wir Ihnen personalisierte Suchergebnisse, personalisierte Werbung oder andere Funktionen bereitstellen können, die auf Ihre Nutzung unserer Dienste zugeschnitten sind. Zusätzlich analysieren wir Ihre Inhalte, damit wir
Missbrauch erkennen können
, wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte. Wir verwenden auch
Algorithmen
, um Muster in Daten zu erkennen. Google Übersetzer hilft beispielsweise Personen, über Sprachbarrieren hinweg zu kommunizieren, indem der Dienst geläufige Sprachmuster in Sätzen erkennt, die übersetzt werden sollen.
Unter Umständen werden
die durch uns erhobenen Daten zu den oben beschriebenen Zwecken dienst- und geräteübergreifend verwendet
. Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise, je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen, Videos von Gitarrenspielern auf YouTube ansehen, kann eine Werbeanzeige für Gitarrenunterricht auf einer Website ausgeliefert werden, auf der unsere Anzeigenprodukte verwendet werden. Je nach Ihren Kontoeinstellungen könnten
Ihre Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites und in Apps
mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten verknüpft werden, um die Dienste von Google und die von Google ausgelieferten Werbeanzeigen zu verbessern.
Wenn andere Nutzer bereits über Ihre E-Mail-Adresse oder andere Sie identifizierende Daten verfügen, zeigen wir diesen Nutzern möglicherweise die öffentlich sichtbaren Daten Ihres Google-Kontos an, wie Ihren Namen und Ihr Foto. Damit können andere Personen beispielsweise eine von Ihnen stammende E-Mail identifizieren.
Bevor wir Daten zu anderen als den in dieser Datenschutzerklärung aufgeführten Zwecken nutzen, bitten wir Sie um Ihre Einwilligung.
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Sie haben Entscheidungsmöglichkeiten in Bezug auf die durch uns erhobenen Daten und ihre Verwendung
In diesem Abschnitt werden die wichtigsten Einstellungen beschrieben, mit denen Sie Ihre Privatsphäre in unseren Diensten verwalten können. Sie können auch den
Privatsphärecheck
verwenden, um wichtige Datenschutzeinstellungen zu überprüfen und anzupassen. Zusätzlich zu diesen Tools bieten wir auch spezifische Datenschutzeinstellungen in unseren Produkten. Mehr dazu erfahren Sie in unserem
Leitfaden zum Datenschutz in Google-Produkten
.
Zum Privatsphärecheck
Daten verwalten, überprüfen und aktualisieren
Wenn Sie angemeldet sind, können Sie Ihre Daten jederzeit in den von Ihnen verwendeten Diensten überprüfen und aktualisieren. Beispielsweise ermöglichen Ihnen Fotos und Drive die Verwaltung bestimmter auf Google gespeicherter Inhaltstypen.
Wir stellen Ihnen auch einen Ort zur Verfügung, an dem Sie die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Daten überprüfen und deren Speicherung steuern können. Ihr
Google-Konto
beinhaltet:
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Aktivitätseinstellungen
Hier können Sie festlegen, welche Arten von Aktivitäten in Ihrem Konto gespeichert werden sollen. Wenn Sie zum Beispiel den YouTube-Verlauf aktiviert haben, werden die Videos, die Sie sich ansehen, und die Dinge, nach denen Sie suchen, in Ihrem Konto gespeichert, damit Sie bessere Empfehlungen erhalten und Videos an der zuletzt angesehenen Stelle fortsetzen können. Und wenn die Einstellung „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert ist, werden Ihre Suchanfragen und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert. So können Dienste persönlicher für Sie gestaltet werden, damit Sie unter anderem schneller Suchergebnisse und nützlichere Empfehlungen zu Apps und Inhalten erhalten. „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ hat auch eine Untereinstellung, mit der Sie festlegen können, ob
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites, in anderen Apps und auf Geräten, die Google-Dienste nutzen
, in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert und zur Verbesserung von Google-Diensten verwendet werden. Zu diesen Informationen gehört beispielsweise, welche Apps Sie auf Android installieren und verwenden.
Aktivitätseinstellungen aufrufen
Einstellungen für Werbung
Hier können Sie Ihre Einstellungen zu Werbeanzeigen verwalten, die auf Google sowie auf Websites und in Apps im Rahmen einer
Partnerschaft mit Google
von Google ausgeliefert werden. Sie können Ihre Interessen verändern, auswählen, ob Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden sollen, um sich relevantere Werbung präsentieren zu lassen, und bestimmte Werbedienste aktivieren oder deaktivieren.
Zu „Mein Anzeigen-Center“
Über mich
Personenbezogene Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto verwalten und festlegen, wer sie in Google-Diensten sehen kann.
Zu "Über mich"
Soziale Empfehlungen
Hier können Sie auswählen, ob Ihr Name und Ihr Foto neben Ihren Aktivitäten wie Rezensionen und Empfehlungen in Werbeanzeigen erscheinen sollen.
Zu "Soziale Empfehlungen"
Websites und Apps, auf bzw. in denen Google-Dienste genutzt werden
Daten von Websites und Apps, auf bzw. in denen Google-Dienste wie Google Analytics genutzt werden, verwalten, die eventuell an Google weitergegeben werden, wenn Sie ihre Dienste aufrufen oder damit interagieren.
Zu Wie wir Daten von Websites oder Apps verwenden, auf bzw. in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden
Möglichkeiten zur Überprüfung und Aktualisierung Ihrer Daten
Meine Aktivitäten
In „Meine Aktivitäten“ können Sie überprüfen und festlegen, welche Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert werden, wenn Sie angemeldet sind und Google-Dienste verwenden, zum Beispiel Ihre Suchanfragen oder Nutzung von Google Play. Sie können sich die Inhalte nach Datum und Thema sortiert ansehen und Ihre Aktivitäten teilweise oder vollständig löschen.
Zu "Meine Aktivitäten"
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard ermöglicht Ihnen die Verwaltung von Daten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Zu Google Dashboard
Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
Hier können Sie Ihre Kontaktdaten wie Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und Ihre Telefonnummer verwalten.
Zu den personenbezogenen Daten
Wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit Ihrem Browser oder Gerät verknüpft sind, z. B.:
Personalisierte Suche:
Hier können Sie auswählen
, ob Ihnen anhand Ihrer Suchaktivitäten relevantere Ergebnisse und Empfehlungen bereitgestellt werden sollen.
YouTube-Einstellungen: Hier können Sie Ihren
YouTube-Suchverlauf
und Ihren
YouTube-Wiedergabeverlauf
pausieren und löschen.
Einstellungen für Werbung: Hier können Sie
Ihre Einstellungen für Werbeanzeigen verwalten
, die Ihnen auf Google und Websites sowie in Apps von Google-Anzeigenpartnern präsentiert werden.
Daten exportieren, entfernen und löschen
Sie können eine Kopie Ihrer Inhalte aus Ihrem Google-Konto exportieren, um diese zu sichern oder sie mit einem anderen Dienst als den von Google zu nutzen.
Daten exportieren
Zum Löschen Ihrer Daten haben Sie folgende Möglichkeiten:
Inhalte aus
bestimmten Google-Diensten
löschen
Bestimmte Elemente in Ihrem Konto unter Verwendung von
Meine Aktivitäten
suchen und dann löschen
Bestimmte Google-Produkte
einschließlich Ihrer mit diesen Produkten verknüpften Daten löschen
Gesamtes Google-Konto löschen
Daten löschen
Sie können über den
Kontoinaktivität-Manager
auch einer anderen Person Zugriff zu Teilen Ihres Google-Kontos gewähren, falls Sie unerwarteterweise nicht in der Lage sind, Ihr Konto zu verwenden.
Und schließlich können Sie auch basierend auf dem anwendbaren Recht und unseren Richtlinien eine
Anfrage zum Entfernen von Inhalten
aus bestimmten Google-Diensten stellen.
Es gibt auch andere Möglichkeiten festzulegen, welche Daten von Google erhoben werden dürfen, und zwar unabhängig davon, ob Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind oder nicht. Hierzu zählen:
Browsereinstellungen: Ihr Browser lässt sich beispielsweise so konfigurieren, dass angezeigt wird, wenn von Google ein
Cookie
in Ihrem Browser gesetzt wurde. Ihr Browser lässt sich auch so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies von einer bestimmten Domain oder allen Domains blockiert werden. Beachten Sie aber, dass Cookies erforderlich sind,
damit unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
und etwa Ihre Spracheinstellungen gespeichert werden können.
Geräteeinstellungen: Ihr Gerät verfügt möglicherweise über Steuerelemente, mit denen Sie festlegen können, welche Daten wir erheben. So können Sie beispielsweise auf Ihrem Android-Gerät
Standorteinstellungen anpassen
.
Datenweitergabe
Datenweitergabe durch Sie
In vielen unserer Dienste können Sie Daten mit anderen Personen teilen. Sie bestimmen in diesem Fall, wie dabei vorgegangen werden soll. Beispielsweise können Sie entscheiden, welche Ihrer Videos auf YouTube öffentlich geteilt werden und welche vertraulich bleiben sollen. Bedenken Sie, dass, wenn Sie Daten öffentlich teilen, Suchmaschinen, einschließlich der Google-Suche, möglicherweise auf diese Daten zugreifen können.
Wenn Sie angemeldet sind und mit Google-Diensten interagieren, z. B. wenn Sie Kommentare zu einem YouTube-Video verfassen oder eine App bei Play rezensieren, werden Ihr Name und Ihr Foto neben Ihrer Aktivität angezeigt. Diese Daten werden wir gegebenenfalls
entsprechend Ihren Einstellungen für "Soziale Empfehlungen"
auch in Werbeanzeigen veröffentlichen.
Datenweitergabe durch Google
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an Unternehmen, Organisationen oder Personen außerhalb von Google nur in folgenden Fällen weiter:
Mit Ihrer Einwilligung
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir Ihre Einwilligung dazu haben. Wenn Sie beispielsweise
Google Home verwenden, um eine Tischreservierung vorzunehmen
, holen wir Ihre Zustimmung ein, bevor wir dem Restaurant Ihren Namen oder Ihre Telefonnummer weitergeben. Wir bieten Ihnen außerdem Steuerungsmöglichkeiten, damit Sie
Drittanbieter-Apps und -Websites einsehen und verwalten
können, denen Sie Zugriff auf Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gewährt haben. Vor der Weitergabe von
sensiblen personenbezogenen Daten
holen wir Ihre ausdrückliche Einwilligung ein.
Im Falle von Domain-Administratoren
Wenn Sie Mitglied einer Bildungseinrichtung oder Mitarbeiter einer Organisation sind, die Google-Dienste nutzt, haben der
Domainadministrator
und Reseller, die Ihr Konto verwalten, Zugriff auf Ihr Google-Konto. Diese haben folgende Möglichkeiten:
Auf die in Ihrem Konto gespeicherten Daten zugreifen und diese speichern, z. B. Ihre E-Mail
Statistiken zu Ihrem Konto ansehen, z. B. wie viele Apps Sie installieren
Das Passwort für Ihr Konto ändern
Den Zugriff auf Ihr Konto sperren oder beenden
Ihre Kontodaten abrufen, um anwendbare Gesetze, Vorschriften und gerichtliche Verfahren einzuhalten oder einer vollstreckbaren behördlichen Anordnung nachzukommen
Ihre Möglichkeiten einschränken, Daten oder Datenschutzeinstellungen zu löschen oder zu bearbeiten
Für die Verarbeitung durch andere Stellen
Wir stellen personenbezogene Daten unseren
verbundenen Unternehmen
, anderen vertrauenswürdigen Unternehmen oder Personen zur Verfügung, die diese in unserem Auftrag verarbeiten. Dies geschieht auf der Grundlage unserer Weisungen und im Einklang mit unserer Datenschutzerklärung sowie anderen geeigneten Vertraulichkeits- und Sicherheitsmaßnahmen. Beispielsweise nutzen wir Dienstanbieter zur Unterstützung beim Betrieb unserer Rechenzentren, Bereitstellen unserer Produkte und Dienste, Verbessern unserer internen Geschäftsprozesse und Anbieten zusätzlichen Supports für unsere Kunden und Nutzer. Außerdem arbeiten wir mit Dienstanbietern zusammen, die uns beim Prüfen von Videoinhalten auf YouTube aus Gründen der öffentlichen Sicherheit unterstützen und uns durch das Analysieren und Anhören von Beispielausschnitten gespeicherter Audioaufnahmen von Nutzern helfen, die Audioerkennungstechnologien von Google zu verbessern.
Aus rechtlichen Gründen
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an Stellen außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir nach Treu und Glauben davon ausgehen dürfen, dass die Offenlegung dieser Daten vernünftigerweise notwendig ist, um folgende Zwecke zu erfüllen:
Geltende Gesetze, Vorschriften oder
gerichtliche Verfahren einzuhalten oder einer vollstreckbaren behördlichen Anordnung nachzukommen
. In unserem
Transparenzbericht
veröffentlichen wir Daten über die Anzahl und die Art der Anfragen, die wir von Behörden erhalten.
Geltende Nutzungsbedingungen durchzusetzen, einschließlich der Untersuchung möglicher Verstöße.
Betrug, Sicherheitsmängel oder technische Probleme aufzudecken, zu verhindern oder anderweitig zu bekämpfen.
Die Rechte, das Eigentum oder die Sicherheit von Google,
unserer Nutzer
oder der Öffentlichkeit vor Schaden zu schützen.
Wir geben möglicherweise
nicht personenbezogene Daten
an die Öffentlichkeit und unsere Partner, beispielsweise an Publisher, Werbetreibende, Entwickler oder Rechteinhaber, weiter. Beispielsweise veröffentlichen wir Daten,
um Trends bezüglich der allgemeinen Nutzung unserer Dienste aufzuzeigen
. Darüber hinaus erlauben wir
bestimmten Partnern
, Daten von Ihrem Browser oder Gerät unter Verwendung ihrer eigenen Cookies oder ähnlicher Technologien zu Werbe- und Messzwecken zu erheben.
Falls Google an einem Unternehmenszusammenschluss, einem Unternehmenserwerb oder einem Verkauf von Vermögensgegenständen beteiligt ist, werden wir weiterhin dafür sorgen, die Vertraulichkeit Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten sicherzustellen. Zusätzlich werden wir betroffene Nutzer benachrichtigen, bevor personenbezogene Daten übermittelt oder Gegenstand einer anderen Datenschutzerklärung werden.
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Wir integrieren Sicherheitsfunktionen in unsere Dienste, um Ihre Daten zu schützen
Alle Google-Produkte sind mit starken Sicherheitsfunktionen ausgestattet, die Ihre Daten fortwährend schützen. Die Erkenntnisse, die wir durch die Bereitstellung unserer Dienste gewinnen, helfen uns, Bedrohungen der Sicherheit automatisch abzufangen und zu verhindern, dass Sie mit solchen konfrontiert werden. Wenn wir tatsächlich ein Risiko erkennen, von dem Sie unserer Meinung nach erfahren sollten, benachrichtigen wir Sie und schlagen Ihnen Maßnahmen vor, um sich besser zu schützen.
Wir bemühen uns intensiv darum, Sie und Google vor unbefugtem Zugriff auf Daten oder vor unbefugter Veränderung, Offenlegung oder Vernichtung von Daten zu schützen. Unsere Maßnahmen umfassen Folgendes:
Wir verschlüsseln Ihre Daten, um sie während der Übertragung zu schützen.
Wir bieten eine Vielzahl von Sicherheitsfunktionen, wie
Safe Browsing
, Sicherheitscheck und die
Bestätigung in zwei Schritten
, um Ihnen zu helfen, Ihr Konto zu schützen.
Wir überprüfen laufend unsere Praktiken zur Erhebung, Speicherung und Verarbeitung von Daten, einschließlich der physischen Sicherheitsmaßnahmen, um unsere Systeme vor unbefugtem Zugriff zu schützen.
Der Zugriff auf personenbezogene Daten wird durch uns beschränkt und nur Mitarbeitern, Auftragnehmern und Kundenservicemitarbeitern von Google gewährt, die diese Daten für die weitere Datenverarbeitung unbedingt benötigen. Alle Personen mit diesen Zugriffsrechten sind strengen Vertraulichkeitsverpflichtungen unterworfen und können disziplinarischen Maßnahmen unterzogen oder entlassen werden, falls sie diese Verpflichtungen nicht einhalten.
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Sie können Ihre Daten jederzeit exportieren oder aus Ihrem Google-Konto löschen.
Sie können eine Kopie Ihrer Inhalte aus Ihrem Google-Konto exportieren, um diese zu sichern oder sie mit einem anderen Dienst als den von Google zu nutzen.
Daten exportieren
Zum Löschen Ihrer Daten haben Sie folgende Möglichkeiten:
Inhalte aus
bestimmten Google-Diensten
löschen
Bestimmte Elemente in Ihrem Konto unter Verwendung von
Meine Aktivitäten
suchen und dann löschen
Bestimmte Google-Produkte
einschließlich Ihrer mit diesen Produkten verknüpften Daten löschen
Gesamtes Google-Konto löschen
Daten löschen
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Wir speichern erhobene Daten über verschiedene Zeiträume, abhängig davon, um welche Daten es sich handelt, wie wir sie nutzen und wie Sie Ihre Einstellungen konfigurieren:
Einige Daten können Sie jederzeit löschen, beispielsweise Ihre
personenbezogenen Daten
oder selbst erstellte oder hochgeladene Inhalte, wie
Fotos
und
Dokumente
. Darüber hinaus können Sie in Ihrem Konto gespeicherte
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten
löschen oder
festlegen, dass diese nach einer bestimmten Zeit automatisch gelöscht werden
. Wir speichern diese Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto, bis Sie sie entweder selbst entfernen oder entfernen lassen.
Andere Daten werden nach einer bestimmten Zeit automatisch gelöscht oder anonymisiert, etwa
Werbedaten
in Serverprotokollen.
Einige Daten, etwa dazu, wie oft Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, speichern wir, bis Sie Ihr Google-Konto löschen.
Einige Daten speichern wir für längere Zeit, wenn dies aus legitimen geschäftlichen oder rechtlichen Gründen erforderlich ist. Diese Gründe können Sicherheit, Betrugs- und Missbrauchsabwehr oder eine Dokumentationspflicht im Finanzbereich sein.
Wenn Sie Daten löschen, beginnen wir mit einem Datenlöschvorgang, um dafür zu sorgen, dass die Daten sicher und vollständig von unseren Servern entfernt werden oder nur in anonymisierter Form gespeichert bleiben. Wir bemühen uns, Daten mithilfe unserer Dienste davor zu schützen, irrtümlich oder mutwillig gelöscht zu werden. Aus diesem Grund kann es zwischen der von Ihnen durchgeführten Löschung von Inhalten und dem Zeitpunkt, zu dem Kopien aus unseren aktiven Systemen und Sicherungssystemen gelöscht werden, zu Verzögerungen kommen.
Weitere Informationen zur Dauer der Datenspeicherung bei Google und Angaben dazu, wie lange es dauert, bis wir Ihre Informationen löschen,
finden Sie hier
.
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Wir überprüfen die vorliegende Datenschutzerklärung regelmäßig und verarbeiten Ihre Daten entsprechend dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Datenübermittlung
Wir betreiben
Server auf der ganzen Welt
. Deshalb können Ihre Daten auf Servern verarbeitet werden, die außerhalb des Landes liegen, in dem Sie leben. Datenschutzgesetze sind von Land zu Land unterschiedlich und einige bieten mehr Schutz als andere. Unabhängig davon, wo Ihre Daten verarbeitet werden, wenden wir grundsätzlich dieselben, in der Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen Schutzmaßnahmen an. Ferner halten wir bestimmte
rechtliche Rahmenbedingungen
zu Datenübermittlungen ein.
Sobald wir formale schriftliche Beschwerden erhalten, nehmen wir mit der Person, die die Beschwerde eingereicht hat, Kontakt auf. Wir arbeiten mit den jeweils zuständigen Regulierungsbehörden einschließlich der lokalen Datenschutzaufsichtsbehörden zusammen, um alle Beschwerden bezüglich der Übermittlung Ihrer Daten beizulegen, die wir nicht direkt mit Ihnen klären können.
Anforderungen in Europa
So können Sie Ihre Rechte ausüben und Google kontaktieren
Wenn das Datenschutzrecht der Europäischen Union (EU) oder des Vereinigten Königreichs (UK) auf die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Anwendung findet, stellen wir Ihnen die in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen
Steuerungsmöglichkeiten
zur Verfügung, damit Sie Ihre Rechte ausüben können, Auskunft über Ihre Daten zu erhalten, sie zu aktualisieren, zu
löschen
und deren Verarbeitung einzuschränken. Darüber hinaus haben Sie das Recht, der Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten zu widersprechen oder Ihre Daten in einen anderen Dienst zu exportieren.
Bei weiteren Fragen oder Anliegen hinsichtlich Ihrer Rechte können Sie sich
an Google und an unsere Datenschutzabteilung wenden
. Falls Sie Bedenken bezüglich Ihrer Rechte gemäß lokalem geltenden Recht haben, können Sie sich außerdem an Ihre lokale Datenschutzaufsichtsbehörde wenden.
Datenverantwortlicher
Der für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Informationen zuständige Datenverantwortliche
hängt von Ihrem gewöhnlichen Aufenthaltsort ab, sofern dies in den Datenschutzhinweisen eines bestimmten Dienstes nicht anders angegeben ist:
Google Ireland Limited, mit Sitz in Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Irland, für Nutzer von Google-Diensten, die ihren gewöhnlichen Aufenthalt im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum oder der Schweiz haben.
Google LLC, mit Sitz in 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA, für Nutzer von Google-Diensten, die ihren gewöhnlichen Aufenthalt im Vereinigten Königreich haben.
Google LLC ist unabhängig von Ihrem Wohnort der zuständige Datenverantwortliche für die Verarbeitung von Informationen, die in Diensten wie der
Google Suche
und Google Maps indexiert und angezeigt werden. Google Ireland Limited ist der zuständige Datenverantwortliche für die Verarbeitung von Informationen, mit denen Google AI-Modelle trainiert werden, um sie in Diensten einzusetzen, die Google Ireland Limited im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum oder in der Schweiz bereitstellt.
Rechtsgrundlagen der Verarbeitung
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten zu den in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen
Zwecken
auf der Basis der folgenden rechtlichen Grundlagen:
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, um Ihnen einen Dienst bereitzustellen, den Sie im Rahmen eines Vertrags angefordert haben.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, soweit wir oder
Dritte
ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, dies zu tun. Dabei wenden wir
geeignete Maßnahmen
zum Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre an.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, wenn dies zum Schutz Ihrer lebenswichtige Interessen oder denen einer anderen Person erforderlich ist.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, wenn wir dazu eine rechtliche Verpflichtung haben.
Wir bitten Sie um Ihre Einwilligung zur Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten für bestimmte Zwecke. Sie haben das Recht, Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit zu widerrufen.
Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen sowie die Art, wie Sie Google-Dienste verwenden, bestimmen, welche Daten verarbeitet werden, zu welchem Zweck dies geschieht und was die Rechtsgrundlagen dafür sind. In der folgenden Tabelle werden diese Verarbeitungszwecke, die Arten der verarbeiteten Daten sowie die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung ausführlicher erläutert.
Warum und wie wir Daten verarbeiten
Welche Daten wir verarbeiten
Rechtliche Gründe
Bereitstellung von Google-Diensten, ‑Produkten und ‑Funktionen
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir verarbeiten die Begriffe, nach denen Sie suchen, um Ihnen entsprechende Suchergebnisse anzuzeigen.
Wir verwenden die IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, um Ihnen die angeforderten Daten senden zu können, beispielsweise ein YouTube-Video.
Wir verwenden eindeutige IDs, die in Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert sind, um Sie als die Person zu authentifizieren, die auf Ihr Google-Konto zugreifen darf.
Fotos und Videos, die Sie in Google Fotos hochladen, werden verwendet, um Ihnen zu helfen, Alben, Collagen und andere Kreationen zu erstellen, die Sie mit anderen teilen können.
Wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder Artikel von uns kaufen, verwenden wir Informationen wie Ihre Lieferadresse oder Lieferanweisungen – beispielsweise für die Bearbeitung und Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung sowie zur Bereitstellung des Supports für das Produkt oder die Dienstleistung, die Sie kaufen.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Zahlungsinformationen, wenn Sie zusätzlichen Speicherplatz für Google Drive kaufen.
Wir können Kontaktdaten (wie Namen und E‑Mail-Adressen) von Personen verwenden, mit denen Sie in Google-Produkten interagieren. So können wir Ihnen helfen, diese Personen zu finden, wenn Sie in Google-Diensten wie Gmail, Fotos und Assistant etwas mit ihnen teilen oder mit ihnen kommunizieren möchten.
Eine E‑Mail mit einer Flugbestätigung kann verwendet werden, um eine Check‑in-Schaltfläche in Gmail zu erstellen.
Google erhebt auch Daten über Sie aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen. Wenn beispielsweise Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird, kann die Google-Suchmaschine diesen Artikel indexieren und anderen Personen zeigen, wenn sie nach Ihrem Namen suchen. Oder wenn Ihre Unternehmensinformationen auf einer Website erscheinen, können wir sie indexieren und in Google-Diensten anzeigen.
Wir können Ihnen helfen, Ihren Standort mithilfe der
Google-Standortfreigabe
zu teilen. So können andere Sie auf einer Karte finden oder Ihre voraussichtliche Ankunftszeit abschätzen.
Wie im Abschnitt
Datenweitergabe
beschrieben, geben wir personenbezogene Daten außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir Ihre Einwilligung dazu haben. Wir bieten Ihnen außerdem Einstellungen, mit denen Sie
Apps und Websites von Drittanbietern überprüfen und verwalten
können, denen Sie Zugriff auf Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gewährt haben.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise durch das Bereitstellen eines YouTube-Videos oder durch die Bearbeitung und Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung, wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder physische Waren von uns kaufen.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Verwaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispiel: Verwendung von Kontaktdaten (wie Namen und E‑Mail-Adressen) von Personen, mit denen Sie in Google-Produkten interagieren, damit Sie diese Personen leichter finden, wenn Sie in Google-Diensten wie Gmail, Fotos und Assistant etwas mit ihnen teilen oder mit ihnen kommunizieren möchten.
Ihre
Einwilligung
, z. B. wenn Sie Ihren Standort über die Google-Standortfreigabe teilen.
Aufrechterhaltung und Verbesserung von Google-Diensten, ‑Produkten und ‑Funktionen
Aufrechterhaltung des Dienstes, damit er wie vorgesehen funktioniert, z. B. durch Fehlerbehebung sowie Nachverfolgung und Behebung von Problemen.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir überprüfen fortlaufend die ordnungsgemäße Funktion unserer Dienste, um Probleme zu erkennen. Wenn wir feststellen, dass eine Funktion fehlerhaft ist, ermöglichen uns die vor dem Eintreten des Problems erhobenen Aktivitätsdaten, das Problem schneller zu beheben.
Wir erfassen die Interaktionen von Nutzern mit Schaltflächen in Anwendungen wie Google Maps und der Google Suche, um festzustellen, ob sie wie vorgesehen funktionieren.
Verbesserung der Google-Dienste sowie der Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit dieser Dienste, z. B. durch Erkennung, Verhinderung und Reaktion von bzw. auf Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsrisiken und technische Probleme, die den Dienst oder Nutzer beeinträchtigen könnten.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir analysieren Daten zu Ihren Interaktionen mit unseren Diensten, damit wir die Produkte weiter optimieren können. So können wir beispielsweise besser feststellen, wenn Nutzer zu lange brauchen, um eine bestimmte Aufgabe auszuführen, oder manche Schritte überhaupt nicht beenden können. In diesem Fall können wir diese Funktion überarbeiten und das Produkt für alle verbessern.
Wir analysieren, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die Rechtschreibprüfung für alle unsere Dienste verbessern können.
Wir analysieren die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Wir analysieren Suchanfragen bei Google Shopping, um festzustellen, welche Produkte, Händler und Marken für verschiedene Arten von Suchanfragen relevant sind.
Die Safe Browsing-Funktion von Google Chrome kann Informationen zu verdächtigen Websites zwischen dem Browser eines Nutzers und Google-Servern teilen und dadurch z. B. zum Schutz vor Phishing, Malware und schädlicher Werbung beitragen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise bei der Verwendung der Interaktionsprotokolle von Google-Apps, um sicherzustellen, dass diese wie vorgesehen funktionieren.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Verwaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die Rechtschreibprüfung für alle unsere Dienste verbessern können.
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen unsere Dienste nutzen, um die Leistung unserer Dienste zu gewährleisten und zu verbessern.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Durchführung von Recherchen, mit denen unsere Dienste für unsere Nutzer verbessert werden und die für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind.
Beispielsweise arbeiten wir daran, die Übersetzungsqualität von Google Übersetzer zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Entwicklung neuer Google-Dienste, ‑Produkte und ‑Funktionen
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Nutzer Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, organisiert haben, halfen uns bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos.
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie kurze Inhalte von Creatorn erstellt und von Nutzern angesehen werden, halfen Google dabei, neue YouTube-Dienste zu entwickeln.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen können wir Audioaufnahmen von Sprachinteraktionen mit Diensten wie der Google Suche, Assistant, Maps und Gboard speichern, um die Audiotechnologien von Google weiterzuentwickeln und zu verbessern.
Wir verwenden Informationen, die online oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind, um neue Modelle für maschinelles Lernen zu trainieren und grundlegende Technologien zu entwickeln, die für verschiedene Google-Produkte wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI-Funktionen eingesetzt werden.
Wir nutzen Ihre Interaktionen mit KI-Modellen und ‑Technologien wie Gemini-Apps, um diese Modelle zu entwickeln, zu trainieren, zu optimieren und zu verbessern, damit sie besser auf Ihre Anfragen reagieren. Wir verwenden sie auch, um Klassifikatoren und Filter zu aktualisieren und dadurch z. B. die Sicherheit, das Sprachverständnis und die Genauigkeit zu verbessern.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Funktionen, die für unsere Nutzer hilfreich sind.
Beispielsweise haben uns Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, verwendet haben, bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos geholfen. Oder wir nutzen Daten, die online oder in anderen öffentlichen Quellen verfügbar sind, um die KI-Modelle von Google zu trainieren sowie Produkte und Funktionen weiterzuentwickeln, die diese grundlegenden Technologien nutzen – wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI.
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Zum Beispiel verwenden wir Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten – wie Ihre Interaktionen mit Gemini-Apps – um Modelle für maschinelles Lernen zu trainieren und zu verbessern und um ihr Sprachverständnis sowie ihre Sicherheitsklassifikatoren und -filter zu aktualisieren.
Mit Ihrer
Einwilligung
, beispielsweise das Speichern von Audioaufnahmen von Sprachinteraktionen mit der Google Suche, Assistant, Maps und Gboard, um Technologien zur Audioerkennung von Google zu entwickeln und verbessern.
Zur Bereitstellung personalisierter Dienste, einschließlich Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen
Um unsere Dienste für Sie anzupassen, etwa über Empfehlungen, personalisierte Inhalte und personalisierte Suchergebnisse.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Der Sicherheitscheck von Google bietet Ihnen Sicherheitstipps, die an Ihre Nutzung von Google-Produkten angepasst sind.
Google News bietet Ihnen möglicherweise lokale Nachrichten, die auf Ihrem ungefähren Standort basieren.
Die Google Suche bietet Ihnen möglicherweise Ergebnisse, die auf ihrem ungefähren Standort basieren.
Google Assistant kann Ihre Kontakte verwenden, um auf Anfrage Nachrichten zu senden, z. B. „SMS an Max Mustermann“.
Google Play nutzt Daten, etwa über Apps, die Sie installiert haben, und Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, um neue Apps zu empfehlen, die Ihnen gefallen könnten.
Möglicherweise zeigen wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Google Suche, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht.
Google kann Werbung basierend auf dem Kontext der von Ihnen besuchten Website anzeigen, beispielsweise Anzeigen für Gartengeräte auf einer Seite mit Tipps zum Gärtnern.
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert haben, können Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse erhalten, die auf Ihren bisherigen Suchanfragen und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten basieren.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen, um auf Ihre Interessen bezogene personalisierte Werbung anzuzeigen.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wenn Sie nach „Mountainbikes“ suchen oder Videos über Mountainbiken ansehen, kann in Ihren Suchergebnissen oder auf YouTube Werbung für Sportausrüstung eingeblendet werden.
Wenn Sie sich auf YouTube Videos zum Thema Backen ansehen, wird Ihnen beim Surfen im Web möglicherweise mehr Werbung zu diesem Thema präsentiert.
Möglicherweise wird Ihnen auch personalisierte Werbung präsentiert, die auf den Daten des Werbetreibenden basiert. Wenn Sie beispielsweise auf der Website eines Werbetreibenden eingekauft haben, kann dieser die Daten über Ihren Besuch zum Einblenden von Werbeanzeigen nutzen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Um einen
Vertrag mit Ihnen auszuführen
, zum Beispiel wenn Google Assistant Ihre Kontakte verwendet, um auf Ihre Anfrage hin eine Nachricht zu senden, wie „Sende eine SMS an Max Mustermann“.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Personalisierung unserer Dienste, um sie nutzerfreundlicher zu gestalten.
Beispielsweise können wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Google Suche zeigen, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht, Sicherheitstipps passend zu Ihrer Nutzung von Google-Produkten geben oder gegebenenfalls die Nutzung altersgerecht anpassen.
Einblenden von Werbung, um viele unserer Dienste kostenlos anbieten zu können.
Zum Beispiel zeigen wir möglicherweise Werbung, die auf dem Kontext einer besuchten Website basiert, wie Werbeanzeigen für Gartengeräte auf einer Seite mit Gartentipps. Bei personalisierter Werbung bitten wir Sie um Ihre Einwilligung.
Mit Ihrer
Einwilligung
– beispielsweise Empfehlungen bei Google Play basierend auf Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, oder personalisierte Werbung auf Grundlage Ihrer Interessen. Zum Beispiel könnte Ihnen Werbung rund um das Thema Backen angezeigt werden, wenn Sie im Web surfen, nachdem Sie auf YouTube Videos über Backen angesehen haben.
Zur Leistungsmessung – Wir nutzen die Daten zur Analyse und Messung, um zu verstehen, wie unsere Dienste verwendet werden.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir analysieren Daten über Ihre Besuche auf unseren Websites, um das Design unserer Produkte zu optimieren.
Wir nutzen Daten zu der Werbung, mit der Sie interagieren, um Werbetreibenden ein besseres Verständnis ihrer Werbekampagnen zu ermöglichen.
Wir verwenden Daten darüber, welche Orte Nutzer in Google Earth am häufigsten anklicken, um zu erfahren, welche Funktionen beliebt sind, und um Fehler zu identifizieren.
Die Google Suche erhebt, wie oft eine bestimmte Anfrage gestellt wurde und wie Nutzer die Qualität ihrer Suchergebnisse wahrnehmen, um die Google Suche noch hilfreicher zu gestalten.
Google Übersetzer analysiert Daten über die Anzahl der angefertigten Übersetzungen und die Häufigkeit, mit der eine Übersetzung als minderwertig eingestuft wird, um mögliche neue Funktionen zu ermitteln und Probleme bei der Nutzung des Dienstes zu beheben.
Wir geben möglicherweise nicht personenidentifizierbare Informationen an unsere Partner – beispielsweise Lizenzgeber von Inhalten – weiter, wenn wir Lizenzgebühren zahlen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen unsere Dienste nutzen, um die Leistung unserer Dienste zu gewährleisten und zu verbessern.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Aufdecken, Verhindern oder anderweitiges Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln oder technischen Problemen bei unseren Diensten.
Beispielsweise beobachten wir Nutzungsmuster in Google Earth, um Programmfehler zu identifizieren.
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, wie oft eine Übersetzung bei Google Übersetzer als minderwertig eingestuft wird, um Probleme bei der Nutzung des Dienstes zu beheben.
Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Funktionen, die für unsere Nutzer hilfreich sind.
Zum Beispiel analysieren wir Daten zur Anzahl der in Google Übersetzer angefertigten Übersetzungen, um mögliche neue Funktionen zu ermitteln.
Einhalten von Verpflichtungen gegenüber unseren Partnern wie Entwicklern und Rechteinhabern.
Zum Beispiel erstellen wir Berichte für die Lizenzgeber von Inhalten, die mit der Zahlung von Lizenzgebühren einhergehen.
Für die Kommunikation mit Ihnen – Wir verwenden die von uns erhobenen Daten, wie etwa Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, um direkt mit Ihnen zu interagieren.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
So könnten wir Ihnen beispielsweise eine Benachrichtigung senden, wenn wir verdächtige Aktivitäten feststellen, z. B. einen Versuch, sich von einem ungewöhnlichen Standort aus in Ihrem Google-Konto anzumelden.
Möglicherweise informieren wir Sie über anstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen unserer Dienste.
Wenn Sie Google kontaktieren, zeichnen wir Ihre Anfrage auf, um Ihnen bei der Lösung eventuell auftretender Probleme behilflich sein zu können.
Google-Dienste wie Google Fotos können Ihnen, abhängig von Ihren Einstellungen, Marketingmitteilungen über Angebote wie beispielsweise Rabattaktionen für Fotodrucke senden.
Google-Dienste wie YouTube Premium und YouTube Music Premium können Sie über anstehende Änderungen Ihres Abonnements informieren.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Zur
Ausführung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise wenn Sie den Google-Support kontaktieren oder sich für Mitteilungen über Produktupdates anmelden.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Wir informieren Sie beispielsweise über unsere Dienste, beispielsweise über anstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen.
Marketing, um Nutzer über unsere Dienste zu informieren.
Zum Beispiel können wir eine E-Mail an Nutzer von Google Fotos senden, die Informationen zu einer Rabattaktion für Fotodrucke enthält.
Zum Schutz von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit
Zur Verbesserung der Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit unserer Dienste. Dazu zählen das Erkennen, Verhindern und Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln und technischen Problemen, die Google, unseren Nutzern oder der Öffentlichkeit schaden könnten.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir erheben und analysieren IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten, um unsere Dienste durch automatisierte Mechanismen vor Missbrauch zu schützen. Dieser Missbrauch kann viele verschiedene Formen annehmen, zum Beispiel das Senden von Spam an Gmail-Nutzer. Außerdem könnte Werbetreibenden durch betrügerisches Klicken auf Werbung Geld gestohlen werden oder Inhalte durch das Starten eines Distributed-Denial-of-Service-Angriffs (DDoS) unterdrückt werden.
Mit der Funktion "Letzte Kontoaktivität" in Gmail können Sie feststellen, ob und wann eine andere Person ohne Ihr Wissen auf Ihre E-Mail zugegriffen hat. In dieser Funktion finden Sie Informationen zu den letzten Aktivitäten in Gmail, wie etwa die IP-Adressen, über die auf Ihre E-Mails zugegriffen wurde, sowie wo und wann der Zugriff erfolgt ist.
Wir analysieren Ihre Inhalte, um
Missbrauch wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte zu erkennen
.
Wir verarbeiten Informationen zu Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten aus unseren Diensten gemäß den Richtlinien von Google zur Entfernung von Inhalten oder gemäß anwendbarem Recht, um das betreffende Ersuchen zu prüfen, Transparenz zu gewährleisten, die Fähigkeit zur Rechenschaftslegung zu verbessern und Missbrauch und Betrug bei diesen Verfahren zu verhindern.
Zur Einhaltung geltender Gesetze, Verordnungen sowie Rechtsverfahren oder Befolgung eines vollstreckbaren behördlichen Ersuchens.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wie andere Technologie- und Kommunikationsunternehmen auch erhält Google regelmäßig Anfragen von staatlichen Behörden und Gerichten auf der ganzen Welt, in denen wir zur Offenlegung von Nutzerdaten aufgefordert werden. Die Achtung Ihrer Privatsphäre und die Sicherheit Ihrer gespeicherten Daten sind zwei wesentliche Aspekte, an denen wir uns bei der Frage orientieren, ob wir diesen rechtlichen Anfragen nachkommen. Unsere Rechtsabteilung prüft jede einzelne Anfrage unabhängig von ihrer Art. Häufig werden Anfragen abgelehnt, die zu allgemein gehalten sind oder bei denen das korrekte Verfahren nicht eingehalten wurde.
Aufgrund rechtlicher Verpflichtungen müssen wir bestimmte Daten speichern, etwa aufgrund einer Dokumentationspflicht im Finanzbereich. Beispielsweise speichern wir aus steuerrechtlichen oder buchhalterischen Gründen Daten zu Zahlungen, die Sie an Google geleistet haben.
Verschiedene Gesetze und Vorschriften verpflichten uns dazu, Maßnahmen zu ergreifen, um sicherzustellen, dass unsere Nutzer alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen. Um Ihr Alter zu bestimmen, verarbeiten wir das von Ihnen angegebene Geburtsdatum. Wir verarbeiten auch Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten, sowohl wenn Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet als auch wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, und verwenden maschinelles Lernen, um festzustellen, ob Sie wahrscheinlich über 18 Jahre alt sind. In bestimmten Fällen, wenn wir nicht bestätigen können, dass Sie alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen, können wir andere Informationen anfordern, um Ihr Alter zu überprüfen, beispielsweise Ihren Personalausweis, Ihre Kreditkarte, ein Foto von Ihnen oder Ihre Telefonnummer.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Durchsetzen rechtlicher Forderungen, einschließlich der Untersuchung möglicher Verletzungen anwendbarer Nutzungsbedingungen.
Wir analysieren beispielsweise Inhalte, um Missbrauch wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte zu erkennen.
Aufdecken, Verhindern oder anderweitiges Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln oder technischen Problemen bei unseren Diensten.
Zum Beispiel erheben und analysieren wir IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten zum Schutz vor automatisiertem Missbrauch.
Schutz der Rechte, des Eigentums und der Sicherheit von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit vor Schaden, einschließlich der Offenlegung von Informationen gegenüber Behörden.
Beispielsweise reagieren wir auf gerichtliche Verfahren oder vollstreckbare Aufforderungen von staatlichen Stellen und Gerichten zur Offenlegung von Daten, nachdem jede Anfrage sorgfältig geprüft wurde, um sicherzustellen, dass sie den anwendbaren Gesetzen entspricht.
Recherchen, durch die unsere Dienste für Nutzer verbessert werden und die für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind.
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten, um die Öffentlichkeit zu informieren, Recherchen zu ermöglichen und Transparenz in Bezug auf diese Ersuchen zu bieten.
Wenn dies zum Schutz Ihrer
lebenswichtigen Interessen
oder denen einer anderen Person erforderlich ist. Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Daten, um sexuellen Missbrauch von Kindern im Internet zu erkennen und zu bekämpfen.
Wenn wir eine
rechtliche Verpflichtung
haben, zum Beispiel zur Aufbewahrung bestimmter Informationen zu Zwecken der Dokumentationspflicht oder zur Verarbeitung und Aufbewahrung von Informationen, um dabei zu helfen sicherzustellen, dass die Nutzer alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen.
Google-Dienste verknüpfen
Wenn Sie ein Nutzer in der EU sind, bieten wir Ihnen die Wahl, eine Verknüpfung zwischen bestimmten Google-Diensten beizubehalten. Weitere Informationen zu Ihren verknüpften Diensten und zum Verwalten Ihrer Auswahl finden Sie unter
Informationen zum GDM und zu Ihren verknüpften Diensten
.
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Anwendungsbereich dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt für alle Dienste, die von Google LLC und seinen
verbundenen Unternehmen
angeboten werden, einschließlich YouTube, Android und Dienste, die auf Websites Dritter bereitgestellt werden, wie Werbedienste. Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt nicht für Dienste, für die gesonderte Datenschutzrichtlinien gelten und die die vorliegende Datenschutzerklärung nicht beinhalten.
Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt nicht für
den Umgang mit Daten durch andere Unternehmen und Organisationen, die unsere Dienste bewerben,
Dienste, die von anderen Unternehmen oder Personen angeboten werden, einschließlich von ihnen angebotene Produkte oder Websites, die möglicherweise Google-Dienste beinhalten, für die die Erklärung gilt, sowie Produkte oder Websites, die Ihnen in Suchergebnissen angezeigt werden oder die über einen Link in unseren Diensten erreicht werden können
Änderungen an dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Wir ändern diese Datenschutzerklärung von Zeit zu Zeit. Wir werden Ihre Rechte im Rahmen dieser Datenschutzerklärung ohne Ihre ausdrückliche Zustimmung nicht einschränken. Wir geben immer das Veröffentlichungsdatum der letzten Änderungen an und bieten Ihnen Zugriff auf
archivierte Versionen
. Bei wesentlichen Änderungen weisen wir deutlicher auf diese hin. So werden Sie zum Beispiel bei bestimmten Diensten per E-Mail über eine Änderung der Datenschutzerklärung benachrichtigt.
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Google-Dienste
Die folgenden Datenschutzhinweise bieten zusätzliche Informationen zu manchen Google-Diensten:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini-Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Mit Family Link verwaltete Google-Konten für Kinder unter 13 Jahren (in einigen Ländern gilt ein anderes Mindestalter für Google-Konten)
Family Link-Leitfaden zum Datenschutz für Kinder und Teenager
Erhebung von Sprach- und Audiodaten im Rahmen von Funktionen für Kinder in Google Assistant
Wenn Sie Mitglied einer Organisation sind, die Google Workspace oder Google Cloud Platform verwendet, erfahren Sie in den
Datenschutzhinweisen zu Google Cloud
, wie diese Dienste Ihre personenbezogenen Informationen erheben und verarbeiten.
Weitere hilfreiche Ressourcen
Die folgenden Links bieten hilfreiche Ressourcen, um weitere Informationen über unsere Praktiken und Datenschutzeinstellungen zu erhalten.
Ihr Google-Konto
verfügt über zahlreiche Einstellungen, mit denen Sie Ihr Konto verwalten können.
Der
Privatsphärecheck
führt Sie durch die wichtigsten Datenschutzeinstellungen für Ihr Google-Konto.
Im
Google Sicherheitscenter
erhalten Sie Informationen zu unseren integrierten Sicherheitsmaßnahmen und Datenschutzeinstellungen. Außerdem können Sie hier die Tools kennenlernen, mit denen Sie innerhalb Ihrer Familie Grundregeln für die Nutzung digitaler Onlinemedien aufstellen können.
In den
Google-Datenschutzinformationen für Jugendliche
finden Sie Antworten auf einige der uns am häufigsten gestellten Fragen zum Datenschutz
Der Abschnitt
Datenschutz & Nutzungsbedingungen
bietet weitere Hintergrundinformationen zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung und zu unseren Nutzungsbedingungen.
Unter
Technologien
finden Sie weitere Informationen zu folgenden Themen:
So verwendet Google Cookies
Die für
Werbung
verwendeten Technologien
Wie wir Daten von Websites oder Apps verwenden, auf bzw. in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden
Wichtige Begriffe
Algorithmus
Ein Prozess oder Regelwerk, dem ein Computer beim Ausführen von Problemlösungsverfahren folgt.
Applikationsdaten-Cache
Ein Applikationsdaten-Cache ist ein Datenspeicher auf einem Gerät. Damit kann eine Webanwendung zum Beispiel ohne Internetverbindung ausgeführt oder die Leistung der Anwendung durch schnelleres Laden der Inhalte verbessert werden.
Browser-Webspeicher
Mithilfe des Browser-Webspeichers können Websites Daten in einem Browser auf einem Gerät speichern. Wenn der Speicher als "lokaler Speicher" verwendet wird, können Daten sitzungsübergreifend gespeichert werden. Dadurch sind sie auch nach dem Schließen und erneuten Öffnen des Browsers weiterhin abrufbar. Eine Technologie, die dies ermöglicht, ist HTML 5.
Cookies
Ein Cookie ist eine kleine Datei, die eine Zeichenkette enthält, die an Ihren Computer gesendet wird, wenn Sie eine Website aufrufen. Wenn Sie die Website das nächste Mal besuchen, kann diese anhand des Cookies Ihren Browser wiedererkennen. Cookies können Nutzereinstellungen und andere Informationen speichern. Ihr Browser lässt sich so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies abgelehnt werden oder dass angezeigt wird, wenn ein Cookie gesendet wird. Einige Funktionen oder Dienste einer Website werden ohne Cookies möglicherweise nicht richtig ausgeführt. Lernen Sie mehr darüber,
wie Google Cookies verwendet
und wie Google Daten, einschließlich Cookies, verwendet,
wenn Sie die Websites oder Apps unserer Partner nutzen
Eindeutige IDs
Bei einer eindeutigen ID handelt es sich um eine Zeichenfolge, anhand derer ein Browser, eine App oder ein Gerät eindeutig identifiziert werden kann. Solche IDs haben eine unterschiedliche Verwendungsdauer und unterscheiden sich darin, ob sie durch den Nutzer zurückgesetzt werden können und wie der Nutzer auf sie zugreifen kann.
Eindeutige IDs werden zu verschiedenen Zwecken verwendet, etwa aus Sicherheitsgründen und zur Betrugserkennung, zum Synchronisieren von Diensten wie dem E-Mail-Posteingang oder zum Speichern von Einstellungen und Anbieten personalisierter Werbung. In Cookies gespeicherte eindeutige IDs dienen beispielsweise dazu, Websites die Darstellung von Browserinhalten in Ihrer bevorzugten Sprache zu ermöglichen. Ihr Browser lässt sich so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies abgelehnt werden oder dass angezeigt wird, wenn ein Cookie gesendet wird. Weitere Informationen dazu,
wie Google Cookies verwendet
Auf anderen Plattformen als Browsern werden eindeutige IDs zur Erkennung eines bestimmten Geräts oder einer App auf diesem Gerät verwendet. Eine eindeutige ID wie die Werbe-ID wird beispielsweise verwendet, um Ihnen auf Android-Geräten relevante Werbung anzuzeigen. Dies können Sie in Ihren Geräteeinstellungen
verwalten
. Eindeutige IDs können auch vom Hersteller einem Gerät fest zugewiesen werden. Diese IDs werden gelegentlich auch als "Universally Unique ID" oder kurz "UUID" bezeichnet. Ein Beispiel hierfür ist die IMEI-Nummer eines Smartphones. Anhand dieser eindeutigen ID können wir etwa unseren Dienst an Ihr Gerät anpassen oder Geräteprobleme im Zusammenhang mit unseren Diensten analysieren.
Gerät
Ein Gerät ist ein Computer, mit dessen Hilfe auf Google-Dienste zugegriffen werden kann. Beispielsweise werden Desktop-Computer, Tablets, intelligente Lautsprecher und Smartphones als Geräte bezeichnet.
Google-Konto
Um einige unserer Dienste nutzen zu können, ist es erforderlich, ein
Google-Konto
zu erstellen und einige personenbezogene Daten (typischerweise Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und ein Passwort) anzugeben. Mithilfe dieser Kontoinformationen ist es möglich, Sie zu authentifizieren, wenn Sie auf Dienste von Google zugreifen, und Ihr Konto vor nicht autorisierten Zugriffen durch andere Nutzer zu schützen. Sie können Ihr Konto jederzeit über die Google-Kontoeinstellungen bearbeiten oder löschen.
IP-Adresse
Jedem Gerät, das mit dem Internet verbunden ist, wird eine Nummer zugewiesen. Diese wird als Internet Protocol(IP)-Adresse bezeichnet. Diese Nummern werden normalerweise in Blöcken zugewiesen, die bestimmten geografischen Gebieten zugeordnet sind. Anhand der IP-Adresse kann oftmals der Ort identifiziert werden, von dem aus sich das Gerät mit dem Internet verbindet.
Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden
Nicht-personenbezogene Daten
Das sind Nutzer-Informationen, die erfasst werden, sodass sie nicht länger auf individuell identifizierbare Nutzer verweisen können.
Personenbezogene Daten
Hierbei handelt es sich um Daten, die Sie uns zur Verfügung stellen und anhand derer Sie persönlich identifiziert werden können (z. B. Ihr Name, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse oder Zahlungsinformationen), oder sonstige Daten, die von Google mit Informationen dieser Art in Verbindung gebracht werden können, beispielsweise Informationen, die wir mit Ihrem Google-Konto verknüpfen.
Pixel-Tag
Ein Pixel-Tag wird auf einer Website oder innerhalb einer E-Mail-Nachricht platziert, um bestimmte Aktivitäten wie das Aufrufen von Websites oder das Öffnen von E-Mails zu erfassen. Pixel-Tags werden häufig in Kombination mit Cookies eingesetzt.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten
Hierbei handelt es sich um besondere Kategorien personenbezogener Daten wie etwa vertrauliche medizinische Informationen, die Zugehörigkeit zu einer bestimmten ethnischen Gruppe, politische oder religiöse Gesinnungen oder sexuelle Neigungen.
Serverprotokolle
Wie bei den meisten Websites zeichnen unsere Server automatisch Ihre Aufrufe unserer Websites auf. Diese „Serverprotokolle“ enthalten normalerweise Ihre Webanfrage, die IP-Adresse, den Browsertyp, die Browsersprache, das Datum und die Uhrzeit Ihrer Anfrage sowie ein oder mehrere Cookies, die Ihren Browser eindeutig identifizieren können.
Ein typischer Protokolleintrag für die Suche nach dem Begriff "Autos" sieht folgendermaßen aus:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
ist dabei die IP-Adresse, die der Internetanbieter dem Nutzer zuweist. Je nach Dienst kann dem Nutzer jedes Mal, wenn er eine Verbindung mit dem Internet herstellt, eine andere Adresse zugewiesen werden.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
sind das Datum und die Uhrzeit der Suchanfrage.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
ist die angeforderte URL einschließlich Anfrage.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
sind der verwendete Browser und das verwendete Betriebssystem.
740674ce2123a969
ist die eindeutige Cookie-ID, die diesem Computer beim ersten Besuch von Google zugewiesen wird. Hinweis: Cookies können von Nutzern gelöscht werden. Wenn der Nutzer seit dem letzten Aufruf von Google das Cookie vom Computer gelöscht hat, wird ihm beim nächsten Aufruf von Google auf dem entsprechenden Gerät erneut eine solche eindeutige Cookie-ID zugewiesen.
Verbundene Unternehmen
Ein verbundenes Unternehmen ist eine juristische Person, die zur Google-Unternehmensgruppe gehört, einschließlich der folgenden Unternehmen, die Dienstleistungen in der EU anbieten: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp und Google Dialer Inc. Weitere Informationen zu den
Unternehmen, die Geschäftsdienstleistungen in der EU anbieten
Verweis-URL
Eine Verweis-URL (Uniform Resource Locator) ist die Information, die ein Webbrowser in der Regel an eine Ziel-Website übermittelt, wenn Sie auf einen Link zu der betreffenden Website klicken. Die Verweis-URL enthält die URL der letzten Website, die im Browser aufgerufen wurde.
Zusätzliche Informationen
Ähnliche Informationen im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer körperlichen oder psychischen Gesundheit
Wenn Sie von uns angebotene Fitnessprodukte und ‐Apps wie Fitbit, die Pixel Watch, Nest oder Google Fit verwenden, erheben wir Daten von Ihnen, z. B. Ihre Größe und Ihr Gewicht. Mithilfe dieser Apps und Geräte sammeln wir außerdem Daten wie Schlafrhythmus, Herzfrequenz, Hauttemperatur, verbrannte Kalorien und zurückgelegte Schritte.
Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, die unsere Dienste nutzen
Websites und Apps, bei denen Google-Dienste wie Werbung und Analysen integriert sind, geben Daten an uns weiter.
Diese Daten werden unabhängig vom verwendeten Browser oder Browsermodus erhoben. Beispielsweise kann der Inkognitomodus in Chrome zwar dazu beitragen, dass andere Personen, die Ihr Gerät verwenden, nicht sehen können, welche Inhalte Sie aufgerufen haben. Websites und Apps von Drittanbietern, bei denen unsere Dienste integriert sind, können dennoch Daten an Google weitergeben, wenn Sie sie öffnen.
Hier finden Sie weitere Informationen
zu einigen der Optionen, mit denen Sie festlegen können, welche Daten weitergegeben werden, wenn Sie Websites und Apps öffnen oder nutzen, die Google-Dienste verwenden.
Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und Web- & App-Aktivitäten aktiviert sind, können Daten zu Ihren Aktivitäten auf Websites, in Apps und in Diensten von Google in den Web- & App-Aktivitäten Ihres Kontos gespeichert werden. Einige Aktivitäten können Informationen über den ungefähren Ort enthalten, an dem Sie sich bei der Nutzung des Google-Dienstes aufgehalten haben. Wenn Sie unter Verwendung eines ungefähren Orts nach etwas suchen, wird dafür ein Gebiet von mindestens drei Quadratkilometern verwendet. Alternativ wird der Ort erweitert, bis der Bereich den Standort von mindestens 1.000 Personen umfasst. So wird Ihre Privatsphäre besser geschützt.
In einigen Fällen werden Orte, an denen Sie in der Vergangenheit gesucht haben, möglicherweise dazu verwendet, einen relevanten Standort für Ihre Suche zu schätzen. Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Berlin nach Cafés suchen, zeigt Google bei zukünftigen Suchanfragen möglicherweise Ergebnisse für Berlin an.
Unter
Meine Aktivitäten
können Sie Ihre Web- & App-Aktivitäten ansehen und verwalten.
Android-Gerät mit Google-Apps
Android-Geräte mit Google-Apps sind Geräte, die von Google oder einem unserer Partner verkauft werden und umfassen Smartphones, Kameras, Fahrzeuge, Wearables und Fernseher. Diese Geräte nutzen Google Play-Dienste und andere vorinstallierte Apps. Dazu zählen Dienste wie Gmail, Maps, die Kamera- und Telefon-App Ihres Smartphones, die Sprachausgabe, die Tastatureingabe und Sicherheitsfunktionen. Weitere Informationen über Google Play-Dienste
finden Sie hier
.
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
Im Folgenden finden Sie Beispiele dafür, wie wir Ihre Daten zur Bereitstellung unserer Dienste nutzen:
Wir verwenden die IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, damit Sie die von Ihnen angeforderten Daten laden können, wie etwa ein YouTube-Video.
Wir verwenden eindeutige IDs, die in Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert sind, um Sie als die Person zu authentifizieren, die auf Ihr Google-Konto zugreifen darf.
Fotos und Videos, die Sie in Google Fotos hochladen, werden verwendet, um Ihnen zu helfen, Alben, Collagen und andere Kreationen zu erstellen, die Sie mit anderen teilen können.
Weitere Informationen
Eine Flugbestätigung, die Sie per E-Mail erhalten, kann verwendet werden, um eine Check-in-Schaltfläche in Gmail zu erstellen.
Wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder Artikel von uns kaufen, teilen Sie uns möglicherweise Informationen wie Ihre Lieferadresse oder Lieferanweisungen mit. Wir verwenden diese Informationen beispielsweise für die Verarbeitung, die Durchführung und die Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung sowie zur Bereitstellung des Supports für den Artikel oder die Dienstleistung, die Sie kaufen.
Bestimmte Google-Dienste
Beispielsweise können Sie
Ihren Blog
aus Blogger oder
eine Google-Website, die Ihnen gehört
, aus Google Sites löschen. Zusätzlich können Sie
Rezensionen
löschen, die Sie zu Apps, Spielen und anderen Inhalten im Play Store verfasst haben.
Bestimmte Partner
Beispielsweise gestatten wir Creatorn und Werbetreibenden, mit Messunternehmen zusammenzuarbeiten, um mithilfe von Cookies oder ähnlichen Technologien mehr über die Zielgruppe ihrer YouTube-Videos oder Werbeanzeigen zu erfahren. Ein weiteres Beispiel sind Händler auf unseren Shopping-Seiten, die mithilfe von Cookies ermitteln, wie viele Nutzer ihre Produkteinträge sehen.
Hier erhalten Sie weitere Informationen
zu diesen Partnern und zu deren Verwendung Ihrer Daten.
Cookies – Damit unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
Wir verwenden beispielsweise ein Cookie namens "lbcs", mit dessen Hilfe sich eine große Zahl von Google Docs-Dokumenten in einem einzigen Browser öffnen lässt. Wird dieses Cookie blockiert, kann Google Docs nicht korrekt ausgeführt werden.
Weitere Informationen
Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten auf dieser Website mit Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites verknüpfen
Google Analytics nutzt eigene Cookies, also Cookies, die vom Google Analytics-Kunden gesetzt wurden. Bei der Verwendung unserer Systeme können Google Analytics-Kunden und Google über Google Analytics generierte Daten mit Drittanbieter-Cookies verknüpfen, die durch Besuche auf anderen Websites generiert wurden. Beispielsweise könnte ein Werbetreibender seine Google Analytics-Daten dazu verwenden, relevantere Werbung zu erstellen oder seinen Traffic genauer zu analysieren.
Weitere Informationen
Der für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Informationen zuständige Datenverantwortliche
Das ist das mit Google verbundene Unternehmen, welches für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten und die Einhaltung der anwendbaren Datenschutzgesetze verantwortlich ist.
der Öffentlichkeit
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten gemäß den Richtlinien von Google zur Entfernung von Inhalten oder gemäß anwendbarem Recht, um das betreffende Ersuchen zu prüfen sowie Transparenz zu gewährleisten, die Rechenschaftspflicht zu verbessern und Missbrauch und Betrug bei diesen Verfahren zu verhindern.
Dienste nutzen, um Anrufe zu tätigen und zu erhalten oder um Nachrichten zu senden und zu empfangen
Beispiele für diese Dienste sind:
Google Voice zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Anrufen, Senden von SMS und Verwalten der Mailbox
Google Meet zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Videoanrufen
Gmail zum Senden und Empfangen von E-Mails
Google Chat zum Senden und Empfangen von Nachrichten
Google Duo zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Videoanrufen und Senden und Empfangen von Nachrichten
Google Fi für einen Telefontarif
Dritte
Beispielsweise verarbeiten wir Ihre Daten, um Rechteinhabern Nutzungsstatistiken bereitzustellen, sie also darüber zu informieren, wie ihre Inhalte in unseren Diensten genutzt wurden. Wir könnten Ihre Daten auch dann verarbeiten, wenn Personen nach Ihrem Namen suchen und wir Suchergebnisse von Websites anzeigen, die öffentlich verfügbare Daten über Sie enthalten.
für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten, um die Öffentlichkeit zu informieren, Recherchen zu ermöglichen und Transparenz in Bezug auf diese Ersuchen zu bieten.
Geeignete Sicherheitsmaßnahmen
Beispielsweise können wir Daten anonymisieren oder verschlüsseln, damit sie mit keinen anderen Daten über Sie verknüpft werden können.
Weitere Informationen
Geräte
Wir können beispielsweise Informationen von Ihren Geräten nutzen, um Ihnen bei der Entscheidung behilflich zu sein, welches Gerät Sie für die Installation einer App oder zum Ansehen eines Films verwenden sollten, die Sie bei Google Play gekauft haben. Diese Informationen verwenden wir außerdem zum Schutz Ihres Kontos.
Gerichtliches Verfahren oder vollstreckbares behördliches Ersuchen
Wie andere Technologie- und Kommunikationsunternehmen auch erhält Google regelmäßig Anfragen von staatlichen Behörden und Gerichten auf der ganzen Welt, in denen wir zur Offenlegung von Nutzerdaten aufgefordert werden. Die Achtung Ihrer Privatsphäre und die Sicherheit Ihrer gespeicherten Daten sind zwei wesentliche Aspekte, an denen wir uns bei der Frage orientieren, ob wir diesen rechtlichen Anfragen nachkommen. Unsere Rechtsabteilung prüft jede einzelne Anfrage unabhängig von ihrer Art. Häufig werden Anfragen abgelehnt, die zu allgemein gehalten sind oder bei denen das korrekte Verfahren nicht eingehalten wurde. Weitere Informationen finden Sie in unserem
Transparenzbericht
.
Gewährleisten und verbessern
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, wie Personen mit Werbung interagieren, um die Leistung unserer Werbeanzeigen zu verbessern.
Gewährleisten, dass unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
Beispielsweise überprüfen wir fortlaufend, ob unsere Systeme ordnungsgemäß funktionieren, sodass Probleme erkannt werden können. Wenn wir feststellen, dass eine Funktion fehlerhaft ist, ermöglichen uns die vor dem Eintreten des Problems erfassten Aktivitätsdaten, das Problem schneller zu beseitigen.
Ihre Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites und in Apps
Diese Aktivitäten könnten durch die Nutzung von Google-Diensten entstehen. Beispiele dafür sind die Synchronisierung Ihres Kontos mit Chrome oder Besuche von Websites und Apps von Google-Partnern. Viele Websites und Apps arbeiten bei der Verbesserung ihrer Inhalte und Dienste mit Google zusammen. Beispielsweise können Websites unsere Werbedienste wie AdSense oder Analysetools wie Google Analytics verwenden oder andere Inhalte wie Videos von YouTube einbetten. Von diesen Produkten können Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten an Google weitergegeben werden. Je nach
Ihren Kontoeinstellungen
und den verwendeten Produkten können diese Daten mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten verknüpft werden, zum Beispiel, wenn ein Partner Google Analytics in Verbindung mit unseren Werbediensten verwendet.
Weitere Informationen über die Datennutzung durch Google
, wenn Sie die Websites oder Apps unserer Partner verwenden
In deren Namen Werbung und Recherchedienste bereitstellen
Beispielsweise können Händler Daten von ihren Kundenkartenprogrammen hochladen, um Informationen zu diesen Programmen in die Such- oder Shopping-Ergebnisse aufzunehmen oder sich ein besseres Bild von der Leistung ihrer Werbekampagnen zu machen. Wir stellen Werbetreibenden nur zusammengefasste Berichte zur Verfügung, die keine Informationen über einzelne Personen preisgeben.
in unseren Diensten erhobene Daten verwenden
Je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen finden Sie im Folgenden Beispiele für die Verwendung der von uns in unseren Diensten erhobenen Daten:
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und eine Suche auf Google durchführen, erscheinen neben Suchergebnissen aus dem öffentlichen Web auch relevante Informationen aus den Inhalten, die in anderen Google-Produkten wie Gmail oder Google Kalender vorhanden sind. Dazu zählen unter anderem der Status Ihrer gebuchten Flüge, Restaurant- und Hotelreservierungen oder Ihre Fotos.
Weitere Informationen
Wenn Sie mit jemandem über Gmail kommuniziert haben und diese Person zu einem Google Docs-Dokument oder einem Termin in Google Kalender hinzufügen möchten, wird die E-Mail-Adresse automatisch vervollständigt, sobald Sie mit der Eingabe des Namens beginnen. Diese Funktion vereinfacht das Teilen von Inhalten mit Freunden und Bekannten.
Weitere Informationen
Die Google App kann Daten nutzen, die Sie in anderen Google-Produkten gespeichert haben, um Ihnen, entsprechend Ihren Einstellungen, personalisierte Inhalte einzublenden. Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Ihren Web- & App-Aktivitäten Suchanfragen gespeichert haben, kann Ihnen die Google App Nachrichtenartikel und andere zu Ihren Interessen passende Informationen auf der Basis Ihrer Aktivitäten zeigen, wie z. B. Sportergebnisse.
Wenn Sie Ihr Google-Konto mit Google Home verknüpfen, können Sie über Google Assistant Ihre Daten verwalten und Dinge erledigen. So können Sie beispielsweise Ihrem Google Kalender Termine hinzufügen oder die Terminübersicht für einen bestimmten Tag aufrufen, Statusaktualisierungen zu einem gebuchten Flug abrufen oder Informationen wie Wegbeschreibungen an Ihr Smartphone senden.
Weitere Informationen
Wenn Sie ein Nutzer in der EU sind, wirken sich Ihre Entscheidungen zum Verknüpfen von Diensten darauf aus, wie bestimmte Google-Dienste die Daten dienstübergreifend verwenden können.
Informationen über Objekte in der Nähe Ihres Geräts
Wenn Sie die Standortdienste von Google unter Android nutzen, können wir die Leistung von Apps verbessern, die, wie Google Maps, Standortdaten benötigen. Wenn Sie den Standortdienst von Google nutzen, sendet Ihr Gerät über Sensoren wie den Beschleunigungsmesser, über nahe gelegene Mobilfunkmasten und über WLAN-Zugangspunkte, wie die MAC-Adresse und die Signalstärke, Informationen an Google. Diese Daten ermöglichen eine bessere Bestimmung Ihres Standorts. Den Google-Standortdienst können Sie in den Einstellungen Ihres Geräts aktivieren.
Weitere Informationen
Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen, die Sie sich ansehen und mit denen Sie interagieren
Beispielsweise erheben wir Daten zu Aufrufen und Interaktionen mit Werbeanzeigen, damit wir Werbetreibenden zusammengefasste Berichte bereitstellen können, aus denen hervorgeht, ob wir ihre Werbeanzeige auf einer Seite ausgeliefert haben und ob die Werbeanzeige von einem Nutzer gesehen wurde. Darüber hinaus können auch andere Interaktionen gemessen werden, etwa wie Sie Ihre Maus über eine Werbeanzeige bewegen oder ob Sie mit der Seite interagieren, auf der die Werbeanzeige eingeblendet wird.
löschen
Sie können beispielsweise, wie oben beschrieben, basierend auf dem anwendbaren Recht (einschließlich Datenschutzrecht) und unseren Richtlinien das
Entfernen von Inhalten aus bestimmten Google-Diensten beantragen
, einschließlich Inhalten, in denen sich möglicherweise Ihre Daten befinden.
Missbrauch erkennen
Wenn wir auf unseren Systemen Spam, Malware, illegale Inhalte (einschließlich
Darstellungen des sexuellen Missbrauchs und der Ausbeutung von Kindern
) und andere Formen von Missbrauch feststellen, die gegen unsere Richtlinien verstoßen, können wir Ihr Konto deaktivieren oder andere angemessene Maßnahmen ergreifen. Unter bestimmten Umständen melden wir den Verstoß auch den zuständigen Behörden.
Öffentlich zugängliche Quellen
Beispielsweise erheben wir Daten, die online oder in anderen öffentlichen Quellen verfügbar sind, um die KI-Modelle von Google zu trainieren sowie Produkte und Funktionen wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI weiterzuentwickeln. Wenn Ihre Unternehmensinformationen auf einer Website erscheinen, können wir sie indexieren und in Google-Diensten anzeigen.
Orte, denen Sie ein Label hinzufügen, z. B. Ihr Zuhause oder Ihr Arbeitsplatz
Sie können wichtige Orte in Ihrem Google-Konto speichern, z. B. Ihr Zuhause oder Ihren Arbeitsplatz. Wenn Sie Ihre Privat- oder Arbeitsadresse festlegen, werden damit bestimmte Aktionen einfacher, etwa das Abrufen von Wegbeschreibungen oder Ergebnissen in der Nähe Ihrer Privat- oder Arbeitsadresse. Außerdem sehen Sie relevantere Werbung.
Sie können Ihre Privat- und Arbeitsadresse jederzeit in Ihrem
Google-Konto
bearbeiten oder löschen.
Partnerschaft mit Google
Es gibt mehr als zwei Millionen Partnerwebsites und -apps im Google-Werbenetzwerk.
Weitere Informationen
Personalisierte Suchergebnisse
Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und die Einstellungen für Web- & App-Aktivitäten aktiviert sind, erhalten Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse auf der Basis Ihrer früheren Suchaktivitäten und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten.
Weitere Informationen dazu erhalten Sie hier.
Auch wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, können Sie personalisierte Suchergebnisse erhalten. Wenn Sie dieses Maß an Personalisierung bei der Suche nicht wünschen, können Sie
privat suchen und surfen
oder die
personalisierte Suche in abgemeldetem Zustand
deaktivieren.
Personalisierte Werbung
Möglicherweise wird Ihnen auch personalisierte Werbung präsentiert, die auf den Daten des Werbetreibenden basiert. Wenn Sie beispielsweise auf der Website eines Werbetreibenden eingekauft haben, kann dieser die Daten über Ihren Besuch zum Einblenden von Werbeanzeigen nutzen.
Weitere Informationen
Personalisierung unserer Dienste
Beispielsweise können wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Suche zeigen, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht.
Personen, mit denen Sie online am häufigsten zu tun haben
Wenn Sie zum Beispiel beim Schreiben einer E-Mail eine Adresse in das Feld "Empfänger", "Cc" oder "Bcc" eingeben, schlägt Gmail Ihnen Adressen von Personen vor,
die Sie am häufigsten kontaktieren
.
Sensible Kategorien
Wenn wir Ihnen personalisierte Werbung präsentieren, so basiert diese auf Themen, von denen wir denken, dass Sie aufgrund Ihrer Aktivitäten daran interessiert sein könnten. Beispielsweise könnten wir Werbung für Themen wie "Kochen und Rezepte" oder "Flugreisen" einblenden. Wir verwenden jedoch nicht solche Themen und schalten nicht solche personalisierten Werbeanzeigen, die auf sensiblen Kategorien wie ethnischer Zugehörigkeit, Religion, sexueller Orientierung oder Gesundheit basieren.
Dasselbe verlangen wie auch von unseren Werbetreibenden
, die unsere Dienste nutzen.
Sensordaten von Ihrem Gerät
Ihr Gerät ist möglicherweise mit Sensoren ausgestattet, die zur genaueren Bestimmung Ihres Standorts und Ihrer Bewegungen verwendet werden können. Beispielsweise kann mithilfe eines Beschleunigungsmessers Ihre Bewegungsgeschwindigkeit erfasst werden und mit einem Gyroskop die Richtung festgestellt werden, in die Sie sich bewegen.
Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden
Server auf der ganzen Welt
Wir betreiben Rechenzentren
auf der ganzen Welt
, um Nutzern unsere Produkte ununterbrochen zur Verfügung stellen zu können.
Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit
Im Folgenden finden Sie Beispiele für die Nutzung Ihrer Daten zur Gewährleistung von Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit unserer Dienste:
Durch das Erheben und Analysieren von IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten können wir unsere Dienste durch automatisierte Mechanismen vor Missbrauch schützen. Dieser Missbrauch nimmt viele verschiedene Formen an, zum Beispiel das Senden von Spam an Gmail-Nutzer. Außerdem könnte Werbetreibenden durch betrügerisches Klicken auf Werbeanzeigen Geld gestohlen werden oder Inhalte durch das Starten eines Distributed-Denial-of-Service-Angriffs (DDoS) unterdrückt werden.
Mit der Funktion "Letzte Kontoaktivität" in Gmail können Sie feststellen, ob und wann eine andere Person ohne Ihr Wissen auf Ihre E-Mail zugegriffen hat. In dieser Funktion finden Sie Informationen zu den letzten Aktivitäten in Gmail, wie etwa die IP-Adressen, über die auf Ihre E-Mails zugegriffen wurde, sowie wo und wann der Zugriff erfolgt ist.
Weitere Informationen
Sprach- und Audiodaten
Sie können zum Beispiel entscheiden, ob Sie möchten, dass Google eine Audioaufnahme in Ihrem Google-Konto speichert, wenn Sie mit der Google Suche, Google Assistant und Google Maps interagieren. Wenn Ihr Gerät einen Befehl zur Aktivierung der Sprachsteuerung erkennt, beispielsweise „Hey Google“, zeichnet Google sowohl Ihre Stimme und Audio als auch einige Sekunden vor der Aktivierung auf.
Weitere Informationen
Synchronisation mit Ihrem Google-Konto
Ihr Chrome-Browserverlauf wird nur dann in Ihrem Konto gespeichert, wenn Sie in Chrome die Synchronisierung mit Ihrem Google-Konto aktiviert haben.
Weitere Informationen
Telefonnummer
Wenn Sie Ihrem Konto Ihre Telefonnummer hinzugefügt haben, kann diese abhängig von Ihren Einstellungen in Google-Diensten für unterschiedliche Zwecke verwendet werden. Beispielsweise kann Ihre Telefonnummer dazu genutzt werden, Ihnen zu helfen, wieder auf Ihr Konto zugreifen zu können, wenn Sie Ihr Passwort vergessen haben. Außerdem kann sie anderen Personen helfen, Sie zu finden und mit Ihnen Kontakt aufzunehmen. Schließlich kann sie verwendet werden, um für Sie relevantere Werbung einzublenden.
Weitere Informationen
Trends aufzuzeigen
Wenn viele Nutzer nach etwas Bestimmtem suchen, kann dies Aufschluss über aktuelle Trends geben. Google Trends analysiert Suchanfragen in der Google Websuche, um die Anzahl der Suchanfragen in einem bestimmten Zeitraum zu ermitteln, und veröffentlicht eine Zusammenfassung dieser Ergebnisse.
Weitere Informationen
Unsere Dienste verbessern
Beispielsweise können wir anhand von Cookies analysieren, wie Nutzer mit unseren Diensten interagieren. Diese Analyse kann uns helfen, unsere Produkte zu optimieren. So könnten wir zum Beispiel feststellen, dass Nutzern die Durchführung einer bestimmten Aufgabe zu lange dauert oder dass manche Schritte überhaupt nicht durchgeführt werden können. In diesem Fall können wir diese Funktion überarbeiten und das Produkt für alle verbessern.
unserer Nutzer
Beispielsweise gibt Google Daten zu Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten aus unseren Diensten an Lumen weiter, um Missbrauch zu verhindern und die Transparenz und Rechenschaft in Bezug auf unsere Moderation von Online-Inhalten zu verbessern. Lumen erfasst und analysiert diese Ersuchen, um Forschung zu ermöglichen, mit deren Hilfe Internetnutzer ihre Rechte besser verstehen.
Weitere Informationen
Vor Missbrauch schützen
Beispielsweise können uns Informationen über Sicherheitsbedrohungen helfen, Sie zu informieren, wenn wir denken, dass Unbefugte Zugriff auf Ihr Konto erlangt haben (an diesem Punkt können wir Ihnen helfen, Maßnahmen zum Schutz Ihres Kontos zu ergreifen).
Werbung, die Sie besonders nützlich finden
Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise auf YouTube Videos zum Thema Backen ansehen, werden Ihnen beim Surfen im Web unter Umständen mehr Werbeanzeigen zu diesem Thema eingeblendet. Anhand Ihrer IP-Adresse können wir auch Ihren ungefähren Standort ermitteln, damit wir Werbung für Pizza-Lieferservices in der Nähe einblenden können, wenn Sie den Suchbegriff "Pizza" eingeben. Hier finden Sie weitere Informationen
über Werbung bei Google
und
warum Ihnen bestimmte Werbeanzeigen präsentiert werden
.
Zahlungsinformationen
Wenn Sie Ihrem Google-Konto eine Kreditkarte oder eine andere Zahlungsmethode hinzufügen, können Sie damit in allen unseren Diensten Artikel einkaufen, wie z. B. Apps im Play Store. Unter Umständen bitten wir Sie um weitere Informationen, wie eine Unternehmenssteuernummer, um Ihre Zahlung verarbeiten zu können. In manchen Fällen müssen wir Ihre Identität überprüfen und könnten Sie dafür nach Informationen fragen.
Wir können Zahlungsinformationen auch verwenden, um zu überprüfen, ob Sie die Altersbeschränkungen einhalten. Dies kann beispielsweise der Fall sein, wenn Sie ein falsches Geburtsdatum angegeben haben, das darauf schließen lässt, dass Sie für ein Google-Konto nicht alt genug sind.
Weitere Informationen
Google
Über Google
Datenschutz
Nutzungsbedingungen
Transparenz-Center
Eine Drop‑down-Liste, um die Sprache der Website zu ändern. Jede Option ist der Name einer Sprache. Es gibt insgesamt 65 Optionen.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Hauptmenü
Google-Apps
Sub-policy 12
https://www.hotjar.com/privacy:
Are you an agency specialized in UX, digital marketing, or growth? Join our
Partner Program
Close banner
Hotjar Logo
Products
Solutions
Pricing
Case studies
Resources
Contact Sales
Sign in
Get started
English
Language
Get started
Toggle navigation menu
Company / Privacy
Your privacy & Hotjar
From day one, Hotjar was designed and built with privacy in mind. We wanted to help our customers improve their websites and create better user experiences, while keeping privacy at the core of our software—and we’ve been doing it since 2014.
Today, Hotjar is used on over 900,000 websites in 180+ countries. We believe we have a responsibility to set the example and protect not just the privacy of our customers, but also that of the people who visit their websites—in other words: you.
Company / Privacy
Your privacy & Hotjar
From day one, Hotjar was designed and built with privacy in mind. We wanted to help our customers improve their websites and create better user experiences, while keeping privacy at the core of our software—and we’ve been doing it since 2014.
Today, Hotjar is used on over 900,000 websites in 180+ countries. We believe we have a responsibility to set the example and protect not just the privacy of our customers, but also that of the people who visit their websites—in other words: you.
Improving websites, for you.
Online businesses use Hotjar to create better website experiences.
Nobody wants to waste their time on a website that is confusing and hard to navigate.
You know it, we know it, and website owners know it too—which is why they turn to Hotjar.
Website owners use Hotjar to better understand user behavior: what actions people take on a website, what elements of a page they click or ignore, what they enjoy, where they struggle. With this insight, website owners can then make changes that improve the overall experience for all website users. And that includes you.
Show more
We record interactions, not your sensitive data.
Hotjar is designed for websites to get insights. And respect your privacy.
When you browse a website that has Hotjar installed, we collect data about your interactions (e.g. where you click, scroll your mouse, move in between pages) and use it to create visual representations of the experience. Website owners get these insights without tracking IP/MAC addresses-- the stuff that relates to the device you use.
Some Hotjar tools, like session recordings, reconstruct the individual actions you took during a website visit; others, like heatmaps, aggregate data points from you and hundreds of other visitors in one report.
But in all cases, by default, sensitive data that you might enter on the site (your credit card details or phone numbers) will never reach our servers: we cannot see it, and neither can the website owner. Hotjar customers viewing a session recording will only see asterisks (‘***’ ) instead of numbers.
For more information, head over to our
Privacy FAQs.
Show more
We will never share or sell your data.
Not to advertisers. Not to third-party services. Not to anyone.
Nobody here at Hotjar likes the idea of tools following us around different websites or companies sharing and selling our data without our permission. We are committed to making sure this doesn’t happen to you, either.
Hotjar is designed to help make websites easier to use, and the data we track about your website visit (for example, what and where you click) is only used for this purpose. We don’t follow you around the Internet: website owners who use Hotjar cannot see or find out about your activity on sites they don’t own. Likewise, we don’t harvest personal data or sell it to anyone, ever, for any reason. Nor do we mine it for profiling or advertising purposes.
To learn more about data privacy, head over to our
Privacy FAQs.
Show more
Request and access your data, anytime.
Your data is stored securely, and you can ask to see it whenever you want.
As a website visitor, you have the right to request access to the personal identifiable information a website owner collected and stored about you. You also have the right to request that this information is deleted.
At any time, you can request a website owner who uses Hotjar to give you access to your data. They can run a search for personal data from inside the Hotjar dashboard; the system will then generate and email you a report that lets you view, and delete, any data connected with you.
To learn more about data privacy and accessing your data, head over to our
Privacy FAQs.
Show more
Tracking: we'll always give you options.
If you prefer websites not to track data about your visit, we can help.
If you prefer websites not to track data about your visit, we can help.
If you want to stop a website using Hotjar from collecting data about your visit, you should know that the website owner is responsible for getting your consent to collect and process data about your visit (and must allow you to withdraw that consent as well).
But we understand that you might want Hotjar (and other tools) to not process data about you regardless of whether a site owner asks for permission or not, so we want to give you an extra option. If you put a ‘Do Not Track’ flag on your browser, Hotjar will look for it before we collect any data about your site visit. Not everybody does that, but we do.
For more information about this take a look at our
guide on how ‘Do Not Track’ in your browser works
.
Show more
Compliance commitment: GDPR, CCPA, and more.
Our customers can use Hotjar in a compliant manner, for you.
We have followed a ‘privacy by design’ approach since our very first day, back in 2014, so we’re big supporters of privacy acts and regulations like the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA), and the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (LGPD) that enhance your privacy rights and protection as a consumer.
We have built the necessary controls around anonymity and consent to make sure website owners who use Hotjar can do it in a compliant manner. Plus, our legal team is fully committed to keeping up-to-date with any changes in the law and making sure they are reflected in our product.
You can read more about GDPR, CCPA, LGPD, and our other commitments over in our
Compliance resources.
Show more
Questions? We’ve got you covered.
From FAQs to in-depth resources - our help center has everything you need to know about Hotjar relating to privacy, compliance, legal, and security.
Take me there
Sub-policy 13
https://www.adroll.com/about/privacy:
Business Units
AdRoll
RollWorks
Careers
Culture
Search Jobs
About
Blog
USA
USA
UK
Deutschland
España
Nederland
France
Italia
Ireland
Australia
Careers
Culture
Search Jobs
About
Blog
Service Privacy Notice
Effective as of March 13, 2025
View
archived Privacy Notice
NextRoll, Inc. (formerly AdRoll, Inc.) and its subsidiaries and affiliates (“
we
” “
our
” or “
us
”) is an independent marketing technology company that offers intelligent, data-driven advertising and marketing services and solutions to help big and small companies accelerate their growth (“
Services
”).
We have prepared this Service Privacy Notice to describe the types of data we collect from you, and explain how, why and when we collect this data in order to provide our Services to our Customers. References to
“Customer”
in this Policy Notice refers to any business, brand, marketer and/or advertiser who uses NextRoll’s Services. This Service Privacy Notice also identifies what rights you have concerning the collection of this data, such as the right to opt-out of interest-based advertising (also commonly referred to as targeted or personalized advertising). If you have additional questions, you can visit our
Trust Center
or
Contact Us.
Please note that this Privacy Notice does not apply to data we collect when you visit a NextRoll website, including
https://www.nextroll.com/
,
www.adroll.com
and
https://www.rollworks.com/
. To learn what data we collect when you visit our websites, please visit the
NextRoll Website Privacy Notice
.
Table of Contents
About NextRoll's Services
What Data we Collect
How We Use the Data We Collect
Data Sharing
Aggregated and De-Identified Data
Cookies and Related Technologies
Non-Cookie Technology for Tracking Outside European Territories
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
Data Retention
Security
International Transfers
Information for European Territory Residents: Our Legal Basis and Your Rights
Information For California Residents Only
Information for Non-California Residents in US States with Data Privacy Laws
Make a Privacy Request
Information For Individuals Located in Brazil
Changes to this Service Privacy Notice
Contact Us About Questions
1. About NextRoll's Services
Back to top
NextRoll is a marketing technology company that helps big and small companies deliver products ambitious marketers use and rely on to grow their businesses. Powered by machine learning and integrated data platforms, NextRoll’s intelligent, data-driven marketing and advertising services and solutions go beyond serving digital ads by providing companies better visibility into which audiences are most interested in certain products and services. By using NextRoll’s proprietary data and machine learning offerings (“
NextRoll Technology
”), companies can better understand their current customers, find new loyal customers and build lasting customer relationships through intelligence-driven direct marketing activities.
NextRoll has two different business divisions:
AdRoll
is an e-commerce marketing platform for companies that sell their products and services directly to consumers (called “
Direct to Consumer
” or “
D2C
” companies). The AdRoll platform makes it easy and affordable for D2C companies to deliver the cross-channel experiences consumers expect – enabling
them to sell more to their existing consumers and identify new consumers to introduce to their products and services. AdRoll does this by creating connected, personalized customer journeys that enable brands to reach new and existing customers through digital advertising, email marketing and onsite experiences. AdRoll also helps companies understand the impact of their marketing efforts with advanced measurement and attribution;
RollWorks
offers an account-based platform for businesses who want to sell their products and services to other businesses (called “
Business to Business”
or “
B2B
” companies). Our RollWorks Services help B2B companies identify their target accounts and key buyers, reach those accounts across multiple channels and measure program effectiveness in their system-of-record.
Interest-Based Advertising
NextRoll’s Technology helps our D2C and B2B Customers provide ads and send emails to people that are most likely to find them interesting by showing them ads that are relevant to their specific interests. This is called “interest-based advertising”. We show many of these interest-based ads on websites and mobile apps which rely on advertising revenue to support the content they provide - and what we all consume - for free each day.
When you visit a website or a mobile application (each a “
Digital Property
”) operated by one of our Customers, open an email from a Customer, or get served an ad by us on behalf of our Customer on a third party site, we may collect certain data from your device as described in this Service Privacy Notice. Our platform then uses that data, as well as other data described in
What Data We Collect
, to help our Customers provide ads and send emails to you that aim to be more relevant to you. To see an example of how this works in practice, see
Example of Interest-Based Advertising.
Interest-based advertising enables publishers of Digital Properties to more accurately determine which ads to serve to specific users based on near real-time data. In turn, this allows our Customers to provide more effective advertising that reaches a more precise pool of prospective buyers.
All in all, interest-based advertising promotes better competition in the marketplace (for example, small and medium sized companies have a better opportunity to reach as many prospective buyers as large, well-funded, competitors), and allows our Customers to provide free or low-cost content to their customers due to the resources generated by effective advertising.
Example of Interest-Based Advertising
You’re working from home for the foreseeable future and want to invest in more comfortable work-from-home clothing. You can’t go to the store right now so you decide to peruse some e-commerce sites instead. You go to Google and type in “loungewear” and a list of websites pop up, including one for ABC Sweatshirts. You’re still in the research phase so you browse their site but don’t purchase. Luckily, ABC Sweatshirts is a
customer
of NextRoll and uses the AdRoll technology for its e-commerce platform. Our technology notes that your device visited ABC Loungwear’s website and was looking at sweatshirts.
Later, as you browse the Internet, we show you ads online from ABC Sweatshirts to encourage you to come back and purchase the sweatshirt, perhaps even with a discount offer or notice of an upcoming sale. We may also show you ads from other companies that sell similar products or services you may be interested in to complete your loungewear outfit, such as sweatpants or home slippers. In addition, if you gave ABC Sweatshirts your email address for marketing purposes, we may also send you emails on behalf of the brand that tell you about its new exclusive line of sweatshirts, special promotions, and more. Alternatively, we may use your email to serve you interest-based ads on social media (for example, your social media provider may match a pseudonymized form of your email address that we provide them with the email address details you have registered with your social media account, enabling us to show you interest-based ads in your social media newsfeed)
.
Measurement and Attribution
In addition to interest-based advertising, we also provide various analytics to help our Customers measure the success of their advertising campaigns and identify prospective buyers who may be the most interested in their products or services.
For instance, by collecting a unique identifier (such as a cookie ID) from the devices of users who see our Customers’ ads or visit their Digital Properties, we can measure whether those unique identifiers subsequently took a particular action, such as buying a Customer’s product or visiting their Digital Property (sometimes called a “conversion”). In some cases, we may use our cross device data asset to match unique identifiers (which includes browsing activity) to email addresses. Customers are only notified of a match if the email already exists in the Customer ‘s CRM records. AdRoll’s D2C Services can collect, measure and analyze different types of data in conjunction with these unique identifiers and provide useful information to our AdRoll Customers such as what IP address ranges visitors to their Digital Properties are from (indicating the geographic locations of a visitor, which may help indicate what locations to run a particular ad campaign), what products or services located on their Digital Property are attracting more attention (or less), and what ad campaigns ultimately led a cookie ID back to a Digital Property to view more products or make a purchase.
RollWorks’ B2B Services provide similar types of analytics derived from the same sort of data as AdRoll’s D2C Services described above, but with a focus on firmographic information to provide insights on the type of B2B customers that appear to be interested in specific products or offerings on that Customer’s Digital Property. For example, determining which IP address ranges are associated with a unique identifier (such as a cookie ID) so we can identify companies who may be interested in our Customer’s product or service, or, if a unique identifier is linked to an email address that has already been provided to the B2B customer, RollWorks may alert the Customer of increased browsing activity that indicates interest from a particular known account.
Overall, we use the information learned from unique identifier behavior across the Internet to provide reporting to both our D2C and B2B Customers. A more detailed list of all the data we collect is described in
What Data We Collect.
2. What Data we Collect
Back to top
We collect the following categories of data in the provision of our Services for the purposes explained below.
Data You or Our Customers Provide To Us
Email and CRM data from our Customers
:
Some Customers provide their customer relationship data to us (e.g. name, email address, company address, mobile number) or instruct us to collect clear email addresses on their behalf using NextRoll Technology (“
Customer CRM Data
”) for processing as part of our Services. By doing so, we help our Customers identify who is showing interest on their Digital Properties as well as serve, measure and analyze interest-based ads to their current or potential customers (we may also trigger these ads by licensing
RollWorks B2B Contact Data
to a Customer). For example, if you are browsing a software company’s website and submitted your email to download a white paper, the software company may use our Services to contact you and provide you with more information about the software company’s products that appear to be of most interest to you (subject to the marketing preferences you indicate to the software company). We use our Customer’s CRM Data only as a processor for the purpose of assisting that particular Customer with their own advertising efforts and reporting performance back to the Customer's CRM system. We do not share clear email addresses belonging to one Customer with another Customer.
Shopping Data
:
Some Customers provide us with data about their buyers’ shopping habits, including non-financial transactional data, product codes and check-out activity in addition to the browsing data that we collect. This data may come from their Digital Properties or other non-financial transactional data they maintain. We use this data to help us better target, personalize and measure the effectiveness of advertising campaigns. This data is also Customer CRM Data and belongs to our Customers and is handled by NextRoll as a processor.
Hashed email addresses
:
When a Customer permits us, we collect hashed versions of the email addresses that you have entered on that Customer’s Digital Property. Hashing is a technology process that pseudonymizes email addresses. For instance, when joe
the
cat@nextroll.com is run through a typical hashing function, it becomes a string of digits, such as: 0F0B7B1A1A7E8BDBBC6AA545F8CCD6F83671B32479271BFCB6CC8498912058D5. We take this step to protect email addresses, while being able to use the unique identifier created for the purpose of recognizing you online across Digital Properties and sending you interest-based ads across different devices (computers, tablets and mobile devices) and browsers (also called “cross-device matching”). We describe cross-device matching in further detail in
How We Use the Data We Collect.
Data We Receive in Our Corporate Capacity
:
We also collect data from our own Customers and visitors to our website(s). To learn more about how we collect and use that data, please see our
Website Privacy Notice.
Data We Automatically Collect From Your Device
Unless you have opted-out or have otherwise refused to provide consent, the following is data that we collect from your device automatically:
Cookies:
A unique identifier that NextRoll assigns to you when visiting a Customer’s Digital Property so NextRoll can understand your online journey and have the opportunity to serve ads to you when you visit Publisher’s Digital Properties.
Device Information:
This is technical information about the device you use to access our Customers’ Digital Property, such as your operating system. Additionally, in the case of mobile devices, your device type, and mobile device's unique advertising identifier (such as the Apple IDFA or Android Advertising ID), and any other unique identifier that may be assigned to the mobile device, such as an Android ID or UDID in older Apple phone models, or a non-cookie unique identifier used by
Non-Cookie Technologies
.
IP Address:
The IP address associated with the device you are using when accessing a Customer’s Digital Property.
Location Data:
This is non-precise information related to your geography derived from your device’s IP address. This does not reveal your precise geographic coordinates (i.e. GPS latitude and longitude) - only country, state, city and zip/postal code, and helps us to display ads that are relevant to your general location (for example, showing ads in French if you are located in France).
Browser Data:
This is technical information about the browser you are using that is captured in order to serve you an ad that can be rendered on your device (for example, Chrome, Firefox, and Safari).
Activity on Customers’ Digital Properties:
This is data about your browsing activity on a Customer’s website or application. This includes, for example, which pages you visited and when, what items were clicked on a page, how much time was spent on a page, whether you downloaded a white paper on a B2B website, what site or ad brought you to the Customer’s website, what items you placed into your online shopping cart and what products were purchased and the price of the products purchased.
Ad Data:
This is data about the online ads we have served (or attempted to serve) to you. This includes , for example, how many times an ad has been served to you, what page the ad appeared on and whether you clicked on or otherwise interacted with the ad.
All of this data is collected to help make sure you get the best and most relevant experience when engaging with our Customers.
Data We Collect From Third Party Sources
Campaign Performance Data:
This data includes information about how well our Customers’ ads and campaigns have performed, whether on our platform or on other advertising platforms.
Data from Audience Partners:
We may collect additional information about you from our audience partners who create and provide us with segments which we use for our Customers (“
Audience Partner
”). A segment is a grouping of users who share one or more attributes (e.g. demographic or firmographic attributes). We use this data to better understand the Customers’ target audience and to better market the Customers’ products and services to you. We may also work with our Customers and Audience Partners to synchronize their unique, pseudonymous identifiers to our own to enable us to more accurately recognize a particular unique browser or device and the advertising interests associated with it (commonly known as “ID or User Syncing”).
Data from Advertising Partners:
This is data that allows us to match the NextRoll cookie identifier with identifiers that may already be used by other companies in the digital advertising ecosystem that we work with (“
Advertising Partners
”). For example, we work with ad exchanges, publishers and supply side platforms (i.e. companies that sell advertising space on publishers’ websites) in order to serve our ads. Matching cookie identifiers helps us deliver ads to you and recognize you across browsers and devices and may include pseudonymous advertising identifiers (meaning identifiers that help identify your browser or device, but not you directly) which some Advertising Partners choose to share with us.
Data collected pursuant to RollWorks Business only:
Email Communications:
Customers may provide us with access to their email communications from their prospects when they have engaged us to provide email marketing services. NextRoll acts as a processor of this CRM Data. . When access to this data involves access to Gmail Data, it will be subject to these additional restrictions:
We will only use access to read, write, modify or control Gmail message bodies (including attachments), metadata, headers, and settings to provide a web email that allows users to compose, send, read and process emails and will not transfer this Gmail Data to others unless doing so is necessary to provide and improve these features, comply with applicable law or as part of a merger, acquisition or sale of assets;
We will not use this Gmail Data for serving advertisements; and
We will not allow humans to read this data unless agreed to by the Customer, doing so is necessary for security purposes such as investigating abuse, to comply with applicable law, or for the provision of NextRoll’s Services.
Contact data from third parties
:
We obtain and collect contact data from various third-party sources, including from public sources and through licenses with data providers. We may also infer contact data based on email addresses and email naming conventions. This contact data is B2B information – in other words, it is typically a business email address, business street address and a business telephone number. Please note that as part of our RollWorks Services, we do not collect business email addresses from third parties for any individuals who are residing in any European Territories (as defined in
International Transfers
).
3. How We Use the Data We Collect
Back to top
Our goal is to leverage this data to help Customers better identify and engage with you and, in turn, provide you with an ideal online experience whereby ad-sponsored content is available for free and the ads served to you are for products and services that aim to be relevant and interesting to you. The data we collect also helps Customers analyze traffic on their Digital Properties, measure the effectiveness of their ad campaigns and gauge the interest of prospective buyers.  Additionally, we use this data to operate, improve and enhance our Services.
Specifically, we use this data for the following purposes:
Interest-Based Advertising:
To select ads that are more likely to be relevant to you based on data such as your browsing activity, the time of day and time spent visiting specific Digital Properties, and non-precise geographic data inferred about your device(s). For example, we may show you ads for your favorite shopping site (or similar sites we think you may like) for goods or services only available in your city, region or country during your lunch or commute hours.
Segmenting Audiences:
To segment you into groups (like bargain hunters, high intent visitors, low intent visitors) for certain purposes such as reporting and analytics as well as determining what ads and email content would best peak your interest.  To do so, we use data from Customer Digital Properties you visit in addition to data provided by the Customer and Audience Partners (i.e. demographic and firmographic information about your unique identifier).
Ad Delivery:
We use data about your browser or other technical information about your device in order to technically deliver advertising and confirm successful delivery of the ad.
Frequency Capping:
We use data about the ads that have been served to you to make sure you will not see the same ad too many times. If we know you’ve already seen one of our Customer’s ads several times, we’ll try to show you a different ad next time.
Sequencing:
If you are being served a sequence of ads, to make sure we show you the right ad next in the sequence.
Mapping data to Our Cross-Device Asset:
NextRoll’s cross-device asset is used to connect multiple devices to one person, household, and/or online identifiers such as an email address (hashed for security) that a Customer may have collected directly from its customers. The cross-device asset allows companies to better understand their known-customer activity, as well as improves the ability to target and measure ad campaigns (including limiting the number of times the same person or household sees an ad).
Cross-device matching
:
Identifying different devices and browsers that are likely to be associated with you so that ads can be targeted, capped and sequenced across those devices, and so that campaign effectiveness can be measured and analyzed. For example, cross-device matching helps us not show you ads for the shoes you were looking at on your phone but already purchased on your tablet. Instead we’ll try to show you ads for an upcoming triathlon where you can put those shoes to work. It also helps us match devices so we can honor your opt-out choices across all devices we know are connected to the opted-out cookie. You may opt-out of cross-device interest-based targeting by employing the respective opt-out techniques we describe in
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Targeted Ads
. To learn more about how we use cross-device matching,
visit our blog
.
Syncing Online Identifiers with Customer CRM Data
:
Customers may use NextRoll Services to match online browsing activity indicated by online identifiers with existing email addresses the Customer has already obtained ( i.e. Customer CRM Data).  Customers may also use this information to understand which consumers or business accounts are showing increased interest to better understand their website audience and respond with appropriate marketing activity.
Identifying Companies Associated with an IP Range for B2B marketing
:
We match IP address ranges to companies who disclose their IP address ranges in order to provide aggregated reports to companies regarding their website traffic.
Reporting and Attribution:
By analyzing activity on our Customers’ Digital Properties, we provide our Customers insights into how their ad campaigns are performing and surface insights about their site visitors. Reporting may include ad metrics, such as traffic on certain Digital Properties, measuring impact of campaigns, impressions (ads served), clicks (ads you clicked on) and conversions. What qualifies as a “conversion” is defined by the Customer—it might include, for example, a sale or a white paper download or a correlation to an actual or inferred sale, site visit or store visit. This data allows a Customer to determine if an ad is not performing well (few attributed conversions), so that the Customer can update the ad (perhaps with a better deal!).
Licensing Data:
When we receive an email address for a U.S. resident or obtain attribute data from third party data providers or derive an email address we may license that data to our Customers. For example, our
RollWorks Contact Data Product
provides our Customers with business email addresses.
Conducting Our Corporate Operations:
Data we collect in our corporate capacity (i.e. our own B2B lists of Customers) is used to conduct our business operations and communications. Please see our
Website Privacy Notice
to learn more about how we use that data.
Complying with Legal Process:
To satisfy in good faith any applicable law, legal process or proper governmental request, such as to respond to a subpoena (whether civil or criminal) or similar process.
Investigating Wrongdoing and Protecting Ourselves or Third Parties:
To enforce or investigate any potential violation of our
Terms of Service
, policies or the law, and to protect ourselves, our Customers or any third party from any potential harm (whether tangible or intangible).
4. Data Sharing
Back to top
We may disclose data about you with the following third parties:
With a Customer:
We may share data about how you have interacted with a Customer’s Digital Properties, email campaigns or ads.  We may share
business contact data
collected from third party sources or inferred (for example, based on email naming conventions) with a RollWorks B2B Customer if we think that your business or employer would be interested in that Customer’s products. In regards to RollWorks’ Services, we do not collect contact data about residents of European Territories from third parties.
With Our Audience Partners:
We share hashed email addresses or other pseudonymous online identifiers with our Audience Partners in connection with audience creation and modeling and creating segments for the Customer based on the Customer’s CRM Data.
With Our Advertising Partners:
We disclose cookie ID data and the ad we propose to serve with our Advertising Partners, as necessary, to allow for the successful delivery of ads to your device.
With Our Service Providers:
We contract with companies who provide services to us to support our business operations (e.g., for example, website and data hosting, fraud prevention, viewability reporting, data hygiene, marketing and email delivery), as well as billing, collections, tech, customer and operational support.
With Our Subsidiaries and Affiliates:
Our subsidiaries and corporate affiliates will only process your data for the purposes already explained in this Service Privacy Notice. Our subsidiaries are NextRoll Limited (Ireland), AdRoll Limited (UK) and NextRoll Pty Limited (Australia).
In Connection with Legal Proceedings:
When we are under a legal obligation to do so, for example, to comply with a binding order of a court or where disclosure is necessary to exercise, establish or defend the legal rights of NextRoll, our Customer or any other third party.
In Connection with a Sale of Our Business:
If a third party acquires some or all of our business or assets, we may disclose your information in connection with the sale (including during due diligence in preparation for the sale).
5. Aggregated and De-Identified Data
Back to top
NextRoll may aggregate and de-identify data it collects so that it can either no longer be directly or indirectly associated with a natural person or cannot be associated with a natural person at all. NextRoll will then use such data for our machine learning, reporting, analytics and other business purposes.
We may also share aggregated and de-identified data with our subsidiaries and affiliates.
6. Cookies and Related Technologies
Back to top
NextRoll offers a consent management platform that adheres to the latest Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) Transparency and Consent Framework (TCF). Our commitment to the principles outlined in the IAB TCF are provided in our
TCF Attestation
.
NextRoll Technology uses cookies, tracking pixels and related technologies to provide our Services to our Customers. Cookies are small data files that are served by our platform and stored on your device. You can refuse consent to, or opt-out of, NextRoll cookies at any time, as explained in
Your Choices and Opting-out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
below. The NextRoll cookie we serve through our NextRoll Technology for this purpose is named “__adroll”, “__ar_v4”, “_adroll_shared” and “__adroll_fpc.”
Our Advertising Partners may also drop cookies for the purposes described in
What Data We Collect
. Generally, the type of cookies dropped will vary depending on the Advertising Partner. We provide a list of our Advertising Pixel Partners
here
.
Additionally, we use
non-tracking cookies
to store user decisions in terms of your ad consent and opt-out choices:
We may drop a __adroll cookie with value opt-out if you opt-out as described below.
We may drop a __consent cookie that stores the consent choices you have made regarding data processing and advertising by NextRoll.
We may drop a__adroll_post_consent_html for custom HTML to display to the user confirming consent selection.
We may drop a__adroll_post_consent_css for custom CSS (website design) to style the confirm GDPR consent selection.
We may drop a__adroll_consent_params cookie GDPR consent parameters for recording via ad server callbacks.
We may drop a __adroll_bounced3 for users redirected through Safari bounce.
We may drop a__adroll_bounce_closed for Safari banner closure.
We may drop a__adroll_load_stats to determine how many times the Safari banner was loaded.
A full list of NextRoll cookies is set out below:
Tracking cookies
Non-tracking cookies
__adroll
__ar_v4
__adroll_shared
__adroll_fpc
__adroll_consent_params
__adroll_post_consent_html
__adroll_post_connsent_css
__adroll_bounced3
__adroll_bounce_closed
__adroll_load_stats
7. Non-Cookie Technology for Tracking Outside European Territories
Back to top
In respect of website visitors with IP addresses
not from a European Territory
, NextRoll and some of its Advertising Partners may use technologies other than cookie technology to recognize your computer, device or browser for the purposes of interest-based advertising, analyzing engagement with ads or content, measuring the effectiveness of a particular ad campaign or marketing effort, to monitor against fraud or misuse of our Services, or in other ways described in this Service Privacy Notice in
How We Use the Data We Collect
. This use of non-cookie technology may be used in addition to cookies, or separately, to collect and record data about your web browsing activities on browsers, search engines or other platforms that may not utilize NextRoll Technology.
You may opt-out of tracking via non-cookie technologies by employing the respective opt-out techniques described in
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics Ads
.
8. Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
Back to top
You can control how you share your data with NextRoll, including electing to opt-out of interest-based advertising altogether. Please visit our
opt-out webpage
to opt-out.
Generally speaking, an opt-out allows you to direct NextRoll not to engage in a particular type of data collection. There are many different ways that NextRoll collects data, different purposes for that data collection, and different industry-specific and NextRoll-specific tools for opting-out. We describe below the different options for controlling how NextRoll uses your data:
Web browser:
You can opt-out of receiving interest-based ads served by us or on our behalf by clicking on the blue icon
that typically appears in the corner of the ads we serve and following the instructions provided or by clicking on our
opt-out page
. Please note that this opt-out function is browser-specific and relies on an opt-out cookie. This means if you delete your cookies or upgrade your browser after having opted out, you will need to opt-out again.
Cross Device Opt-Out:
As described above in
How We Use the Data We Collect
, we may link multiple browsers or devices to the cookie ID, hashed email address or other unique identifiers associated with you. If you opt-out on a browser or device and we have additional devices or browsers linked to you, we will extend your opt-out decision to any other linked browsers and devices. Since we only link users across browsers and devices in certain conditions, there may be cases where you are still being tracked in a different browser or device we have not linked, and where we are treating you as a different user.
Mobile Device Opt-Out:
To opt-out of receiving interest-based ads that are based on your behavior across different mobile applications, see instructions for iOS and Android devices:
iOS 7 or Higher:
Go to your Settings > Select Privacy > Select Advertising > Enable the “Limit Ad Tracking” setting; and
For Android devices with OS 2.2 or higher and Google Play Services version 4.0 or higher:
Open your Google Settings app > Select Ads > Enable “Opt-out of interest-based advertising.”
Industry Opt-Out Tools and Self-Regulation:
NextRoll is a member of the Network Advertising Initiative (
NAI
) and adheres to the framework principles. You may use the
NAI opt-out tool
which will allow you to opt-out of seeing interest-based ads from us and from other NAI approved member companies. In addition, the NAI opt-out tool allows you to separately opt-out of “audience matched” advertising through the NAI’s “
Audience Matched Advertising Opt-Out
.” You can also use the
email opt-out tool
provided by our Advertising Partner, LiveRamp, to opt-out your email address from their database. Audience matching is a particular type of interest-based advertising where de-identified data (e.g. hashed emails) is tied to “offline” activity or information (this information generally is or can be associated with a consumer’s email address - whether that information is part of our Customer’s own customer lists or in lists we license to the Customer). To do “audience matching,” we or another platform then “match” that information (in de-identified form) to cookie IDs, mobile ad IDs, or other online identifiers. We describe this hashing activity in additional detail in
What Data We Collect
. Because this “audience matched” information is derived from an email address or information that can be tied to an email address, it is possible to opt-out with an email address. However, when you opt-out this way, you will need to submit all of the email addresses that you use for the opt-out to work.
We also comply with the Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising as managed by the Digital Advertising Alliance (
DAA
). You may opt-out of receiving personalized ads from other companies that perform ad targeting services, including some that we may work with as Advertising Partners, via the
DAA website
.
We also comply with the Canadian Self-regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising as managed by the Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (
DAAC
). You may opt-out of receiving personalized ads from other companies that perform ad targeting services, including some that we may work with as Advertising Partners, via the
DAAC website
.
Finally, we also adhere to the European Interactive Advertising Digital Alliance (EDAA) guidelines for online advertising. You may opt-out via the
EDAA website
.
9. Data Retention
Back to top
Customer CRM Data:
The data retention period for Customer CRM Data is as follows:
If either Customer or NextRoll explicitly terminates the NextRoll Services in accordance with our Terms of Service, NextRoll will delete Customer CRM Data within 90 days from the termination date.
If a Customer’s account has been suspended for 90 days or more, the Customer CRM Data will be deleted.
When a Customer has not logged in to their NextRoll account in the past 365 days
and
there has been no product usage in the past 30 days
and
no media spend has occurred in the past 30 days, the Customer CRM Data will be deleted when the 366th day of no login activity occurs for the account.
Customers may request deletion of Customer CRM Data by visiting the privacy requests
webpage
.
Mobile Identifiers and Cookie Identifiers:
Cookies we set expire (and are then deleted) 13 months from the last time your device accessed a Digital Property using NextRoll Technology. If you visit another Digital Property that uses our technology inside that 13-month expiry period, then the expiry period will be reset and measured from that date instead. The expiration period for mobile identifiers is controlled by you on your device.
Personal Data Associated with Mobile and Cookie Identifiers Related to Browsing History:
We delete personal data associated with mobile and cookie identifiers after 12 months (for example, data such as a Customer’s website you visited or ads that you may have clicked).
Personal Data Associated with Advertising Bidding Requests:
Data logged in order to process an advertising bid request we have received from an Advertising Partner (such as a cookie identifier, IP address, the domain url requesting to display the ad, and browser information) are deleted after 7 days. Data we have logged regarding bids we have placed to display an advertisement (including cookie identifiers, mobile identifiers, the advertisement bid on and the advertisement won or displayed to the visitor) are deleted after 15 days.
Personal Data Associated with the Display of an Advertisement:
Data logged for the display of an advertisement (including cookie identifiers, the advertisement won or displayed to you and data indicating whether you clicked on the particular advertisement displayed) are deleted after 12 months.
Hashed Email Addresses:
Hashed email addresses collected from Customer site visitors are deleted 12 months from the last date the hashed email was collected.
10. Security
Back to top
We apply technical, administrative and organizational security measures to protect the data we collect against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure or access, in particular where the processing involves the transmission of data over a network, and against other unlawful forms of processing. NextRoll has also completed the SOC2 Type 2 Audit (Security and Privacy) with no exceptions. This report is only available to Customers by a request to
support@nextroll.com
.
11. International Transfers
Back to top
We may transfer the data we collect about you to countries (including the United States of America) other than the country where we originally collected it for the purposes of performing our Services. In general, the transferring countries will be the countries in which we, our Customers, our Advertising Partners, or their service providers operate.
Those countries may not have the same data protection laws as your country. However, when we transfer your data to other countries, we will protect that data as described in this Service Privacy Notice and take steps, where necessary, to ensure that international transfers comply with applicable laws.
For example, when we transfer your data from a European Territory (as defined below) to our parent company in the United States, we do so under the European Commission's Standard Contractual Clauses. These Standard Contractual Clauses are incorporated in the
NextRoll Data Protection Addendum
between NextRoll and each of our Customers where applicable. When we transfer your data outside of a European Territory to Advertising Partners (or vice versa), we do so under lawful data export mechanisms which may include Standard Contractual Clauses and Binding Corporate Rules.
12. Information for European Territory Residents: Our Legal Basis and Your Rights
Back to top
Our Legal Basis:
If you interact with our Services from the European Territories, our legal basis for collecting and using the personal data described above will depend on the personal data concerned and the specific context in which we collect it. For these purposes, "
European Territories
" means the European Economic Area, Switzerland and the United Kingdom.
We will normally process personal data about you based on consent (except where the purpose of processing is based on legitimate interest, as described in the “vendor” details of the Consent Management Tool presented to you while visiting Digital Properties from the European Territories). For example, when you visit a Customer’s Digital Property, you will be asked to consent to NextRoll dropping a cookie.
If you have questions about, or need further information concerning, the legal basis on which we collect and use your personal data, please email
dpo@nextroll.com
.
European Residents’ Privacy Rights:
In addition, if you are a resident of a European Territory, you have the following data subject access rights under EU data protection law:
If you wish to access, correct, update or request deletion of your personal data, please visit our
privacy requests webpage
to obtain a verifiable request form.
If you wish to object to us processing your personal data or would like to otherwise restrict the processing of your personal data, we will honor that request. Please visit the
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
portion of this Service Privacy Notice to select the best opt-out method for you.
Similarly, if we process your personal data with your consent, then you can withdraw your consent at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect the processing of your personal data conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent. You can also refuse consent for NextRoll or our Advertising Partners to drop cookies by visiting our
opt-out page
or by refusing consent for NextRoll (or changing your consent preferences) when you see a Consent Management Tool displayed on a Customer site which lists NextRoll as a vendor.
You have the right to complain to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your personal data. Contact details for data protection authorities in the European Territories are available from the
European Data Protection Board website
. However, if you have any questions about our collection and use of your personal data, we encourage you to contact us first at
support@nextroll.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@nextroll.com
.
In some cases, we act as a processor for our Customers (for example, when we handle our Customers’ CRM data solely to provide them Services) and, in those cases, you should direct any requests to exercise your data protection rights to the relevant Customer. If you are uncertain whether we process your personal data as a controller or a processor in any specific context, you can contact us at
support@nextroll.com
and we will advise you accordingly.
13. Information For California Residents Only
Back to top
This section supplements the information contained in this Service Privacy Notice and applies solely to visitors, users and others who are residents of the State of California, as defined in Section 17014 of Title 18 of the California Code of Regulations. This section is provided to comply with the
California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018
, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020 (
CPRA
), and regulations promulgated thereunder as each may be amended from time to time (collectively, the “
CCPA
”). Any terms defined in the CCPA have the same meaning when used in this section.
Information We Collect and the Purposes for Which this Information is Used
We collect information that identifies, relates to, describes, references, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or device (“
personal information
”). This collection of information is listed in
What Data We Collect.
We set out below the CCPA categories of personal information we have collected from consumers within the last twelve (12) months in respect of our Services. Please note that personal information in certain categories may overlap with other categories.
A.
Identifiers
Yes
Device IP address, email address, cookie string data, pseudonymous data (e.g. hashed emails), operating system, and your device type, and mobile device's identifier (such as the Apple IDFA or Android Advertising ID) and any other unique identifier that may be assigned to any device by third parties and cross-referenced to recognize a device.
Directly and indirectly from consumers, third party data providers, ad exchanges, supply-side platforms and Audience Partners. In the case of business email addresses, RollWorks B2B Services may infer a business email address.
B.
Personal information listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e))
Yes
Name, business address, business telephone number, education, employment, employment history, household income.the perceived general education level of consumers may be collected for marketing, advertising and analytics.
Directly from third party data providers and Audience Partners.
C.
Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law
Yes
Limited to age ranges such as 35-44, 45-54, 55-64 and 65+ and male/female gender categories are sometimes collected for use for NextRoll Services that do not carry a risk of unintended discrimination.
Audience Partners.
D.
Commercial information
Yes
Records of products or services purchased, obtained or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
Directly from consumers and Customers.
E.
Biometric information
No
-
-
F.
Internet or other similar network activity
Yes
Browsing history, search history, information on a consumer's interaction with a website, application or advertisement. For example, which pages you visited and when, what items were clicked on a page, how much time was spent on a page, whether you downloaded a white paper on a B2B website, what items you placed into your online shopping cart, what products were purchased and the price of the products purchased.
Directly from browsing history on Customers’ Digital Properties.
Non-personal information about one of our ads (e.g. the third party who served the ad, and the name of the ad) may be connected with browsing history or activity on our websites for the purposes of determining attribution information (e.g. whether particular ad led to a consumer visiting our website, and, if so, which particular ad campaign).
G.
Geolocation data
Yes
Non-precise geolocation derived from IP address.
Directly from consumers, ad exchanges, publishers and supply-side platforms and Audience Partners.
H.
Sensory data
No
-
-
I.
Professional or employment-related information
Yes
Current or past job history, including details about the employer (industry, name, company location, company domain or URL), and employee (positions held, duration of employment, and office location of the company where the employee worked).
Directly from third party data providers and Audience Partners.
J.
Non-public education information (per the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g, 34 C.F.R Part 99))
No
-
-
K.
Inferences drawn from other personal information
Yes
Creating profiles that reflect consumer preferences and interests.
Directly from Audience Partners.
L.
Sensitive personal information
Yes
Personal information that reveals a consumer’s financial account, debit card, or credit card number in combination with any required security or access code, password, or credentials allowing access to an account.
Personal information that relates to the analysis of an individual's physical or mental health may be collected to the extent that the following constitute collection of sensitive personal information:
purchase or browsing history for over-the-counter medications or devices that inform targeted ad selection; and
browsing history and inquiry for services such as elective surgeries, allergy treatments, and health-education or support groups that inform targeted ad selection.
NextRoll does not create consumer profiles based on perceived interest or association with the categories of information related to health information (for example, NextRoll does not have consumer profiles for “allergies” or “ankle surgery,” etc.). NextRoll does not purchase consumer profiles that reflect consumer preferences and interests related to health.The consumer-profile interests NextRoll permits for targeted advertising can be found
here
.
Directly from Customers and consumers.
Purposes for Which Personal Information is Collected
All data we collect is primarily for the commercial purpose of providing marketing, advertising (i.e., cross-context behavioral advertising) and analytical Services. However, as part of performing these Services, we also use data collected for the following additional business purposes:
Auditing Interactions with Consumers: to count ad impressions and verify the quality of ad impressions served to unique visitors identified by cookie id or other unique identifier;
Debugging and Repair:  the identification and repair of impairments to intended and existing functionalities in our Services and NextRoll Technology, perform debugging and related activities to repair errors that impair the functionality of our Services;
Security:  to detect security incidents and protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent or illegal activity, including, when necessary, to prosecute those responsible for such activities;
Internal Research and Development:  to conduct internal research for technological development of our Services and demonstration of the performance of these Services; and
Quality and Safety Maintenance and Verification:  to verify the quality or safety of our Services and improve, upgrade or enhance our Services and NextRoll Technology.
For more information on how we use this data, please refer to
How We Use the Data We Collect.
Disclosure of Personal Information for a Business Purpose
NextRoll discloses personal data for business purposes as set out in
Purposes for which Personal Information is Collected
above. We disclose, or otherwise share as indicated below, the categories of personal information to the categories of third parties as set out in
Data Sharing
.
Sharing Personal Information
In the preceding twelve (12) months, we have shared, and/or sold, the following categories of personal information for the commercial purpose of providing cross-context behavioral advertising (known as retargeted or interest based advertising) services:
Category A (Identifiers). By serving ads on digital publisher sites such as news, blogs and weather sites we share and/or sell cookie string data and pseudonymous data (e.g. hashed emails) from Category A (identifiers) with Advertising Partners and Advertising Partners.
Category F (Internet or other similar network activity). NextRoll may share and/or sell browsing information (e.g., page views on a NextRoll customer site or ads served or clicked) to NextRoll customers about end users who have visited the customer’s site.
Sales of Personal Information
In the preceding (12) twelve months, we have sold the following categories of personal information:
Category A (Identifiers). Pursuant to our
RollWorks B2B Contact Data
Service, we have sold personal information in the form of business emails from Category A (Identifiers) to Customers.
NextRoll does not have actual knowledge that it sells or shares the personal information of minors.
To opt-out of the sale or sharing of your personal information visit our
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information page
.
Furthermore, NextRoll processes interest based advertising opt-out preference signals via global privacy controls. To use this method, you must download and enable global privacy controls on a participating browser or browser extension.
Your Rights and Choices
The CCPA provides California residents with specific rights regarding their personal information. This section describes the rights of California residents and provides information on how to exercise those rights.
Right to Know and Data Portability Rights
You have the right to request that we disclose certain information to you about our collection and use of personal information over the past 12 months. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request, (see
Exercising Right to Know, Data Portability, Right to Deletion, and Right to Correct
)
we will disclose to you:
The categories of personal information we collected about you;
The categories of sources for the personal information we collected about you;
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting or selling that personal information;
The categories of third parties with whom we share that personal information;
The specific pieces of personal information we collected about you (otherwise known as a data portability request); and
Two separate lists where we have sold or disclosed your personal information for a business purpose:
Sales: identifying the personal information categories that each category of recipient purchased; and
Disclosures for a business purpose: identifying the personal information categories that each category of recipient obtained
Right to Delete
You have the right to request that we delete any of your personal information that we collect from you and retain, subject to certain exceptions. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request (see
Exercising Right to Know, Data Portability, Right to Deletion, and Right to Correct
), we will delete (and direct our service providers to delete) your personal information from our records, unless an exception applies.
We may deny your deletion request if retaining the information is necessary for us or our service provider(s) to:
Complete the transaction for which we collected the personal information, provide a good or service that you requested, take actions reasonably anticipated within the context of our ongoing business relations with you or otherwise perform our contract with you;
Detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity or prosecute those responsible for such activities;
Exercise free speech, ensure the right of another consumer to exercise their free speech rights or exercise another right provided by law;
Comply with the California Electronic Communications Privacy Act (Cal. Penal Code § 1546 et. seq.);
Engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, historical, or statistical research in the public interest that adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws, when the information’s deletion may likely render impossible or seriously impair the research’s achievement, if you previously provided informed consent;
Enable solely internal uses that are reasonably aligned with consumer expectations based on your relationship with us;
Comply with a legal obligation; and
Make other internal and lawful uses of that information that are compatible with the context in which you provided it.
Right to Correct
You have the right to request that a business correct inaccurate personal Information that is maintained about you, taking into account the nature of the personal information and the purposes of the processing of the personal Information.
Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request (see
Exercising Right to Know, Data Portability, Right to Deletion, and Right to Correct
), we will use commercially reasonable efforts to correct (and direct our service providers to do the same) your personal information, unless an exception applies.
Exercising Right to Know, Data Portability, Right to Deletion, and Right to Correct
To exercise the right to know, data portability and deletion rights described above, please submit the consumer request to us by either:
Calling us at 1-844-740-7126; or
Visiting our
privacy requests webpage.
After submitting the request, a form will be sent to the requestor to verify the consumer request.
On the verification form, the requestor must:
Provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected personal information or an authorized representative; and
Describe the request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate and respond to it.
Only you, or a person that you authorize to act on your behalf, may make a verifiable consumer request related to your personal information.
We cannot respond to your request or provide you with personal information if we cannot: (i) verify your identity or authority to make the request; and (ii) confirm the personal information relates to you.
We will only use personal information provided in a verifiable consumer request to verify the requestor’s identity or authority to make the request.
Response Timing and Format
We will deliver our written response to you electronically unless you indicate delivery to be by mail.
The response we provide will also explain the reasons we cannot complete a request, if applicable. Please note that personal information deleted during this period as set out in
Data Retention
will not be provided.
The format of our responses to you concerning personal information collected, disclosed or sold will be provided in a readily useable format that should allow you to transmit the information from one entity to another entity without hindrance.
We do not charge a fee to process or respond to your verifiable consumer request unless it is excessive, repetitive or manifestly unfounded. If we determine that the request warrants a fee, we will tell you why we made that decision and provide you with a cost estimate before completing your request.
CCPA Metrics
To view metrics regarding consumer requests to know, delete, and opt out, for the previous calendar year (January 1 - December 31) please visit our CCPA Metrics
webpage
.
Right to Limit Collection of Sensitive Personal Information
You have the right to limit the use or disclosure of sensitive personal information by the business by visiting our
opt-out
page or
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information page
, or through the instructions provided in
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics Ads
.
Right to Opt out of the Sale or Sharing of Your Personal Information
To exercise the right to opt-out of the sale or sharing of your personal information you (or your authorized representative) may visit  the
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information
webpage.
Opt Out Preference Signals
If you are visiting a site with NextRoll’s Technology, you may opt-out of the sale or sharing of your data by broadcasting an Opt-Out Preference Signal, such as the Global Privacy Control (“
GPC
”) (on the browsers and/or browser extensions that support such a signal). If you do not have an account on the site you are browsing or if you are not logged into your account while browsing, your request to opt-out will be linked to your browser identifier only and not linked to any account information because the connection between your browser and the account is not known to NextRoll. Please also check for the Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information or Privacy Choices link on the sites you visit.
Non-Discrimination
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your CCPA rights. Unless permitted by the CCPA, we will not:
Deny you goods or services;
Charge you different prices or rates for goods or services, including through granting discounts or other benefits, or imposing penalties;
Provide you a different level or quality of goods or services;
Suggest that you may receive a different price or rate for goods or services or a different level or quality of goods or services; or
Retaliate against an employee, applicant, or independent contractor’s right to exercise their CCPA rights.
14. Information for Non-California Residents in US States with Data Privacy Laws
Back to top
Exercising Your Consumer Rights.
Several US state privacy laws provide residents with specific rights regarding their personal information. Consumers in these states can exercise their rights via the methods described above under the headings:
Exercising Right to Know
;
Data Portability
; Right to Deletion; and Right to Correct. To appeal NextRoll’s decision as a Controller with regard to a consumer request, or to contact NextRoll, please view the
Contact Us About Questions section
.
The Sale of Personal Information and Processing for Targeted Advertising
For information on the sale of your personal information and how to opt out, see
Sales of Personal Information
. NextRoll processes personal information for targeted advertising. See
How We Use the Data We Collect
above. To opt out of targeted advertising, see
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
, or visit the “Privacy Choices” link in the footer of all NextRoll webpages:
15. Make a Privacy Request
Back to top
To exercise the right to know (access), data portability and deletion rights (right to be forgotten), please submit the consumer request to us by either:
Calling us at 1-844-740-7126; or
Visiting our
privacy requests webpage
.
16. Information for Individuals Located in Brazil
Back to top
Please view NextRoll’s disclosures pursuant to the Brazilian Data Protection Law, the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (“
LGPD
”),
here
.
17. Changes to this Service Privacy Notice
Back to top
We may update or modify this Service Privacy Notice at our discretion at any time. When we make changes to this Service Privacy Notice we will post the updated notice online and update the notice’s effective date. Please review this Service Privacy Notice periodically.
If we are required by applicable law to obtain your consent to any material changes before they come into effect, then we will do so in accordance with law.
18. Contact Us About Questions
Back to top
If you have any questions about this Service Privacy Notice or our privacy practices, or want to appeal NextRoll’s decision as a Controller with regard to a consumer request, you can contact
support@nextroll.com
.
If you are located in a European Territory then, where we process your data as a data controller, NextRoll Limited is the data controller of your information. To contact NextRoll Limited please email
support@nextroll.com
or write to us at the following address:
NextRoll Limited
Attn: Legal
Floor 3, Block 3
Miesian Plaza
Dublin 2, Ireland
D02 Y754
If you wish to escalate your inquiry after contacting the support team, you are welcome to contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@nextroll.com
:
Lucid Privacy Group
NextRoll Data Protection Officer
1050 Page Street
San Francisco, CA 94117
USA
Website Privacy Notice
Effective as of March 13, 2025
View archived Privacy Policy
NextRoll, Inc. (formerly AdRoll, Inc.) and its subsidiaries and affiliates (“
we
,” “
our
” or “
us
”) is an independent marketing technology company that offers intelligent, data-driven advertising and marketing services and solutions to help big and small companies accelerate their growth (“
Services
”).
Please note that this Privacy Notice only applies to data that we collect when you visit a NextRoll website or a mobile application, including
connect.adroll.com
,
app.adroll.com
,
www.nextroll.com
,
www.adroll.com
,
pages.adroll.com
,
www.rollworks.com
,
pages.rollworks.com
,
https://blog.adrollgroup.com
,
help.adroll.com
,
tech.adroll.com
, or
developers.adroll.com
(each a "
Digital Property
"). To learn what data we collect when you visit the websites of our Advertisers, please visit the
NextRoll Service Privacy Notice
.
Table of Contents
About NextRoll's Services
What Data We Collect
How We Use the Data We Collect
Data Sharing
Aggregated and De-Identified Data
Cookies and Related Technologies
Non-Cookie Technology for Tracking Outside European Territories
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
Data retention
Security
International Transfers
Information for European Territory Residents: Our Legal Basis and Your Rights
Information for California Residents Only
Information for Non-California Residents in US States with Data Privacy Laws
Information for Individuals Located in Brazil
Changes to this Privacy Notice
Contact Us About Questions
1. About NextRoll's Services
Back to top
NextRoll is a marketing technology company that helps big and small companies deliver products ambitious marketers use and rely on to grow their businesses. Powered by machine learning and integrated data platforms, NextRoll’s intelligent, data-driven marketing and advertising services and solutions go beyond serving digital ads by providing companies better visibility into which audiences are most interested in certain products and services.  By using NextRoll’s proprietary data and machine learning offerings (“NextRoll Technology,”), companies can better understand their customers, find new loyal customers and build lasting customer relationships through intelligence-driven marketing activities.
NextRoll has two different business divisions:
AdRoll
is an e-commerce marketing platform for companies that sell their products and services directly to consumers (called “Direct to Consumer” or “D2C” companies). The AdRoll platform makes it easy and affordable for D2C companies to deliver the cross-channel experiences consumers expect – enabling them to sell more to their existing consumers, and also to identify new consumers to introduce to their products and services. AdRoll does this by creating connected, personalized customer journeys that enable brands to reach new and existing customers through digital advertising, email marketing and onsite experiences, and helps companies understand the impact of their marketing efforts with advanced measurement and attribution;
RollWorks
offers an account-based platform for businesses who want to sell their products and services to other businesses (called “Business to Business” or “B2B” companies). Our RollWorks Services help B2B companies identify their target accounts and key buyers, reach those accounts across multiple channels and measure program effectiveness in their system-of-record.
The NextRoll websites are a collection of sites that we use to describe our Services to potential customers, to provide our Services to our Customers, and to support Customers and partners as they seek to identify, deploy and measure their marketing and advertising efforts with us over time.
For more information on the data collected through our Services, please see our
Service Privacy Notice
.
2. What Data We Collect
Back to top
We may collect the following categories of information on our Digital Properties and use them for the purposes explained below.
Data You Provide To Us
Contact Information:
You may provide us with your name, address, phone number and email when you set up an account with us and you may provide your name, title, company, email, address and/or phone number when you sign up for an event with us online or download content from our Digital Properties.
Account Information:
If you open an account, we will collect your username and password and other information necessary to open and access your account.
Customer Service Information:
Information you may provide to our customer service including your email address for purposes of responding to your inquiries and survey responses.
Financial Information:
Credit card number or other payment account information. This information is collected directly by our payments processor and not stored by NextRoll.
Hashed email addresses:
We collect hashed versions of the email addresses that you enter on our Digital Properties. Hashing is a technology process that pseudonymizes (i.e. digitally scrambles) email addresses. For instance, when joe_the_cat@nextroll.com is run through a typical hashing function, it becomes a string of digitsm such as: 0F0B7B1A1A7E8BDBBC6AA545F8CCD6F83671B32479271BFCB6CC8498912058D5. We take this step to de-identify data and protect email addresses. We use the hashed email  created for the purpose of recognizing you and sending your interest-based ads across different devices (computers, tablets and mobile devices) and browsers (also called “cross-device matching”). We describe cross-device matching in further detail in
How We Use the Data We Collect
.
Information about your business:
You may use the tools available on NextRoll’s Digital Properties to learn more about how NextRoll’s Services can help you grow your business.  If you are an existing Customer, we may use the information you provide about your business when using our online tools to add to your existing Customer profile with NextRoll.
Data We Automatically Collect From Your Device
Cookies:
A unique identifier that NextRoll assigns to you when visiting one of our sites so we can understand your online journey and have the opportunity to serve ads to you when you visit a publisher’s site.
Device Information:
This is technical information about the device you use to access our Digital Properties such as your operating system. Additionally, in the case of mobile devices, your device type, unique advertising identifier (such as the Apple IDFA or Android Advertising ID) and any other unique identifier that may be assigned to the mobile device, such as an Android ID or UDID in older Apple phone models, or a non-cookie unique identifier used by
Non-Cookie Technologies
.
IP Address:
The IP address associated with the device you are using when visiting a NextRoll Digital Property.
Location Data:
This is non-precise information related to your geography derived from your device’s IP address. This does not reveal your precise geographic coordinates (i.e. your GPS latitude and longitude) - only country, state, city and zip/postal code, and helps us to display ads that are relevant to your general location (for example, showing ads in French if you are located in France).
Browser Data:
This is technical information about the browser you are using that is captured in order to serve you an ad that can be rendered on your device (for example, Chrome, Firefox, and Safari).
Activity on our Digital Properties:
This is data about your browsing activity on our Digital Properties and your interactions with our other tools or dashboards. For example, which pages you visited and when, what items were clicked on a page, how much time was spent on a page or whether you downloaded a white paper.
Ad Data:
This is data about the online ads we have served (or attempted to serve) to you. This includes, for example, how many times an ad has been served to you, what page the ad appeared on and whether you clicked on or otherwise interacted with the ad.
All this data is collected to help make sure you get the best and most relevant experience when engaging with NextRoll.
Data We Collect from Third Party Sources
Data from Audience Partners:
We may collect additional information about you from our audience partners who create and provide us with segments of our own customers (“Audience Partner”). A segment is a grouping of users who share one or more attributes (e.g. firmographic attributes).  We use this data to better understand our target audience and to better market our Services to you.
Data from Advertising Partners:
This is data that allows us to match the NextRoll cookie identifier with identifiers that may already be used by other companies in the digital advertising ecosystem that we work with (“Advertising Partners”). For example, we work with ad exchanges, publishers and supply side platforms (i.e. companies that sell advertising space on publishers’ websites) in order to serve our ads. Matching cookie identifiers helps us deliver ads to you and recognize you across browsers and devices, and may include pseudonymous advertising identifiers (meaning identifiers that help identify your browser or device, but not you directly) which some Advertising Partners choose to share with us.
Contact Data from Third Parties:
We obtain and collect contact data from various third party sources, including from public sources and through licenses with data providers. This contact data is B2B information – in other words, it is typically a business email address, business street address, or sometimes, a business telephone number.
3. How We Use the Data We Collect
Back to top
Specifically, we use this data for:
Interest-Based Advertising:
Serving you ads for certain NextRoll Services that are more likely to be relevant to you based on your browsing activity, the time of day you visit our Digital Properties and the time you spend on them, and non-precise geographic data inferred about your device/s. For example, we may show you ads for our Service  only available in your city, region or country during your lunch or commute hours. For more information about how our Services work, please see our Service Privacy Notice.
Segmenting Audiences:
We use data from our Digital Properties you visit in addition to data from Audience Partners to segment you into groups (like high or low intent visitors) for reporting, analytics and determining what ads and email content would best peak your interest.
Ad delivery:
We use data about your browser or other technical information about your device in order to deliver advertising and confirm successful delivery of the ad.
Frequency Capping:
We use data about ads that have been served to you to make sure that you don't see the same NextRoll ad too many times.
Sequencing:
If you are being served a sequence of ads, we do this to make sure we show you the right ad next in the sequence.
Mapping Data to our Cross-Device Asset:
NextRoll cross-device asset is used to connect multiple devices to one person, household, and/or online identifiers such as an email address (hashed for security) that you may have submitted to NextRoll.  Our cross-device asset allows us to better understand your online activity and helps us improve our ability to target and measure ad campaigns (including limiting the number of times you or your household sees an ad for NextRoll Services).
Cross-Device Matching:
Identifying different devices and browsers that are likely to be associated with you so that ads can be targeted, capped and sequenced across those devices, and so that campaign effectiveness can be measured and analyzed. For example, cross-device matching helps us not show you ads for the shoes you were looking at on your phone but already purchased on your tablet. Instead we’ll try to show you ads for an upcoming triathlon where you can put those shoes to work. It also helps us match devices so we can honor your opt-out choices across all devices we know are connected to the opted-out cookie. You may opt-out of cross-device interest-based targeting by employing the respective opt-out techniques we describe in
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Targeted Ads
. To learn more about how we use cross-device matching, click
here
.
Syncing Online Identifiers with Customer CRM Data:
If you have provided us with your email address, we may match your online browsing activity indicated by online identifiers.  We may use this information to see if you are showing increased interest in our products and services to better understand our website audience and to respond with appropriate marketing activity.
Identifying Companies Associated with an IP Range for B2B Marketing:
We match IP address ranges to companies who disclose their IP address ranges to analyze and report our website traffic.
Reporting and Attribution:
Analyzing how our ads are performing and gaining insights into our Customers and prospective customers. Reporting may include ad metrics such as attribution (described above), impressions (ads served), clicks (ads you clicked on) and conversions (for example, if you create an account with us or download a white paper from our site). This helps us identify ads that are most useful to you and demonstrates NextRoll’s value. Relatedly, this also helps us identify an ad that is not performing well, allowing us to update our ad or ad campaign strategy.
Providing our Services and Customer Support:
For example, to monitor usage of features, manage campaigns and log data for audit purposes. We may contact you when you ask us for support or when it appears to us that you might need support. We maintain records of our communications with you for future reference.
Billing:
Invoice you and collect fees for services we have provided.
Troubleshoot Problems:
To monitor and fix our website performance, for example, if the site is slow, not loading properly, or to investigate aberrations in performance of our Services.
Prevent Potential Fraud and Enforce our Terms of Service:
To prevent fraud on our sites or through the use of our Services,to enforce our Terms of Service or other policies or investigate any potential violation of those Terms and policies, any potential violation of the law, or to protect ourselves, our Customers or any third party from any potential harm (whether tangible or intangible).
Customize, Measure and Improve our Websites and Services:
To provide customized content and to measure which content is most helpful (or unhelpful) to our Customers, which helps improve our website and our services. For example, if we notice higher visits to certain Help Center articles or receive higher customer support tickets for specific issues, we can improve our support materials or identify areas where we can make our product better for our Customers.
Contact You About Your Account or our Services, Including to Market our Services to You or Provide Updates:
We may use your contact information to contact you about your account, for example, in relation to the performance of your campaigns, to follow up on billing issues or to tell you about new Services we are offering. We may send you product updates, performance information, surveys or communicate with you in other ways about our services. When we can legally do so, we may augment the information you give us in order to contact you by phone or even snail mail. You can opt-out of receiving emails by unsubscribing through the link at the bottom of our emails or by updating your email preferences
here
. You can let us know if you don’t want to receive phone calls or other marketing materials from us by contacting
support@nextroll.com
.
Conducting Our Corporate Operations.
Data collected in our corporate capacity, such as our own B2B lists of Customers and prospective customers, is used to conduct our business operations and send communications.
Complying with Legal Process:
To satisfy in good faith any applicable law, legal process or proper governmental request, such as to respond to a subpoena (whether civil or criminal) or similar process.
Investigating Wrongdoing and Protecting Ourselves or Third Parties:
To enforce or investigate any potential violation of our Terms of Service and policies, any potential violation of the law and to protect ourselves, our Customers, or any third party from any potential harm (whether tangible or intangible).
4. Data Sharing
Back to top
We may disclose data about you:
With our Audience Partners:
We share hashed email addresses or other pseudonymous online identifiers with our Audience Partners in connection with audience creation and modeling and creating segments.
With our Advertising Partners:
We disclose cookie ID data and the ad we propose to serve to you with our Advertising Partners, as necessary, to allow for successful delivery of ads to your device.
With our Service Providers:
We contract with companies who help with parts of our business operations (e.g., website and data hosting, fraud prevention, viewability reporting, data hygiene, marketing and email delivery), as well as billing, collections, tech, customer and operational support.
With our Subsidiaries and Affiliates:
These entities will only process your data for the purposes already explained in this Website Privacy Notice. Our subsidiaries are NextRoll Limited (Ireland), AdRoll Limited (UK) and NextRoll Pty Limited (Australia).
In connection with legal proceedings:
When we are under a legal obligation to do so, for example to comply with a binding order of a court, or where disclosure is necessary to exercise, establish or defend the legal rights of NextRoll, our Customers or any other third party.
In connection with a sale of our business:
If a third party acquires some or all of our business or assets, we may disclose your information in connection with the sale (including during due diligence in preparation for the sale).
5. Aggregated and De-Identified Data
Back to top
NextRoll may aggregate and de-identify data it collects so that it can either no longer be directly associated with a natural person or cannot be associated with a natural person at all.  NextRoll will then use such data for our machine learning, reporting, and other business purposes.
We may also share aggregated and de-identified data with our subsidiaries and affiliates and third parties, including with our Advertising Partners. For example, we may conduct industry wide surveys to publish benchmark reports, or to include statistics when collaborating with researchers or other companies on industry white papers.
6. Cookies and Related Technologies
Back to top
Our websites use cookies, tracking pixels and related technologies to operate and personalize our sites.  For example, to provide personalized content on our site, enable customer service chat functionality, for analytics purposes, and to target ads to you about our products and services on other websites.
We also use cookies, tracking pixels and related technologies to provide our services for our Customers. Cookies are small data files that are served by our platform and stored on your device.  You can refuse consent to, or opt-out of, NextRoll cookies at any time, as explained in
Your Choices and Opting-out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
below.
Tracking cookies
enable us to identify your device when you move between different Digital Properties, so that we can serve targeted advertising to you.
The NextRoll cookie we serve through the NextRoll platform for this purpose is named “__adroll,” “__ar_v4” and “__adroll_fpc”.
Our Advertising Partners may also drop cookies for the purposes described in
What Data We Collect
. Generally, the type of cookies dropped will vary depending on the Advertising Partner. We provide a list of our Advertising Pixel Partners
here
.
Additionally, we use
non-tracking cookies
to store user decisions in terms of your ad consent and opt-out choices:
We may drop an __adroll cookie with value opt-out if you opt-out as described below.
We may drop a __consent cookie that stores the consent choices you have made regarding data processing and advertising by NextRoll.
A full list of NextRoll cookies is set out below:
Tracking cookies
Non-tracking cookies
__adroll
__ar_v4
__adroll_fpc
__adroll_consent_paramas
__adroll_post_consent_html
__adroll_post_connsent_css
7. Non-Cookie Technology for Tracking Outside European Territories
Back to top
In respect of website visitors with IP addresses
not from a European Territory
, NextRoll and some of our Advertising Partners may use technologies other than cookie technology to recognize your computer, device or browser for the purpose of interest-based advertising, analyzing engagement with ads or content, measuring the effectiveness of a particular ad campaign or marketing effort, monitoring against fraud or misuse of our Services, or in other ways described in this Website Privacy Notice in
How We Use the Data We Collect
. This use of non-cookie technology may be used in addition to cookies, or separately, to collect and record data about your web browsing activities on browsers, search engines or other platforms that may not utilize NextRoll Technology. You may opt-out of tracking via non-cookie technologies by employing the respective opt-out techniques described in
Your Choices and Opting- Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics Ads
.
8. Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
Back to top
You can control how you share your data with NextRoll, including electing to “opt-out” of interest-based advertising altogether. Please visit our
opt-out webpage
to opt out.
Generally speaking, an opt-out allows you to direct NextRoll not to engage in a particular type of data collection.  There are many different ways that NextRoll collects data, different purposes for that data collection and different industry-specific and NextRoll-specific tools for opting-out.  We describe below the different options for controlling how NextRoll uses your data:
Web browser:
You can opt-out of receiving interest-based ads served by us or on our behalf by clicking on the blue icon
that typically appears in the corner of the ads we serve and following the instructions provided or by clicking
here
. Please note that this opt-out function is browser-specific and relies on an “opt-out cookie.” This means if you delete your cookies or upgrade your browser after having opted out, you will need to opt-out again.
Cross Device Opt-Out:
As described above, How We Use the Data We Collect, we may link multiple browsers or devices to the cookie ID, hashed email address or other unique identifiers associated with you. If you opt-out on a browser or device and we have more browsers or devices linked to you, we will extend your opt-out decision to the other linked browsers and devices. Since we only link users across browsers and devices in some conditions, there could be cases where you are still being tracked in a different browser or device we have not linked, and where we are treating you as a different user.
Mobile Device Opt-Out:
To opt-out of receiving targeted ads that are based on your behavior across different mobile applications see the following instructions, for iOS and Android devices:
iOS 7 or Higher:
Go to your Settings > Select Privacy > Select Advertising > Enable the “Limit Ad Tracking” setting; and
For Android devices with OS 2.2 or higher and Google Play Services version 4.0 or higher:
Open your Google Settings app > Select Ads > Enable “Opt-out of interest-based advertising.”
Industry Opt-Out Tools and Self-Regulation:
NextRoll is a member of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI) and adheres to the framework principles. You may use the NAI opt-out tool
here
, which will allow you to opt-out of seeing personalized ads from us and from other NAI approved member companies. In addition, the NAI opt-out tool allows you to separately opt-out of “audience matched” advertising through the NAI’s “Audience Matched Advertising Opt-Out” tool. You can also use the
email opt-out tool
provided by our Advertising Partner, LiveRamp, to opt your email address from their database. Audience matching is a particular type of interest-based advertising where de-identified data (e.g. hashed emails) is tied to “offline” activity or information (generally, information that is or can be associated with a consumer’s email address) and matches that de-identified data to cookies, mobile ad IDs or other online identifiers. We describe this hashing activity in detail in
What Data We Collect
. Because this “audience matched” information is derived from an email address or information that can be tied to an email address, it is possible to opt-out with an email address. However, when you opt-out in this way, you will need to submit all of the email addresses that you use for the opt-out to work.
We also comply with the Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising as managed by the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA). You may opt-out of receiving personalized ads from other companies that perform ad targeting services, including some that we may work with as Advertising Partners via the
DAA website
.
We also comply with the Canadian Self-regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising as managed by the Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC). You may opt-out of receiving personalized ads from other companies that perform ad targeting services, including some that we may work with as Advertising Partners via the
DAAC website
.
Finally, we also adhere to the European Interactive Advertising Digital Alliance (EDAA) guidelines for online advertising. You may opt-out via the
EDAA website
.
You can also request that we stop email marketing to you. You can use the “unsubscribe link” in our marketing emails or contact
support@nextroll.com
.
9. Data retention
Back to top
We retain data for as long as necessary to perform our Services and for the purposes described in this Website Privacy Notice. For example, we may retain:
billing information as necessary to meet audit requirements;
login information to confirm when Customers accepted our Terms of Service; and
information as long as necessary to meet legal requirements, resolve disputes or enforce agreements.
We retain cookie data such as device and browser information, ad data and data collected on our Digital Properties as follows:
Mobile Identifiers and Cookie Identifiers:
Cookie identifiers we collect expire (and are then deleted) 13 months from the last time your device accessed a Digital Property using our technology. If you visit another Digital Property that uses NextRoll Technology inside that 13-month expiry period, then the expiry period will be reset and measured from that date instead. The expiration period for mobile identifiers is controlled by you on your device.
Personal Data Associated with Mobile and Cookie Identifiers Related to Browsing History:
We delete personal data associated with mobile and cookie identifiers after 12 months (for example, data such as a NextRoll Digital Property you visited or NextRoll ads that you may have clicked).
Personal Data Associated with Advertising Bidding Requests:
Data logged in order to process an advertising bid request we have received from an Advertising Partner (such as cookie identifier, IP address, the domain url requesting to display the ad and browser information) are deleted after 7 days. Data we have logged regarding bids we have placed to display an advertisement (including cookie identifiers, mobile identifiers, the advertisable bid on and the advertisable won or displayed to the visitor) are deleted after 15 days.
Personal Data Associated with the Display of an Advertisement:
Data logged for the display of an advertisement (including cookie identifiers, the advertisement won or displayed to you and data indicating whether you clicked on the particular advertisement displayed) are deleted after 12 months.
10. Security
Back to top
We apply technical, administrative and organizational security measures to protect the data we collect against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure or access, in particular where the processing involves the transmission of data over a network, and against other unlawful forms of processing.
11. International Transfers
Back to top
We may transfer the information we collect about you to countries (including the United States of America) other than the country where we originally collected it for the purposes of performing  our Services. In general, these countries will be the countries in which we or our service providers operate.
Those countries may not have the same data protection laws as your country. However, when we transfer your information to other countries, we will protect that information as described in this Website Privacy Notice and take steps, where necessary, to ensure that international transfers comply with applicable laws.
For example, when we transfer your information from a European Territory (as defined below) to our parent company in the United States, we do so under the European Commission's Standard Contractual Clauses. When we transfer your data outside of a European Territory to Advertising Partners (or vice versa), we do so under lawful data export mechanisms which may include Standard Contractual Clauses and Binding Corporate Rules.
12. Information for European Territory Residents: Our Legal Basis and Your Rights
Back to top
Our Legal Basis:
If you are a visitor from the European Territories, our legal basis for collecting and using the personal data described above will depend on the personal information concerned and the specific context in which we collect it. "European Territories" mean the European Economic Area and Switzerland. For the purpose of this Website Privacy Notice, the term "European Territories" shall continue to include the United Kingdom.
We will typically collect personal data from you based on your consent. For example, when you visit one of our Digital Properties, you will be asked to consent to NextRoll dropping a cookie. We also collect personal data where the purpose of processing is based on NextRoll’s legitimate interest, as described in the “vendor” details of the Consent Management Tool presented to you . For example, to administer our platforms and provide our Services and fulfil our contractual obligations as a service provider.
If you have questions or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your personal data, please contact us first at
support@nextroll.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@nextroll.com
.
European Residents Privacy Rights:
If you are a resident of a European Territory, you have the following enhanced rights under EU data protection law:
If you wish to
access, correct, update or request deletion
of your personal information, please complete the information on this
webpage
to obtain a verifiable request.
If you wish to
object
to us processing your personal data or would like to otherwise restrict the processing of your personal data, we will honor that request. Please visit the
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
portion of this Privacy Notice to select the best opt-out method for you.
Similarly, if we process your personal data with your consent,
then you can withdraw your consent at any time
. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect the processing of your personal data conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent. You can also refuse consent for NextRoll or our Advertising Partners to drop cookies by visiting our
opt-out page
or by refusing consent for NextRoll when you see a Consent Management Tool displayed on websites which lists NextRoll as a vendor.
You have the
right to complain
to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your personal data. Contact details for data protection authorities in the European Territories are available from the European Data Protection Board
website
. However, if you have any questions about our collection and use of your personal data, we encourage you to contact us first at
support@nextroll.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@nextroll.com
.
13. Information For California Residents Only
Back to top
This section supplements the information contained in this Website Privacy Notice and applies solely to visitors, users, and others who are residents of the State of California, as defined in Section 17014 of Title 18 of the California Code of Regulations. This section is provided to comply with the
California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018
(as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020 (CPRA), and regulations promulgated thereunder as each may be amended from time to time (collectively the “CCPA”).
Any terms defined in the CCPA have the same meaning when used in this section.
For the purposes of this section “
Services
” shall mean performing advertising and marketing services for NextRoll’s purposes as well as maintaining or servicing NextRoll Customer accounts, providing Customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying Customer information and processing payments.
Information We Collect and the Purposes for Which this Information is Used
We collect information that identifies, relates to, describes, references, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or device (“
personal information
”).  This collection of information is listed in
What Data We Collect
.
We set out below the CCPA categories of personal information we have collected from consumers within the last twelve (12) months who are NextRoll Customers and/or visitors of the NextRoll’s Digital Properties. Personal information in certain categories may overlap with other categories.
A.
Identifiers
Yes
Device IP address, email address, cookie string data, pseudonymous data (e.g. hashed emails), operating system, and your device type, and mobile device's identifier (such as the Apple IDFA or Android Advertising ID) and any other unique identifier that may be assigned to any device by third parties and cross-referenced to recognize a device.
Directly and indirectly from consumers, third party data providers, ad exchanges, supply-side platforms and Audience Partners. In the case of business email addresses, RollWorks B2B Services may infer a business email address.
B.
Personal information listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e))
Yes
Name, business address, business telephone number, education, employment, employment history, credit card number or other payment account information.
Directly from consumers and Audience Partners.
C.
Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law
No
-
-
D.
Commercial information
Yes
Records of products or services purchased, obtained or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
Directly from consumers.
E.
Biometric information
No
-
-
F.
Internet or other similar network activity
Yes
Browsing history, search history, information on a consumer's interaction with a website, application, or advertisement. For example, which pages you visited and when, what items were clicked on a page, how much time was spent on a page, whether you downloaded a white paper on a B2B website, what items you placed into your online shopping cart, what products were purchased and the price of the products purchased.
Directly from browsing history on our Digital Properties.
Non-personal information about one of our ads (e.g. the third party who served the ad, and the name of the ad) may be connected with browsing history or activity on our websites for the purposes of determining attribution information (e.g. whether particular ad led to a consumer visiting our website, and, if so, which particular ad campaign).
G.
Geolocation data
Yes
Non-precise geolocation derived from IP address.
Directly from consumers, ad exchanges, publishers and supply-side platforms and Audience Partners.
H.
Sensory data
No
-
-
I.
Professional or employment-related information
Yes
Current or past job history, including details about the employer (industry, name, company location, company domain or URL), and employee (positions held, duration of employment, and office location of the company where the employee worked).
Third party data providers and AudiencePartners.
J.
Non-public education information (per the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g, 34 C.F.R Part 99))
No
-
-
K.
Inferences drawn from other personal information
Yes
Creating profiles that reflect consumer preferences and interests.
Audience partners.
L.
Sensitive Personal Information
Personal information that reveals a consumer’s financial account, debit card, or credit card number in combination with any required security or access code, password, or credentials allowing access to an account.
Customers
Purposes for Which Personal Information is Collected
All data we collect pursuant to this Website Privacy Notice is primarily for the commercial purpose of performing advertising and marketing services for our own purposes as well as maintaining or servicing our Customer accounts, providing Customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying customer information and processing payments. We also use data collected for the following additional business purposes:
Auditing Interactions with Consumers:
count ad impressions and verify the quality of ad impressions served to unique visitors identified by cookie IDor other unique identifier;
Debugging and Repair:
the identification and repair of impairments to intended and existing functionalities in our Services and NextRoll Technology, perform debugging and related activities to repair errors that impair the functionality of our Services;
Security:
to detect security incidents and protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent or illegal activity, including, when necessary, to prosecute those responsible for such activities;
Internal Research and Development:
conduct internal research for technological development of our Services and demonstration of the performance of these Services; and
Quality and Safety Maintenance and Verification:
verify the quality or safety of our Services and improve, upgrade or enhance our Services and NextRoll Technology.
For more information on how we use this data, please refer to
How We Use the Data We Collect
.
Disclosures of Personal Information for a Business Purpose
NextRoll discloses personal data for business purposes as set out in Purposes for which Personal Information is Collected above. We disclose, or otherwise share as indicated below, the categories of personal information to the categories of third parties as set out in
Data Sharing
.
Sharing and Selling Personal Information
In the preceding twelve (12) months, we have shared and/or sold the following categories of personal information for the commercial purpose of  of providing cross-context behavioral advertising (known as retargeted or interest based advertising) services:
Category A (Identifiers). By serving ads on digital publisher sites such as news, blogs and weather sites we share and/or sell cookie string data and pseudonymous data (e.g. hashed emails) from Category A (identifiers) with Advertising Partners and Advertising Partners.
NextRoll does not have actual knowledge that it sells or shares the personal information of minors.
To opt-out of the sale or sharing of your personal information, visit our
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information
page.
Furthermore, NextRoll processes interest based advertising opt-out preference signals via global privacy controls. To use this method, you must download and enable global privacy controls on a participating browser or browser extension.
Your Rights and Choices
The CCPA provides California residents with specific rights regarding their personal information. This section describes the rights of California residents under CCPA and provides information on how to exercise those rights.
Right to Know and Data Portability Rights
You have the right to request that we disclose certain information to you about our collection and use of personal information over the past 12 months. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request, we will disclose to you:
The categories of personal information we collected about you;
The categories of sources for the personal information we collected about you;
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting or selling that personal information;
The categories of third parties with whom we share that personal information;
The specific pieces of personal information we collected about you (otherwise known as a data portability request); and
Two separate lists where we have sold or disclosed your personal information for a business purpose:
Sales: identifying the personal information categories that each category of recipient purchased; and
Disclosures for a business purpose: identifying the personal information categories that each category of recipient obtained
Right to Delete
You have the right to request that we delete any of your personal information that we collect from you and retain, subject to certain exceptions. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request (see
Exercising Right to Know, Data Portability and Right to Correct
), we will delete (and direct our services providers to delete) your personal information from our records, unless an exception applies.
We may deny your deletion request if retaining the information is necessary for us or our service provider(s) to:
Complete the transaction for which we collected the personal information, provide a good or service that you requested, take actions reasonably anticipated within the context of our ongoing business relations with you or otherwise perform our contract with you;
Detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, or prosecute those responsible for such activities;
Exercise free speech, ensure the right of another consumer to exercise their free speech rights, or exercise another right provided by law;
Comply with the California Electronic Communications Privacy Act (Cal. Penal Code § 1546 et. seq.);
Engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, historical, or statistical research in the public interest that adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws, when the information’s deletion may likely render impossible or seriously impair the research’s achievement, if you previously provided informed consent;
Enable solely internal uses that are reasonably aligned with consumer expectations based on your relationship with us;
Comply with a legal obligation; and
Make other internal and lawful uses of that information that are compatible with the context in which you provided it.
Right to Correct
You have the right to request that a business correct inaccurate personal Information that is maintains about you, taking into account the nature of the personal information and the purposes of the processing of the personal Information.
Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request (see
Exercising Right to Know, Data Portability, Right to Deletion, and Right to Correct
), we will use commercially reasonable efforts to correct (and direct our service providers to do the same) your personal information, unless an exception applies.
Exercising Right to Know, Data Portability, Right to Deletion, and Right to Correct
To exercise the access, data portability, and deletion rights described above, please submit the consumer request to us by either.
Calling us at 1-844-740-7126; or
Visiting our privacy requests
webpage
.
After submitting the request, a form will be sent to the requestor to verify the consumer request.
On the verification from, the requestor must:
Provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected personal information or an authorized representative; and
Describe your request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate, and respond to it.
Only you, or a person that you authorize to act on your behalf, may make a verifiable consumer request related to your personal information.
We cannot respond to your request or provide you with personal information if we cannot: (i) verify your identity or authority to make the request; and (ii) confirm the personal information relates to you.
We will only use personal information provided in a verifiable consumer request to verify the requestor’s identity or authority to make the request.
Response Timing and Format
We will deliver our written response to you electronically unless you indicate delivery to be by mail.
The response we provide will also explain the reasons we cannot complete a request, if applicable. Please note that personal information deleted during this period as set out in
Data Retention
will not be provided.
The format of our responses to you concerning personal information collected, disclosed or sold will be provided in a readily usable format that should allow you to transmit the information from one entity to another entity without hindrance.
We do not charge a fee to process or respond to your verifiable consumer request unless it is excessive, repetitive or manifestly unfounded. If we determine that the request warrants a fee, we will tell you why we made that decision and provide you with a cost estimate before completing your request.
Right to Opt out of the Sale or Sharing of Your Personal Information
To exercise the right to opt-out of the sale or sharing of your personal information you (or your authorized representative) may visit the
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information
webpage.
Opt Out Preference Signals
If you are visiting a NextRoll Digital Property, you may opt-out of the sale or sharing of your data by broadcasting an Opt-Out Preference Signal, such as the Global Privacy Control (“GPC”) (on the browsers and/or browser extensions that support such a signal). If you do not have an account on the site you are browsing or if you are not logged into your account while browsing, your request to opt-out will be linked to your browser identifier only and not linked to any account information because the connection between your browser and the account is not known to NextRoll. If you would like us to make the connection between your browser and your account when you send the opt out request or GPC signal, and you have not yet opted out, you can do so here.
Personal Information Sales Opt-Out Rights
To exercise the right to opt-out of interest-based advertising, you (or your authorized representative) may submit a request to us by visiting the
Do Not Sell or Share My Information
webpage.
Non-Discrimination
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your CCPA rights. Unless permitted by the CCPA, we will not:
Deny you goods or services;
Charge you different prices or rates for goods or services, including through granting discounts or other benefits, or imposing penalties;
Provide you a different level or quality of goods or services; or
Suggest that you may receive a different price or rate for goods or services or a different level or quality of goods or services.
14. Information for Non-California Residents in US States with Data Privacy Laws
Back to top
Exercising Your Consumer Rights.
Several US state privacy laws provide residents with specific rights regarding their personal information. Consumers in these states can exercise their rights via the methods described above under the headings:in Exercising Right to Know, Data Portability; Right to Deletion; and Right to Correct. To appeal NextRoll’s decision as a Controller with regard to a consumer request, or to contact NextRoll, please view the Contact Us About Questions section.
The Sale of Personal Information and Processing for Targeted Advertising
For information on the sale of your personal information and how to opt out, see
Sales of Personal Information
. NextRoll processes personal information for targeted advertising. See
How We Use the Data We Collect
above. To opt out of targeted advertising, see
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
, or visit the “Privacy Choices” link in the footer of all NextRoll webpages:
15. Information for Individuals Located in Brazil
Back to top
Please view NextRoll’s disclosures pursuant to the Brazilian Data Protection Law, the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (“LGPD”),
here
.
16. Changes to this Privacy Notice
Back to top
We may update or modify this Website Privacy Notice at our discretion at any time. When we make changes to this Website Privacy Notice, we will post the updated notice online and update the notice’s effective date. Please review this Website Privacy Notice periodically.
If we are required by applicable law to obtain your consent to any material changes before they come into effect, then we will do so in accordance with law.
17. Contact Us About Questions
Back to top
If you have any questions about this Service Privacy Notice or our privacy practices, or want to appeal NextRoll’s decision as a Controller with regard to a consumer request, you can contact support@nextroll.com.
If you are located in a European Territory then, where we process your data as a data controller, NextRoll Limited is the data controller of your information. To contact NextRoll Limited please email support@nextroll.com or write to us at the following address:
NextRoll Limited
Attn: Legal
Floor 3, Block 3
Miesian Plaza
Dublin 2, Ireland
D02 Y754
If you wish to escalate your inquiry after contacting the support team, you are welcome to contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@nextroll.com
or by writing to the following address:
Address:
Lucid Privacy Group
Attention: NextRoll Data Protection Officer
1050 Page Street
San Francisco, CA 94117
USA
×
We Value Your Privacy
Settings
NextRoll, Inc. ("NextRoll") and our
19 advertising partners
use cookies and similar technologies on this site and use personal data (e.g., your IP address). If you consent, the cookies, device identifiers, or other information can be stored or accessed on your device for the purposes described below. You can click "Allow All" or "Decline All" or click Settings above to customise your consent regarding the purposes and features for which your personal data will be processed and/or the partners with whom you will share personal data.
NextRoll and our
advertising partners
process personal data to: ● Store and/or access information on a device; ● Create a personalised content profile; ● Select personalised content; ● Personalised advertising, advertising measurement, audience research and services development; ● Services development. For some of the purposes above, our advertising partners: ● Use precise geolocation data. Some of our partners rely on their legitimate business interests to process personal data. View our
advertising partners
if you wish to provide or deny consent for specific partners, review the purposes each partner believes they have a legitimate interest for, and object to such processing.
If you select Decline All, you will still be able to view content on this site and you will still receive advertising, but the advertising will not be tailored for you. You may change your setting whenever you see the
Manage consent preferences
on this site.
Decline All
Allow All
Manage consent preferences
Sub-policy 14
https://www.criteo.com/de/privacy/:
Plattform
Zurück
Zurück
Plattform
Werbung & Monetarisierung für Marketer und Media Owner
Commerce Media Platform
Die vernetzte Commerce Media-Umgebung für das offene Internet
Commerce Growth
Automatisierte Kundengewinnung/-bindung für Marketer & Agenturen
Commerce Max
Retail Media im offenen Internet für Brands & Agenturen
Commerce Grid
Für Media Owner, Agenturen und Retailer, die Media und Commerce mit Programmatic verknüpfen möchten
Commerce Yield
Programmatische Monetarisierung für große Media Owner & Retailer
Zurück
Technologie
Commerce-fokussierte Technologie für maximale Ergebnisse
Adressierbarkeit
Weitere Informationen zu unserer mehrgleisigen Strategie für die Adressierbarkeit des Ökosystems
AI Engine
Eure KPIs erreichen – schnell und ohne Rätselraten
Predictive Bidding
Cleverer bieten und Geld sparen – auf Basis des individuell erwarteten Nutzerwerts
Produktempfehlungen
Umsatz steigern mit absichtsbasierten Empfehlungen
Shopper Graph
Kampagnen skalieren und optimieren mit vernetzten Shopper-IDs & Commerce-Daten
Lösungen
Zurück
Zurück
Performance-Media
Digitale Werbelösungen für jede Phase der Customer Journey
Kundengewinnung
Menschen erreichen, die euch nicht kennen, sich aber wahrscheinlich für euch interessieren
Kundenbindung
Den Lifetime Value von Menschen erhöhen, die euch kennen
Dynamic Retargeting
Mehr Conversions erzielen bei Kunden, die euch kennen – mit personalisierten Produkt-Ads
Zielgruppen
Top-Kunden finden & binden – mit dem weltweit größten Commerce-Datensatz
Videowerbung
Kombiniere Videowerbung mit Performance-Funktionen und führe so Konsumenten via Online-Video bis zur Conversion
Contextual Advertising
Optimiertes Targeting – mit Commerce- und Kontextdaten
Zurück
Retail Media
Aktivierungs- und Monetarisierungslösungen für Brands, Agenturen und Retailer
Retail Media
Shopper erreichen und konvertieren – mit relevanten Ads am digitalen PoS
Ressourcen
Zurück
Zurück
Allgemeines
Insights, Fortbildung, Criteo-News und mehr
Ressourcen-Center
Reports, Leitfäden, Webinare und mehr für eure Werbestrategie
Blog
Insights und Kommentare zu Commerce Media und digitaler Werbung
Success Stories
So erreichen andere ihre Ziele mit Criteo
Konsumententrends
Die neuesten Konsumdaten für 20 Länder und >600 Produktkategorien
Glossar
Die gebräuchlichsten Begriffe in der digitalen Werbung
Adressierbarkeit
Weitere Informationen zu unserer mehrgleisigen Strategie für die Adressierbarkeit des Ökosystems
Help Center
FAQs, Leitfäden und mehr für optimale Criteo-Kampagnen
Events
Trefft uns dort!
Zurück
Creative Formats
Werbeformate und eine Galerie mit realen Beispielen
Formate für digitale Ads
Unsere Ad-Formate für Video, Adaptive, Rich Media und mehr
Ad Gallery
Praxis-Beispiele für eine Vielzahl von Formaten, Branchen und Regionen
Dynamic Creative Optimization+
Echtzeit-Entscheidungen zu Creatives, die dafür sorgen, dass eure Ads gesehen werden
Werbesicherheit & Vertrauen
Das Maximum an Qualität und Performance sicherstellen
Über Criteo
Zurück
Zurück
Über Criteo
Unternehmen
Criteo kennenlernen
Investoren
Informationen für Investoren
In den Medien
Pressemitteilungen und Erwähnungen
Diversität, Gleichstellung & Inklusion
Unsere DEI-Säulen, Ziele und mehr
Nachhaltigkeit
Unser Ansatz für eine nachhaltige Zukunft
Produkt-Ethik
So stellen wir ethische Werbung sicher
Arbeiten für Criteo
Eure Chancen erkunden
Search for:
Search
Select your Language
Deutsch
English
Español
Français
Italiano
Polski
Português
Pусский
한국어
中文
日本語
Deutsch
Mein Account
Jetzt loslegen
Datenschutzrichtlinie
Inhaltsverzeichnis
Datenschutzrichtlinie
Criteo-Services in Internet-Browsern deaktivieren
Criteo-Services in mobilen Apps deaktivieren
So verwenden wir Ihre Daten
So arbeiten die Criteo-Services umgebungsübergreifend
Ihre Rechte
Unsere Partner
CCPA Datenschutzrichtlinie
Willkommen! Auf dieser Seite finden Sie Informationen über Criteo, unsere Technologien und Services, unsere Datenschutzrichtlinien sowie dazu, wie wir Daten erfassen und verarbeiten.
Status der Criteo-Dienste
Criteo-Dienste sind in Ihrem derzeit verwendeten Browser deaktiviert
Criteo-Dienste sind in Ihrem derzeit verwendeten Browser aktiviert
Die Standardeinstellungen des Browsers, den Sie derzeit verwenden, schränken die Verwendung von Cookies Dritter sowie unsere Möglichkeiten ein, mühelos zu erkennen, ob Sieentschieden haben, Criteo-Dienste zu deaktivieren. Um sicherzustellen, dass Criteo-Dienste in Ihrem derzeit verwendeten Browser deaktiviert sind, klicken Sie bitte auf die folgende Schaltfläche.
null
Criteo-Services deaktivieren
Unser Geschäftsmodell
Wir bieten Advertisern die Möglichkeit, ihre Kampagnen und/oder Angebote genau auf die Zielgruppen auszurichten, die sie mit den werblichen Inhalten erreichen wollen. Im Gegenzug heißt das für die Konsumenten, dass sie auf den Websites, Apps und anderen Plattformen unserer Partner („Publisher“ oder „Partner“) Werbung sehen, die für sie wahrscheinlich relevant ist.
Wie funktionieren unsere Services?
Criteo verwendet keine Daten, die es uns ermöglichen würden, Sie direkt zu identifizieren, wie z.B. Ihren Vor- und Nachnamen, Ihre Postanschrift, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse im Klartext, usw.
Wenn Sie auf der Website eines Werbetreibenden surfen oder eine mobile App nutzen, die unsere Technologien verwendet, ermöglicht uns diese Technologie, eine begrenzte Menge an Daten zu Ihrem Surf- und Kaufverhalten zu erfassen – zum Beispiel die Produkte, die Sie sich angesehen, in Ihren Warenkorb gelegt oder gekauft haben.
Hier finden Sie weitere Informationen dazu, welche Daten Criteo konkret sammelt
. Abhängig von der Online-Umgebung, in der Sie sich bewegen, verknüpfen wir diese Daten mit einem eindeutigen Identifikator, etwa einem Identifikations-Cookie oder einer anderen ähnlichen Technologie (z.B. mobilen Werbe-IDs und nicht auf Cookies basierenden Technologien).
Wenn Sie die Website oder die mobile App eines Publishers nutzen, der ebenfalls unsere Technologien nutzt, teilt uns der Publisher entweder direkt oder über eine Ad Exchange mit, dass eine Werbefläche zur Verfügung steht, um Ihnen für Sie personalisierte Werbung anzuzeigen. Die Criteo-Technologie entscheidet dann anhand der Vorgaben der mit uns zusammenarbeitenden Werbetreibenden möglicherweise, diese Werbefläche zu kaufen.
Die Werbung, die Sie von unseren Partnern sehen, wird durch unsere Technologie generiert und basiert auf unseren Empfehlungsalgorithmen.
Ein praktisches Beispiel
Dies ist ein Beispiel dafür, wie unsere Technologie es möglich macht, Ihnen genau die Ads anzuzeigen, die für Sie relevant sein könnten:
Wenn Benutzer die Website eines Werbetreibenden aufrufen, auf der unsere Technologie eingesetzt wird, erfassen wir Daten zu den entsprechenden Browsing-Events.
Beispiel für von Criteo gesammelte Daten:
Der Benutzer mit der Cookie-ID 123f94d8-a745-4f8b-a1d0-bf6fbbd60058 (kurz und bequem einfach „Criteo ID 123“) hat sich am 1.1.2018 um 13:37 Uhr Produkt A angesehen, während er die Webseite www.beispiel-werbetreibender.de besuchte.
Unsere Technologie vergleicht nun diese Daten mit den aggregierten Daten, die die Website des Werbetreibenden bereitgestellt hat.
Beispiel für solche aggregierten Daten:
Im Allgemeinen haben Benutzer, die Produkt A auf www.beispiel-werbetreibender.de gekauft haben, auch Produkt B auf dieser Website gekauft.
Außerdem ist das Produkt C auf dieser Website besonders beliebt.
Wenn die Benutzer anschließend eine Publisher-Website besuchen, werden wir über die Verfügbarkeit dortiger Werbeflächen informiert.
Beispiel für von Criteo gesammelte Daten:
Der Benutzer mit der Criteo-ID 123 befindet sich gerade auf der Website. Dort steht eine Werbefläche mit den folgenden Merkmalen (Größe, Sichtbarkeit, usw.) zur Verfügung.
Unsere Algorithmen bestimmen dann, wie wichtig und erfolgversprechend es ist, diese Werbefläche für eine personalisierte Ad zu kaufen.
Beispiel für die von Criteo getroffene Entscheidung: Kauf der auf www.example-publisher.com verfügbaren Werbefläche, um darauf eine Ad mit den folgenden Produkten auszuliefern:
Produkt A, weil der Benutzer mit der Criteo-ID 123 während einer kürzlich stattgefundenen Session Interesse daran gezeigt hat.
Produkt B: Daran ist der Benutzer mit der Criteo-ID 123 möglicherweise gleichfalls interessiert, da er sich bei einer kürzlich stattgefundenen Session für Produkt A angesehen hat.
Produkt C, weil dieses Produkt beliebt ist.
Wenn Sie die Criteo-Services deaktivieren, erhalten Sie keine personalisierten Ads von uns. Die Werbefläche wird jedoch möglicherweise von einem anderen Unternehmen gekauft, um Ihnen personalisierte oder nicht personalisierte Werbung anzuzeigen. Wenn Sie die Criteo-Services deaktivieren möchten,
klicken Sie hier
.
Bitte beachten Sie: Die Nutzung unserer Technologien auf den Websites und in den mobilen Apps unserer Partner wird durch deren Datenschutzrichtlinien geregelt. Auf diese Datenschutzrichtlinien können Sie direkt auf den entsprechenden Websites oder in den entsprechenden mobilen Apps zugreifen. Wir verlangen von unseren Partnern, dass sie Ihnen vollständige und angemessene Informationen zur Verfügung stellen und,  im Rahmen der gesetzlichen Vorgaben Ihre Zustimmung einholen, bevor uns Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zugänglich gemacht werden.
In den folgenden Umgebungen arbeiten unsere Technologien in ähnlicher Weise:
Auf einer Website nutzen wir Cookies. Diese Technologie wird von den meisten Webbrowsern unterstützt.
In einer App nutzen wir mobile Werbe-IDs, die uns die Anbieter von Betriebssystemen für mobile Endgeräte (zum Beispiel Google oder Apple) zur Verfügung stellen.
Auf einem Browser wie Safari, dessen Standardeinstellungen die Verwendung von Cookies von Drittanbietern und Website-übergreifendes Tracking einschränken, benötigen wir zum parallelen Einsatz unserer Technologien Ihre explizite Zustimmung.
Unsere Technologien arbeiten auch auf transversale Weise zwischen den verschiedenen oben aufgeführten Umgebungen. Hier finden Sie weitere Informationen dazu,
wie unsere Dienstleistungen beim Übergang von einer Umgebung zur anderen arbeiten („geräteübergreifende Verknüpfung“)
.
Um Ihnen Werbung zu zeigen, die besser auf Ihre Interessen zugeschnitten ist, nutzen und verarbeiten wir möglicherweise Zielgruppen- und Segment-Informationen, die wir aus Daten gewinnen, die Sie vertrauenswürdigen Drittparteien zur Verfügung gestellt haben, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten. Diese Partner senden uns möglicherweise Informationen über Ihre Einkaufsgewohnheiten (z. B. Interesse an Kleidung, Möbeln oder Elektronik), interessante Orte in Ihrer Umgebung (zum Beispiel Geschäfte in Ihrer Nähe) basierend auf ungefähren geographischen Standort-Informationen, oder die Produkte, die Sie in einer Filiale eines Werbetreibenden gekauft haben, der unsere Services für sein Online-Marketing einsetzt. In diesem Fall verarbeitet Criteo nur solche geographischen Standort-Informationen und Identifizierungsmerkmale (wie Cookie-IDs und IDs für mobile Werbung), über die wir Sie nicht persönlich identifizieren können.
Wir glauben, dass personalisierte Werbung für Sie und das Ökosystem des Internets vorteilhaft ist: Solche Werbung fördert ein freies und offenes Internet, indem sie es Publishern ermöglicht, die von ihnen erstellten Inhalte zu monetarisieren. Gleichzeitig profitieren Sie von Werbung, die für Sie wahrscheinlich interessanter ist als die Ihnen sonst angezeigten nicht personalisierten Ads.
Unsere Grundprinzipien für den Datenschutz
Bei der Entwicklung und beim Einsatz unserer Services und Technologien legen wir großen Wert darauf, Ihre Privatsphäre und Ihre Daten zu schützen.
Datensparsamkeit
Wir verpflichten uns, niemals Daten zu verwenden, die es uns ermöglichen, Sie direkt zu identifizieren, z.B. Ihren Vor- und Nachnamen, Ihre Postanschrift, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse im Klartext usw. Unsere Technologien sind auch ohne solch eine persönliche Identifizierung in der Lage, Ihre Geräte und/oder Browser anhand einer aus einer Reihe von Zeichen bestehenden Kennung (zum Beispiel in einem Cookie oder in einer anderen Form von ID) wiederzuerkennen. Diese Daten werden jedoch durch europäische Bestimmungen und durch kalifornisches Recht als personenbezogene Daten qualifiziert. Nicht nur deshalb betreiben wir einen großen Aufwand, um diese Daten zu schützen und Ihre Privatsphäre zu respektieren.
Privacy by Design – Datenschutz von Anfang an
Unsere Produktteams entwickeln jede Funktion unter Berücksichtigung des Datenschutzes. Dies ist der Eckpfeiler von Privacy by Design und gehört zur langjährigen Praxis von Criteo. Das entspricht auch unserem Engagement für die Gewährleistung eines branchenführenden Niveaus von Datenschutz und Sicherheit für Konsumenten und Werbetreibende.
Zu den Schlüsselelementen gehören:
Wie von der DSGVO gefordert, haben wir bereits 2013 einen Datenschutzbeauftragten ernannt. Zudem beschäftigen wir ein Team von Datenschutzexperten.
Diese Experten sind in alle Prozesse der Produktgestaltung sowie von Forschung und Entwicklung involviert. Sie führen fortlaufend Folgenabschätzungen im Bereich Datenschutz durch, um potenzielle Risiken während des Produktlebenszyklus zu identifizieren und proaktiv zu mindern.
Das Datenschutzteam führt unternehmensweite Datenschutzschulungen durch, implementiert Verhaltenskodizes und trägt einen wesentlichen Teil der Verantwortung dafür, dass wir branchenführende Produkte und Services entwickeln.
Wir überprüfen und dokumentieren regelmäßig unsere internen Vorschriften, ändern gegebenenfalls bestehende Datenschutzrichtlinien und setzen diese Richtlinien auch bei unseren Partnern und Zulieferern durch.
Die Selbstverpflichtung von Criteo
Für unsere Werbung ist es nicht erforderlich:
Daten zu erfassen, durch die wir Sie direkt identifizieren können, z. B. Ihren Vor- und Nachnamen, Ihre Postadresse oder Ihre E-Mail-Adresse in Klartext usw.
Sensible Informationen zu erfassen (etwa zu Religion, politischer Meinung, Gesundheit oder sexueller Orientierung) und als Basis für die Segmentierung und das Erstellen von personalisierten Ads zu nutzen. Auf den Websites eines Publishers, die möglicherweise sensible Informationen (z. B. eine medizinische Website) offenlegen könnten, erfassen wir möglicherweise die URL einer Website oder den Namen der mobilen App. Dies dient dem alleinigen Zweck der Bereitstellung von Werbeanzeigen.
Nicht änderbare IDs zu erfassen, wie Hardware-Kennungen der Geräte, die Sie verwenden (UDID- oder MAC-Adresse usw.)
Präzise Daten zu Ihrem geographischen Standort in Echtzeit zu erfassen.
Criteo unterstützt Brancheninitiativen für mehr Transparenz bei personalisierter Werbung
Schon seit Langem engagiert sich Criteo in Initiativen, die mehr Transparenz und Nutzerkontrolle bei der personalisierten Werbung fördern:
Digital Advertising Alliance
Criteo befolgt die
Selbstregulierungsgrundsätze der Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) für verhaltensorientierte Internetwerbung
und ist auch in
die Abmelde-Plattform „YourAdChoices“ der DAA
integriert. Diese Plattform bietet Ihnen die Möglichkeit, Ihre Entscheidungen hinsichtlich Online-Werbung an alle teilnehmenden Unternehmen zu kommunizieren. Dazu gehört auch das Deaktivieren der entsprechenden Services.
European Digital Advertising Alliance
Criteo erfüllt die
Selbstregulierungsprinzipien der Europäischen Allianz für digitale Werbung (EDAA)
. Criteo Dynamic Retargeting wurde von der EDAA unabhängig für den Datenschutz zertifiziert.
Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada
Criteo befolgt die
Selbstregulierungsgrundsätze der Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)
und ist auf der
Abmelde-Plattform „YourOnlineChoices“ von DAAC
vertreten. Diese Plattform bietet Ihnen die Möglichkeit, Ihre Entscheidungen hinsichtlich Online-Werbung an alle teilnehmenden Unternehmen zu kommunizieren. Dazu gehört auch das Deaktivieren der entsprechenden Services.
Network Advertising Initiative
Criteo befolgt die
Verhaltenskodizes der Network Advertising Initiative (NAI)
und ist auf der
Abmelde-Plattform der NAI
vertreten, die Ihnen die Möglichkeit bietet, Ihre Entscheidungen bezüglich Online-Werbung gegenüber allen teilnehmenden Unternehmen zu äußern. Dazu gehört auch das Deaktivieren der entsprechenden Services.
IAB Europe
Criteo ist Mitglied des
IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework
und hält sich an dessen Spezifikationen und Richtlinien. Die Identifikationsnummer von Criteo in dieser Organisation ist 91.
Criteo stellt hohe Anforderungen an seine Werbe- und Publisher-Partner
Wir verpflichten die Werbetreibenden und Publisher, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten, per Vertrag zur Einhaltung der
Criteo-Werberichtlinien
, unserer
Richtlinien für Publisher und Partner
sowie der jeweils gültigen Gesetze und Vorschriften zum Schutz personenbezogener Daten, insbesondere der DSGVO.
Mit dem Einsatz der Criteo-Services verpflichten sie sich, sofern die geltenden Vorschriften dies erfordern:
Auf ihren Websites und in ihren mobilen Apps entsprechende Hinweise und Informationen bereitzustellen, die es Nutzern ermöglichen, mehr über unsere Dienste zu erfahren und ihnen zu widersprechen.
Vor dem Platzieren von Cookies oder dem Einsatz ähnlicher Technologien die Einwilligung der Benutzer zum Zwecke der Anzeige personalisierter Werbung einzuholen.
Um unseren Partnern dabei zu helfen, ihre rechtlichen und vertraglichen Verpflichtungen zu erfüllen, informieren wir sie regelmäßig über die Best Practices unserer Branche.
Ihre Daten, Ihre Entscheidung
Weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten in Bezug auf Ihre persönlichen Daten finden Sie hier.
Hier erhalten Sie Informationen dazu, wie wir Ihre Daten verwenden.
Criteo-Services deaktivieren
.
Kontakt zu Criteo
Änderungen unserer Datenschutzrichtlinie
Bitte beachten Sie, dass wir unsere Datenschutzrichtlinie nach Bedarf und Anforderungen aktualisieren oder ändern. Wenn wir diese Datenschutzrichtlinie überarbeiten, informieren wir Sie darüber auf dieser Seite oder auf anderen angemessenen Wegen. So sind Sie stets aktuell darüber informiert, welche Daten wir erfassen, wie wir diese nutzen und unter welchen Umständen wir sie gegebenenfalls offenlegen. Bei wesentlichen Änderungen informieren wir Sie durch eine Mitteilung auf dieser Website, bevor die Änderungen wirksam werden.
Zuletzt aktualisiert: 3.11.2022
Datenschutz-Präferenz-Center
Wenn Sie eine Website besuchen, kann diese Informationen über Ihren Browser abrufen oder speichern. Dies geschieht meist in Form von Cookies. Hierbei kann es sich um Informationen über Sie, Ihre Einstellungen oder Ihr Gerät handeln. Meist werden die Informationen verwendet, um die erwartungsgemäße Funktion der Website zu gewährleisten. Durch diese Informationen werden Sie normalerweise nicht direkt identifiziert. Dadurch kann Ihnen aber ein personalisierteres Web-Erlebnis geboten werden. Da wir Ihr Recht auf Datenschutz respektieren, können Sie sich entscheiden, bestimmte Arten von Cookies nicht zulassen. Klicken Sie auf die verschiedenen Kategorieüberschriften, um mehr zu erfahren und unsere Standardeinstellungen zu ändern. Die Blockierung bestimmter Arten von Cookies kann jedoch zu einer beeinträchtigten Erfahrung mit der von uns zur Verfügung gestellten Website und Dienste führen.
Weitere Informationen
Alle zulassen
Einwilligungspräferenzen verwalten
Immer aktiv
Diese Cookies sind zur Funktion der Website erforderlich und können in Ihren Systemen nicht deaktiviert werden. In der Regel werden diese Cookies nur als Reaktion auf von Ihnen getätigte Aktionen gesetzt, die einer Dienstanforderung entsprechen, wie etwa dem Festlegen Ihrer Datenschutzeinstellungen, dem Anmelden oder dem Ausfüllen von Formularen. Sie können Ihren Browser so einstellen, dass diese Cookies blockiert oder Sie über diese Cookies benachrichtigt werden. Einige Bereiche der Website funktionieren dann aber nicht. Diese Cookies speichern keine personenbezogenen Daten.
Cookie-Details‎
Analytics
Diese Cookies ermöglichen es uns, Besuche und Verkehrsquellen zu zählen, damit wir die Leistung unserer Website messen und verbessern können. Sie unterstützen uns bei der Beantwortung der Fragen, welche Seiten am beliebtesten sind, welche am wenigsten genutzt werden und wie sich Besucher auf der Website bewegen. Alle von diesen Cookies erfassten Informationen werden aggregiert und sind deshalb anonym. Wenn Sie diese Cookies nicht zulassen, können wir nicht wissen, wann Sie unsere Website besucht haben.
Cookie-Details‎
Präferenzen
Mit diesen Cookies ist die Website in der Lage, erweiterte Funktionalität und Personalisierung bereitzustellen. Sie können von uns oder von Drittanbietern gesetzt werden, deren Dienste wir auf unseren Seiten verwenden. Wenn Sie diese Cookies nicht zulassen, funktionieren einige oder alle dieser Dienste möglicherweise nicht einwandfrei.
Cookie-Details‎
Marketing
Diese Cookies können über unsere Website von unseren Werbepartnern gesetzt werden. Sie können von diesen Unternehmen verwendet werden, um ein Profil Ihrer Interessen zu erstellen und Ihnen relevante Anzeigen auf anderen Websites zu zeigen. Sie speichern nicht direkt personenbezogene Daten, basieren jedoch auf einer einzigartigen Identifizierung Ihres Browsers und Internet-Geräts. Wenn Sie diese Cookies nicht zulassen, werden Sie weniger gezielte Werbung erleben.
Cookie-Details‎
Back Button
Performance Cookies
Vendor Search
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
33Across
host description
View Cookies
Name
cookie name
Wenn Sie auf „Alle Cookies akzeptieren“ klicken, stimmen Sie der Speicherung von Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät zu, um die Websitenavigation zu verbessern, die Websitenutzung zu analysieren und unsere Marketingbemühungen zu unterstützen.
Datenschutzrichtlinie.
Cookie-Einstellungen
Alle ablehnen
Alle Cookies akzeptieren
Sub-policy 15
https://www.outbrain.com/de/legal/privacy:
Error
All Contracts
Amplify Terms
Engage Terms
Privacy Policy
Amplify Terms
Cookies
Amplify Terms
Engage Terms
Engage Terms
Impressum & Nutzungsbedingungen
Outbrain Terms of Use
Gambling Terms
Gambling Terms (United Kingdom Only)
LiveRamp Terms
Engage Data Sharing Agreement
Outbrain Gambling Chart
Security
Hotel Terms (Lanyon)
Amplify API Terms of Use
Data Processing Agreement
Data Processing Agreement
Data Processing Agreement
CCPA Glossary Terms
Header Bidding Terms (EU)
Header Bidding Terms (Inc.)
Outbrain Trusted Partners
Amplify Data Sharing Agreement
Purchase Order Terms
Vendor Code of Conduct
Header Bidding Terms (JP)
Marketing Data Sharing Addendum
Amplify Terms
SSP Data Sharing Agreement
Programmatic Access Terms (OPA)
Supply Side Platform Agreement
Supply Side Platform Agreement - EU
EU Programmatic Access Terms (OPA)
Keystone Agreement
Keystone Agreement - EU
Digital Services Act
New Terms
Newer Terms
OPA Data Sharing Agreement
Engage Terms
OB UK Engage Master Services Agreement
OB. Inc Engage Master Services Agreement
Supply Side Platform Terms
OB Code On Page Terms
OB Video Terms
OB Header Bidding Terms
Engage - Code On Page Terms
Engage - Supply Side Platform Terms
Engage - Header Bidding Terms
Engage - Video Terms
Engage - Outbrain UK -- MSA Terms
Engage - OB.Inc -- MSA Terms
Engage - Code on Page (JP)
Engage - MSA Terms (JP)
Engage - Header Bidding Terms (JP)
Engage - SSP Terms (JP)
Engage - Video Terms(JP)
Engage Terms
Amplify Terms
Terms of Use
Effective January 18th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Effective Date: December 17, 2024
The Amplify Terms vary according to the country where your billing address is located. Please use your billing country below to view the applicable Amplify Terms.
My billing address is located in:
United States of America
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua & Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bonaire
Bosnia & Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Ter
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Canary Islands
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Channel Islands
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos Island
Colombia
Comoros
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Ter
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Great Britain
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guyana
Haiti
Hawaii
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Korea South
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lesotho
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malaysia
Malawi
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Midway Islands
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Nambia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherland Antilles
Netherlands (Holland, Europe)
Nevis
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau Island
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Island
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Republic of Montenegro
Republic of Serbia
Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
St Barthelemy
St Eustatius
St Helena
St Kitts-Nevis
St Lucia
St Maarten
St Pierre & Miquelon
St Vincent & Grenadines
Saipan
Samoa
Samoa American
San Marino
Sao Tome & Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
South Africa
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Tahiti
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad & Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks & Caicos Is
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City State
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands (Brit)
Virgin Islands (USA)
Wake Island
Wallis & Futana Is
Yemen
Zaire
Zambia
These terms were last revised and are current as of the effective date set forth above. Outbrain reserves the right to change these terms from time to time.
Amplify Terms and Conditions
These Amplify Terms and Conditions (“
Terms
”) are entered into by
Outbrain Inc.
(“
Outbrain
”) and the entity executing an Insertion Order or using the Outbrain dashboard (“
Customer
”). These Terms govern Customer’s use of the Service (as defined below), and together with an Insertion Order (or the information entered through the Outbrain dashboard (“
Dashboard
”)) comprise the "
Agreement
" between Outbrain and Customer. If there is any inconsistency between: (i) the terms of a signed Insertion Order or those entered through the Dashboard (either “
Campaign Details
”), and (ii) these Terms, the Campaign Details, as applicable, shall prevail.
1.          Services
1.1       Outbrain partners with a network of online properties (the “
Network
”) to display a user interface containing links that navigate to websites. Outbrain uses its proprietary algorithms, serving methodology, and advanced buying tools to deliver ads on behalf of clients to relevant audiences throughout the Network (the “
Service
”).
1.2       Outbrain shall display links to graphical, textual, video and/or auditory content selected by Customer on the Network. Such links, together with the headlines, images, and/or video that may accompany the links and the destination page reached from any such link are the “
Content
.” Outbrain shall continue to distribute the Content on the Network until the earlier of: (i) the end date of Customer’s campaign; (ii) reaching of Customer’s budget; or (iii) the disabling of a campaign (provided that Outbrain reserves the right to charge for additional Actions (as defined in Section 5.1) as the Content is removed from circulation – see
FAQs
for more details).
1.3       Outbrain does not guarantee: (i) the placement, positioning or the timing of delivery of any Content; (ii) clicks or impressions (including clicks from a particular audience segment); and/or (iii) conversions. If Fees (as defined in Section 5) do not reach Customer’s budget, Customer's sole remedies shall be to: (i) subject to Section 2 below, extend the end date of the applicable campaign, (ii) replace or add to the existing Content with other Content; or (iii) to pay only for accrued Fees. In no event shall Outbrain be liable for failure to deliver clicks, impressions and/or views  to Content.
1.4       Outbrain will make reports available to Customer regarding the campaign(s). The final monthly reports (which may differ from the daily reports) will provide the conclusive basis for Outbrain's calculation of Fees owed by Customer. Customer may submit its own Outbrain-compatible tracker. If there is a ten percent (10%) discrepancy or more between Customer's numbers and Outbrain's numbers, then the parties agree to work in good faith to identify the correct amount to be paid to Outbrain. If the discrepancy is less than ten percent (10%), Outbrain's numbers shall be conclusive.
2.          Content
2.1       Customer is solely responsible for the Content. Customer has the right to and authorizes Outbrain to place the Content on the Network. Customer is authorized to use and/or has approved all images and words of the Content’s headline (whether created or generated by Customer or on Customer’s behalf). Content headlines and images must accurately reflect the tone and subject matter of the Content. To the extent Outbrain (and/or integrated tools) provide recommendations as to the Content, headlines and/or campaign, Customer remains solely responsible.
2.2 Customer shall not, directly or indirectly, provide Content that: (i) is obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous, pornographic, violent, profane, indecent or unlawful; (ii) is factually inaccurate, misleading or deceptive; and/or (iii) facilitates or promotes any type of illegal activity, including without limitation pyramid schemes, gambling, the sale or use of illicit drugs, or discrimination or harassment of any individual or group. Further, Content may not (a) redirect to a destination other than as originally submitted to the Service, and/or (b) be substantively different from the Content originally submitted to Outbrain.
2.3  Content must comply with Outbrain's
Advertising Guidelines
, as may be updated from time to time by Outbrain. Outbrain may at any time (at its sole discretion) reject or remove Content.
2.4 Customer acknowledges and agrees that certain Content may change during the course of a campaign (e.g., due to revisions by the Content's author, comments from readers, or otherwise). Customer's recourse in the event of such change shall be to direct Outbrain to remove such Content from its then-current campaign and/or select other Content. Customer further acknowledges that, if there is an objection to the Content (whether from the Content author or publisher, or otherwise), Outbrain will act in accordance with Section 2 of its
Terms of Use
and may cease (at its sole discretion) including the Content in the Service or require Customer to make changes to the Content.
2.5       Both parties shall implement anti-malware scanning processes of the Content. Upon notice, both parties shall take immediate action to remove any suspicious Content from the Network.
3.          Term and Cancellation
The Campaign Details will set forth the start and end date of a particular campaign. However, the Agreement, or an individual campaign may be suspended or terminated: (i) by Customer for any reason upon two (2) business days' written notice to Outbrain or within twelve (12) hours through the Dashboard, or (ii) by Outbrain for any reason upon two (2) days’ written notice to Customer. During the notice period, all previously contracted campaigns shall continue to run pursuant to the Campaign Details and Customer shall be responsible for paying Outbrain for all Fees accrued up to and including the last day of such notice period. Outbrain also reserves the right at its sole discretion to immediately suspend or terminate all or part of Customer's use of the Service if Outbrain reasonably believes Customer is in breach of the terms of this Agreement.
4.          Campaign Details
If Customer utilizes Outbrain’s Dashboard, Customer will have access to certain online reports and control over its campaign(s). To the extent Customer registers and has access to the Dashboard, Outbrain may collect certain personal data of Customer. For further information on how we may collect and use our business partner's personally identifiable information, please see our Business Partner Privacy Policy. Outbrain collects and processes this personal data in order to respond to Customer questions or requests, provide Customer with access to certain services, verify Customer’s identity and communicate with Customer about the use of the Service. Customer is solely responsible for all changes requested or approved (either directly or via Outbrain's API), including those made through the Dashboard using its login. Customer is solely responsible for protecting its login and password to the Dashboard. Customer can manage campaigns using the Dashboard by modifying the Campaign Details, and/or Customer may have the option of working with an Outbrain account manager, as determined by Outbrain.
5.          Fees and Payment Terms
5.1       Ads displayed on the Network are paid for via one of following payment methods: (i) cost-per-click (“
CPC
”); (ii) cost-per thousand impressions (“
CPM
”); (iii) cost-per-completed view (“
CPCv
”) where completed view means fifty percent (50%) of the video Ad/Content is in view continuously from beginning to the end of video; (iv) cost-per thousand Viewable Impressions (“
vCPM
”); and/or (v) other desired actions agreed between the parties from time to time (each, an “
Action
”). A viewable impression is counted as viewable if fifty percent (50%) of the video ad is in view continuously for 2 seconds. Outbrain fees will be based on the number of Actions, plus the cost of the Service (the “
Fees
”), which will not exceed Customer’s pre-designated maximum budget. Customer shall pay Outbrain the Fees as measured by Outbrain's tracking system up to the maximum budget designated in the Campaign Details. Outbrain may charge any applicable national, state, or local sales or use taxes, value added taxes or country-specific fees that Outbrain is legally obligated to charge. If CPC is being used for campaign measurement, such CPC may not be less than Outbrain’s then-in-effect minimum CPC (which may vary by market). If Customer is utilizing Outbrain’s automatic bidding feature, Customer grants Outbrain the right to set and modify Customer’s CPC at Outbrain’s discretion to aid in achieving Customer’s targets for its campaign. Customer shall be solely responsible for any additional fees incurred for utilizing third party services on its campaign(s). For the avoidance of doubt, Outbrain will not cover, credit or reimburse any third party fees, including, but not limited to, use of any third-party tracker(s) on Customer’s campaign(s). Customer may increase or decrease its budget through the Dashboard or through a signed amendment to an Insertion Order.
5.2        If Customer has signed an Insertion Order, Fees will generally be invoiced by Outbrain to Customer by the end of the following calendar month unless otherwise set forth in an Insertion Order. Customer shall pay all invoices within thirty (30) days from receipt. Any portion of a charge not disputed (pursuant to Section 5.3) in good faith must be paid in full. If Customer has provided the Campaign Details through the Dashboard or has signed an Insertion Order and has used a credit card for billing purposes, Outbrain shall charge the Outbrain fees (including processing fees) to Customer’s credit card at such intervals as Outbrain determines in its sole discretion. The decision as to whether to allow Customer to choose between invoice and credit card, and/or require a prepayment prior to the start of a campaign) rests solely with Outbrain. Outbrain shall review all billing inquiries, including refund requests, on a case-by-case basis and reserves the right to approve or deny any request in its sole discretion.
5.3        If Customer disputes any amount on an invoice, Customer must provide written notice to Outbrain (email is sufficient) within thirty (30) days of receipt of any invoice or the right to dispute shall be deemed waived. Customer’s email must include the amount disputed and provide adequate information to support any such claim. Customer may not withhold payment for any undisputed amounts, and any portion of a charge not disputed in good faith must be paid in full.
5.4        If payment is not made when due and not properly disputed pursuant to Section 5.3, Outbrain may charge interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum from the due date until the date of actual payment, whether before or after judgment. Outbrain also reserves the right to suspend or terminate any or all of Customer's use of the Service until Customer has paid all amounts due. Outbrain reserves the right to charge Customer for all costs of collection, including collection agency and reasonable legal fees and court costs. Customer authorizes Outbrain to investigate Customer's credit record. If applicable, Customer agrees to provide such further financial information and documentation as may be required from time to time by Outbrain as a condition for the continued extension of credit. Customer acknowledges and agrees that any account, credit card and related billing and payment information which Customer provides to Outbrain may be shared by Outbrain with companies who work on Outbrain's behalf solely for the purpose of performing credit checks, effecting payment to Outbrain, collecting debts owed to Outbrain and/or servicing Customer's account. Outbrain may, in its sole discretion, extend, revise or revoke credit at any time. In addition, Outbrain reserves the right to require immediate payment of any outstanding balance that exceeds Customer’s credit limit and/or past the payment terms defined in this Agreement.
6.          Additional Features and Terms
6.1       Outbrain may also make additional Service features available to Customer from time to time and use of such features may be subject to Customer’s agreement to certain additional terms and conditions (“
Additional Terms
”) (e.g., via an online click-through agreement or via the Dashboard). Such features will be provided at Outbrain’s discretion to Customer and may include fees in addition to those described in Section 5.1. Customer’s acceptance of the Additional Terms will constitute a binding and enforceable agreement as between Outbrain and Customer. In the event of any inconsistency between these Terms, the Additional Terms, and the Campaign Details, the order of precedence is: (i) Additional Terms, (ii) Campaign Details, and (iii) these Terms. Customers who choose to utilize LiveRamp services (via the Outbrain Dashboard or otherwise) for purposes of their Outbrain campaign(s) are subject to
LiveRamp Terms.
6.2       Subject to Customer’s compliance with Section 9 below, Customer may place on Customer’s website, application pages or landing pages: (i) Outbrain pixel(s) (the “
Outbrain Pixel
”); and/or (ii) third party pixels or tags (“the “
Third Party Pixels
”) for the purpose of providing analytics related to Customer’s campaign and/or enhanced targeting functionality (the Outbrain Pixel and Third Party Pixels together are the “
Pixels
”). Customer represents and warrants that: (a) its use of the Pixels are in accordance with Data Protection Laws; and (b) it has provided appropriate notice to users regarding use of the Pixels, including an explanation: (x) that third parties, including Outbrain, may use cookies or similar technologies to collect or receive information from Customer’s website(s), and may use that information to provide measurement services and target ads; (y) as to how users opt-out of the collection of information for targeting purposes; and (z) it will not use the Pixels on websites or application pages that target minors and/or contain sensitive categories of data (e.g., physical or mental health conditions). Customer shall not use the Pixels unless and until it has complied with the provisions of this Section 6.2. Further, if an end-user has opted out of behavioral advertising via Customer’s site(s) (or a mechanism such as settings within an advertiser application), Customer shall be fully responsible for not loading the Outbrain Pixel. Outbrain may update, change, or substitute the Outbrain Pixel functionality at any time in its reasonable discretion provided that it does not disrupt the functioning of Customer’s landing page and serves the same purpose.
6.3       If Customer utilizes third party segments for enhanced targeting of its campaign(s) (“
3rd Party Targeting
”), Customer shall pay for its use of 3rd Party Targeting (“
3rd Party Data Costs
”) including any applicable taxes. Customer’s invoice for each campaign shall include both the Fees, and the 3rd Party Data Costs (if applicable). Customer agrees that 3rd Party Data costs will be based on Outbrain’s reporting metrics. If Customer utilizes 3rd Party Targeting, Customer shall: (x) disclose this to users via an appropriate notice and/or in its privacy policy (as applicable); and (y) represent and warrant that its use of 3rd Party Targeting shall, at all times, be compliant with Data Protection Laws and satisfy the requirements for an appropriate legal basis for processing. Customer shall not, at any time, use 3rd Party Targeting: (i) for discriminatory purposes; (ii) to target minors under the age of sixteen (16); (iii) based on Special Categories of Personal Data; (iv) based on Personal Data relating to alleged or confirmed criminal convictions or offenses; and/or (v) otherwise in violation of any applicable law in any country where the campaign is performed.
7.         Confidentiality
7.1       Each party agrees that with respect to any Confidential Information (as defined below) that is disclosed by one party to the other in connection with the Agreement, the party receiving such Confidential Information shall not disclose such Confidential Information to any third party, or use it for any purpose, except in connection with its rights and obligations under the Agreement. "
Confidential Information
" means all information concerning a party or any of its subsidiaries or affiliates that is not generally known to the public, which information is marked confidential or proprietary, or which under the circumstances ought reasonably to be treated as confidential or proprietary, and includes, without limitation, the terms of the Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information does not include information that: (i) is, as of the time of disclosure, or thereafter becomes, part of the public domain through a source other than the receiving party; (ii) was lawfully in the possession of the receiving party as of the time of disclosure; (iii) is independently developed by the receiving party without reference to the Confidential Information; or (iv) is subsequently obtained from a third party not subject to an obligation of confidentiality with respect to the information disclosed.
7.2       Confidential Information shall be kept in the strictest confidence and shall be protected by all reasonable and necessary security measures. Confidential Information shall not be released by the receiving party to anyone except an employee or agent, who has a need to know the same, and who is bound by confidentiality obligations at least as restrictive as these contained herein. Neither party will use any portion of Confidential Information provided by the other party pursuant to the Agreement for any purpose other than as expressly set forth under the Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, either party may disclose Confidential Information strictly necessary to comply with the demands of any court order, law or governmental agency and Outbrain may share Confidential Information of Customer with any holding company of Customer or with any subsidiary company of Customer’s holding company.
7.3       If Customer is acting on behalf of a Content provider, Customer authorizes Outbrain to grant such Content provider (or any subsequent third party appointed by the Content provider) access to and a right to use the Campaign Details.
8.          Representations and Warranties
8.1       Each party represents and warrants to the other party that: (i) it has all necessary rights and authority to enter into the Agreement and grant the rights and licenses under the Agreement; (ii) it shall comply with Applicable Laws; and (iii) the execution or acceptance of the Agreement (which includes the Campaign Details), and the performance of its respective obligations and duties pursuant to the Agreement, do not and will not violate any agreement to which such party is bound. “
Applicable Laws
” means any applicable federal, national, state or foreign laws or regulations or any industry self-regulatory rules or guidelines (including the Interactive Advertising Bureau Guidelines, Standards & Best Practices, the NAI Code of Conduct, the DAA Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising. Any Applicable Laws related to the privacy of personal data are referred to as “
D
ata Protection Laws
.”
8.2       Customer represents and warrants that: (i) the Content (which for the avoidance of doubt, includes the headline, images, videos, and landing pages) does not violate any Applicable Laws and will not contain any material which may be harmful, abusive, obscene, threatening or defamatory; (ii) it has all necessary rights, licenses, and clearances to grant the rights granted herein, including for Outbrain to use, host, cache, route, store, copy, modify, distribute, reformat, reproduce, publish, display, transmit and distribute the Content; (iii) the Content will not infringe any intellectual property rights of any third party; (iv) it will not provide Content that is targeted to children under the age of sixteen (16); (v) Content complies with Outbrain's
Advertising Guidelines
, as may be updated from time to time by Outbrain; (vi) Content shall not (a) redirect to a destination other than as originally submitted to the Service, and/or (b) be substantively different from the Content originally submitted to the Service; (vii) it will not use the Service in a manner that provides an unintended advantage or interferes with the integrity and/or overall performance of the Service; (viii) if using the Dashboard, Customer will adhere to any rules of such use as solely determined by Outbrain (e.g., not using source bidding to whitelist any particular Network source); (ix) it is not subject to, nor owned or controlled by any person that is subject to, sanctions or export control restrictions imposed pursuant to U.S. law or the laws of any other jurisdiction applicable to the performance of the agreement nor will it  not take any action that could result in economic sanctions or other trade control restrictions or penalties being imposed on Outbrain; and (x) all business and payment information provided to Outbrain is true, correct, and accurate.
8.3       If Customer is an agency (or other third party acting on behalf of the provider of the Content), Customer represents and warrants that: (i) it is the authorized agent of the provider of the Content; (ii) it has the legal authority to enter into the Agreement and make all decisions and take all actions relating to the provider of the Content; and (iii) it has entered into a written agreement granting the agent the authority to represent the provider of the Content in accordance with (i) and (ii) above (and shall submit such agreement to Outbrain on demand). Customer further agrees that it is not acting on behalf of a French company or a foreign company whose advertising content mainly targets French territory exclusively through the Dashboard. If Customer is acting on behalf of a French content provider whose advertising mainly targets the French territory, please contact info@outbrain.com for more information on how to purchase Outbrain Services.
8.4       EXCEPT AS MAY BE EXPRESSLY SET FORTH IN THE AGREEMENT, OUTBRAIN MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS OR WARRANTIES, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED -- INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, TITLE, NON-INFRINGEMENT, OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, OR ANY WARRANTIES ARISING FROM A COURSE OF DEALING, USAGE OR TRADE PRACTICE -- ABOUT ITS SERVICES AND THE PERFORMANCE OR SUCCESS OF ANY CAMPAIGNS MADE BY IT ON BEHALF OF CUSTOMER, OR THAT THE SERVICE WILL OPERATE UNINTERRUPTED, SECURE OR ERROR FREE.
9.          Data Protection
The provisions of the
Data Sharing Agreement
shall be incorporated into, and form part of, this Agreement.
10.        Indemnification
10.1     Each party shall defend, indemnify and hold harmless the other party and its respective agents, affiliates, subsidiaries, directors, officers, employees, contractors, and Network partners (as applicable) against any and all third party claims resulting from the breach of such party's representations and warranties under this Agreement.
10.2     In connection with any such claim: (i) the indemnified party shall provide prompt written notice to the indemnifying party of any such claim (provided that the failure to provide such prompt notice shall not relieve the indemnifying party of its indemnification obligations in the Agreement, except to the extent it has been damaged thereby); (ii) the indemnifying party shall have sole control of the defense or settlement of the claim (provided that the indemnifying party may not enter into any settlement that may adversely affect the rights or obligations of the indemnified party without the indemnified party's prior written consent); (iii) at the indemnifying party's request and expense, the indemnified party cooperating in the investigation and defense of such claim; and (iv) the indemnified party shall have the right to participate in its defense with counsel of its own choosing at the indemnified party's expense.
11.        Limitation of Liability
EXCEPT WITH RESPECT TO CLAIMS ARISING FROM A PARTY'S INDEMNITY OBLIGATIONS, WILLFUL MISCONDUCT, A BREACH OF THE CONFIDENTIALITY AND/OR NON-PAYMENT OF FEES OWED IN THE AGREEMENT, THE MAXIMUM AGGREGATE LIABILITY OF EITHER PARTY AND ITS DIRECTORS, OFFICERS, EMPLOYEES, VENDORS, NETWORK PARTNERS OR AGENTS FOR ANY ACTION REGARDLESS OF THE FORM OF THE ACTION, WHETHER IN TORT OR CONTRACT, ARISING UNDER OR RELATED IN ANY WAY TO THE AGREEMENT OR ITS IMPLEMENTATION SHALL BE LIMITED TO THE GREATER OF: (I) THE AMOUNT OF FEES PAYABLE BY CUSTOMER UNDER THE AGREEMENT IN THE 12 MONTHS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO A CLAIM; AND (II) $50,000. IN NO EVENT SHALL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE FOR CONSEQUENTIAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE OR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES OR OTHER DAMAGES OF ANY KIND, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION, LOST DATA, LOST REVENUES OR LOST PROFITS, ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED IN ANY WAY TO THE AGREEMENT OR ITS IMPLEMENTATION, EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES.
12.        Miscellaneous
12.1     Neither Party may assign the Agreement, in whole or in part, by operation of law or otherwise, without the prior written consent of the other; provided, however that either party may assign its rights or delegate its duties under the Agreement, in whole or in part, without the other's consent, in connection with a merger, reorganization or sale of all, or substantially all, of the assignor's assets, provided that the successor entity shall have sufficient resources to fully perform the Agreement and shall assume the obligation to fully perform the Agreement.
12.2     The Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York applicable to contracts entered into and wholly to be performed therein, without regard to that body of law relating to conflict of laws. Each party hereby irrevocably and unconditionally consents to submit to the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts of the State of New York and of the United States of America, in each case located in the County of New York, for any claim arising out of or relating to the Agreement (and agrees not to commence any claim relating thereto except in such courts). The prevailing party in any action arising out of or to enforce the Agreement shall be entitled to recover its reasonable attorney's fees and costs. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event of Customer’s default of its obligations in Section 5 above, Outbrain shall have the right, if it so chooses, to commence an action against Customer for such default in the appropriate court in the venue and jurisdiction in which Customer resides or maintains assets.
12.3     No press releases or general public announcements shall be made without the mutual written consent of Customer and Outbrain. Outbrain shall have the right to include Customer’s name including, but not limited to, in Outbrain’s client list and in other marketing materials. Customer shall not use Outbrain’s name, logo or trademark without Outbrain’s prior written consent.
12.4     All notices under the Agreement will be in writing via email to the address of the receiving party set forth on the Insertion Order or Dashboard, or at such different address as may be designated by such party by written notice to the other party from time to time. Notice will be effective on receipt.
12.5     No failure of either party to enforce any of its rights under the Agreement will act as a waiver of such rights. If one (1) or more provisions of the Agreement are held to be unenforceable under Applicable Laws, then such provision(s) shall be excluded from the Agreement, and the balance of the Agreement shall be enforceable in accordance with its terms.
12.6     Neither party shall be liable for any delay or failure to perform any of its obligations set forth in the Agreement due to causes beyond its reasonable control. Neither party shall be liable for any unavailability or inoperability of the Internet, technical malfunction, or computer error or corruption resulting in loss of data or other harm. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Customer shall not be relieved from any of its obligations as to Fees due hereunder.
12.7     Sections
7, 8, 9, 10, 11
and
12,
together with any outstanding undisputed payment obligation, shall survive the termination of the Agreement.
12.8     Customer and Outbrain shall each act as independent contractors. Nothing in the Agreement shall be deemed or construed as creating a joint venture or partnership between the parties.
12.9     The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof and may not be modified without the prior written consent of both parties. In no event shall any inconsistent or conflicting terms and conditions contained in any purchase order, insertion order, invoice or other document submitted by Customer concerning the subject matter hereof have any force or effect even if accepted or signed by Outbrain.
Engage Master Services Agreement
Engage Code on Page Terms
Engage Header Bidding Terms
Engage Video Terms
Supply Side Platform Terms
Engage Data Sharing Agreement
SSP Data Sharing Agreement
Engage Terms
Effective December 17th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Standard Partner Distribution Terms
Effective 1 March 2024
The Engage Terms vary according to the country where your billing address is located. Please use your billing country below to view the applicable Engage Terms.
My billing address is located in:
United States of America
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua & Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bonaire
Bosnia & Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Ter
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Canary Islands
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Channel Islands
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos Island
Colombia
Comoros
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Ter
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Great Britain
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guyana
Haiti
Hawaii
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Korea South
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lesotho
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malaysia
Malawi
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Midway Islands
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Nambia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherland Antilles
Netherlands (Holland, Europe)
Nevis
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau Island
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Island
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Republic of Montenegro
Republic of Serbia
Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
St Barthelemy
St Eustatius
St Helena
St Kitts-Nevis
St Lucia
St Maarten
St Pierre & Miquelon
St Vincent & Grenadines
Saipan
Samoa
Samoa American
San Marino
Sao Tome & Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
South Africa
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Tahiti
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad & Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks & Caicos Is
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City State
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands (Brit)
Virgin Islands (USA)
Wake Island
Wallis & Futana Is
Yemen
Zaire
Zambia
The following Standard Partner Distribution Terms (“Terms”) govern the implementation and use of the products, services, and technology made available by Outbrain to the Partner identified in the Partner Enrollment Form.
1. CERTAIN DEFINITIONS.
1.1  “Ads.txt” means an authorized digital sellers text file. All references to Ads.txt include App-ads.txt.
1.2 "Advertiser Recs" means Recommendations (that are not Recirculation Recs) in the Outbrain network submitted by Outbrain’s advertisers.
1.3 “Application” means a self-contained software program designed to run on a mobile device including a phone or tablet.
1.4 "Content" means graphical, textual, and/or auditory content (which may include text, data, information, photos, images, graphics, audio, video or other content).
1.5 “Cards” means the formats available through the Technology where Recommendations appear.
1.6 "Data" means all data collected or generated by Outbrain through the Technology, including any reports or other data made available to Partner in connection with the Agreement.
1.7 "Destination Page" means any webpage or other online location (which may be located on a Partner Site(s) or another website or Application) that may be accessed by clicking on Recommendations.
1.8 "End Users" means individual human viewers of a web page, Application and/or platform of the Partner Sites on which the Technology is implemented.
1.9 “Intellectual Property Rights” includes any invention, discovery, concept, expression or work, whether or not patented or patentable, registered or not, including, without limitation, discoveries, compositions, know-how, procedures, technical information, processes, methods, formulas, algorithms, protocols, techniques, designs and drawings, trade dresses, any physical embodiment thereof, and any patents, copyrights, trademarks, industrial designs and utility models, (and applications or extensions therefore), domains and trade secrets or similar rights to aforementioned rights recognised in any jurisdiction now or in the future.
1.10 "Partner Sites" means the web properties, Applications or platforms identified in the Partner Enrollment Form, together with any additional properties on which Partner elects to implement the Technology upon prior written approval from Outbrain (e-mail will suffice).
1.11 "Recirculation Recs" means Recommendations (that are not Advertiser Recs) which link to Content on Partner Sites.
1.12 "Recommendations" means the display of Advertiser Recs and/or Recirculation Recs via Cards that Outbrain delivers to the viewer of a web page, Application or platform on which the Technology is implemented.
1.13 "Revenue" means net revenue generated from Advertiser Recs and charged by Outbrain for the display of such Advertiser Recs in the Outbrain network.
1.14 "Technology" means Outbrain’s Javascript, API, SDK and associated protocols that, when implemented on websites and Applications, displays the user interface managed by Outbrain’s proprietary optimization technology for serving, selecting and ordering Cards.
1.15 “Updates” means updates, modifications, or improvements to the Technology from time to time in Outbrain’s sole discretion, including, but not limited to, adding Ads.txt lines and any other similar industry standards.
1.16 "OB Generated Links” means an End User page view on a Partner Site generated from a referral link of OBNews.outbrain.com (or successor link or an additional link(s) which may be provided by Outbrain from time to time).
2. TECHNOLOGY; PLACEMENT AND APPEARANCE.
2.1 Partner shall implement the Technology (including Outbrain’s provided Ads.txt) pursuant to Outbrain’s technical instructions and any implementation guides made available by Outbrain, as revised from time to time. Outbrain, in its sole discretion, may determine which of Outbrain’s available Technology (e.g., JS, API, SDK or any other equivalent) shall be used in each Partner implementation. Implementations of the Technology must appear directly below the main Content on each page of the Partner Sites on which the Technology is installed or as otherwise mutually agreed in writing (e-mail shall suffice). Implementation must include at least one (1) link to Advertiser Recs per page unless otherwise agreed in writing.
2.2 Partner shall display the Technology throughout the Term in accordance with all self-regulatory codes and applicable laws and regulations, including with respect to disclosing the source or nature of the Recommendations. Without limiting the foregoing obligation, Partner agrees to comply with Outbrain’s reasonable instructions regarding how the Technology is to be displayed, labelled or identified.
2.3 Outbrain may make Updates from time to time. If Outbrain requests Partner to implement any such Updates, Partner shall make such Updates within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt of notice from Outbrain. If Partner can demonstrate such Updates would materially and adversely affect the performance of the Partner Sites, Outbrain may either address Partner’s concerns to its reasonable satisfaction or agree not to require Partner to implement such Updates.
2.4 During the Term, Outbrain shall be Partner's sole and exclusive provider of direct and indirect content recommendations, where “content recommendations” are one or more paid or unpaid links comprised of a headline or phrase indicating that an End User will be driven to Content (regardless of whether the Destination Page displays content, advertorials or advertisements).
2.5 Outbrain may drive End Users to Partner Sites generating additional Partner Site page views via OB Generated Links or Recirculation Recs. If an End User clicks on an Advertiser Rec from an OB Generated Link, Partner shall not be compensated for any advertising revenue generated by such page views. Any display of Recirculation Recs will require Outbrain’s prior written approval (email will suffice), which may be conditioned on a minimum Advertiser Rec implementation or other fees.
2.6 Outbrain may test changes to the Technology, including to Card ordering, format and frequency. To the extent that Partner controls any testing, Partner shall comply with such testing requests on at least a quarterly basis.
3. REVENUE & PAYMENT.
3.1 During the Term, Partner will be paid as set forth on the Partner Enrollment Form. For the avoidance of doubt, Revenue is net of, inter alia, advertiser fees, third-party data services integrated into Outbrain’s platform, invalid clicks/impressions, and advertiser and agency discounts/rebates.
3.2 Partner must promptly provide Outbrain completed and accurate tax forms and all other similar materials Outbrain requires, which may include tax form W-8BEN, W-8BEN-E or W-9 if applicable (collectively all such forms and materials, “Tax Materials”). Notwithstanding anything set forth to the contrary in this Agreement, Outbrain may (a) withhold payments owed to Partner hereunder without penalty or late fee until Outbrain has received Partner’s Tax Materials, and (b) deduct any applicable taxes payable by Outbrain from payments owed to Partner hereunder as required by law. Once Outbrain has received the Tax Materials, Outbrain will use commercially reasonable efforts to pay any amounts not paid to Partner pursuant to the foregoing subsection (a) as soon as reasonably practicable.
3.3 To ensure proper payment, Partner is responsible for notifying Outbrain in writing of accurate contact and payment information. Partner is also responsible for any charges assessed by Partner’s bank or payment provider. If the amount owed to Partner is less than US$50, then the amount owed will be accrued if and until the calendar month in which the balance of the payments due to Partner exceeds US$50. Any dispute regarding a payment from Outbrain must be submitted to Outbrain in writing within thirty (30) calendar days of postage or wire transfer date of such payment or it shall be deemed waived.
3.4 In addition to Outbrain’s other rights and remedies, Outbrain may (i) withhold and offset any payments owed to Partner under the Agreement (including in case of a material breach) against any fees Partner owes Outbrain under the Agreement or any other agreement), and/or (ii) require Partner to refund Outbrain within thirty (30) calendar days of any invoice, any amounts Outbrain may have overpaid to Partner in prior periods. If an Outbrain advertiser or client whose Advertiser Recs were displayed on any Partner Sites defaults on payment to Outbrain, for any reason, Outbrain may withhold payment or charge back Partner’s account.
4.  PRIVACY.
The provisions of the
Engage Data Sharing Agreement
shall be fully incorporated into, and form part of, this Agreement.
5. LICENSE TERMS.
5.1 During the Term and subject to Partner’s compliance with all of the terms of the Agreement, Outbrain grants Partner a limited, non-exclusive, revocable, non-sublicensable, non- transferable licence to use the Technology to display the Advertiser Recs, and to the extent permitted by Section 2.5 Recirculation Recs, on Partner Sites in the form and format provided.
5.2 Outbrain grants Partner, during the Term, a limited, worldwide, non-exclusive, royalty-free licence to use and display Outbrain’s trademarks, service marks and logos (collectively, “Outbrain Marks”), as incorporated into the Technology, strictly in accordance with Partner’s obligations and rights in the Agreement. All goodwill arising out of Partner’s use of any of the Outbrain Marks shall inure solely to the benefit of Outbrain. Outbrain shall have the right to refer to Partner and the Partner Sites in any general listing of advertisers or partners (including in marketing and sales materials) who have implemented the Technology. Notwithstanding the foregoing, each party will request prior written consent before issuing a press release regarding the Agreement or using the other party’s name on its website other than in accordance with the Agreement.
5.3 As between the parties: (a) Outbrain retains all right, title and interest in and to the Outbrain Marks, Technology and Data (excluding any Content from the Partner Sites which shall be owned by Partner), the Outbrain site at
www.outbrain.com
and the Dashboard; and (b) Partner retains all right, title and interest in and to the Partner Sites including the look and feel excluding the items described in subparagraph (a) above.
5.4 The licences granted under the Agreement are specifically set forth in the Agreement; there are no implied rights. All rights not expressly granted to Partner in the Agreement are reserved by Outbrain.
6. PROHIBITED ACTIVITY.
6.1 Partner will not: (i) edit, modify, truncate, filter, or change the order of Recommendations; (ii) obscure, modify or redirect End Users away from a Destination Page, or intersperse any Content between the Recommendations and any Destination Page; (iii) minimize, remove or otherwise inhibit the full and complete display of the Technology; (iv) artificially inflate clicks or impressions on Recommendations, or encourage or require any person to click on Recommendations using incentives or other methods and/or engage in any automated, deceptive, fraudulent, invalid, incentivized, or other methods that are designed to generate clicks which are not the willing actions of End Users; (v) remove, deface, obscure, or alter any notices of Intellectual Property Rights included in the Technology; (vi) access, reproduce or use the Technology in any manner or for any purpose other than as expressly permitted under the Agreement; (vii) modify, adapt, translate, prepare derivative works from, decompile, reverse engineer, disassemble the Technology or otherwise attempt to derive source code from the Technology, or attempt to create a substitute or similar service or product through use of or access to Technology or related proprietary information or otherwise use the Technology on behalf of or for the benefit of any third party; (viii) attempt to interfere with or disrupt the Technology or attempt to gain access to any systems or networks that connect to it other than through the Technology as implemented pursuant to the Agreement; (ix) copy, cache, distribute, display, alter, or otherwise use any Recommendations (or authorize or assist any third party to do so) except as such Recommendations are provided through the Technology; or (x) use the Technology for any purpose not authorized by Outbrain, including for any purpose that is inconsistent with the implementation guidelines as provided to Partner.
6.2 Partner will not deploy the Technology on any properties that display or contain adult, obscene, pornographic, defamatory, libelous, infringing, abusive, fake or deceptive or illegal Content, that promotes hate or discrimination, facilitates the sale of firearms or illegal drugs, or that participates or encourages participation in, illegal activities or is directed at children under of the age of 16. Outbrain reserves the right in its sole discretion to disable the Technology on any property at any time.
7.     REGISTRATION.
Partner may register for the Outbrain dashboard (the “Dashboard”) to access online reports and control certain settings for the Technology. To the extent that Partner has access to the Dashboard, Outbrain may collect Partner’s (or individuals who act on behalf of Partner) personally identifiable information associated with such Dashboard access. For further information on how we may collect and use our business partner's personally identifiable information, please see our Business Partner Privacy Policy. Partner will be solely responsible for all changes to data made by it, or individuals acting on Partner’s behalf, through the Dashboard. Estimates of Revenue paid or payable Partner displayed in the Dashboard are provided solely for the Partner’s convenience. Outbrain does not guarantee that these estimated amounts displayed, if any, shall be precise or definitively due to be paid to Partner pursuant to the Agreement. Access to Outbrain dashboard shall be solely at the discretion of Outbrain and may be discontinued by Outbrain at any time.
8. SUSPENSION OF TECHNOLOGY; TERMINATION.
8.1 Outbrain may suspend or discontinue all or any aspect of the Technology, including its availability, at any time if required by exigent circumstances (such as a significant security breach, propagation of malware, other viruses to users, etc.) or other improper, unlawful, fraudulent or misleading circumstances.
8.2 Either party may terminate the Agreement at any time in the event of a material breach by the other party of any provision of the Agreement that remains uncured for fourteen (14) days after the breaching party’s receipt of written notice of the breach.
8.3 The Agreement is terminable on fourteen (14) days prior written notice unless otherwise stated on the Partner Enrollment Form. In addition, Outbrain may terminate the Agreement if the Technology is not implemented within thirty (30) days of Outbrain providing the Technology to Partner. Upon expiration or termination of the Agreement, all rights and obligations of the parties under the Agreement will be extinguished, except that Sections 9.6, 9.7, 10, 11 and 13 of the Terms will survive termination, as well as any other terms of this Agreement which, by their nature should survive termination, and continue to bind the parties.
9.  LIMITED WARRANTIES; INDEMNITY.
9.1 Each party represents and warrants to the other that: (i) it has all right, power, and authority necessary to enter into the Agreement and perform its obligations under it; and (ii) it will comply with all applicable laws, regulations and orders in its performance of the Agreement.
9.2 Outbrain warrants that the Technology (as provided and made available by Outbrain and implemented by Partner in accordance with the Agreement) does not and will not, to the best of Outbrain's knowledge, infringe any Intellectual Property Right of any third party.
9.3 Partner represents and warrants that the Partner Sites: (i) owns or has the right to operate the Partner Site(s); (ii) will adhere to the
Outbrain Partner Guidelines
and/or to the Partner’s own guidelines which shall be substantially similar to Outbrains’; (iii) do not and will not contain any Content that is illegal or that infringes any Intellectual Property Rights of any third party; (iv) will not contain any obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous material or material that violates any person’s right of publicity, privacy or personality; and (v) do not and will not knowingly contain a misrepresentation of fact or factual inaccuracy.
9.4 Nothing in the Agreement shall be construed as a promise of any sort of minimum traffic volumes, clicks, impressions or usage or any other such commitments by Outbrain to Partner.
9.5 Except as expressly provided in the Agreement, neither party makes any representations or warranties, express or implied in relation to the Agreement, the Partner Sites, the Technology, any Content made available by Outbrain through the Technology or any other matters (including any implied terms relating to satisfactory quality or fitness for any purpose, any warranties of availability or uninterrupted or error free performance, any warranties arising out of any course of performance or dealing).
9.6 Outbrain makes no representations or warranties concerning any Content contained in or accessed via the Technology, including without limitation Advertiser Recs, and Outbrain will not be responsible or liable for the contents, accuracy, intellectual property infringement, legality or decency of Content provided through the Technology or for Partner’s reliance on any of the foregoing.
9.7 Each party (the “Indemnifying Party”) shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless the other party and its parent and affiliates, and each of its and their respective affiliates, directors, officers, shareholders, members, authorized representatives, employees and agents (collectively, the “Indemnified Party”) from and against any and all claims, losses, liabilities, damages, costs, settlements, regulatory findings and/or fines and other expenses (including reasonable legal fees) (collectively, “Claims”) that arise out of any third party claim occasioned by any breach of any of the Indemnifying Party’s representations and warranties in this Agreement. The Indemnified Party shall promptly notify the Indemnifying Party of any Claim in writing, provided, however, that any delay in providing such notice shall not relieve the Indemnifying Party of any of its obligations except to the extent that the Indemnifying Party is prejudiced by such delay. The Indemnified Party shall have the right to participate in the defense and settlement of the Claim with counsel of its own choosing and its own expense, subject to the Indemnifying Party’s control thereof.
10. CONFIDENTIALITY.
Each party (the “Receiving Party”) acknowledges that it will have access to certain information and materials, including the terms of the Agreement, concerning the business, technology, products and services of the other party (the “Disclosing Party”) that are, or reasonably should be considered given the circumstances of disclosure to be, confidential (“Confidential Information”). Confidential Information will not include: (a) information known to the Receiving Party prior to disclosure by the Disclosing Party; (b) information independently developed by the Receiving Party without reference to Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party; (c) information that is or becomes publicly known through no fault of the Receiving Party; or (d) information disclosed to the Receiving Party by a third party without breach of any obligation of confidence. Except as permitted hereunder, the Receiving Party (i) will not use any Confidential Information for its own benefit or the benefit of any third party, and (ii) will not disclose any Confidential Information to any third party other than its directors, employees, contractors, advisors, investors or potential investors who have a need to know and who have agreed not to use, and to maintain the confidentiality of, the Confidential Information consistent with this Section 10. The Receiving Party will return or destroy the Confidential Information promptly upon the Disclosing Party’s written request. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Receiving Party may disclose Confidential Information to the extent required by applicable law or legal process, provided that the Receiving Party provides prompt written notice of any required disclosure to the Disclosing Party and provides reasonable cooperation (at the Disclosing Party’s expense) with any effort by the Disclosing Party to contest or limit the scope of such disclosure.
11. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY.
11.1 Neither Outbrain nor the Partner exclude or limit liability to the other for: (i) death or personal injury caused by its negligence or that of its employees or contractors; (ii) fraud or fraudulent misrepresentation; or (iii) any other liability which cannot lawfully be excluded or limited.
11.2 SUBJECT ALWAYS TO SECTION 11.1, NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE FOR ANY SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE AGREEMENT OR ANY BREACH HEREOF (INCLUDING FOR LOSS OF DATA OR COST OF COVER), WHETHER OR NOT SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES, AND WHETHER UNDER A THEORY OF CONTRACT, TORT (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE) OR OTHERWISE.
11.3 SUBJECT ALWAYS TO SECTION 11.1 AND EXCEPT FOR LIABILITIES ARISING OUT OF A PARTY’S VIOLATION, MISAPPROPRIATION OR INFRINGEMENT OF A PARTY’S INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS,IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S AGGREGATE LIABILITY ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE AGREEMENT OR ANY BREACH HEREOF (WHETHER UNDER A THEORY OF CONTRACT, TORT (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE), WARRANTY OR OTHERWISE) EXCEED THE GREATER OF ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS ($100,000) OR THE AMOUNT OF REVENUE PAID OR PAYABLE TO THE PARTNER IN THE 12-MONTH PERIOD IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO LIABILITY (OR, IN THE CASE OF A SERIES OF CONNECTED EVENTS, THE FIRST SUCH EVENT).
12. EXPORT CONTROLS.
Partner will comply with all export laws and restrictions and regulations of the Department of Commerce, the United States Department of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control ("OFAC"), or other United States or foreign agency or authority, and shall not export, or allow the export or re-export of the Technology in violation of any such restrictions, laws or regulations. By downloading or using the Technology, Partner agrees to the foregoing and represent and warrants that it is not located in, under the control of, or a national or resident of any restricted country. Partner represents and warrants that none of it, or any individual, entity, or organization holding any ownership interest or controlling interest in Partner, including any officer or director, is an individual, entity, organization with whom any United States law, regulation, or executive order prohibits U.S. companies and individuals from dealing, including, names appearing on the Specially Designated Nationals List.
13.  MISCELLANEOUS.
The Agreement shall be interpreted and construed in accordance with and governed by the laws of the State of New York, without regard to its conflict of law provisions or the United Nations Conventions for the International Sale of Goods. Any action or proceeding arising from or relating to the Agreement must be brought in a federal court in the Southern District of New York or in state court in New York County, New York, and each party irrevocably submits to the jurisdiction and venue of any such court in any such action or proceeding. The parties agree that irreparable damage would occur if any of the provisions of the Agreement is not performed in accordance with these specific terms. Accordingly, the parties agree that each shall be entitled to injunctive relief to prevent breaches of the Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions of the Agreement, in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or in equity. The parties are independent contractors, and nothing in the Agreement will be construed to create a partnership, joint venture, agency or other relationship between the parties. No failure or forbearance by a party to enforce any of its rights under the Agreement or insist upon performance of the other party’s obligations under the Agreement will be deemed a waiver of such rights or obligations to any extent, and no waiver by either party of any default or breach of the Agreement will constitute a waiver of any other or subsequent default or breach. Neither party will be liable for any failure to perform due to causes beyond the party's reasonable control. The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties concerning its subject matter and supersedes all prior or contemporaneous agreements or understandings, written or verbal, concerning such subject matter. The Partner Enrollment Form may be amended, modified or superseded, only by a written instrument signed by both parties. The headings in the Agreement are for the convenience of reference only and have no legal effect. Any reference to days in the Agreement shall be deemed business days unless otherwise specified. The Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original, but all of which together will constitute one and the same instrument. If any provision of the Agreement is held to be unenforceable for any reason, such provision shall be reformed only to the extent necessary to make it enforceable, failing which, it shall be severed from the Agreement and the balance of the Agreement shall continue in full force and effect. Neither party may assign the Agreement or any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the other party’s prior written consent, except (i) due to operation of law, merger, reorganization, or as a result of an acquisition or change of control, and (ii) by Outbrain to its subsidiaries. Subject to the foregoing, the Agreement will be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties and their permitted successors and assigns.
Effective February 16th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
Please note that Outbrain Privacy Policy has moved here:
https://www.outbrain.com/privacy/
Effective February 16th 2022
Download
Datenschutzbestimmungen
Outbrain ist dem Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten verpflichtet. Diese Datenschutzbestimmungen („
Datenschutzbestimmungen
“) gelten für die Verwendung der von uns erfassten Daten, einschließlich aller personenbezogenen Daten, durch Outbrain. Personenbezogene Daten sind Informationen, die sich auf Sie beziehen und Sie persönlich identifizieren können. Wir verwenden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten entsprechend den geltenden Gesetzen. Im Sinne der Compliance und der Übereinstimmung mit Outbrains Werten rund um Vertrauen und Transparenz verfügt Outbrain über ein Team von Datenschutz-Champions, die für die kontinuierliche Umsetzung unseres weltweit gültigen Maßnahmenkatalogs zum Datenschutz verantwortlich sind.
.
+ ALLE ERWEITERN
– ALLES ZUKLAPPEN
1.
Wer wir sind, Was wir tun, Wie Sie Outbrain kontaktieren können, unser Datenschutzbeauftragter oder die zuständigen Behörden
+
Wer wir sind:
Diese Datenschutzbestimmungen gelten für Outbrain Inc., ein Unternehmen nach dem Recht von Delaware, USA, mit Hauptsitz in New York, und dessen verbundene Tochterunternehmen (zusammen bezeichnet als:
„Outbrain“
oder
„wir“
,
„uns“
,
„unser“
). Wir haben Niederlassungen in mehreren Ländern weltweit und arbeiten mit Publishern und Vermarktern auf der ganzen Welt zusammen.
Bitte beachten Sie, dass Outbrains Tochterunternehmen Zemanta Inc über eigene Datenschutzbestimmungen verfügt; diese können Sie
hier
einsehen.
Was wir tun:
Outbrains Mission ist es, relevante Empfehlungen anhand Ihrer Interessen für Sie bereitzustellen. Zu diesem Zweck schließen wir Vereinbarungen mit:
Online-Publishern und Partnern, die ihren Lesern relevanten Content empfehlen wollen (dabei handelt es sich um Outbrain Engage);
Werbetreibenden, die erreichen wollen, dass Leser ihren Content ansehen (hierbei handelt es sich um
Outbrain Amplify
); und
externen Partnern, die uns bei der Bereitstellung relevanter Empfehlungen helfen.
Weitere Informationen zu unseren Amplify-Diensten (für Werbetreibende) finden Sie
hier
und zu unseren Engage-Diensten (für Publisher)
hier
.
Wie Sie Kontakt mit uns aufnehmen:
Unsere Compliance bezüglich dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen überprüfen wir regelmäßig. Wir freuen uns über Ihre Fragen, Anmerkungen und Anfragen zu diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen. Richten Sie diese bitte in erster Instanz an
privacy@outbrain.com
oder auf postalischem Weg an
Outbrain Inc., 222 Broadway 19th Floor, New York, NY 10038, Attn:
Privacy Questions.
Sollte Outbrain Ihre Fragen oder Anliegen nicht zu Ihrer Zufriedenheit beantworten, können Sie sich auch an folgende Ansprechpartner wenden, um Rat oder Unterstützung zu erhalten bzw. Beschwerden vorzubringen:
Outbrains externer Datenschutzbeauftragter („DSB“): ePrivacy GmbH, vertreten durch Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. Sie erreichen die ePrivacy GmbH direkt über dpo@outbrain.com; und/oder
den
Information Commissioner’s Officer
, die für Outbrain zuständige federführende Aufsichtsbehörde in den europäischen Gebieten.
2.
Kooperationen und Einhaltung
+
Wir befolgen die im Rahmen der Selbstverpflichtung formulierten Grundsätze der
Digital Advertising Alliance
(DAA) und der
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance
(EDAA);
Wir sind vollberechtigte Mitglieder der
Network Advertising Initiative
(NAI), eines Verbands, der sich der verantwortungsvollen Erfassung von Daten und deren Verwendung in der Digitalwerbung verpflichtet hat. Wir befolgen die Verhaltensregeln der NAI für Web- und Mobilwerbung. Outbrain befolgt ebenfalls die im Rahmen der Selbstverpflichtung formulierten Grundsätze für die verhaltensgesteuerte Online-Werbung des Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) sowie die Rahmenbedingungen für die verhaltensgesteuerte Online-Werbung des IAB Europe; und
Zudem sind wir zertifiziert nach den Standards der
JICWEBS DTSG Brand Safety
, weitere Informationen dazu finden Sie
hier
.
3.
Outbrain-Nutzertypen (inkl. Deaktivierungsoptionen)
+
Ein Großteil dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen ist in einzelne Abschnitte unterteilt, die sich daran orientieren, wie Sie mit Outbrain interagieren. Sie sind entweder ein Websitebesucher, ein Nutzer und/oder ein Geschäftspartner (siehe nachfolgende Definitionen). Bitte entscheiden Sie, welcher Nutzertyp Sie sind. Entsprechend den einzelnen Nutzertypen erläutern wir, welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun, welche Cookies und anderen vergleichbaren Technologien wir nutzen, wie wir diese Informationen weitergeben und über welche Rechte Sie verfügen.
Websitebesucher:
Sie sind ein Websitebesucher, wenn Sie
unsere
Websites, Internetseiten, interaktiven Funktionen, Blogs und deren jeweiligen Content auf
Outbrain.com
(oder einer darauf basierenden Ableitung wie Outbrain.co.uk, Outbrain.fr, Outbrain.de usw.) („
unsere Websites
“) besuchen und mit diesen interagieren. Weitere Informationen finden Sie
hier
.
（a）
Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
Wir möchten wissen, welche Dienstleistungen auf unseren Websites Sie interessieren, und Sie an die von uns angebotenen Services erinnern, wenn Sie nicht auf unseren Websites sind. Zu diesem Zweck erfassen wird folgende Informationen von Ihrem Gerät: (i) IP-Adresse; (ii) User-Agent-Daten: Gerätetyp (z. B. iPhone), Browsertyp (z. B. Chrome), Betriebssystem (z. B. iOS); (iii) die auf unseren Websites besuchten Seiten (z. B. die Seite „Über Outbrain“); (iv) den Zeitpunkt des Besuchs (und die entsprechende Zeitzone); und (v) die verweisenden URLs und andere normalerweise bei HTTP-Anfragen übertragenen Informationen (z. B. Informationen, die uns mitteilen, wie Sie auf unsere Website gelangt sind).
Außerdem können wir Ihren Namen sowie Ihre E-Mail-Adresse erfassen, falls Sie uns diese Angaben über unsere Websites zukommen lassen (beispielsweise, indem Sie sich für unseren Newsletter registrieren).
（b）
Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
In dieser
Cookie-Tabelle
, die von Zeit zu Zeit aktualisiert wird, finden Sie unter dem Abschnitt „Websitebesucher“ eine detaillierte Liste von Erst- und Drittanbietercookies (sowie ihrer jeweiligen Speicherfristen), die verwendet werden können, wenn Sie unsere Websites besuchen.
（c）
So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
Weitergabe von Informationen, die wir auf unseren Websites von Ihnen erhalten
Wir verkaufen und/oder geben keine personenbezogenen Daten über Sie an Dritte für deren Marketing- oder Werbezwecke weiter. Wir nutzen jedoch unter Umständen die Dienste verschiedener Drittanbieter (jeweils in der
Cookie-Tabelle
aufgeführt) zur Unterstützung unserer Marketing- oder Werbetätigkeit Ihnen gegenüber. Wir verlangen, dass diese Dritten und externen Unternehmen einwilligen, sich an die gültigen Datenschutzgesetze zu halten, sämtliche an sie weitergegebenen Informationen vertraulich zu behandeln und nur zur Erfüllung ihrer Pflichten uns gegenüber zu verwenden. Dazu schließen wir Verträge mit allen Drittparteien, die personenbezogene Daten verarbeiten.
Wenn Sie einen Post auf unserem Blog hinterlassen, sind Ihr Kommentar und Ihre Informationen öffentlich zugänglich. Bitte wenden Sie sich an
support@outbrain.com
, um Ihren Kommentar zu entfernen.
Verwendung von Dienstleistungen Dritter auf unseren Websites.
Unsere Websites enthalten Links zu anderen Websites, die uns nicht gehören und die wir nicht betreiben. Wir kontrollieren, empfehlen oder billigen den Content, die Produkte, Dienstleistungen, Datenschutzbestimmungen oder -maßnahmen dieser Websites Dritter nicht. Auf unseren Websites sehen Sie beispielsweise anklickbare Symbole, über die Sie auf die Facebook-Seite von Outbrain oder die LinkedIn-Seite von Outbrain gelangen. Sofern Sie sich entscheiden, diese Links anzuklicken, sollten Sie sich dessen bewusst sein, dass diese Seiten nicht Outbrain gehören und nicht von Outbrain betrieben werden, weshalb diese Drittseiten unter Umständen ihre eigenen Cookies auf Ihr Gerät senden und unabhängig personenbezogene Daten erfassen. Aus diesem Grunde ist es wichtig, dass Sie sich mit den Datenschutzbestimmungen dieser Drittseiten vertraut machen.
Beachten Sie bitte auch den Abschnitt dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen über die
Weitergabe von Daten
.
(d)
Ihre Rechte
Unsere
Nutzungsbedingungen
regeln die Nutzung unserer Websites und sind für Sie gültig, wenn Sie mit unseren Websites interagieren. Sie können die Nutzung unserer Websites jederzeit beenden. In diesem Fall können Sie auch die Cookies entfernen, die wir auf jedem für den Zugriff auf unsere Websites verwendeten Gerät gesetzt haben; dies können Sie über Ihren Browser tun. Falls Sie während Ihrer Nutzung unserer Websites Ihre E-Mail-Adresse übermitteln, enthält jede E-Mail, die Sie von Outbrain erhalten, eine Option zum Abbestellen des E-Mail-Empfangs. Außerdem können Sie auch das Direktmarketing deaktivieren; wenden Sie sich hierzu per E-Mail an
support@outbrain.com
.
Für Besucher aus dem
europäischen Gebiet
hat Outbrain auf unseren Websites eine Plattform für das Zustimmungs-Management eingerichtet (betrieben durch
One Trust
), über die Sie die Möglichkeit haben, Ihre Zustimmung zu Cookies und vergleichbaren Nachverfolgungstechnologien abzugeben oder zu verweigern. Wenn Sie unsere Websites aufrufen, wird Ihnen ein Banner in der Mitte der Seite angezeigt, das Informationen zu den von uns verwendeten Cookies enthält. Sie können auf dem Banner sämtliche Cookies durch Klick ablehnen (z. B. Performance Cookies oder Targeting Cookies), die (gemäß Cookie-Tabelle) nicht unbedingt notwendig sind. Indem Sie auf „Accept Cookies“ klicken, willigen Sie in die Verwendung von Cookies und ähnlicher Nachverfolgungstechnologien ein. Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten von Websitebesuchern aus dem europäischen Gebiet auf unseren Websites basiert auf der Zustimmung. Sie können Ihre Zustimmung jederzeit widerrufen
Cookies Settings
. Hinsichtlich sämtlicher Websitebesucher aus nicht-europäischen Gebieten stützen wir uns auf unser legitimes Interesse, sämtliche personenbezogenen Daten zu verarbeiten; dies schließt Websitebesucher aus nicht-europäischen Gebieten jedoch nicht davon aus, ihre Zustimmung jederzeit über unsere Plattform für das Zustimmungs-Management zu widerrufen.
Nutzer:
Sie sind ein Nutzer, wenn Sie eine Seite einer Website oder Anwendung eines Partners von Outbrain besuchen, auf der das Outbrain-Widget installiert ist oder auf der unsere Empfehlungen platziert sind („
Partner-Websites
“). Falls Sie beispielsweise die Seiten
https://news.sky.com/uk
,
www.spiegel.de
oder
www.cnn.com
besuchen, wird das Outbrain-Widget in diese Websites eingebunden. Dass Sie mit einem Outbrain-Widget verbunden sind, erkennen Sie an dem Text, der auf Outbrain verweist (z. B. „Empfohlen von Outbrain“, „von Outbrain“ neben den Empfehlungen). Wenn Sie auf die Verlinkung zu Outbrain klicken, sehen Sie einen
detaillierten Hinweis
, über den Sie zum
Interessenportal von Outbrain
und zu diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen navigieren können, wo Sie personalisierte Empfehlungen deaktivieren können. In manchen Fällen nutzt ein Partner möglicherweise einen White-Label-Service von Outbrain für seine eigenen Angebote. In diesem Fall müssen diese Partner in ihren Datenschutzbestimmungen auf die Verwendung der Outbrain-Services hinweisen. Weitere Informationen finden Sie
hier
.
Beispiel eines Outbrain-Widgets.
(a)
Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
Wir verwenden UUIDs, IP-Adressen und andere Nutzungsdaten, damit wir Ihnen interessante Empfehlungen unterbreiten können. Outbrains Empfehlungen werden unter Umständen von einem Werbetreibenden bezahlt, der Sie auf eine neue Website leitet, oder es handelt sich um eigene Empfehlungen des Partners, sodass der Link auf eine andere Seite desselben Partners führt.
UUID.
Wenn Sie als Nutzer erstmalig eine Partner-Website (z. B. CNN.com) besuchen, setzt Outbrain zur Erzeugung einer eindeutigen Nutzerkennung (UUID) ein Cookie auf Ihrem Gerät. Alternativ erhält Outbrain bei Ihrer ersten Interaktion mit einem Partner, der diese Partner-Anwendung verwendet, Ihre Werber-ID, die Ihnen über Ihr Gerät zugewiesen ist. Wir katalogisieren und analysieren den Content, den Sie auf Partner-Websites konsumieren. Unsere Empfehlungen basieren auf: (i) dem Browserverlauf einer UUID; (ii) ähnlichen Surfmustern anderer Nutzer; (iii) Empfehlungen, die bei Outbrains Adressaten zur gegebenen Zeit beliebt sind; (iv) einem gewissen Maß an Zufälligkeit und (v) Zielanforderungen, die durch unsere Amplify-Kunden bereitgestellt oder verlangt werden. Beispielsweise weiß Outbrain, dass UUID 123 (wobei es sich um Sie handeln kann, während Sie mit Ihrem iPhone X und dem Chrome-Browser auf der Website „The Guardian“ surfen) gern Texte über ferne Reiseziele liest und dass Personen, die gern von fernen Reisezielen lesen, sich auch für Artikel über exotisches Essen interessieren. Wenn Sie mit Outbrain interagieren, sammeln wir keine personenbezogenen Daten im herkömmlichen Sinne, wie etwa E-Mail-Adresse oder Name; somit können wir Ihren Namen nicht mit Ihrer UUID in Verbindung bringen (beispielsweise wissen wir nicht, dass Max Mustermann, bei dem es sich ebenfalls um UUID 123 handelt, gerne über ferne Reiseziele liest).
Die UUID stellt eine Abfolge von Ziffern und/oder Buchstaben dar. Diese UUID ist an Ihr Gerät gebunden und variiert je nach Browser-Kombination. Mit anderen Worten: Outbrain erfasst verschiedene UUIDs abhängig davon, welches Gerät und/oder welchen Browser Sie für den Zugriff auf die Websites des Partners verwenden. Sie haben beispielsweise eine bestimmte UUID, wenn Sie eine Partner-Website von Ihrem Mobiltelefon aus mit dem Safari-Browser besuchen, jedoch eine andere UUID, wenn Sie eine Partner-Website von Ihrem iPad aus mit dem Safari-Browser besuchen. Outbrain kombiniert und konsolidiert eine UUID von einem Mobilgerät (Handgerät oder Tablet) von einem Browser, der dann von demselben Gerät auf eine Anwendung (oder umgekehrt) zugreift. Outbrain betreibt keine geräteübergreifende Nachverfolgung und kann daher einen Nutzer, der mit Outbrain über sein Mobiltelefon interagiert, nicht als denselben Nutzer identifizieren, der mit Outbrain über seinen PC interagiert.
IP-Adresse
Zusätzlich zu Ihrer UUID erkennen wir auch Ihre IP-Adresse, die uns Auskunft über Ihren Standort gibt; um diese Identifizierung zu verbergen, löschen wir das letzte Oktett. Diese verdeckte Information verwenden wir dann, um, zusammen mit Informationen, die wir von anderen vertrauenswürdigen Drittpartnern (wie z. B. MaxMind) erhalten haben, herauszufinden, an welchem Standort Sie sich befinden (z. B. New York). Outbrain wird, selbst wenn Sie die personalisierte Nachverfolgung deaktivieren, immer noch Ihre IP-Adresse erfassen, da dies notwendig ist, um Ihnen kontextbasierte Empfehlungen anzuzeigen. In diesem Fall wird Ihre IP-Adresse jedoch nicht mit Ihrer UUID in Verbindung gebracht und würde nicht Teil Ihres Nutzerprofils darstellen.
Weitere Nutzungsdaten
Zusätzlich zu Ihrer UUID und IP-Adresse erfassen wir auch die folgenden Informationen von Ihnen:
(a) im Web über PC oder Mobilgerät: (i) User-Agent-Daten: Gerätetyp (z. B. iPhone), Browsertyp (z. B. Chrome), Betriebssystem (z. B. iOS); (ii) die besuchten Seiten; (iii) den Zeitpunkt des Besuchs; und (iv) die verweisenden URLs und andere normalerweise bei HTTP-Anfragen übertragene Informationen.
Die oben genannten statistischen Informationen geben uns Auskunft darüber, wie viele Nutzer eine bestimmte Seite auf unseren Partner-Websites, auf denen ein Outbrain-Widget installiert ist, besuchten, wie lange jeder Nutzer auf dieser Seite verweilte, welche Art Content sie auf dieser Seite anklickten und wie sie im Allgemeinen mit dieser Seite interagierten; und
(b) in Anwendungen:
(i) die Version der Anwendung (wie sie im App Store oder Play Store erscheint); (ii) die Anwendungs-ID oder den Paketnamen (wie er im App Store oder Play Store erscheint); (iii) das Betriebssystem (z. B. iOS oder Android); (iv) die Version des Betriebssystems; und (v) das Gerätemodell (z. B. iPhone X). Bei diesen Informationen handelt es sich um personenbezogene Daten, wenn Outbrain sie mit einer UUID verbindet.
Da Outbrain keine direkte Verbindung zu den Nutzern hat, die mit Partner-Websites interagieren, verlässt sich Outbrain darauf, dass seine Partner die rechtliche Grundlage schaffen, auf der Outbrain die personenbezogenen Daten verarbeiten kann. Jede Partnerseite greift dabei zurück auf
(b)
Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
Outbrain-Cookies
Outbrain-Pixel
Drittpartei-Pixel
Outbrain-Cookies
Please see the Die Cookie-Tabelle enthält unter „Nutzer“ eine detaillierte Liste der Erstanbieter-Cookies, die wir bei Ihrer Interaktion mit Partner-Websites, auf denen die Outbrain-Technologie implementiert ist, verwenden.
Outbrain-Pixel
Zusätzlich zu Outbrains sichtbarem Widget auf Partner-Websites implementieren bestimmte Outbrain-Werbetreibende gegebenenfalls das Outbrain-Pixel auf ihren Websites. Das Outbrain-Pixel ermittelt, ob der Nutzer, der auf die Seite mit dem installierten Pixel gelangt, über eine Outbrain-UUID verfügt, um den Werbetreibenden Auskunft hinsichtlich ihrer jeweiligen Kampagne zu geben. Falls es eine mit diesem Endnutzer verbundene UUID gibt, kann Outbrain den Werbetreibenden entweder erlauben, diese UUIDs erneut anzusprechen, und/oder den Werbetreibenden die Gesamtzahl der Nutzer (gesammelt und anonymisiert), die eine bestimmte Seite erreicht haben, übermitteln (beispielsweise weiß ein Werbetreibender nicht, dass es bei UUID 1234 zu einer Conversion kam, sondern nur, dass eine stattgefunden hat). Outbrain gibt keine personenbezogenen Daten (inkl. Ihrer UUID) an Werbetreibende weiter und sammelt keine weiteren personenbezogenen Daten über das Pixel. Outbrain kombiniert keine Informationen, die es über das Outbrain-Pixel erhalten hat, mit einem UUID-Profil (beispielsweise wird Outbrain nur nachverfolgen, dass eine Conversion stattgefunden hat, und nicht, dass eine Conversion bei UUID 123 erfolgte, als sie auf die jeweilige Seite des Werbetreibenden gelangte). Wir verlangen von Werbetreibenden, die Verwendung des Outbrain-Pixels auf ihren eigenen Websites offenzulegen.
Outbrain kann auch bestimmten vertrauenswürdigen Drittparteien erlauben, Daten über Cookies, die über das Outbrain-Widget gesendet wurden, zu sammeln. In diesen Fällen gibt Outbrain diesen Drittparteien nicht die Daten weiter, die Outbrain über seine Nutzer sammelt, sondern gestattet diesen Drittparteien die direkte Datensammlung (inkl. personenbezogener Daten) über das Widget zu Betrugsverhinderungs- und/oder Sicherheitszwecken oder um Werbetreibenden Messwerte (wie die Anzahl an Conversions und/oder Impressionen) zur Verfügung zu stellen. Jegliche Datenerfassung dieser Art unterliegt den Datenschutzbestimmungen dieser Drittparteien.
Drittpartei-Pixel
Wenn Sie auf einen Link zu einer unserer Empfehlungen klicken, setzt der Werbetreibende, der die Empfehlung finanziert, unter Umständen entweder durch Weiterleitungen vor der Ankunft auf der Zielseite der Empfehlungen oder bei Erreichen der Zielseite Cookies (oder Drittanbietercookies von Drittparteien, die im Auftrag des Werbetreibenden handeln) auf Ihrem Gerät. Solche Cookies werden gesetzt, um dem Werbetreibenden Analysewerte in Bezug auf seine Werbekampagne zur Verfügung zu stellen (z. B. Informationen, wie viele Nutzer die Werbekampagne gesehen haben). Wir verlangen von unseren Werbetreibenden, die Verwendung von Drittparteipixel und/oder -cookies über ihre Website für den Endnutzer offenzulegen. Da diese Cookies und/oder Pixel nach alleinigem Ermessen unserer Werbetreibenden gesetzt werden, gelten für Sie die Datenschutzhinweise und/oder Datenschutzbestimmungen dieses Werbetreibenden.
(c) So
geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
Unsere Partner
Outbrain leitet und/oder verkauft keine vollständigen Nutzerprofile an Dritte weiter. Wir teilen jedoch unter Umständen bestimmte Elemente eines Nutzerprofils (z. B. die UUID) unter anderen mit den folgenden Partnern:
Partner, mit denen wir hinsichtlich Markensicherheit, Analytics und Betrugsbekämpfung zusammenarbeiten;
Demand-Side-Plattformen (DSP) und Supply-Side-Plattformen (SSP);
Ad Exchanges und/oder Ad Networks; und
Demand-Management-Plattformen.
Hier
finden Sie eine Liste mit einigen unserer vertrauenswürdigen Partner.  Zudem sammeln und/oder teilen wir möglicherweise manche Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten mit vertrauenswürdigen Partnern aufgrund der Verwendung von OpenRTB. Viele dieser Partner sind als IAB TCF Global Vendors registriert und
hier
zu finden.
(d)
Ihre Rechte
Outbrain-Deaktivierung im Web auf Ihrem PC und Mobilgerät
Outbrain-Deaktivierung im Web auf Ihrem PC und Mobilgerät.
Sie können Outbrains personalisierte Empfehlungen jederzeit deaktivieren (oder, falls Sie sie deaktiviert haben und sie wieder aktivieren möchten), indem Sie den nachstehenden Switch-Button betätigen. Sie können personalisierte Empfehlungen auch über Outbrains Interessenprofil deaktivieren. Hierbei handelt es sich um eine Website, auf der Sie eine allgemeine Darstellung der Daten finden, die Outbrain von Ihnen hat und möglicherweise verwendet, um Empfehlungen zu generieren.
Outbrain-Deaktivierung in Apps
Outbrain-Deaktivierung in Apps.
Um Outbrains Empfehlungen auf Ihren mobilen Anwendungen zu deaktivieren, können Sie folgendermaßen vorgehen:
iOS-Geräte: Einstellungen > Datenschutz > Werbung > Kein Ad-Tracking
Android-Geräte: Google Einstellungen > Werbung > Personalisierte Werbung deaktivieren
Bitte beachten Sie, dass eine Deaktivierung über unser Interessenprofil und/oder diese Datenschutzbestimmungen nicht eine Deaktivierung der personalisierten Nachverfolgung in Ihren Anwendungen zur Folge hat. Diese Deaktivierung muss über Ihre Geräteeinstellungen erfolgen.
Zusätzliche Deaktivierungsoptionen.
.
Sie können auch den Erhalt personalisierter Werbung durch uns oder andere Werbeunternehmen über branchenbetriebene Tools deaktivieren, beispielsweise NAI oder die verschiedenen DAA-basierten Seiten (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC, www.youradchoices.ca/choices, und/oder EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu). Durch den Besuch der Seiten für Verbraucherwahlmöglichkeiten NAI, DAA, DAAC oder EDAA können Sie einige oder alle Leistungen der teilnehmenden Mitglieder deaktivieren. Wie auch die Deaktivierung von Outbrain bedeuten diese Deaktivierungen nicht, dass Sie gar keine Werbung mehr erhalten, sondern lediglich, dass die Werbung nicht mehr auf Sie zugeschnitten ist. Sie erhalten weiterhin Werbung, beispielsweise auf Grundlage der jeweiligen Website, die Sie betrachten (d. h. kontextbasierte Werbung). Falls durch die Einstellungen Ihrer Browser zudem Cookies abgewiesen werden, wenn Sie die Verbraucherseiten DAA, DAAC oder EDAA besuchen, ist Ihre Deaktivierung unter Umständen nicht wirksam, da unsere Deaktivierung Cookie-basiert erfolgt.
WICHTIGE Hinweise
Obwohl Sie Outbrains personalisierte Empfehlungen deaktiviert haben:
Sie sehen weiterhin Outbrains Empfehlungen.
Die Deaktivierung von Outbrains Personalisierungsverfolgung bedeutet nicht, dass Sie keine weiteren Empfehlungen von Outbrain erhalten. Stattdessen bedeutet es, dass Outbrains Empfehlungen nicht mehr personalisiert sind (d. h. es handelt sich um kontextbasierte Empfehlungen).
Ihre Deaktivierung basiert auf Cookies und ist spezifisch für das Gerät/den Browser.
Sofern Sie im Web von verschiedenen Geräten und/oder Browsern aus surfen, müssen Sie eine Deaktivierung von jedem Gerät und/oder Browser aus vornehmen, damit dafür gesorgt ist, dass wir auf allen die Personalisierungsverfolgung verhindern. Aus demselben Grund müssen Sie, wenn Sie ein neues Gerät kaufen, den Browser wechseln oder das Deaktivierungs-Cookie löschen, eine erneute Deaktivierung vornehmen. Die Deaktivierung der Personalisierungsverfolgung ist nicht dasselbe wie die Blockierung von Cookies.
Sie dürfen Outbrain mindestens 21 Tage lang nicht aktivieren, da die Löschung Ihres Profils an Ihre UUID geknüpft ist.
Ihre Deaktivierung der personalisierten Empfehlungen durch Outbrain ist sofort wirksam. Falls Ihr Browser jedoch die lokale Speicherung zulässt und Sie innerhalb von 21 Tagen nach Ihrer Deaktivierung Outbrains personalisierte Empfehlungen aktivieren (z. B. durch die Zulassung eines Cookie-Banners), wird Ihr vorheriges Profil möglicherweise wieder mit Ihrer UUID verbunden. Sofern Sie nicht innerhalb von 21 Tagen eine neue Aktivierung vornehmen, wird Ihr Profil gelöscht und kann nicht wiederhergestellt werden.
So wie bei den meisten Deaktivierungscookies basiert die Deaktivierung von Outbrain über Browser auf einem Cookie.
Beim Deaktivierungscookie handelt es sich um ein persistentes Cookie, um den Präferenzen der Nutzer nachzukommen. Die Funktion „Intelligent Tracking Prevention“ in iOS11 könnte Auswirkungen auf das Fortbestehen der Cookies auf Websites nach einem Zeitraum von 24 Stunden haben. Wir schlagen vor, dass Sie einen anderen Browser verwenden oder in Betracht ziehen, alle Drittanbietercookies auf Ihrem Browser zu blockieren, sodass diese deaktiviert sind, ohne dass Sie sich auf die jeweiligen Deaktivierungsmethoden eines Unternehmens verlassen müssen.
Ihr lokaler Speicher wird nicht gelöscht.
Obwohl Sie Outbrains personalisierte Empfehlungen deaktiviert haben, wird Ihr lokaler Speicher nicht automatisch gelöscht, weshalb Sie diesen zusätzlich zu Ihrer Deaktivierung über Ihren Browser löschen müssen.
Geschäftspartner:
Sie sind ein Geschäftspartner, wenn Sie sich im Namen des Unternehmens, für das Sie arbeiten, registrieren (oder Outbrain per E-Mail kontaktieren), um die Dienstleistungen Outbrain Amplify oder Outbrain Engage zu nutzen. Weitere Informationen finden Sie
hier
.
(a)
Welche Informationen wir erfassen und warum wir dies tun
Womöglich übermitteln Sie bestimmte personenbezogene Daten (wie Ihren Namen und/oder Ihre E-Mail-Adresse), wenn Sie sich für die Amplify- oder Engage-Dienstleistungen registrieren oder anderweitig mit uns kommunizieren oder interagieren. Wenn Sie sich bei uns als Geschäftspartner bewerben, benötigen wir gegebenenfalls weitere Daten von Ihnen über Anmeldebögen für Werbetreibende, Werbeaufträge und andere Formulare. Zusätzlich erfassen wir automatisch Informationen über die Aktivitäten Ihres Nutzernamens im Outbrain-Dashboard. Wenn Sie beispielsweise als Amplify-Geschäftspartner die Kosten pro Klick für eine Ihrer Kampagnen ändern, findet sich im Audit Trail von Outbrain eine Aufzeichnung all dieser Maßnahmen.
Wir erfassen und verarbeiten die oben genannten personenbezogenen Daten, um unsere Verpflichtungen aus unserem Vertrag mit Ihnen als Geschäftspartner (oder zukünftiger Geschäftspartner) zu erfüllen, unter anderem:
Beantwortung Ihrer Fragen und Anforderungen;
Gewährung Ihres Zugriffs auf bestimmte Funktionen und Eigenschaften der Amplify- und Engage-Dienstleistungen (z. B. Bereitstellung und Pflege Ihres Dashboard-Kontos);
Verifizierung Ihrer Identität; und
Kommunikation mit Ihnen über Ihr Konto, unsere Produkte und die für Ihre Nutzung der Amplify- oder Engage-Dienstleistung relevanten Werbeaktionen.
(b)
Cookies und andere vergleichbare Technologien, die wir nutzen
In der
Cookie-Tabelle
unter „Geschäftspartner“ erhalten Sie eine detaillierte Liste der Erst- und Drittanbietercookies (und ihrer jeweiligen Speicherfristen), die wir für Geschäftspartner verwenden.
(c)
So geben wir unter Umständen Informationen weiter
Wir legen bestimmte Informationen über Geschäftspartner gegenüber Anbietern, Auftragnehmern oder anderen offen, die Outbrain bei der Erbringung der Dienstleistungen unterstützen (z. B. Kreditkartenabwicklung). Beachten Sie bitte auch den Abschnitt dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen über die Weitergabe von Daten.
(d)
Ihre Rechte
Sofern Sie als Geschäftspartner Ihre Daten verifizieren, berichtigen, aktualisieren oder deren Deaktivierung veranlassen möchten, können Sie Ihre Profileinstellungen im Outbrain-Dashboard editieren oder uns unter
support@outbrain.com
kontaktieren. Falls Sie von Outbrain E-Mails erhalten, können Sie den Empfang über einen Link in der E-Mail abbestellen. Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie durch das Abbestellen nicht den Erhalt von Benachrichtigungen deaktivieren, die für die Erbringung der Amplify- oder Engage-Dienstleistungen unerlässlich sind (z. B. E-Mail-Rechnungen).
(e)
Rechtsgrundlage
Outbrains Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten von Geschäftspartnern ist vertraglich festgelegt.
4.
Sicherheitsmaßnahmen, Übertragung außerhalb des EWR, Weitergabe und Datenspeicherung
+
Sicherheit
Datenübertragungen außerhalb der EU/des EWR
Weitergabe von Daten
Datenspeicherung
Sicherheit
Outbrain verfügt über ein spezielles Sicherheitsteam. Wir führen eine strenge Kontrolle der durch uns erfassten personenbezogenen Daten durch und speichern diese in durch Firewalls geschützten und sicheren Datenbanken mit streng begrenzten und kontrollierten Zugriffsrechten, damit deren Sicherheit gewährleistet ist. Weitere Informationen können Sie unseren
Sicherheitsstandards
entnehmen.
Geschäftspartner haben Zugriff auf bestimmte passwortgeschützte Funktionen der Dienstleistungen Amplify oder Engage. Die Geschäftspartner tragen dafür Verantwortung, dieses Passwort vertraulich zu behandeln und dafür zu sorgen, dass es auch von ihren Mitarbeitern und/oder Vertretern vertraulich behandelt wird. Bitte denken Sie daran, dass die Informationsübertragung über das Internet leider niemals vollständig sicher ist. Ein häufig vorkommender Internetbetrug wird als „Spoofing“ oder „Phishing“ bezeichnet. Dabei erhalten Sie eine E-Mail, die von einer vertrauenswürdigen Quelle zu stammen scheint und in der Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erfragt werden. Bitte beachten Sie, dass wir Ihnen keine E-Mails senden, in denen wir Sie um die Überprüfung Ihrer Kreditkarten- oder Bankdaten oder anderer personenbezogener Daten bitten. Sollten Sie jemals eine E-Mail erhalten, die den Anschein erweckt, von uns zu sein, und in der derartige Daten von Ihnen angefordert werden, antworten Sie nicht darauf und klicken Sie auch auf keine Links in dieser E-Mail. Leiten Sie stattdessen diese E-Mail an uns unter
legal@outbrain.com
, weiter, da wir Fälle möglichen Internetbetrugs untersuchen.
Datenübertragungen außerhalb der EU/des EWR
Wenn wir Daten aus dem Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum (EWR) übertragen, stellen wir sicher, dass diese Übertragungen mit den geltenden Datenschutzgesetzen übereinstimmen. Darunter fallen, falls anwendbar, die Standardvertragsklauseln der Europäischen Kommission oder eine positive Angemessenheitsfeststellung der Europäischen Kommission gemäß Artikel 25 Absatz 6 der Richtlinie 95/46/EG oder Artikel 45 der DSGVO. Dies bedeutet, dass Ihre Rechte und der Schutz Ihrer Daten an Ihre Daten geknüpft sind und wir anerkannte Vertragsklauseln und weitere Maßnahmen verwenden, durch die für den Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch die Empfänger gesorgt ist. Bei Outbrain gelten zwischen den Outbrain-Einheiten die Standardvertragsklauseln für den Datentransfer außerhalb des EWR.
Weitergabe von Daten
Zusätzlich zu der beschriebenen Offenlegung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten der einzelnen Nutzerarten legen wir personenbezogene Daten unter Umständen wie folgt offen:
Innerhalb der durch Outbrain kontrollierten Unternehmensgruppe aus internen Gründen, vorrangig für geschäftliche und betriebliche Zwecke;
Bei einem Geschäftsübergang, wie einer Fusion, dem Erwerb durch ein anderes Unternehmen oder dem teilweisen oder vollständigen Verkauf unserer Vermögenswerte, gehören Ihre personenbezogenen Daten wahrscheinlich zu den übertragenen Vermögenswerten;
Bei entsprechenden rechtlichen Anforderungen (z. B. zur Unterstützung strafrechtlicher Ermittlungen oder anderer Rechtsverfahren); und/oder
To respond to a genuine emergency.
Als Reaktion auf einen echten Notfall.
Datenspeicherung
Die Speicherfrist für jedes durch Outbrain verwendete Cookie (egal ob unser eigenes oder für uns durch Dritte) ist in
Cookie-Tabelle
genannt. Insbesondere das Outbrain-Cookie (Obuid), das für die Nachverfolgung von Nutzeraktivitäten wie Klicks verwendet wird, erlischt drei (3) Monate, nachdem ein Nutzer eine bestimmte Seite innerhalb unseres Netzwerks besucht hat. Das Cookie wird jedoch wieder aktiviert, wenn ein Nutzer zur selben Seite oder einer anderen Seite innerhalb unseres Netzwerks zurückkehrt. Zudem speichern wir keine individuellen Datenpunkte über einen Nutzer für mehr als 13 Monate. Falls beispielsweise UUID 123 am 31. Dezember 2018 einen Artikel gelesen hat, ist dieser Artikel am 1. Februar 2019 nicht mehr Teil des Profils von UUID 123.
Outbrain verfügt zudem über eine Richtlinie zur Datenspeicherung, in der die Speicherfrist für personenbezogene Daten aufgeführt ist, die auf unserer Analyse basiert, welche Speicherfrist für bestimmte Daten aus rechtlichen oder geschäftlichen Gründen angemessen ist. Wenn wir personenbezogene Daten nicht mehr benötigen, löschen oder vernichten wir diese auf sichere Weise. Zusammengefasste Daten, durch die kein Gerät/Browser (oder keine Person) identifiziert werden kann und die für die Berichterstattung und Analyse benötigt werden, behalten wir so lange, wie dies wirtschaftlich nötig ist.
5.
Kinder und sensible Daten
+
Kinder
Keine unserer Dienstleistungen richtet sich beabsichtigt an Kinder unter 16 Jahren. Wir erfassen wissentlich keine personenbezogenen Daten von Personen unter 16 Jahren. Stellen wir bei der Datenerfassung fest, dass ein Websitebesucher, ein Nutzer oder ein Geschäftspartner unter 16 ist, verwenden oder behalten wir seine/ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht. Wenn wir davon Kenntnis erlangen, dass wir unwissentlich personenbezogene Daten von einem Kind im Alter von unter 16 erfasst haben, ergreifen wir angemessene Anstrengungen zur Löschung dieser Daten aus unseren Verzeichnissen. Wenn du ein Kind bist, nutze Outbrain nicht, verlasse diese Seite und geh lieber spielen!
Sensible Daten
Wir sammeln und erfassen keine sensiblen personenbezogenen Daten.
6.
Besucher des europäischen Gebiets
+
In Übereinstimmung mit bestimmten Datenschutzgesetzen, insbesondere der europäischen Datenschutz-Grundverordnung (DSGVO), gewährt Outbrain Personen, die mit Outbrain interagieren, bestimmte zusätzliche Rechte wie das Recht auf Zugriff, Berichtigung, Einspruch, Beschwerde, Löschung und Blockierung. Insbesondere und unter bestimmten Umständen:
das Recht auf Auskunft darüber, ob und welche personenbezogenen Daten von uns verarbeitet werden, sowie das Recht, die Berichtigung oder Änderung personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
das Recht, die Löschung personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
das Recht, die Einschränkung der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen.
den jederzeitigen vollständigen oder teilweisen Widerruf Ihrer Zustimmung zur Verarbeitung und Nutzung Ihrer Daten mit zukünftiger Gültigkeit.
das Recht auf Erhalt Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten in einem üblichen, strukturierten und mechanisch lesbaren Format.
Kontaktaufnahme mit unserem Datenschutzbeauftragten bei Fragen, Anmerkungen, Beschwerden oder Anfragen im Zusammenhang mit unserer Datenschutzerklärung und der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten.
das Recht auf Beschwerde bei der zuständigen Aufsichtsbehörde, falls Sie der Auffassung sind, dass die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten gesetzeswidrig ist.
Neben dem oben Genannten weisen wir in diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen auf bestimmte Rechte für Bürger des europäischen Gebiets hin. Laut der DSGVO bezeichnet die Formulierung „Bürger aus
europäischen Gebieten
“ den Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum (EWR), die Europäische Freihandelsassoziation (EFTA) und die Schweiz. Im Sinne dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen umfasst der Begriff „europäische Gebiete“ weiterhin das Vereinigte Königreich, auch nachdem dieses den Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum im Anschluss an den Brexit verlässt.
Gerne können Sie uns eine E-Mail an
Privacy@outbrain.com
schicken, falls Sie Fragen zur Geltendmachung Ihrer oben genannten Rechte haben.
7.
„Do Not Track“-Angabe
+
Einige Browser senden an Websites „Do Not Track (DNT)“-Signale, mit denen der Website mitgeteilt wird, dass die Aktivitäten des Nutzers nicht verfolgt werden sollen. Es besteht jedoch kein allgemeingültiges Verständnis darüber, wie DNT-Signale zu interpretieren sind, und daher findet durch Outbrain derzeit keine Modifizierung, Änderung oder Reaktion auf die DNT-Anforderungen oder -Signale von diesen Browsern statt. Wir beobachten weiterhin die Branchenaktivitäten in diesem Bereich und bewerten unsere DNT-Verfahren bei Bedarf neu. Zwischenzeitlich können Sie eine Reihe anderer durch uns bereitgestellter Tools zur Kontrolle der Datenerfassung und -nutzung einsetzen, unter anderem die Möglichkeit, im Nutzerbereich den Erhalt personalisierter Empfehlungen zu deaktivieren.
8.
Mögliche Änderungen dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen
+
Wir ändern diese Datenschutzbestimmungen zu gegebener Zeit. Darüber informieren wir durch einen deutlichen Hinweis, der für Sie als Websitebesucher oder Geschäftspartner erkennbar ist. Wir haben jedoch keine Möglichkeit, Nutzern gegenüber eine Aktualisierung durch eine Mitteilung anzukündigen. Sie sollten sich regelmäßig diese Datenschutzbestimmungen ansehen, um zu erfahren, ob es ein Update gab, da wir stets das Datum der letzten Änderung der Datenschutzbestimmungen oben auf der Seite anzeigen, damit Sie wissen, wann diese zuletzt überarbeitet wurden.
Effective February 16th 2022
Download
Política de privacidad
Outbrain se compromete a proteger sus datos personales. Esta Política de privacidad («
Política de privacidad
») rige el uso por parte de Outbrain de nuestros datos recopilados, incluyendo todos y cada uno de los datos personales. Los datos personales son información que se relaciona con usted y que puede identificarle como individuo. Utilizamos sus datos personales de conformidad con todas las leyes aplicables. Para garantizar el cumplimiento y estar en sintonía con los valores de Outbrain en materia de confianza y transparencia, contamos con un equipo de defensores de la privacidad responsables de la implementación continua de nuestro programa de privacidad global.
+ EXPANDIR TODO
– CERRAR TODO
1.
Quiénes somos, qué hacemos, cómo puede ponerse en contacto con Outbrain, con nuestro RPD o con las autoridades competentes
+
Quiénes somos:
Esta política de privacidad se aplica a Outbrain Inc., una sociedad de Delaware (EE.UU.) con sede en Nueva York y sus filiales (colectivamente, «
Outbrain
», o «
nosotros
», «
nos
», «
nuestro
»). Operamos desde diversas oficinas alrededor del mundo y colaboramos con editores y vendedores de todo el mundo.
Tenga en cuenta que nuestra filial Zemanta Inc. cuenta con su propia política de privacidad que está disponible
aquí
.
Qué hacemos:
La misión de Outbrain es facilitarle recomendaciones interesantes acorde con sus intereses. Para lograr nuestra misión firmamos acuerdos con:
editores y socios en línea que desean recomendar contenido relevante a sus lectores (Outbrain Engage);
anunciantes que quieren que los lectores vean su contenido (
Outbrain Amplify
), y
socios externos que nos ayudan a hacerle llegar recomendaciones relevantes.
Si desea obtener más información sobre nuestro servicios de Amplify (anunciante) haga clic
aquí,
y para nuestros servicios de Engage (editores),
aquí
.
Cómo ponerse en contacto con nosotros:
Revisamos regularmente nuestro cumplimiento de la presente Política de privacidad. Las preguntas, comentarios y solicitudes relacionadas con esta Política de privacidad son bienvenidas y deben dirigirse en primer lugar a
privacy@outbrain.com
o por correo postal a
Outbrain Inc. 222 Broadway 19th Floor, New York, NY 10038, Attn: Privacy Questions
.
Si Outbrain no responde satisfactoriamente a sus preguntas o inquietudes, también puede ponerse en contacto con las siguientes personas para obtener asesoramiento, apoyo o realizar reclamaciones:
El Responsable de Protección de Datos externo de Outbrain («RPD»): ePrivacy GmbH, representada por D. Christoph Bauer. Se puede contactar con ePrivacy GmbH directamente en dpo@outbrain.com, o
en el
Information Commissioner’s Officer
, que es el principal servicio de supervisión de Outbrain en Europa.
2.
Adhesión y alianza
+
●Nos adherimos a los principios de autorregulación establecidos por la
Digital Advertising Alliance
(DAA) y la
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance
(EDAA).
●Somos miembros activos de la
Network Advertising Initiative
(NAI), una asociación dedicada a la recopilación responsable de datos y su uso para la publicidad digital. Nos adherimos asimismo al Código de conducta de NAI para sitios web y móviles. Outbrain también se adhiere a los Principios de autorregulación de la Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) para la Publicidad conductual en línea y al Marco OBA de IAB de Europa, y
●También estamos certificados por
JICWEBS DTSG Brand Safety Certified
aquí
.
3.
Tipos de usuarios de Outbrain (incluyendo las opciones adicionales de inhabilitación)
+
Gran parte de esta Política de privacidad está dividida en apartados en función de la manera en que usted puede interactuar con Outbrain. Usted es un Visitante del sitio, un Usuario o un Socio comercial (como se define a continuación). Por favor, determine qué tipo de usuario es. Para cada tipo de usuario hemos explicado qué información recopilamos y por qué, qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos, cómo compartimos dicha información y sus derechos.
Visitantes del sitio
Usted es un Visitante del Sitio cuando visita e interactúa con
nuestros
sitios web, páginas web, funciones interactivas, blogs y sus respectivos contenidos en
Outbrain.com
(o cualquier derivación, como Outbrain.co.uk, Outbrain.fr, Outbrain.de, etc.) («
Nuestros sitios
»). Ver más
aquí
.
（a）
Qué información recopilamos y por qué
Queremos entender qué servicios le interesan de Nuestros Sitios y queremos recordarle los servicios que ofrecemos cuando no esté visitando Nuestros Sitios. Para ello, recopilamos la siguiente información desde su dispositivo: (I) dirección IP, (ii) datos del Agente usuario: tipo de dispositivo (por ejemplo, iPhone), tipo de navegador (por ejemplo, Chrome), sistema operativo (por ejemplo, iOS), (iii) las páginas visitadas en Nuestro Sitio (por ejemplo, la página «Acerca de» de Outbrain), (iv) la hora de la visita (y la zona horaria correspondiente) y (v) las URL de referencia y otra información que normalmente se transmite en las solicitudes HTTP (por ejemplo, información diciéndonos cómo llegó a Nuestros Sitios).
Además, también podemos recopilar información como su nombre y dirección de correo electrónico si acepta enviarnos detalles mediante Nuestros Sitios (por ejemplo, aceptando recibir nuestro boletín informativo).
（b）
Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
Consulte en esta
Tabla de cookies
, actualizada regularmente, bajo el apartado «Visitantes del sitio» para obtener un listado detallado de las cookies de origen y de terceros (así como sus correspondientes periodos de retención) que podrían utilizarse cuando usted visita nuestros sitios.
（c）
Cómo podemos intercambiar información
Intercambio de información sobre usted en Nuestros sitios.
No vendemos o compartimos sus datos personales con terceros para fines de marketing o publicidad.  Sin embargo, es posible que utilicemos otros terceros (cada uno de los cuales aparece en la
Tabla de cookies
) para ayudarnos a vender o a enviarle publicidad.  Exigimos que estos terceros y empresas se comprometan a cumplir con todas las leyes de protección de datos aplicables, a mantener toda la información compartida con ellos de manera confidencial y a utilizar la información sólo para cumplir con sus obligaciones para con nosotros. Lo anterior se alcanza mediante acuerdos con todos los terceros que tratan datos personales.
Si realiza una publicación en nuestro blog, su comentario e información estarán disponibles públicamente. Póngase en contacto con
support@outbrain.com
para eliminar su comentario.
Uso de servicios de terceros en Nuestros sitios.
Nuestros sitios contienen enlaces a otros sitios web que ni operamos ni son de nuestra propiedad. No controlamos, recomendamos ni respaldamos el contenido, los productos, los servicios, las políticas ni las prácticas de privacidad de estos sitios web de terceros. Por ejemplo, en Nuestros sitios encontrará iconos en los que podrá hacer clic y que le llevarán a la página de Facebook de Outbrain o a la página de LinkedIn de Outbrain. Si decide hacer clic en estos enlaces, debe saber que estos sitios web ni son propiedad ni están operados por Outbrain, por lo que estos terceros podrán enviar sus propias cookies a su dispositivo y podrán recopilar datos personales de forma independiente. Por lo tanto, es importante que conozca las políticas de privacidad de las páginas de estos terceros.
Consulte también el apartado
«Intercambio»
de la presente Política de privacidad.
(d)
Sus derechos
Nuestros
Términos de uso
rigen el uso que usted realiza de Nuestros sitios y también se le aplican a usted cuando interactúe con Nuestros sitios. Puede dejar de usar Nuestros sitios en cualquier momento. Si lo hace, es posible que también desee eliminar las cookies que hayamos colocado en cualquier dispositivo utilizado para acceder a Nuestros sitios, lo cual puede realizar mediante su explorador. Si durante su uso de Nuestros sitios proporciona su dirección de correo electrónico, cualquier correo electrónico que reciba de Outbrain incluirá la opción «darse de baja». Además, también podrá inhabilitar el envío de marketing directo escribiendo a
support@outbrain.com
.
Para los Visitantes del sitio en
territorio europeo
, Outbrain ha implementado una plataforma de gestión de consentimiento (impulsada por
One Trust
) en Nuestros sitios que brinda la oportunidad de otorgar o no su consentimiento a las cookies y tecnologías de seguimiento similares que empleamos. Después de acceder a Nuestros sitios, verá un banner en el centro de la página con información sobre las cookies que empleamos. Puede hacer clic en el banner para rechazar cualquier tipo de cookies (por ejemplo, aquellas sobre el proceso o las publicitarias) que no se consideren estrictamente necesarias (como se define en la Tabla de cookies). Al hacer clic en «Aceptar» en el banner, usted está aceptando las cookies así como tecnologías similares de seguimiento. La base legal de Outbrain para el tratamiento de datos personales de los Visitantes del sitio en el territorio europeo en Nuestros sitios es el consentimiento. Puede retirar su consentimiento en cualquier momento
Cookies Settings
. Por lo que respecta a todos los demás Visitantes del sitio no ubicados en territorios europeos, nos apoyamos en nuestro legítimo interés para procesar datos personales de cualquier tipo, si bien esto no impide que los Visitantes del sitio no ubicados en territorio no europeo retiren su consentimiento en cualquier momento a través de nuestra plataforma de gestión de consentimiento.
Usuarios:
Se considera que usted es un Usuario cuando visita una página de un sitio web o una aplicación de uno de los asociados de Outbrain en los que esté instalado el widget de Outbrain o aparezcan nuestras recomendaciones («
Sitios de asociados
»). Por ejemplo, si usted visita
https://news.sky.com/uk
,
www.spiegel.de
o
www.cnn.com
, el widget de Outbrain está implementado en dichos sitios web. Podrá reconocer que está interactuando con un widget de Outbrain cuando vea texto que hace referencia a Outbrain (p. ej., «Recomendado por Outbrain», «de Outbrain» junto a las recomendaciones. Si hace clic en la referencia hipervinculada de Outbrain, verá una
nota detallada
que le permitirá navegar al
Portal de interés de Outbrain
y hasta esta Política de privacidad donde puede elegir la opción de inhabilitar las recomendaciones personalizadas. En algunos casos, un asociado puede incluir en su propia oferta servicios de Outbrain con etiqueta blanca. En tales casos, dichos asociados deben especificar su uso de Outbrain en sus políticas de privacidad. Ver más
aquí
.
Ejemplo de un widget de Outbrain.
(a)
Qué información recopilamos y por qué
Utilizamos identificadores únicos de usuario (UUID, por sus siglas en inglés), direcciones IP y otra información de uso para poder ofrecer recomendaciones interesantes. Las recomendaciones de Outbrain pueden estar sujetas a pago por parte de un anunciante que le guiará mediante un vínculo a un nuevo sitio web o pueden ser orgánicas, de modo que dicho enlace conduzca a otra página del mismo sitio del asociado
UUID.
Si usted, como usuario, visita por primera vez un sitio de un asociado (p. ej., CNN.com), Outbrain colocará una cookie en su dispositivo con el fin de generar un UUID. Como alternativa, si usted interactúa por primera vez con un asociado utilizando la aplicación de dicho asociado, Outbrain recibirá su ID de anunciante, la cual está asignada a su dispositivo. Nosotros catalogamos y analizamos el contenido que usted consume en los sitios de los asociados. Nuestras recomendaciones se basan en: (i) un historial de navegación del UUID; (ii) patrones similares de navegación de otros Usuarios; (iii) recomendaciones que gozan de popularidad en general entre el público de Outbrain en ese momento; (iv) determinada aletoriedad, y (v) requisitos de identificación que pueden aportar o solicitar nuestros clientes de Amplify. A modo de ejemplo, Outbrain puede saber que el UUID 123 (que puede ser la de su iPhone X en The Guardian cuando utiliza Chrome como navegador) tiene interés en leer información sobre destinos de vacaciones lejanos y que las personas interesadas en leer sobre destinos de vacaciones lejanos también están interesadas en información sobre comida exótica. Cuando usted interactúa con Outbrain, nosotros no recopilamos datos personales típicos sobre usted, como su dirección de correo electrónico o su nombre, y por lo tanto no podemos asociar su nombre a su UUID (por ejemplo, no podemos saber que a John Smith, que tiene el UUID 123, le interesa leer artículos sobre destinos de vacaciones lejanos).
El UUID es una secuencia de números o letras. Este UUID se vincula automáticamente a su dispositivo y varía dependiendo de su combinación de navegadores. En otras palabras, Outbrain registra un UUID diferente dependiendo del dispositivo o navegador que utilice para acceder a los Sitios asociados. Por ejemplo, usted tendrá un UUID cuando acceda a un Sitio asociado desde su teléfono móvil utilizando el navegador Safari, y un UUID diferente cuando acceda a un Sitio asociado desde su iPad utilizando el navegador Safari. Outbrain combinará y consolidará un UUID de un dispositivo móvil (portátil o tablet) desde un navegador que accede posteriormente a una aplicación (o viceversa) desde el mismo dispositivo. Outbrain no ejecuta un
cross device tracking
y por lo tanto no puede vincular a un usuario que interactúa con Outbrain en su teléfono con el mismo usuario que interactúa con Outbrain desde su equipo de escritorio.
Dirección IP
Aparte de su UUID, reconocemos su dirección IP, la cual trasladamos al sistema geolocalización y eliminamos el último octeto para enmascarar la información de identificación. A continuación, utilizamos esta información enmascarada, en combinación con la información recibida de otros terceros asociados de confianza (como MaxMind), para determinar una referencia general de dónde se ubica usted (p. ej., en Nueva York). Outbrain reconocerá igualmente su dirección IP aunque inhabilite el seguimiento personalizado, ya que esto es necesario para poder seguir ofreciéndole recomendaciones contextuales, si bien, en este caso, su dirección IP no se asocia con su UUID y no forma parte de ningún perfil de usuario.
Otros datos relacionados con la utilización
Además de su UUID y su dirección IP, recopilamos también la siguiente información relacionada con usted en (a) sitios para dispositivos de escritorio y móviles: (i) Datos del Agente usuario: tipo de dispositivo (p. ej., iphone), tipo de navegador (p. ej., chrome), sistema operativo (p. ej. iOS); (ii) las páginas visitadas; (iii) la hora de la visita; y (iv) las URL de referencia y otra información que normalmente se transmite en las solicitudes HTTP.La información estadística mencionada anteriormente nos aporta información sobre cuántos Usuarios han visitado una página específica en nuestros Sitios asociados en los que está instalado el widget de Outbrain, cuánto tiempo ha permanecido cada Usuario en dicha página, el tipo de contenido de la página en cuestión en el que han hecho clic y cómo han interactuado en general con dicha página; y (b) en aplicaciones (i) versión de la aplicación (tal y como aparece en App Store o Play Store); (ii) ID de la aplicación o nombre de paquete (tal y como aparece en App Store o Play Store); (iii) sistema operativo (p. ej. IOS o Android); (iii) versión del sistema operativo; y (iv) modelo del dispositivo (p. ej. iPhone X).Esta información se considera personal si Outbrain la asocia a un UUID.
Puesto que Outbrain no tiene una relación directa con los Usuarios que interactúan con Sitios asociados, Outbrain parte de que sus asociados aplican los fundamentos legales según los cuales Outbrain puede procesar los datos personales. Cada asociado se basa en
(b)
Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
Cookies de Outbrain
Píxeles de Outbrain
Píxeles de terceros
Cookies de Outbrain
Consulte en la
Tabla de cookies
under “Users” en el apartado «Usuarios» para obtener un listado detallado de las cookies de origen que utilizamos cuando usted interactúa con Sitios asociados en los que está implementada la tecnología de Outbrain.
Píxeles de Outbrain
Ademas del widget visible de Outbrain en los Sitios asociados, algunos anunciantes de Outbrain pueden implementar el píxel de Outbrain en sus sitios web. El píxel de Outbrain determina si un Usuario que accede a la página en la que está instalado el píxel tiene un UUID de Outbrain con el fin de proporcionar informes a los anunciantes en relación con su campaña particular. Si hay un UUID asociado a un usuario final, Outbrain permite a los anunciantes o bien redestinar dichos UUID y/o notifica a los anunciantes el número total de Usuarios (de forma acumulada y anónima) que han accedido a una página en particular (por ejemplo, un anunciante no puede saber que el UUID1234 se ha convertido, sino solamente que se ha producido una conversión). Outbrain no transfiere a sus anunciantes ningún dato personal (incluido su UUID) ni recopila ninguna otra información personal a través del píxel. Outbrain no combina la información recibida de la información de píxel de Outbrain con un perfil de UUID (por ejemplo, Outbrain solamente registra que se ha producido una conversión, y no que el UUID123 se ha convertido al acceder a la página elegida del anunciante). Exigimos a los anunciantes que revelen el uso del píxel de Outbrain en sus propios sitios web.
Outbrain también puede permitir a determinados terceros asociados de confianza recopilar datos a través de cookies suministradas por medio del widget de Outbrain. En tales casos, Outbrain no transfiere esta información recolectada sobre sus usuarios a dichos terceros, pero sí que les permite a estos terceros recopilar información directamente (incluyendo datos personales) mediante el widget para la prevención de fraudes y/o fines de seguridad o para proporcionar información de mediciones a anunciantes (tales como el numero de conversiones o impresiones). Esta recopilación de información se rige por las políticas de privacidad de los terceros.
Píxeles de terceros
Si hace clic en un enlace a una de nuestras recomendaciones, el anunciante que patrocina la recomendación puede colocar cookies (o cookies de terceros pertenecientes a terceros que actúan en nombre del anunciante ) en su dispositivo, bien a través de redireccionamiento antes de llegar a la página de destino de las recomendaciones o al llegar a la página de destino. Estas cookies se colocan con el fin de proporcionar análisis al anunciante relacionado con la campaña del mismo (por ejemplo, para ver cuántos usuarios han visto la campaña del anunciante). Exigimos a nuestros anunciantes que revelen el uso de píxeles de terceros y/o cookies para los usuarios finales a través su sitio web. Estas cookies y/o píxeles se agregan a discreción única de nuestros anunciantes, por lo que usted queda sujeto al aviso de privacidad del anunciante y/o a su política de privacidad.
(c)
Cómo podemos intercambiar información
Nuestros socios
Outbrain no comparte con terceros ni vende a terceros perfiles de usuario completos. No obstante, podemos compartir determinados elementos de un perfil de usuario (por ejemplo, el UUID) con los siguientes socios, incluyendo:
socios de seguridad de la marca, de análisis y de prevención de fraudes;
plataformas de demanda (DSP) y plataformas SSP;
Ad Exchanges y/o redes; y
plataformas de gestión de demanda.
Consulte
aquí
un listado de algunos de nuestros socios de confianza.  Además, podemos recopilar y/ o compartir una serie de datos personales con socios de confianza en virtud de su participación en la OpenRTB. Muchos de estos socios están registrados como vendedores globales adscritos al TCF (marco regulatorio de consentimiento y transparencia) de la Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) y pueden encontrarse
aquí
.
(d)
Sus derechos
Inhabilitación de Outbrain en sitios para dispositivos de escritorio y móviles
Inhabilitación de Outbrain en sitios para dispositivos de escritorio y móviles.
Usted puede inhabilitar el envío (opt out) de recomendaciones personalizadas de Outbrain (o, si las ha inhabilitado, volver a suscribirlas) en cualquier momento desplazando el botón más abajo. Asimismo, puede inhabilitar el envío de recomendaciones personalizadas a través del
Perfil de interés
de Outbrain, que es un sitio web que ofrece una visualización general de los datos que Outbrain tiene sobre usted y que puede utilizar para emitir sus recomendaciones.
Inhabilitación de Outbrain en aplicaciones
Inhabilitación de Outbrain en aplicaciones.
Para inhabilitar las recomendaciones de Outbrain en sus aplicaciones móviles puede seguir los pasos que se indican a continuación:
Dispositivos iOS: Configuración > Privacidad > Publicidad > Limitar seguimiento de anuncios
Dispositivos Android: Aplicación de configuración de Google > Anuncios > Inhabilitar personalización de anuncios
Tenga en cuenta que la inhabilitación a través de su Perfil de interés y/o de esta Política de privacidad no implica la inhabilitación del seguimiento personalizado en sus aplicaciones. Esta inhabilitación debe realizarse a través de la configuración de su dispositivo.
Otras opciones de inhabilitación
.
Otras opciones de inhabilitación.
También puede inhabilitar la recepción de anuncios personalizados enviados por nosotros u otras compañías anunciantes mediante herramientas de iniciativas del sector como la NAI o las distintas páginas basadas en la DAA (DAA,
http://www.aboutads.info/choices
; DAAC,
www.youradchoices.ca/choices
, y/o EDAA
www.youronlinechoices.eu
). Visitar las páginas de elección del consumidor de la NAI, DAA, DAAC o EDAA le permitirá inhabilitar todos o algunos de los servicios de los miembros participantes. Al igual que la inhabilitación a través de Outbrain, estas opciones de inhabilitación no significan que no vaya a dejar de recibir publicidad, sino que los anuncios que reciba no estarán personalizados según sus preferencias. Por lo tanto, seguirá recibiendo publicidad, por ejemplo, basada en el sitio web en particular que esté visitando (es decir, anuncios basados en el contexto). Del mismo modo, si sus navegadores están configurados para rechazar cookies cuando visite las páginas de atención al consumidor de la DAA, DAAC o EDAA, su inhabilitación no tendrá efecto, puesto que está basada en cookies.
Información IMPORTANTE
Aunque haya inhabilitado las recomendaciones personalizadas de Outbrain:
Seguirá viendo las recomendaciones de Outbrain.
Inhabilitar el seguimiento personalizado de Outbrain no significa que vaya a dejar de recibir recomendaciones de Outbrain. En lugar de ello, las recomendaciones de Outbrain que reciba no serán personalizadas (es decir, serán recomendaciones basadas en el contexto).
Su inhabilitación está basada en cookies y es específica para el dispositivo/navegador.
Si navega por la página web desde varios dispositivos o navegadores, deberá inhabilitar cada dispositivo o navegador para asegurarse de que no realizamos el seguimiento personalizado en ninguno ellos. Por la misma razón, si compra un dispositivo nuevo, cambia de navegador o borra (o limpia) la cookie de inhabilitación tendrá que inhabilitarla de nuevo. Inhabilitar el seguimiento personalizado no es lo mismo que bloquear las cookies.
No deberá habilitar las recomendaciones de Outbrain durante al menos 21 días, ya que la eliminación de su perfil está vinculada a su UUID.
Su inhabilitación de las recomendaciones personalizadas de Outbrain será efectiva de manera inmediata. No obstante, si su navegador permite el almacenamiento local y usted habilita las recomendaciones personalizadas de Outbrain (por ejemplo, al aceptar un banner de cookie) en un plazo de 21 días después de inhabilitarlas, es posible que su perfil anterior vuelva a conectarse con su UUID. Si no habilita Outbrain en un plazo de 21 días, se eliminará su perfil y no podrá recuperarse.
Como la mayoría de las cookies de inhabilitación, la opción de inhabilitación en el navegador de Outbrain se basa en una cookie.
La cookie de inhabilitación está diseñada con efecto persistente para atender a las preferencias del usuario. Sin embargo, la función de «Prevención de seguimiento inteligente» de iOS11 puede afectar a la persistencia de las cookies entre sitios web por espacio de las siguientes 24 horas. Recomendamos utilizar otro navegador o considerar el bloqueo de las todas las cookies de terceros en el navegador para lograr ser «inhabilitado» sin necesidad de supeditarse a ningún método de inhabilitación efectivo de la compañía.
Su memoria local no se borra.
Aunque haya inhabilitado las recomendaciones personalizadas de Outbrain, su memoria local no se borrará automáticamente y por lo tanto deberá hacerlo usted a través del navegador además de la inhabilitación.
Socios comerciales:
Usted se convierte en Socio comercial cuando se registra (o envía un correo electrónico a Outbrain) en nombre de la compañía para la que trabaja para utilizar los Servicios Outbrain Amplify o Outbrain Engage. Ver más
aquí
.
(a)
Qué información recopilamos y por qué
Puede que usted proporcione ciertos datos personales (como su nombre y/o la dirección de correo electrónico) cuando se suscriba a los servicios de Amplify o Engage o alternativamente cuando se ponga en contacto o interactúe con nosotros. Si solicita convertirse en Socio comercial, es posible que le solicitemos información adicional a través de formularios de solicitud de anunciantes, órdenes de inserción y otros formularios. Asimismo, recopilamos automáticamente información acerca de las acciones de su nombre de usuario en el panel de control de Outbrain. Por ejemplo, como un Socio comercial de Amplify, si usted cambia el coste por clic para una de sus campañas, el registro de auditoría de Outbrain tendrá un registro de todas esas acciones.
Recopilamos y tratamos los datos personales anteriores con el fin de cumplir nuestras obligaciones en virtud de nuestro acuerdo como Socio comercial (o posible Socio comercial) con usted, incluido para:
responder a sus preguntas y solicitudes;
proporcionarle acceso a determinadas funciones y características de nuestros servicios Amplify o Engage (p. ej., para poner a disposición y mantener su cuenta del panel de control);
verificar su identidad; e
informarle sobre su cuenta, nuestros productos y promociones disponibles que puedan ser relevantes para su uso del servicio Amplify o Engage.
(b)
Qué cookies y otras tecnologías similares utilizamos
Consulte en esta
Tabla de cookies
el apartado «Socios comerciales» para obtener un listado de las cookies de origen y de terceros (y sus correspondientes periodos de retención) que utilizamos con los socios comerciales.
(c)
Cómo podemos compartir la información con otros
Podemos revelar cierta información de los Socios comerciales a proveedores, contratistas u otros que ayuden a Outbrain a prestar los servicios (por ejemplo, procesamiento de tarjetas de crédito). Consulte también el apartado «Intercambio» de la presente Política de privacidad.
(d)
Sus derechos
Si como Socio comercial desea verificar, corregir, actualizar o solicitar la desactivación de su información, puede ir al panel de control de Outbrain para editar sus preferencias de perfil o ponerse en contacto con nosotros en
support@outbrain.com
. Si está recibiendo correos electrónicos de Outbrain, puede «darse de baja» haciendo uso del enlace en el correo electrónico. Tenga en cuenta que la cancelación de la suscripción no le inhabilitará las notificaciones que sean críticas para proporcionar los servicios de Amplify o Engage (por ejemplo, facturas por correo electrónico).
(e)
Base legal
La base legal de Outbrain para el tratamiento de datos personales de Socios comerciales es el acuerdo contractual.
4.
Medidas de seguridad, transmisiones fuera del EEE, intercambio y retención de datos
+
Seguridad
Transferencias de datos fuera de la UE/EEE
Intercambio
Retención de datos
Seguridad
Outbrain tiene un equipo de seguridad específico. Mantenemos un estricto control de los datos personales que recopilamos y los retenemos en bases de datos seguras y protegidas por cortafuegos con derechos de acceso estrictamente limitados y controlados, para garantizar su seguridad. Consulte
normas de seguridad
para obtener más información.
Los socios comerciales tienen acceso a determinadas funciones protegidas por contraseña del servicio Amplify o Engage. Los Socios comerciales son responsables de mantener la confidencialidad de la contraseña y de asegurar que lo hagan igualmente sus empleados y/o agentes. No olvide que, lamentablemente, la transmisión de información a través de internet nunca es completamente segura. El «spoofing» o «phishing» son algunas de las estafas más comunes en Internet. Esto se produce cuando recibe un correo electrónico que parece proceder de una fuente legítima que le solicita datos personales. Tenga en cuenta que no le enviaremos ningún correo electrónico solicitándole que verifique la información de su tarjeta de crédito, bancaria o cualquier otro dato personal. Si alguna vez recibe un correo electrónico que parece ser de nuestra parte solicitándole dicha información, no responda a él y no haga clic en ninguno de los enlaces que aparecen en el correo electrónico. En su lugar, reenvíenos el correo electrónico a
legal@outbrain.com
, ya que investigaremos casos de posible fraude en Internet.
Transferencias de datos fuera de la UE/EEE
Cuando transferimos datos personales desde el Espacio Económico Europeo (EEE) garantizamos que dichas transferencias se realizan de conformidad con las leyes de protección de datos relevantes, incluidas, si son de aplicación, las cláusulas contractuales tipo de la UE o una decisión de adecuación de la Comisión Europea en virtud del artículo 25(6) de la Directiva 95/46/CE o el artículo 45 del RGPD. Expresado de otro modo, sus derechos y protecciones quedan adheridos a sus datos y nosotros hacemos uso de cláusulas contractuales aprobadas y otras medidas destinadas a garantizar que los destinatarios de sus datos personales se encarguen de protegerlos. Outbrain ha establecido las cláusulas contractuales tipo entre las entidades de Outbrain para gestionar la transferencia de datos fuera del EEE.
Intercambio
Además de la descripción de cómo podemos revelar sus datos personales en función de cada tipo de usuario, también podemos revelar datos personales de la siguiente manera:
Dentro de la familia de empresas controladas por Outbrain por razones internas, principalmente con fines comerciales y operativos.
Si pasamos por una transición de negocios, como una fusión, adquisición por otra compañía o venta de todos o parte de nuestros activos, es probable que sus datos personales se encuentren entre los activos transferidos.
Cuando la ley así lo requiera (por ejemplo, para cooperar con investigaciones de las fuerzas del orden u otros procedimientos legales).
Para responder a una verdadera emergencia.
Además, combinamos sus datos personales con los de otros usuarios para compartir información sobre tendencias y acumular estadísticas de usuarios con terceros, siempre de forma agregada y anonimizada.
Retención de datos
El período de retención para cada una de las cookies que utiliza Outbrain (ya sea por su cuenta o en nuestro nombre por parte de terceros) se indica en la
Tabla de cookies
. Más específicamente, la cookie de Outbrain (Obuid), que se utiliza para el seguimiento de acciones de los usuarios, tales como clics, expira tres (3) meses después de que un usuario visite un sitio en particular dentro de nuestra red, si bien esta cookie se restablecerá si el usuario vuelve a visitar el mismo sitio u otro sitio de nuestra red. Del mismo modo, no retenemos ningún punto de datos individual de un usuario durante más de 13 meses. Por ejemplo, si el UUID 123 leyó un artículo el 31 de diciembre de 2018, el 1 de febrero de 2019 dicho artículo dejó de formar parte del perfil del UUID 123.
Outbrain también mantiene una Política de Retención de Datos que detalla el período de retención de datos personales sobre la base de nuestro análisis sobre cuánto tiempo es necesario retener razonablemente los datos específicos para fines legales o comerciales. Cuando ya no necesitamos datos personales, los borraremos o destruiremos de forma segura. Los datos agregados, que no puedan identificar un dispositivo/navegador (o a una persona) y se utilicen con fines de información y análisis, se mantendrán durante el tiempo que sea necesario desde el punto de vista comercial.
5.
Niños y datos sensibles
+
Niños
Ninguno de nuestros servicios está dirigido intencionadamente a niños menores de 16 años. No recopilamos de manera consciente datos personales de ninguna persona menor de 16 años de edad. Si en el momento de la recopilación determinamos que un Visitante del sitio, un Usuario o un Socio comercial es menor de 16 años, no utilizaremos ni mantendremos sus datos personales. Si tenemos constancia de que sin saberlo hemos recopilado datos personales de un menor de 16 años, haremos todos los esfuerzos razonables para eliminar dicha información de nuestros registros. ¡Si eres un niño, ve a jugar al patio, no uses ni interactúes con Outbrain!
Datos sensibles
No recopilamos ni recibimos ninguna categoría sensible de datos personales.
6.
Visitantes del territorio europeo
+
De conformidad con determinadas leyes relativas a la privacidad, en particular el Reglamento General de Protección de Datos europeo (RGPD), Outbrain otorga derechos adicionales específicos a las personas individuales que interactúan con Outbrain, como el derecho de acceso, de rectificación, de objeción, de reclamación, de eliminación y de bloqueo. En términos más específicos y bajo determinadas circunstancias:
El derecho a solicitar información sobre si procesamos datos personales y cuáles, así como el derecho a solicitar la rectificación o modificación de dichos datos personales.
El derecho a solicitar el borrado de los datos personales.
El derecho a solicitar la restricción del tratamiento de los datos personales.
El derecho a retirar su consentimiento para el tratamiento y uso de sus datos total o parcialmente en cualquier momento a través de una solicitud en el futuro.
El derecho a obtener sus datos personales en un formato común, estructurado y legible mecánicamente.
Contacte a nuestro responsable de protección de datos para plantear preguntas, presentar sugerencias, reclamaciones o solicitudes en relación con nuestra declaración de protección de datos y el tratamiento de sus datos personales.
El derecho a presentar una reclamación ante la autoridad supervisora responsable si cree que el tratamiento de sus datos personales infringe la legislación.
Además de lo anterior, hacemos referencia a ciertos derechos de los ciudadanos del territorio europeo a través de la presente Política de Privacidad. Según el RGPD, se entienden como ciudadanos de «
Territorios europeos
» los del Espacio Económico Europeo (EEE), el Espacio Europeo de Libre Comercio (EFTA) y Suiza. A los efectos de la presente Política de privacidad, el término «territorio europeo» seguirá incluyendo al Reino Unido, incluso después de que el Reino Unido abandone el Espacio Económico Europeo tras el
Brexit
.
Si tiene cualquier pregunta en relación al ejercicio de los derechos mencionados más arriba, envíe un correo electrónico a
Privacy@outbrain.com
.
7.
Declaración de «no rastreo» (
Do Not Track
)
+
Algunos navegadores transmiten señales de «no rastreo» (DNT, por sus siglas en inglés) a sitios web. Debido a que no existe una idea común de cómo interpretar la señal DNT, Outbrain no altera, cambia ni responde actualmente a las peticiones o señales DNT de estos navegadores. Seguiremos supervisando la actividad del sector en esta área y volveremos a evaluar nuestras prácticas de DNT según sea necesario. Entretanto, puede utilizar todas las demás herramientas que ponemos a disposición para controlar la recopilación y el uso de los datos, incluida la posibilidad de inhabilitar la recepción de recomendaciones personalizadas en el apartado Usuarios.
8.
Cómo puede cambiar esta Política de privacidad
+
Es posible que añadamos cambios de forma periódica a esta Política de privacidad. En este caso, incorporaremos un aviso en primer plano claramente visible para usted como Visitante del sitio o como Socio comercial, pero no disponemos de medio alguno para informar a los Usuarios de una actualización mediante notificación. Le recomendamos que consulte con regularidad si la Política de privacidad ha sido modificada, lo cual podrá comprobar fácilmente ya que indicamos siempre la fecha de la última modificación de la Política de privacidad en la parte superior de la página.
Effective February 16th 2022
Download
Politique de confidentialité
Outbrain s’engage à protéger vos données à caractère personnel. Cette politique de confidentialité (la «
Politique de confidentialité
») régit l’utilisation par Outbrain des données collectées par nous, notamment toutes les données à caractère personnel quelles qu’elles soient. Par données à caractère personnel, on entend les informations qui vous concernent et permettent éventuellement de vous identifier. Nous utilisons vos données à caractère personnel conformément aux lois en vigueur. Afin de garantir la conformité et de nous aligner sur les valeurs d’Outbrain en matière de confiance et de transparence, nous disposons d’une équipe de « privacy champions » chargés de mettre en œuvre en continu notre programme mondial de respect de la vie privée.
+ ESPANDI TUTTO
– TOUT RÉDUIRE
1.
Qui nous sommes, ce que nous faisons, comment contacter Outbrain, notre DPO ou les autorités compétentes
+
Qui nous sommes :
La présente politique de confidentialité s’applique à Outbrain Inc., une société du Delaware (États-Unis) dont le siège se trouve à New York, et à ses succursales affiliées (collectivement désignées par les termes «
Outbrain
», ou «
nous
», «
notre
», «
nos
»). Nous exerçons nos activités dans différents bureaux situés dans plusieurs pays et nous travaillons en partenariat avec des éditeurs et des annonceurs du monde entier.
Veuillez noter que la succursale d’Outbrain, Zemanta Inc., dispose d’une Politique de confidentialité distincte qui est consultable
ici
.
Ce que nous faisons :
Outbrain a pour mission de vous proposer des recommandations pertinentes que nous pensons susceptibles de vous intéresser. Pour remplir cette mission, nous concluons des accords avec :
des éditeurs et des partenaires qui souhaitent recommander des contenus pertinents à leurs utilisateurs (il s’agit d’Outbrain Engage) ;
des annonceurs qui souhaitent que les utilisateurs visualisent leurs contenus (il s’agit d’
Outbrain Amplify
) ; et
des partenaires tiers qui nous aident à proposer des recommandations pertinentes.
Pour en savoir plus sur nos services Amplify (annonceurs), rendez-vous
ici
et sur nos services Engage (éditeurs), rendez-vous
ici
.
Comment nous contacter :
Nous vérifions régulièrement que nous respectons cette Politique de confidentialité. Les questions, commentaires et demandes concernant cette Politique de confidentialité sont les bienvenus. Ils doivent être adressés en premier lieu par e-mail à
privacy@outbrain.com
ou par courrier à
Outbrain Inc., 222 Broadway 19th Floor, New York, NY 10038, Attn: Privacy Questions
.
Si Outbrain ne répond pas de manière satisfaisante à vos questions ou inquiétudes, vous pouvez également contacter, pour des conseils, une assistance ou des réclamations :
le délégué à la protection des données externe d’Outbrain (« DPO ») : ePrivacy GmbH, représenté par Christoph Bauer. Vous pouvez joindre directement ePrivacy GmbH à l’adresse dpo@outbrain.com ; et/ou
Information Commissioner’s Officer
, le service de supervision principal d’Outbrain pour les pays européens.
2.
Alliances et adhésion
+
Nous adhérons aux principes d’autorégulation définis par la
Digital Advertising Alliance
(DAA) et la
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance
(EDAA) ;
Nous sommes membres de plein droit de la
Network Advertising Initiative
(NAI), une association dédiée à la collecte et l’utilisation responsables des données à des fins de publicité numérique. Nous adhérons également au code de bonne conduite de la NAI pour le Web et les appareils mobiles. Outbrain adhère aussi aux principes d’autorégulation de l’Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) pour la publicité comportementale en ligne et à l’OBA Framework de l’IAB Europe.
Nous avons également reçu la certification
JICWEBS DTSG Brand Safety
ici
.
3.
Types d’utilisateurs Outbrain (y compris les Options d’exclusion)
+
La majeure partie de cette Politique de confidentialité est divisée en sections basées sur la manière dont vous interagissez avec Outbrain. Vous êtes un Visiteur des sites, un Utilisateur et/ou un Partenaire commercial (comme défini ci-après). Veuillez déterminer quel type d’utilisateur vous êtes. Pour chaque type d’utilisateur, nous avons expliqué quelles informations nous collectons et pourquoi, quels témoins de connexion ou « cookies » et autres technologies similaires nous utilisons, comment nous partageons ces informations, et vos droits.
Visiteurs des sites :
vous êtes un Visiteur des sites quand vous consultez et interagissez avec
nos
sites Web,
nos
pages Web,
nos
fonctionnalités interactives,
nos
blogs et leur contenu sur
Outbrain.com
(ou tout autre site dérivé comme Outbrain.co.uk ; Outbrain.fr ; outbrain.de etc.) («
Nos Sites
»). Cliquez ici pour en savoir
plus
.
（a）
Quelles informations nous collectons et pourquoi
Nous souhaitons comprendre quels services sur Nos Sites vous intéressent et vous rappeler les services que nous proposons quand vous n’êtes pas sur Nos Sites. Pour ce faire, nous collectons les informations suivantes à partir de votre appareil : (i) l’adresse IP; (ii) les données agent utilisateur : le type d’appareil (ex. : iPhone), le type de navigateur (ex. : Chrome), le système d’exploitation (ex. : iOS) ; (iii) les pages visitées sur Nos Sites (ex. : la page « À propos » d’Outbrain ») ; (iv) l’heure de visite (et le fuseau horaire correspondant) ; et (v) les URL correspondantes et autres informations normalement transmises dans les requêtes HTTP (par exemple, informations indiquant comment vous êtes arrivé sur Nos Sites).
De plus, nous pouvons aussi collecter votre nom et votre adresse e-mail si vous acceptez de nous envoyer vos détails sur Nos Sites (par exemple, en vous inscrivant à notre lettre d’information).
（b）
Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires nous utilisons
Veuillez consulter cette
Table des cookies
, qui est mise à jour ponctuellement, sous la section « Visiteurs des sites » pour obtenir la liste détaillée des cookies propriétaires et tiers (et leur période de conservation respective) qui peuvent être utilisés lorsque vous consultez Nos Sites.
（c）
Comment nous sommes susceptibles de partager les informations
Le partage des informations que nous obtenons sur vous sur nos Sites.
Nous ne vendons pas et/ou ne partageons pas les données à caractère personnel vous concernant avec des tiers à des fins de marketing ou de publicité.  Nous faisons appel à des tiers divers (chacun d’entre eux étant répertorié dans la
Table des cookies
) pour nous aider dans nos démarches commerciales et publicitaires envers vous.  Nous demandons à ces tiers et entreprises d’accepter de respecter l’ensemble des lois en vigueur en matière de protection des données, de préserver la confidentialité de toutes les informations que nous partageons avec eux et de ne les utiliser que pour remplir leurs obligations envers nous. À cette fin, nous concluons des accords avec tous les tiers qui traitent les données à caractère personnel.
Si vous publiez un post sur notre blog, vos commentaires et informations seront disponibles publiquement. Veuillez contacter
support@outbrain.com
pour supprimer vos commentaires.
Utilisation de services de tiers sur nos Sites.
Nos Sites contiennent des liens vers d’autres sites Web dont nous ne sommes ni les propriétaires, ni les exploitants. Nous ne contrôlons, ne recommandons et ne cautionnons pas le contenu, les produits, les services, les politiques de confidentialité ou les pratiques de ces sites Web tiers. Vous noterez par exemple sur Nos Sites la présence d’icônes sur lesquelles vous pouvez cliquer pour accéder à la page Facebook ou LinkedIn d’Outbrain. Si vous choisissez de cliquer sur ces liens, vous devez savoir que ces sites ne sont pas détenus ou exploités par Outbrain et, par conséquent, ces sites Web tiers peuvent déposer leurs propres cookies sur votre appareil et collecter indépendamment des données à caractère personnel. Il est donc important que vous vous familiarisiez avec les politiques de confidentialité de ces sites Web tiers.
Veuillez aussi consulter la section
Partage
de la présente Politique de confidentialité.
(d)
Vos droits
Nos
Conditions d’utilisation
régissent votre utilisation de Nos Sites et s’appliquent à vous lorsque vous interagissez avec Nos Sites. Vous pouvez cesser d’utiliser Nos Sites à tout moment. Dans ce cas, vous souhaiterez peut-être aussi supprimer tout cookie placé sur les appareils, quels qu’ils soient, utilisés pour accéder à Nos Sites. Cette opération peut s’effectuer via votre navigateur. Si vous avez fourni une adresse e-mail lors de l’utilisation de Nos Sites, chaque e-mail que vous recevez de la part d’Outbrain comporte une option de désabonnement (« unsubscribe »). De plus, vous pouvez aussi demander votre exclusion du marketing direct en envoyant un e-mail à l’adresse
support@outbrain.com
.
Pour les Visiteurs des sites de
Pays européens
, Outbrain a mis en place une plateforme de gestion du consentement (exploitée par
One Trust
) sur Nos Sites qui vous donne la possibilité d’accepter, ou de refuser, les cookies et autres technologies de suivi similaires. Lors de l’accès à Nos Sites, vous verrez une bannière au centre de la page avec des informations sur les cookies que nous utilisons. Vous pouvez cliquer sur la bannière pour refuser les cookies (par exemple, les cookies de performance ou les cookies de ciblage) qui ne sont pas des cookies strictement nécessaires (au sens défini dans la Table des cookies). En cliquant sur « J’accepte » dans la bannière, vous indiquez que vous acceptez les cookies et les technologies de suivi similaires. La base juridique d’Outbrain pour le traitement des données à caractère personnel des Visiteurs des sites de Pays européens sur Nos Sites est le consentement. Vous pouvez retirer votre consentement à tout moment
Cookies Settings
. Concernant tous les autres Visiteurs des sites qui ne sont pas basés dans des Pays européens, nous faisons valoir notre intérêt légitime pour le traitement des données à caractère personnel. Toutefois, cela n’exclut pas que les Visiteurs des sites de Pays non européens retirent leur consentement à tout moment sur notre plateforme de gestion du consentement.
Utilisateurs :
vous êtes un Utilisateur si vous visitez la page d’un site ou une application d’un des partenaires d’Outbrain sur laquelle le widget Outbrain est installé ou sur laquelle nos recommandations figurent (les «
Sites de partenaires »
). Par exemple, si vous consultez
https://news.sky.com/uk
,
www.spiegel.de
ou
www.cnn.com
, le widget Outbrain est exécuté sur ces sites Web. Les mentions référençant Outbrain (ex. : « Recommandé par Outbrain », « by Outbrain » à côté des recommandations) vous indiquent la présence d’un widget Outbrain. Si vous cliquez sur le lien de la référence Outbrain, vous visualiserez une
notification détaillée
qui vous permettra d’accéder au
Portail d’intérêts Outbrain
et à la présente Politique de confidentialité dans laquelle vous pouvez demander votre exclusion des recommandations personnalisées. Parfois, un partenaire peut avoir un service d’Outbrain générique pour sa propre offre. Dans ce cas, ces partenaires doivent préciser leur utilisation d’Outbrain dans leurs politiques de confidentialité. Cliquez ici pour en savoir
plus
.
Exemple de widget Outbrain
(a)
Quelles informations nous collectons et pourquoi
Nous utilisons les UUID, l’adresse IP et d’autres informations d’usage afin de proposer des recommandations intéressantes. Les recommandations d’Outbrain peuvent être payées par un annonceur pour vous mettre en relation avec un nouveau site Web. Elles peuvent aussi être organiques avec un lien vers une autre page du site du même partenaire.
UUID.
Quand vous consultez un Site de Partenaire (ex. : CNN.com) en tant qu’Utilisateur pour la première fois, Outbrain dépose un cookie sur votre appareil afin de générer un UUID. De même, si vous interagissez pour la première fois avec un Partenaire en utilisant l’application du Partenaire, Outbrain reçoit l’identifiant d’annonceur qui vous est attribué par votre appareil. Nous répertorions et analysons le contenu que vous consommez sur les Sites de Partenaires. Nos recommandations se basent sur : (i) l’historique de navigation des UUID ; (ii) les profils de consommation similaires d’autres Utilisateurs ; (iii) les recommandations généralement populaires auprès des utilisateurs d’Outbrain à ce moment-là ; (iv) quelques données aléatoires ; et (v) les exigences de ciblage éventuellement fournies ou demandées par nos clients Amplify. À titre d’exemple, Outbrain peut savoir que l’UUID 123 (cela pourrait être vous sur votre iPhone X lisant The Guardian en utilisant Chrome comme navigateur) aime lire des articles sur les destinations de vacances lointaines et que les personnes qui aiment lire ce type d’article aiment aussi les contenus sur la nourriture exotique. Lorsque vous interagissez avec Outbrain, nous ne collectons pas les données à caractère personnel traditionnelles auprès de vous, comme le nom ou l’adresse e-mail, nous ne pouvons donc pas associer votre nom avec votre UUID (par exemple, nous ne savons pas que Jean Dupont, qui est aussi l’UUID 123, aime lire des articles sur les destinations de vacances lointaines).
L’UUID est une séquence de chiffres et/ou de lettres. Cet UUID est rattaché à votre appareil et varie en fonction du navigateur que vous lui associez. Autrement dit, Outbrain enregistre un UUID différent selon le navigateur et/ou appareil que vous utilisez pour accéder aux Sites de Partenaires. Vous aurez, par exemple, un UUID quand vous consultez un Site de Partenaire depuis votre téléphone portable avec le navigateur Safari et un autre UUID pour la consultation d’un Site de Partenaire depuis votre iPad avec le navigateur Safari. Outbrain combinera et consolidera l’UUID depuis un appareil mobile (portable ou tablette) avec un navigateur qui accède ensuite à l’application (ou inversement) à partir du même appareil. Outbrain n’effectue aucun suivi entre les appareils et ne peut donc pas identifier un utilisateur interagissant avec Outbrain sur son téléphone comme étant le même utilisateur que celui qui interagit avec Outbrain sur son ordinateur portable.
Adresse IP
Outre votre UUID, nous reconnaissons votre adresse IP que nous convertissons en position géographique et supprimons le dernier octet pour masquer les informations d’identification. Nous exploitons ensuite ces informations masquées, conjointement avec des informations que nous recevons d’autres partenaires tiers de confiance (tels que MaxMind) pour bien identifier votre localisation (par exemple, Paris). Outbrain continuera de reconnaître votre adresse IP même si vous demandez votre exclusion du suivi personnalisé, car cela est nécessaire pour continuer à proposer des recommandations basées sur le contexte. Toutefois, dans ce cas, votre adresse IP n’est pas associée à votre UUID et ne figurera dans aucun profil utilisateur.
Autres informations d’utilisation
Outre votre UUID et votre adresse IP, nous collectons également auprès de vous les informations suivantes (a) sur les sites Web pour mobile et ordinateur de bureau : (i) les données agent utilisateur : le type d’appareil (ex. : iPhone), le type de navigateur (ex. : Chrome), le système d’exploitation (ex. : iOS) ; (ii) les pages visitées ; (iii) l’heure de visite ; et (iv) les URL correspondantes et autres informations normalement transmises dans les requêtes HTTP.Les informations statistiques ci-dessus nous donnent des informations sur le nombre d’Utilisateurs consultant une page spécifique sur nos Sites de Partenaires sur lesquels le widget Outbrain est installé, le temps que chaque Utilisateur a passé sur cette page, le type de contenu sur cette page sur lequel ils ont cliqué et la manière générale dont ils ont interagi avec cette page ; et (b) sur les applications : (i) la version de l’application (telle qu’elle apparaît dans App Store ou Play Store) ; (ii) l’ID de l’application ou le nom de package (tel qu’il apparaît dans App Store ou Play Store) ; (iii) le système d’exploitation (ex. : iOS ou Android) ; (iii) la version du système d’exploitation ; et (iv) le modèle d’appareil (ex. : iPhone X). Ces informations sont assimilées à des données à caractère personnel si Outbrain les associe à un UUID.
Outbrain n’ayant aucune relation directe avec les Utilisateurs interagissant avec les Sites de Partenaires, Outbrain s’appuie sur ses partenaires pour déterminer la base juridique sur laquelle Outbrain peut traiter les données à caractère personnel. Chaque site de partenaire s’appuie sur
(b)
Cookies et autres technologies similaires nous utilisons
Cookies Outbrain
Pixels Outbrain
Pixel Tiers
Cookies Outbrain
Veuillez consulter la
Tables des cookies
sous « Utilisateurs » pour obtenir la liste détaillée des Cookies propriétaires que nous utilisons quand vous interagissez avec des Sites de Partenaires où la technologie Outbrain est mise en œuvre.
Pixels Outbrain
En complément du widget visible d’Outbrain sur nos Sites de Partenaires, certains annonceurs Outbrain peuvent mettre en œuvre le pixel Outbrain sur leurs sites Web. Le pixel Outbrain détermine si l’Utilisateur qui atteint la page où le pixel est installé a un UUID Outbrain afin de livrer un rapport aux annonceurs concernant leur campagne spécifique. S’il existe un UUID associé avec un utilisateur final, Outbrain permet aux annonceurs de recibler ces UUID et/ou leur indique le nombre total d’Utilisateurs (sur une base agrégée et anonymisée) ayant atteint cette page (par exemple, un annonceur ne connaît pas cet UUID1234 converti, mais sait seulement qu’une conversion a eu lieu). Outbrain ne transmet pas de données à caractère personnel à ses annonceurs (y compris votre UUID) et ne collecte pas d’autres données à caractère personnel via le pixel. Outbrain ne combine aucune information reçue du pixel Outbrain avec le profil d’un UUID (par exemple, Outbrain sait seulement qu’une conversion a eu lieu et ignore que l’UUID123 s’est converti lorsqu’il a atteint la page sélectionnée de l’annonceur). Nous exigeons des annonceurs qu’ils révèlent l’utilisation du pixel Outbrain sur leurs propres sites Web.
Outbrain peut aussi autoriser certains partenaires tiers de confiance à collecter des données via les cookies fournis par le biais du widget Outbrain. Dans ce cas, Outbrain ne transmet pas à ces tiers les données qu’Outbrain collecte sur ses Utilisateurs, mais autorise lesdits tiers à collecter directement des données (y compris des données à caractère personnel) via le widget à des fins de lutte contre la fraude et/ou de sécurité, ou pour fournir des informations de mesure aux annonceurs (telles que le nombre de conversions et/ou d’impressions). Cette collecte est régie par la politique de confidentialité de ces tiers.
Pixel Tiers
Si vous cliquez sur le lien d’une de nos recommandations, l’annonceur qui sponsorise la recommandation est susceptible de placer des cookies (ou des cookies tiers de tiers agissant pour le compte de l’annonceur) sur votre appareil lors de la redirection avant d’arriver sur la page de destination des recommandations ou en atteignant la page de destination. Ces cookies sont déposés dans le but de fournir des analyses à l’annonceur concernant sa campagne (par exemple, pour voir combien d’utilisateurs ont vu la campagne de l’annonceur). Nous exigeons de nos annonceurs qu’ils révèlent l’utilisation de pixels et/ou de cookies tiers aux utilisateurs finaux via leur site Web. Ces cookies et/ou ces pixels étant ajoutés à la seule discrétion de nos annonceurs, vous serez soumis à la notification de confidentialité et/ou à la politique de confidentialité de cet annonceur.
(c)
Comment nous sommes susceptibles de partager les informations
Nos Partenaires
Outbrain ne partage pas et/ou ne vend pas les profils complets des Utilisateurs avec des tiers, quels qu’ils soient. Cependant, nous pouvons partager certains éléments d’un profil utilisateur (par exemple, l’UUID) avec les partenaires suivants, y compris les :
Partenaires spécialisés dans la sécurité de marque, l’analyse et la fraude ;
Plateformes côté demande (DSP) et Plateformes côté offre (SSP) ;
Bourses d’annonces et/ou réseaux d’annonces ; et
Plateformes de gestion de la demande.
Rendez-vous
ici
pour consulter la liste de certains de nos partenaires de confiance.  En outre, nous pouvons collecter et/ou partager certaines données à caractère personnel avec des partenaires de confiance dans le cadre de la participation à OpenRTB. Bon nombre de ces partenaires sont inscrits au TCF de l’IAB comme fournisseurs mondiaux et sont visibles
ici
.
(d)
Vos droits
Exclusion Outbrain sur sites Web pour mobile et ordinateur de bureau
Exclusion Outbrain sur sites Web pour mobile et ordinateur de bureau.
Vous pouvez demander une exclusion des recommandations personnalisées d’Outbrain (ou, si vous avez activé l’exclusion et souhaitez rétablir l’inclusion) à tout moment en déplaçant le commutateur ci-dessous. Vous pouvez aussi demander une exclusion des recommandations personnalisées depuis le
Profil d’intérêts
d’Outbrain, un site Web qui fournit une vue d’ensemble des données qu’Outbrain détient sur vous et peut exploiter pour effectuer ses recommandations.
Exclusion Outbrain sur les applications
Exclusion Outbrain sur les applications.
Pour demander l’exclusion des recommandations d’Outbrain dans vos applications mobiles, vous pouvez procéder de la façon suivante :
Appareils iOS : Réglages > Confidentialité > Publicité > Suivi publicitaire limité
Appareils Android : Appli Paramètres de Google > Annonces > Désactiver personnalisation des annonces
Veuillez noter qu’une exclusion via notre Profil d’intérêts et/ou la présente Politique de confidentialité ne vous exclura pas du suivi personnalisé sur vos applications. Cette exclusion doit être effectuée à partir des options de réglage de votre appareil.
Options d’exclusion complémentaires
.
Vous pouvez également demander votre exclusion de la réception de publicités personnalisées de notre part ou de celle d’autres sociétés publicitaires à l’aide d’outils fournis par le secteur comme la NAI ou des pages basées sur la DAA (DAA,
http://www.aboutads.info/choices
; DAAC,
www.youradchoices.ca/choices
; et/ou EDAA
www.youronlinechoices.eu
). En vous rendant sur les pages de choix du consommateur de la NAI, la DAA, la DACC (Alliance de la publicité numérique du Canada) ou de l’EDAA, vous pourrez refuser tout ou partie des services de leurs membres. Comme dans le cas de l’exclusion pour Outbrain, ces retraits ne signifient pas que vous ne recevrez plus aucune publicité, mais les publicités que vous recevrez ne seront plus personnalisées. Vous continuerez à recevoir des publicités, par exemple basées sur le site Web spécifique que vous êtes en train de consulter (à savoir des publicités liées au contexte). Par ailleurs, si vos navigateurs sont configurés pour refuser les cookies quand vous visitez les pages du consommateur de la DAA, de la DAAC ou de l’EDAA, votre exclusion (ou retrait) peut ne pas être effective, car notre système d’exclusion est basé sur les cookies.
Informations IMPORTANTES
Même si vous avez demandé l’exclusion des recommandations personnalisées d’Outbrain:
Vous continuerez à voir des recommandations Outbrain.
Le fait de demander votre exclusion du suivi de personnalisation d’Outbrain ne signifie pas que vous cesserez de recevoir des recommandations d’Outbrain. En revanche, cela signifie que les recommandations d’Outbrain ne seront pas personnalisées (à savoir des recommandations liées au contexte).
Votre exclusion des recommandations personnalisées est fondée sur les cookies et est spécifique à un appareil/navigateur.
Si vous naviguez sur Internet depuis plusieurs appareils et/ou navigateurs, vous devrez demander l’exclusion pour chaque appareil et/ou navigateur pour garantir que nous bloquons le suivi de personnalisation sur tous les dispositifs. Pour la même raison, si vous achetez un nouvel appareil, changez de navigateurs ou supprimez (ou effacez) le cookie d’exclusion, vous devrez effectuer à nouveau une demande d’exclusion. Demander l’exclusion du suivi de personnalisation n’est pas la même chose que bloquer les cookies.
Vous ne devez pas faire de demande d’exclusion à Outbrain pendant au moins 21 jours, car la suppression de votre profil est liée à votre UUID.
.
Votre demande d’exclusion des recommandations personnalisées d’Outbrain prend effet immédiatement. Cependant, si votre navigateur autorise un stockage local et si vous demandez votre inclusion dans les recommandations personnalisées (par exemple en acceptant une bannière de cookies) dans les 21 jours suivant votre demande d’exclusion, il est possible que votre profil antérieur soit reconnecté à votre UUID. Si vous ne procédez pas à une nouvelle demande d’inclusion dans les 21 jours, votre profil sera supprimé et ne pourra pas être récupéré.
Comme avec la plupart des cookies d’exclusion, l’exclusion dans le navigateur Outbrain s’appuie sur un cookie.
Le cookie d’exclusion est conçu pour être persistant afin de respecter les préférences de l’utilisateur. Cependant, la fonctionnalité « Intelligent Tracking Prevention » sous iOS11 peut impacter la persistance des cookies sur les sites Web au-delà de 24 heures. Nous vous conseillons d’utiliser un autre navigateur ou d’envisager de bloquer les cookies tiers depuis le navigateur afin que vous soyez « exclu » sans avoir à vous fier à la méthodologie de réelle exclusion d’une entreprise.
Votre espace de stockage local ne sera pas effacé.
Même si vous avez demandé l’exclusion des recommandations personnalisées d’Outbrain, votre espace de stockage local ne sera pas effacé automatiquement et vous devrez donc l’effacer au niveau du navigateur en plus de votre exclusion.
Partenaires commerciaux :
vous êtes un Partenaire commercial si vous souscrivez (ou échangez des e-mails avec Outbrain) pour le compte de la société dans laquelle vous travaillez aux services Outbrain Amplify ou Outbrain Engage. Cliquez ici pour en savoir
plus
.
(a)
Quelles informations nous collectons et pourquoi
Vous êtes susceptible de fournir certaines données à caractère personnel (telles que votre nom et/ou adresse e-mail) quand vous souscrivez aux services Amplify ou Engage, communiquez ou interagissez avec nous d’une autre manière. Si vous demandez à devenir Partenaire, nous sommes susceptibles de vous demander des informations complémentaires sous forme de formulaires de candidature annonceur, d’ordres d’insertion ou autres. De plus, nous collectons automatiquement des informations sur les actions liées à votre nom d’utilisateur dans le tableau de bord Outbrain. Par exemple, si vous modifiez, en tant que Partenaire Amplify, le coût-par-clic d’une de vos campagnes, la piste d’audit d’Outbrain gardera un enregistrement de toutes ces actions.
Nous collectons et traitons les données à caractère personnel ci-dessus afin de remplir nos obligations au titre de notre accord avec un Partenaire (ou Partenaire potentiel) notamment pour :
répondre à vos questions et demandes ;
vous donner accès à certaines fonctions et fonctionnalités de nos services Amplify ou Engage (par exemple pour fournir et tenir à jour le compte de votre tableau de bord) ;
vérifier votre identité ; et
communiquer avec vous sur votre compte, nos produits et les promotions disponibles compte tenu de votre utilisation du service Amplify ou Engage.
(b)
Quels cookies et autres technologies similaires nous utilisons
Veuillez consulter cette
Table des cookies
sous « Partenaires commerciaux » pour obtenir la liste détaillée des cookies propriétaires et tiers (et de leur période de conservation respective) que nous utilisons avec les Partenaires.
(c)
Comment nous sommes susceptibles de partager les informations
Nous sommes susceptibles de divulguer certaines informations de Partenaires aux prestataires, sous-traitants ou autres qui contribuent à la prestation des services Outbrain (ex. : traitement des cartes de crédit). Veuillez aussi consulter lasection Partage de la présente Politique de confidentialité.
(d)
Vos droits
Si, en tant que Partenaire, vous souhaitez vérifier, corriger, mettre à jour ou demander la désactivation de vos informations, rendez-vous dans le tableau de bord Outbrain pour modifier vos préférences de profil ou contactez-nous à l’adresse
support@outbrain.com
. Si vous recevez des e-mails Outbrain, vous pouvez vous « désabonner » en utilisant le lien dans l’e-mail. Veuillez noter que le désabonnement n’exclut pas que vous receviez des notifications importantes pour la fourniture des services Amplify ou Engage (ex. : factures électroniques).
(e)
Base juridique
La base juridique d’Outbrain pour le traitement des données à caractère personnel des Partenaires commerciaux est le contrat.
4.
Mesures de sécurité, Transferts hors de l’EEE, Partage et conservation des données
+
Sécurité
Transferts des données hors de l’UE/EEE
Partage
Conservation des données
Sécurité
Outbrain dispose d’une équipe de sécurité dédiée. Nous mettons en œuvre des contrôles stricts sur les données que nous collectons, en les conservant dans des bases de données sécurisées et protégées par des pare-feu avec des droits d’accès contrôlés et limités afin de garantir leur sécurité. Veuillez consulter
normes de sécurité
pour de plus amples informations.
Les Partenaires commerciaux ont un accès protégé par un mot de passe à certaines fonctionnalités du service Amplify ou Engage. Les Partenaires commerciaux sont tenus de garder ce mot de passe confidentiel et de veiller au respect de cette règle par leurs salariés et/ou leurs mandataires. N’oubliez pas que la transmission d’informations par Internet n’est malheureusement jamais complètement sécurisée. Une des fraudes classiques sur Internet est connue sous le nom d’usurpation d’identité électronique (« spoofing ») ou hameçonnage (« phishing »). Ceci se produit quand vous recevez un e-mail d’une source apparemment légitime vous demandant de lui fournir des données à caractère personnel. Sachez que nous ne vous enverrons aucun e-mail vous demandant de vérifier un numéro de carte de crédit, des informations bancaires ou autres données à caractère personnel. Si vous recevez un e-mail semblant provenir de nous vous demandant de nous fournir de telles informations, n’y répondez pas et ne cliquez sur aucun lien apparaissant dans ce message électronique. Veuillez plutôt nous transférer l’e-mail à l’adresse
legal@outbrain.com
, car nous mènerons des enquêtes sur d’éventuelles fraudes sur Internet.
Transferts des données hors de l’UE/EEE
Lorsque nous transférons des données à caractère personnel à partir de l’Espace économique européen (EEE), nous veillons à ce que ces transferts soient conformes aux lois applicables en matière de protection de données, y compris, le cas échéant, aux clauses contractuelles types de l’UE ou à une décision d’adéquation favorable de la Commission européenne en vertu de l’article 25(6) de la Directive 95/46/CE ou de l’article 45 du RGPD. En d’autres termes, vos droits et protections demeurent avec vos données et nous utilisons des clauses contractuelles approuvées et d’autres mesures conçues pour garantir que les destinataires de vos données à caractère personnel les protègent. Outbrain a mis en place les Clauses contractuelles types entre les entités d’Outbrain pour la gouvernance du transfert de données hors de l’EEE.
Partage
En complément de la description de la manière dont nous sommes susceptibles de divulguer vos données à caractère personnel pour chaque type d’utilisateur, nous pouvons également divulguer les données à caractère personnel comme suit :
Au sein de la famille des sociétés contrôlées par Outbrain pour des raisons internes, particulièrement pour des objectifs liés aux activités et au fonctionnement de l’entreprise ;
Si nous faisons face à une évolution de notre entreprise, comme une fusion, l’acquisition d’une autre société ou la vente de tout ou partie de nos actifs, vos données à caractère personnel sont susceptibles de faire partie des actifs transférés ;
En cas d’exigences légales le demandant (par exemple pour coopérer dans le cadre d’investigations sur la mise en application de la législation ou autres procédures légales) ; et/ou
Pour répondre à une urgence.
Par ailleurs, nous combinons vos données à caractère personnel avec celles d’autres utilisateurs afin de partager des informations sur les tendances et de rassembler des statistiques d’utilisation avec des tiers, toujours sous forme agrégée et anonyme.
Conservation des données
La période de conservation pour chacun des cookies utilisés par Outbrain (que ce soit par nous-mêmes ou par des tiers en notre nom) est définie dans la
Tables des cookies
. Plus particulièrement, le cookie Outbrain (Obuid), qui permet de suivre les actions des utilisateurs telles que les clics, expire trois (3) mois après qu’un utilisateur a visité un site spécifique sur notre réseau. Cependant, ce cookie se réinitialisera si un utilisateur retourne sur le même site ou sur un site différent au sein de notre réseau. De plus, nous ne conservons aucun point de données individuel sur un Utilisateur au-delà de 13 mois. Par exemple, si l’UUID 123 lit un article le 31 décembre 2018, cet article ne fera plus partie du profil de l’UUID 123 au 1er février 2019.
Outbrain tient également à jour une Politique de conservation des données qui détaille la période de conservation pour les données à caractère personnel sur la base de notre analyse de la durée raisonnable de conservation nécessaire de données particulières pour des raisons légales ou opérationnelles. Quand nous n’avons plus besoin des données à caractère personnel, nous les supprimons ou les détruisons de manière sécurisée. Les données agrégées, qui ne permettent pas d’identifier un appareil/navigateur (ou un individu) et sont utilisées à des fins de reporting et d’analyse, sont conservées aussi longtemps que commercialement nécessaire.
5.
Enfants et Données sensibles
+
Enfants
Aucun de nos services n’est destiné intentionnellement à des enfants de moins de 16 ans. Nous ne recueillons pas sciemment de données à caractère personnel auprès d’enfants âgés de moins de 16 ans. Si nous réalisons en cours de collecte qu’un Visiteur des sites, un Utilisateur ou un Partenaire commercial a moins de 16 ans, nous n’utiliserons ni ne conserverons ses données à caractère personnel. Si nous réalisons que nous avons involontairement collecté des données à caractère personnel auprès d’un enfant de moins de 16 ans, nous prendrons alors les mesures raisonnables pour supprimer ces informations de nos registres. Si vous êtes un enfant, allez jouer dans la cour, n’utilisez pas Outbrain, n’interagissez pas avec nous !
Données sensibles
Nous ne collectons ni ne recevons aucune catégorie sensible de données à caractère personnel.
6.
Visiteurs de Pays européens
+
Conformément à certaines lois sur le respect de la vie privée, en particulier le Règlement général sur la protection des données (RGPD), Outbrain octroie des droits particuliers complémentaires aux individus qui interagissent avec Outbrain, comme le droit d’accès aux données, le droit de rectification, le droit d’opposition, le droit de porter réclamation, le droit à l’effacement et le droit de blocage. Plus particulièrement et sous certaines conditions :
le droit de demander des informations sur l’utilisation ou non de données à caractère personnel par nous, et si oui, lesquelles, et le droit de demander la rectification ou la modification de données à caractère personnel ;
le droit de demander la suppression de données à caractère personnel ;
le droit de demander la limitation du traitement des données à caractère personnel ;
le droit de retirer votre consentement à l’utilisation et au traitement de vos données, intégralement ou partiellement, à tout moment, avec effet futur ;
le droit d’obtenir vos données à caractère personnel dans un format classique, structuré et lisible par machine ;
la possibilité de contacter notre délégué à la protection des données (« DPO ») pour toute question, commentaire, réclamation ou demande en lien avec notre déclaration sur la protection des données et le traitement de vos données à caractère personnel ;
le droit d’introduire une réclamation auprès de l’autorité de contrôle si vous êtes persuadé que le traitement de vos données à caractère personnel constitue une violation de la législation.
En complément des droits ci-dessus, nous référençons certains droits pour les citoyens des pays européens dans cette Politique de confidentialité. Conformément au RGPD, les citoyens des «
Pays européens
» désignent les citoyens de l’Espace économique européen (EEE), de l’Association européenne de libre-échange (AELE) et de la Suisse. Aux fins de cette Politique de confidentialité, le terme « pays européens » continuera d’inclure le Royaume-Uni, même après son départ de l’Espace économique européen suite au Brexit.
Veuillez adresser un e-mail à l’adresse
Privacy@outbrain.com
pour toute question relative à l’exercice des droits susmentionnés quels qu’ils soient.
7.
Dispositions « Do Not Track » (non-traçage)
+
Certains navigateurs transmettent des signaux refusant le traçage de données (« do not track ») aux sites Web. Outbrain ne procède actuellement à aucune altération, modification ou réponse aux demandes ou signaux de non-traçage de ces navigateurs car il n’existe pas de compréhension commune sur la manière d’interpréter les signaux de non-traçage. Nous continuerons de suivre l’activité du secteur dans ce domaine et réévaluerons nos pratiques de non-traçage si nécessaire. En attendant, vous pouvez utiliser notre gamme d’outils complémentaires pour contrôler la collecte et l’utilisation des données, et qui donnent notamment la possibilité de demander l’exclusion de la réception de recommandations personnalisées (« opt-out ») dans la section Utilisateurs.
8.
Les modifications qui pourraient être apportées à cette Politique de confidentialité
+
Nous sommes susceptibles de modifier la présente Politique de confidentialité de manière ponctuelle. Nous afficherons clairement une notification que vous pourrez voir en tant que Visiteur des sites ou Partenaire commercial, mais nous n’avons pas de moyen d’informer les Utilisateurs d’une mise à jour par le biais d’une notification. Vous devez vérifier ici régulièrement si la Politique de confidentialité a été mise à jour, car nous indiquerons toujours la date de la dernière modification de la Politique de confidentialité en haut de la page afin que vous puissiez savoir quand elle a été révisée pour la dernière fois.
Effective February 16th 2022
Download
Politica sulla privacy
Outbrain si impegna a proteggere i tuoi dati personali. La presente informativa sulla privacy (“
Politica sulla privacy
”) disciplina l'utilizzo da parte nostra dei dati che raccogliamo, ivi inclusi tutti i dati personali. I dati personali sono informazioni che si riferiscono a te e possono identificarti come individuo. Utilizziamo i tuoi dati personali in linea con tutte le leggi applicabili. Al fine di garantire il rispetto e l'allineamento con i valori di Outbrain in materia di fiducia e trasparenza, disponiamo di un team di esperti di privacy responsabili dell'implementazione continua del nostro programma di privacy globale.
+ ESPANDI TUTTO
– RIDUCI TUTTO
1.
Chi siamo, Cosa facciamo, Come puoi contattare Outbrain, il nostro RPD o le autorità competenti
+
Chi siamo:
questa politica sulla privacy si applica a Outbrain Inc., un'azienda del Delaware (USA) con sede a New York; e le sue partecipate
(
collettivamente, “Outbrain,” o “noi”, “ci”, “nostro”)
. Operiamo da diversi uffici in tutto il mondo e collaboriamo con editori e operatori di mercato in tutto il mondo.
Nota che Zemanta Inc, consociata di Outbrain, ha una politica sulla privacy separata, che può essere consultata
qui
.
Cosa facciamo:
la mission di Outbrain è quella di fornirti consigli e raccomandazioni interessanti sulla base di quelli che riteniamo essere i tuoi interessi. Per realizzare la nostra mission stipuliamo accordi con:
editori e partner online che desiderano consigliare contenuti pertinenti ai loro lettori (si tratta del servizio Outbrain Engage);
inserzionisti che desiderano che i lettori visualizzino i loro contenuti (si tratta del servizio
Outbrain Amplify
) e
partner terzi che ci aiutano a fornire raccomandazioni pertinenti.
Per ulteriori informazioni sui nostri servizi Amplify (inserzionisti) clicca
qui
mentre per i nostri servizi Engage (editori) clicca
qui
.
Come contattarci:
Esaminiamo regolarmente la nostra osservanza della presente politica sulla privacy. Domande, commenti e richieste riguardanti la presente politica sulla privacy sono apprezzati e vanno indirizzati a
privacy@outbrain.com
oppure all'indirizzo postale:
Outbrain Inc., 222 Broadway 19th Floor, New York, NY 10038, Attn:
Domande sulla privacy.
Qualora Outbrain non risponda in maniera soddisfacente alle tue domande o richieste, puoi altresì contattare i seguenti contatti di riferimento per consigli, supporto o reclami
Il responsabile esterno della protezione dei dati di Outbrain ("DPO"): ePrivacy GmbH, rappresentato dal Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. ePrivacy GmbH è raggiungibile direttamente presso dpo@outbrain.com ; e/o
l'
Information Commissioner’s Officer
, che è la principale autorità di controllo su Outbrain all'interno dei Territori europei.
2.
Alleanze e Adesioni
+
Aderiamo ai principi di autoregolamentazione stabiliti da
Digital Advertising Alliance
(DAA) e da
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance
(EDAA).
Siamo soci in regola della
Network Advertising Initiative
(NAI), un'associazione dedicata alla raccolta responsabile di dati e al loro utilizzo per la pubblicità digitale. Aderiamo al Codice di condotta NAI anche per il settore Web e Mobile. Outbrain aderisce altresì ai principi di autoregolamentazione dell'Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) per la pubblicità comportamentale online e al framework di IAB Europa per la pubblicità comportamentale online; e
Siamo anche
certificati con JICWEBS DTSG Brand Safety
qui
.
3.
Tipi di utente Outbrain (incluse le opzioni di opt-out)
+
Gran parte della presente politica sulla privacy è suddivisa in sezioni in base alle modalità in cui è possibile interagire con Outbrain. Tu sei o un visitatore del sito oppure un utente e/o un partner commerciale (come definito di seguito). Ti preghiamo di stabilire quale tipo di utente sei, in quanto, per ogni tipo di utente descriviamo i tuoi diritti, quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché, quali cookie e altre tecnologie analoghe utilizziamo e come condividiamo tali informazioni.
Visitatori del sito:
sei un visitatore del sito quando visiti e interagisci con i nostri siti web, le nostre pagine web, le funzioni interattive, i blog e i loro rispettivi contenuti disponibili all'indirizzo
Outbrain.com
(o qualsiasi sua derivazione, come Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; outbrain.de, ecc.) (“
I nostri siti
“). Scopri di più
qui
.
（a）
Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
Desideriamo capire quali servizi sui nostri siti ti interessano e desideriamo ricordarti i servizi che offriamo quando non sei sui nostri siti. Per farlo, raccogliamo le seguenti informazioni dal tuo dispositivo: (i) indirizzo IP; (ii) dati dell'user agent: tipo di dispositivo (ad es. iPhone), tipo di browser (ad es. Chrome), sistema operativo (ad es. iOS); (iii) le pagine visitate sui nostri siti (ad es. la pagina "Chi siamo" di Outbrain); (iv) l'orario della visita (e il fuso orario corrispondente); nonché (v) le URL di riferimento e altre informazioni normalmente trasmesse nelle richieste HTTP (ad esempio, queste informazioni ci dicono come sei arrivato sui nostri siti).
Inoltre, possiamo anche raccogliere il tuo nome e il tuo indirizzo e-mail se accetti di inviarci i tuoi dati tramite i nostri siti (ad esempio, iscrivendoti alla nostra newsletter).
（b）
Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
Visita questa
Tabella dei cookie
che viene aggiornata di volta in volta, nella sezione "Visitatori del Sito", per un elenco dettagliato dei cookie proprietari e di terze parti (e dei relativi periodi di conservazione) che possono essere utilizzati quando visiti i nostri siti.
（c）
Come possiamo condividere le informazioni
Condivisione delle informazioni che acquisiamo su di te sui nostri siti.
Non vendiamo e/o condividiamo i tuoi dati personali con terzi per finalità di pubblicità o marketing. Possiamo ricorrere a vari terzi (ciascuno elencato nella
Tabella dei cookie
) affinché ci aiutino a svolgere attività di commercializzazione o pubblicità nei tuoi confronti. Richiediamo a tali parti e società terze di impegnarsi a rispettare tutte le leggi applicabili sulla protezione dei dati, ad acconsentire a mantenere riservate tutte le informazioni condivise con loro e a utilizzare tali informazioni esclusivamente per adempiere ai loro obblighi nei nostri confronti. Lo facciamo stipulando accordi con tutte le terze parti che trattano i dati personali.
Se pubblichi un post sul nostro blog, i tuoi commenti e le tue informazioni saranno disponibili al pubblico. Contatta
support@outbrain.com
per rimuovere il tuo commento.
Utilizzo di servizi di terzi sui nostri siti.
I nostri siti contengono collegamenti ad altri siti web che non sono di nostra proprietà o gestiti da noi. Non controlliamo, raccomandiamo o approviamo il contenuto, i prodotti, i servizi, le politiche sulla privacy o le pratiche di tali siti web di terzi. Ad esempio, sui nostri siti noterai icone cliccabili che ti condurranno alla pagina Facebook di Outbrain o alla pagina LinkedIn di Outbrain. Se scegli di fare clic su tali collegamenti, devi sapere che questi siti non sono di proprietà o gestiti da Outbrain e che quindi questi siti web di terze parti potrebbero inviare i propri cookie al tuo dispositivo e potrebbero raccogliere dati personali in maniera indipendente. È quindi importante che tu conosca le politiche sulla privacy di questi siti web terzi.
Consulta anche la sezione
Condivisione
della presente politica sulla privacy.
(d)
I tuoi diritti
Le nostre
Condizioni d’uso
disciplinano l'uso dei nostri siti e si applicano a te quando interagisci con i nostri siti. Puoi smettere di usare i nostri siti in qualsiasi momento. Se lo fai, potresti voler rimuovere tutti i cookie che abbiamo inserito su qualsiasi dispositivo utilizzato per accedere ai nostri siti, attraverso il tuo browser. Se durante l'utilizzo dei nostri siti hai fornito il tuo indirizzo e-mail, qualsiasi e-mail che ricevi da Outbrain include un'opzione di "annullamento dell'iscrizione" (unsubscribe). Inoltre, è possibile anche rinunciare al direct marketing inviando un'e-mail a
support@outbrain.com
.
Per i visitatori del sito nei
Territori europei
, Outbrain ha implementato una piattaforma di gestione del consenso (gestita da
One Trust
) sui nostri siti che ti offrono l'opportunità di acconsentire o meno all'uso di cookie e tecnologie di tracciamento (tracking) analoghe. Accedendo ai nostri siti, vedrai un banner al centro della pagina con informazioni sui cookie che utilizziamo. È possibile fare clic sul banner per rifiutare i cookie (ad esempio, i cookie prestazionali o i targeting cookie) fintanto che non siano cookie strettamente necessari (come definiti nella tabella dei cookie). Premendo "Accetto" sul banner si indica il consenso all’utilizzo dei cookie e di tecnologie di tracciamento simili. La base giuridica di Outbrain per il trattamento dei dati personali dei visitatori dei nostri siti appartenenti al territorio europeo è il consenso. Puoi ritirare il tuo consenso in qualsiasi momento
Cookies Settings
. Per quanto riguarda tutti gli altri visitatori del sito che non si trovano nei territori europei, ci basiamo sul nostro legittimo interesse per il trattamento di qualsiasi dato personale, tuttavia, ciò non preclude ai visitatori del sito non appartenenti ai territori europei la possibilità di ritirare il consenso in qualsiasi momento attraverso la nostra piattaforma di gestione del consenso.
Utenti:
sei un utente se visiti una pagina di un sito web o di un'applicazione di uno dei partner di Outbrain nelle quali è installato il widget Outbrain o sono presenti i nostri consigli e raccomandazioni (“
Siti partner
”). Ad esempio, se visiti
https://news.sky.com/uk
,
www.spiegel.de
o
www.cnn.com
, in quanto il widget Outbrain è implementato su tali siti web. Sai che stai interagendo con un widget Outbrain quando vedi del testo che fa riferimento a Outbrain (ad esempio "Recommended by Outbrain", "by Outbrain" accanto ai consigli). Se fai clic sul riferimento contenente il collegamento ipertestuale a Outbrain, visualizzerai una
informativa dettagliata
che ti consentirà di raggiungere il
portale di interesse di Outbrain
e questa politica sulla privacy dove è possibile scegliere di non ricevere raccomandazioni personalizzate. In alcuni casi, un partner può avvalersi dei servizi di Outbrain per la propria offerta. In tal caso, tali partner devono rendere noto il loro uso di Outbrain nelle loro politiche sulla privacy. Scopri di più
qui
.
Esempio di un widget Outbrain.
(a)
Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
Usiamo UUID, indirizzo IP e altre informazioni di utilizzo in maniera da poter offrire consigli interessanti. I consigli di Outbrain possono essere pagati da un inserzionista che vuole collegarti a un nuovo sito web oppure possono essere organiche, nel qual caso il collegamento rinvia a un'altra pagina sullo stesso sito web del partner
UUID.
Quando, in veste di utente, visiti per la prima volta un sito partner (ad esempio, CNN.com), Outbrain deposita un cookie sul tuo dispositivo al fine di generare un UUID. In alternativa, se interagisci per la prima volta con un partner utilizzando l'applicazione di quel partner, Outbrain riceve un ID inserzionista che ti viene assegnato dal tuo dispositivo. Cataloghiamo e analizziamo i contenuti che consumi attraverso i siti partner. I nostri consigli si basano su: (i) cronologia di navigazione UUID; (ii) modelli di navigazione simili di altri utenti; (iii) consigli che sono in genere popolari presso il pubblico di Outbrain in quel dato momento; (iv) un pizzico di casualità e (v) requisiti di targeting che possono essere forniti o richiesti dai nostri clienti Amplify. Ad esempio, Outbrain potrebbe sapere che l'UUID 123 (che potresti essere tu che tramite il tuo iPhone X stai visitando il sito del Guardian usando Chrome come browser) ama leggere contenuti su destinazioni per le vacanze esotiche e che alle persone che amano leggere contenuti sulle medesime destinazioni di vacanza piace anche leggere di cibi esotici. Quando interagisci con Outbrain non raccogliamo i tradizionali dati personali, come il tuo indirizzo e-mail o il tuo nome, quindi non possiamo associare il tuo nome al tuo UUID (per esempio, non sappiamo che John Smith, che è anche UUID 123, ama leggere sulle destinazioni per le vacanze esotiche).
L'UUID è una sequenza di numeri e/o lettere. L'UUID viene associato al tuo dispositivo e varia in base alla tua combinazione di browser. In altre parole, Outbrain registra un UUID diverso a seconda del dispositivo e/o del browser che utilizzi per accedere ai siti partner. Ad esempio, avrai un UUID quando visiti un sito partner dal tuo telefono cellulare utilizzando Safari come browser e un UUID diverso quando visiti un sito partner dal tuo iPad utilizzando Safari come browser. Outbrain combinerà e consoliderà un UUID da un dispositivo mobile (palmare o tablet) da un browser che accede quindi a un'applicazione (o viceversa) da quel medesimo dispositivo. Outbrain non effettua il tracciamento incrociato dei dispositivi e quindi non può collegare un utente che interagisce con Outbrain sul proprio telefono come lo stesso utente che sta interagendo con Outbrain sul proprio computer.
Indirizzo IP
Oltre al tuo UUID, riconosciamo il tuo indirizzo IP, che traduciamo in termini di geolocalizzazione e cancelliamo l'ultimo ottetto per mascherare le informazioni di identificazione. Utilizziamo quindi queste informazioni mascherate, insieme alle informazioni che abbiamo ricevuto da altri partner terzi di fiducia (come MaxMind) per ottenere una comprensione a grandi linee del luogo in cui ti trovi (ad esempio, New York). Outbrain riconoscerà comunque il tuo indirizzo IP anche se rinunci al tracciamento personalizzato, in quanto ciò è necessario per continuare a fornirti raccomandazioni e consigli basati sul contesto, tuttavia, in tali casi il tuo indirizzo IP non è associato al tuo UUID e non farebbe parte di alcun profilo utente.
Altre informazioni sul trattamento
Oltre all'UUID e all'indirizzo IP, raccogliamo le seguenti informazioni su di te via (a) pc o dispositivo mobile: (i) dati dell'user agent: tipo di dispositivo (ad es. iPhone), tipo di browser (ad es. Chrome), sistema operativo (ad es. iOS); (ii) le pagine visitate; (iii) l'orario della visita; e (iv) gli URL di riferimento e altre informazioni normalmente trasmesse nelle richieste HTTP.
Le informazioni statistiche di cui sopra ci forniscono informazioni su quanti utenti hanno visitato una specifica pagina dei nostri siti partner su cui è installato il widget Outbrain, su quanto tempo ogni utente è rimasto su quella pagina, sul tipo di contenuto di quella pagina su cui ha cliccato e su come si è generalmente comportato su quella pagina; e (b) sulle applicazioni (i) versioni dell'applicazione (come appare in App Store o Play Store); (ii) ID dell'applicazione o nome del pacchetto (come appare in App Store o Play Store); (iii) sistema operativo (ad es. IOS o Android); (iv) versione del sistema operativo; e (v) modello del dispositivo (ad es. iPhone X). Queste informazioni sono considerate dati personali se Outbrain le associa a un UUID.
Poiché Outbrain non ha un rapporto diretto con gli utenti che interagiscono con i siti partner, Outbrain si affida ai suoi partner per determinare le basi legali su cui Outbrain può trattare i dati personali. Ogni sito partner si basa su
(b)
Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
Cookie Outbrain
Pixel Outbrain
Pixel di terzi
Cookie Outbrain
Visita questa
Tabella dei cookie
nella sezione "Utenti" per un elenco dettagliato dei cookie proprietari che utilizziamo quando interagisci con i siti partner nei quali è implementata la tecnologia Outbrain.
Pixel Outbrain
Oltre al widget Outbrain visibile sui siti partner, alcuni inserzionisti di Outbrain possono implementare il pixel Outbrain sui loro siti web. Il pixel Outbrain determina se l'utente che raggiunge la pagina nella quale è installato dispone di un UUID Outbrain, al fine di fornire un resoconto agli inserzionisti in relazione alla loro particolare campagna. Se a tale utente finale è associato un UUID, Outbrain consente agli inserzionisti di riorientare (re-targeting) tali UUID e/o di fornire agli inserzionisti il numero totale di utenti (su base aggregata e anonima) che hanno raggiunto una determinata pagina (ad esempio, un inserzionista non sa che l'UUID1234 è stato convertito, ma solo che è stata effettuata 1 conversione). Outbrain non trasmette ai suoi inserzionisti alcun dato personale (incluso il tuo UUID) e non raccoglie ulteriori dati personali tramite il pixel. Outbrain non combina le informazioni ricevute dalle informazioni dei pixel di Outbrain con il profilo di un UUID (ad esempio, Outbrain tiene traccia solo del fatto che 1 conversione è avvenuta e non che l'UUID123 è stato convertito quando ha raggiunto la pagina scelta dall'inserzionista). Richiediamo agli inserzionisti di rendere noto l'utilizzo di pixel Outbrain sui propri siti web.
Outbrain può anche consentire ad alcuni partner terzi di fiducia di raccogliere dati tramite i cookie forniti attraverso il widget di Outbrain. In tali casi, Outbrain non trasmette a questi terzi i dati che Outbrain raccoglie sui suoi utenti, ma consente a tali terzi di raccogliere direttamente i dati (inclusi i dati personali) attraverso il widget per scopi di difesa dalle frodi e/o per sicurezza o per fornire informazioni di misurazione agli inserzionisti (come il numero di conversioni e/o impronte). Qualsiasi raccolta di questo tipo sarà regolata dalle norme sulla privacy di terzi.
Pixel di terzi
Se fai clic su un collegamento verso uno dei nostri consigli, l'inserzionista che sponsorizza tale consiglio può installare cookie (o cookie di terze parti che agiscono per conto dell'inserzionista) sul tuo dispositivo o tramite dei reindirizzamenti prima che tu giunga alla pagina di destinazione dei consigli o nel momento in cui raggiungi la pagina di destinazione. Tali cookie servono a fornire delle analisi all'inserzionista per quanto riguarda la sua campagna (ad esempio, per vedere quanti utenti hanno visto la campagna). Richiediamo ai nostri inserzionisti di rendere noto l'uso di pixel e/o cookie di terze parti agli utenti finali attraverso il loro sito web. Poiché questi cookie e/o pixel sono aggiunti a sola discrezione dei nostri inserzionisti, sarai soggetto all'informativa sulla privacy di tale inserzionista.
(c)
Come possiamo condividere le informazioni
I nostri partner
Outbrain non condivide e/o vende interi profili utente con terzi. Tuttavia, possiamo condividere alcuni elementi di un profilo utente (ad esempio, UUID) con i seguenti partner, tra cui:
Partner di sicurezza del marchio, di analisi e di lotta alle frodi;
Piattaforme lato domanda (DSP) e lato offerta (SSP);
Scambi di pubblicità e/o reti; e
Piattaforme di gestione della domanda.
Si prega di cliccare
qui
per visionare una lista di alcuni dei nostri partner di fiducia.  Inoltre, possiamo raccogliere e/o condividere alcuni dati personali con partner di fiducia in virtù della partecipazione alla OpenRTB. Molti di questi partner sono registrati come IAB TCF Global Vendor e possono essere trovati
qui
.
(d)
I tuoi diritti
Opzioni di opt-out da Outbrain su pc e dispositivi mobili
Opzioni di opt-out da Outbrain su pc e dispositivi mobili.
È possibile rifiutare di ricevere i consigli personalizzati di Outbrain (o, se si è scelto di non riceverli e si desidera tornare indietro) in qualsiasi momento, indicandolo qui sotto. Puoi anche rinunciare ai consigli personalizzati tramite il
Profilo di interesse
sul sito web di Outbrain, che fornisce una visualizzazione generale dei dati che Outbrain conosce su di te e che può utilizzare per formulare i suoi consigli.
Opzioni di opt-out da Outbrain sulle app
Opzioni di opt-out da Outbrain sulle app.
Per escludere i consigli di Outbrain sulle tue applicazioni mobili, puoi seguire i seguenti passi:
dispositivi iOS: Impostazioni > Privacy > Pubblicità > Limita raccolta dati
Dispositivi Android: Google Impostazioni App > Annunci > Disattivazione degli annunci basati sugli interessi
Si prega di notare che un opt-out tramite il nostro profilo di interesse e/o la presente Politica sulla privacy non ti escluderà dal tracciamento personalizzato delle tue applicazioni. Questo opt-out deve essere effettuato tramite le impostazioni del dispositivo.
Ulteriori opzioni di rinuncia (opt-out)
.
Ulteriori opzioni di rinuncia (opt-out).
Puoi anche esprimere la tua rinuncia a ricevere annunci personalizzati offerti da noi o da altre agenzie pubblicitarie attraverso strumenti messi a disposizione da NAI o le varie pagine basate su DAA (DAA,
http://www.aboutads.info/choices
; DAAC,
www.youradchoices.ca/choices
, e/o EDAA
www.youronlinechoices.eu
). Visitare le pagine delle scelte dei consumatori di NAI, DAA, DAAC o EDAA ti consente di rinunciare a tutti o parte dei servizi dei membri partecipanti. Come la funzione di opt-out di Outbrain, queste rinunce non fanno sì che non riceverai più alcuna pubblicità, semplicemente gli annunci pubblicitari non saranno personalizzati per te. Continuerai a ricevere annunci pubblicitari, ad esempio, in base al sito web specifico che stai visualizzando (ossia annunci basati sul contesto). Inoltre, se i tuoi browser sono configurati per rifiutare i cookie quando visiti le pagine delle scelte dei consumatori DAA, DAAC o EDAA, la tua rinuncia potrebbe non essere efficace, in quanto il nostro opt-out è basato sui cookie.
Informazioni IMPORTANTI
Anche se hai scelto di non ricevere i consigli personalizzati di Outbrain:
Continuerai a visualizzare i consigli di Outbrain.
La disattivazione del tracking per la personalizzazione di Outbrain non significa che non riceverai più consigli da Outbrain. Piuttosto significa che i consigli di Outbrain non saranno personalizzati (cioè saranno raccomandazioni basate sul contesto).
La tua rinuncia (opt-out) è basata su cookie ed è specifica
del dispositivo/browser.
Se navighi sul web da dispositivi e/o browser diversi, dovrai esprimere la rinuncia da ciascun dispositivo e/o browser per assicurarti di impedire il tracking per la personalizzazione su ciascuno di loro. Per lo stesso motivo, se acquisti un nuovo dispositivo, cambi browser o cancelli (o annulli) il cookie di rinuncia, dovrai esprimere nuovamente tale rinuncia. Rinunciare al tracking per la personalizzazione non equivale a bloccare i cookie.
Non devi eseguire l’opt-in di Outbrain per almeno 21 giorni in quanto la cancellazione del tuo profilo è legata al tuo UUID.
.
La tua rinuncia ai consigli personalizzati di Outbrain è efficace immediatamente. Tuttavia, se il tuo browser consente l'archiviazione locale e attivi consigli personalizzati di Outbrain (ad esempio accettando un banner cookie) entro 21 giorni dalla rinuncia, è possibile che il tuo profilo precedente venga riconnesso al tuo UUID. Se non effettui l'attivazione opt-in entro 21 giorni, il profilo verrà eliminato e non potrà essere ripristinato.
Come per la maggior parte dei cookie di opt-out, il browser Outbrain si basa su un cookie.
Il cookie opt-out è destinato ad essere persistente per applicare le preferenze dell'utente. Tuttavia, la funzione "Intelligent Tracking Prevention" di iOS11 può avere un impatto sulla persistenza dei cookie nei siti web in una finestra di 24 ore. Suggeriamo di utilizzare un altro browser o di considerare la possibilità di bloccare tutti i cookie di terze parti dal browser in modo da essere "opt out" senza doversi affidare alla metodologia di opt out di qualsiasi azienda.
La tua memoria locale non verrà svuotata.
Anche se hai scelto di non seguire i consigli personalizzati di Outbrain, la tua memoria locale non verrà cancellata automaticamente e quindi, oltre all'opt-out, dovrai cancellarla a livello di browser.
Partner commerciali:
sei un Partner commerciale quando ti registri (o invii un'e-mail a Outbrain) per conto dell'azienda per la quale lavori per utilizzare i servizi Outbrain Amplify o Outbrain Engage. Scopri di più
qui
.
(a)
Quali informazioni raccogliamo e perché
Puoi fornire determinati dati personali (quali ad esempio il tuo nome e/o l’indirizzo e-mail) quando ti registri per i servizi Amplify o Engage o altrimenti quando comunichi o interagisci con noi. Se presenti domanda per diventare un Partner commerciale, potremmo richiederti ulteriori informazioni tramite moduli di domanda dell'inserzionista, ordini di inserzione e altri moduli. Inoltre, raccogliamo automaticamente informazioni in merito alle azioni del tuo nome utente nel cruscotto (dashboard) Outbrain. Ad esempio, in qualità di Partner commerciale Amplify, se modifichi il costo per clic per una delle tue campagne, la traccia di controllo di Outbrain registrerà tutte queste azioni.
Raccogliamo e trattiamo i dati personali di cui sopra al fine di adempiere ai nostri obblighi ai sensi del nostro accordo come Partner commerciale (o potenziale Partner commerciale) stipulato con voi, ivi incluso per:
rispondere alle tue domande e richieste;
fornirti accesso a determinate funzioni e caratteristiche dei nostri servizi Amplify o Engage (ad esempio per fornirti e mantenere il tuo account dashboard);
verificare la tua identità; e
comunicare con te in merito al tuo account, ai nostri prodotti e alle promozioni disponibili pertinenti al tuo utilizzo del servizio Amplify o Engage.
(b)
Quali cookie e altre tecnologie simili utilizziamo
Ti rimandiamo a questa
Tabella dei cookie
nella sezione "Partner commerciali" per un elenco dettagliato dei cookie proprietari e di terze parti (e dei relativi periodi di conservazione) che utilizziamo con i Partner commerciali.
(c)
Come possiamo condividere le informazioni con chiunque
Potremmo divulgare determinate informazioni dei Partner commerciali a venditori, contraenti o altri soggetti che assistono Outbrain nell'erogazione dei servizi (ad es. trattamento delle carte di credito). Consulta anche lasezione Condivisione della presente politica sulla privacy.
(d)
I tuoi diritti
Se in veste di Partner commerciale desideri verificare, correggere, aggiornare o richiedere la disattivazione delle tue informazioni, puoi accedere al cruscotto (dashboard) Outbrain per modificare le preferenze del tuo profilo oppure contattarci all'indirizzo:
support@outbrain.com
. Se stai ricevendo e-mail di Outbrain, puoi "annullare l'iscrizione" a tale invio utilizzando un collegamento presente nell'e-mail. Nota che l'annullamento dell'iscrizione non comporta la rinuncia a ricevere notifiche rilevanti per l'erogazione dei servizi Amplify o Engage (ad es. fatture inviate via e-mail).
(e)
Base giuridica
La base giuridica di Outbrain per il trattamento dei dati personali dei Partner commerciali è contrattuale.
4.
Misure di sicurezza, trasferimenti al di fuori dello SEE, condivisione e conservazione dei dati
+
Sicurezza
Trasferimento dei dati al di fuori dell'UE/dello SEE
Condivisione
Conservazione dei dati
Sicurezza
Outbrain dispone di un team dedicato per la sicurezza. Manteniamo rigorosi controlli sui dati personali che raccogliamo, conservandoli in database protetti e soggetti a firewall con diritti di accesso rigorosamente limitati e controllati, per garantirne la sicurezza. Consulta le nostre
norme sulla sicurezza
per maggiori informazioni.
I partner commerciali hanno accesso a determinate funzionalità protette da password del servizio Amplify o Engage. I partner commerciali hanno la responsabilità di mantenere riservata questa password e di garantire lo stesso per loro dipendenti e/o ai loro agenti. Ricorda che, sfortunatamente, la trasmissione di informazioni tramite Internet non è mai completamente sicura. Una truffa comune su Internet è nota come "spoofing" o "phishing" e si verifica quando ricevi un'email proveniente da quella che sembra essere una fonte legittima che richiede i tuoi dati personali. Ti preghiamo di osservare che non ti invieremo alcuna e-mail che ti chieda di verificare la carta di credito, le coordinate bancarie o eventuali altri dati personali. Qualora dovessi ricevere un'e-mail che sembra provenire da noi e ti chiede tali informazioni ti preghiamo di non rispondere e non fare clic su nessun link presente nell'e-mail. Al contrario, inoltraci l'e-mail all'indirizzo
legal@outbrain.com
, in quanto esamineremo possibili casi di frode su Internet.
Trasferimento dei dati al di fuori dell'UE/dello SEE
Quando trasferiamo dati personali dallo Spazio Economico Europeo (SEE), ci assicureremo che tali trasferimenti siano conformi alle leggi sulla protezione dei dati, incluse, se applicabile, le clausole contrattuali standard dell'UE o una decisione di adeguatezza positiva della Commissione Europea ai sensi dell'articolo 25(6) della Direttiva 95/46/CE o dell'articolo 45 del GDPR. In altre parole, i tuoi diritti e le tue protezioni rimangono con i tuoi dati e utilizziamo clausole contrattuali approvate e altre misure studiate per garantire che i destinatari dei tuoi dati personali li proteggano. Outbrain ha posto in vigore le Clausole contrattuali standard tra le entità di Outbrain per disciplinare il trasferimento dei dati al di fuori dello SEE.
Condivisione
Oltre alla descrizione di come possiamo divulgare i tuoi dati personali per ciascun tipo di utente, possiamo altresì divulgare dati personali nei seguenti casi:
all'interno della famiglia di società controllate da Outbrain per ragioni interne, principalmente per scopi aziendali e operativi;
qualora dovessimo attraversare una transizione aziendale, quale una fusione, un'acquisizione da parte di un'altra società oppure una vendita di tutte o di parte delle nostre attività, i tuoi dati personali saranno probabilmente inclusi tra le attività trasferite;
laddove ciò sia richiesto dalla legge (ad esempio, per collaborare con indagini delle forze dell'ordine oppure con altri procedimenti giudiziari); e/o
per rispondere a un'emergenza effettiva
Inoltre, combiniamo i tuoi dati personali con quelli di altri utenti al fine di condividere informazioni sulle tendenze e aggregare le statistiche degli utenti con terze parti, sempre in forma aggregata e anonimizzata.
DConservazione dei dati
Il periodo di conservazione per ciascuno dei cookie utilizzati da Outbrain (sia per i nostri sia per quelli usati da terzi per nostro conto) è indicato nella
Tabella dei cookie
. Più specificamente, il cookie Outbrain (Obuid), che viene utilizzato per monitorare le azioni degli utenti come i clic, scade tre (3) mesi dopo che un utente ha visitato un particolare sito all'interno della nostra rete, tuttavia, questo cookie si resetta se un utente ritorna allo stesso sito o a un sito diverso all'interno della nostra rete. Inoltre, non conserviamo alcun data point individuale su un utente per più di 13 mesi. Ad esempio, se l'UUID 123 legge un articolo il 31 dicembre 2018, il 1° febbraio 2019 quell'articolo non farà più parte del profilo dell'UUID 123. Outbrain mantiene altresì una politica di conservazione dei dati che dettaglia il periodo di conservazione dei dati personali in base alla nostra analisi della durata ragionevolmente necessaria di tale conservazione, rispetto a dati specifici, tenuto conto delle finalità legali o commerciali. Nel momento in cui non necessitiamo più dei dati personali, li cancelliamo o li distruggiamo in maniera sicura. I dati aggregati, che non consentono di identificare un dispositivo/browser (o una singola persona) e sono utilizzati per finalità di reporting e analisi vengono conservati per tutto il tempo necessario dal punto di vista commerciale.
5.
Bambini e dati sensibili
+
Minori
Nessuno dei nostri servizi si rivolge intenzionalmente a minori di 16 anni. Non raccogliamo consapevolmente dati personali da minori di 16 anni. Se al momento della raccolta dovessimo stabilire che un Visitatore del sito, un Utente o un Partner commerciale ha meno di 16 anni, non useremo né conserveremo i suoi dati personali. Qualora dovessimo venire a conoscenza del fatto che abbiamo raccolto inconsapevolmente dati personali da un minore di età inferiore ai 16 anni, attueremo ogni ragionevole sforzo per eliminare tali informazioni dai nostri archivi. Se sei un bambino, vai a giocare in giardino, non usare o interagire con Outbrain!
Dati sensibili
Non raccogliamo o riceviamo categorie di dati personali sensibili.
6.
Visitatori dei territori europei
+
In conformità con le leggi in materia di tutela della vita privata (privacy), in particolare con il regolamento generale europeo sulla protezione dei dati (GDPR), Outbrain riconosce specifici diritti aggiuntivi alle persone che interagiscono con Outbrain quali il diritto di accesso, di rettifica, di opposizione, di reclamo, di cancellazione e di blocco. Più specificamente e in determinate circostanze:
il diritto di richiedere informazioni sull'eventualità del trattamento in atto e su quali dati personali siano trattati da noi, nonché il diritto di richiedere la rettifica o la modifica di tali dati personali.
il diritto di richiedere che i dati personali siano cancellati.
il diritto di chiedere che il trattamento dei dati personali sia soggetto a limitazioni.
il diritto alla revoca del proprio consenso al trattamento e all'utilizzo dei propri dati, in tutto o in parte, in qualsiasi momento con applicazione per il futuro.
il diritto di ottenere i propri dati personali in un formato comune, strutturato e leggibile da un dispositivo automatico.
il diritto di contattare il nostro responsabile della protezione dei dati nel caso in cui vi siano domande, commenti, reclami o richieste in relazione alla nostra dichiarazione sulla protezione dei dati e sul trattamento dei dati personali.
il diritto di sporgere reclamo presso l'autorità di controllo responsabile qualora si ritenga che il trattamento dei propri dati personali avvenga in violazione della legislazione.
In aggiunta a quanto sopra, facciamo riferimento a determinati diritti per i cittadini dei Territori europei nel corso della presente politica sulla privacy. Ai sensi del GDPR, con il termine cittadini dei "
Territori europei
" si intendono i cittadini dello Spazio economico europeo (SEE), dell’Associazione europea di libero scambio (EFTA) e della Svizzera. Ai fini della presente Informativa sulla privacy, il termine "Territori europei" continuerà a includere il Regno Unito, anche dopo che il Regno Unito avrà lasciato lo Spazio economico europeo in seguito alla Brexit.
Si prega di inviare un'e-mail a
Privacy@outbrain.com
con eventuali domande sull'esercizio dei diritti di cui sopra.
7.
Comunicazione antitracciamento (“Do Not Track”)
+
Alcuni browser trasmettono segnali antitracciamento, denominati "Do Not Track" (DNT), ai siti web. Poiché non esiste una comprensione comune su come interpretare il segnale DNT, al momento Outbrain non altera, modifica o risponde alle richieste o ai segnali DNT di tali browser. Continueremo a monitorare l'attività del settore in questo contesto e rivaluteremo le nostre pratiche DNT se necessario. Nel frattempo, puoi utilizzare la gamma di altri strumenti che mettiamo a disposizione per controllare la raccolta e l'utilizzo dei dati, ivi inclusa la capacità di rinunciare a ricevere consigli personalizzati consultando la sezione Utenti.
8.
Come può variare la presente politica sulla privacy
+
Occasionalmente potremmo modificare la presente politica sulla privacy. Inseriremo un avviso in evidenza che ti sarà visibile in qualità di Visitatore del sito o Partner commerciale, tuttavia non disponiamo di mezzi per avvertire gli Utenti in merito a un aggiornamento a titolo di preavviso. Si consiglia di controllare periodicamente per vedere se la Politica sulla privacy è stata aggiornata, in quanto pubblicheremo sempre la data dell'ultima modifica della politica sulla privacy nella parte in alto della pagina affinché tu possa sapere quando è stata rivista l'ultima volta.
Effective February 16th 2022
Download
プライバシー・ポリシー
アウトブレインはお客様の個人データを大切に保護します。このプライバシー・ポリシー（以下「プライバシー・ポリシー」といいます。）は、アウトブレインが収集する全ての個人データを含む情報の利用方法を定めるものです。個人データとは、お客様に関わる情報であって、個人を特定できる情報をいいます。アウトブレインは、お客様の個人データを利用するに際しては、適用されるすべての法令を遵守します。グローバルプライバシープログラムを継続的に実施するプライバシーチャンピオンのチームのもと、信頼と透明性というアウトブレインの価値を守っていきます。 - 全て閉じる
+ EXPAND ALL
– COLLAPSE ALL
1. アウトブレインについて、アウトブレインのミッション、アウトブレイン・アウトブレインのDPO・関係部署へのご連絡
+
アウトブレインについて
このプライバシー・ポリシーは、ニューヨークに本社を置く米国デラウェア州の法人Outbrain Inc.と、その関連子会社（以下、総称して「アウトブレイン」又は「当社」といいます。）に適用されます。当社は世界各地で事業を展開しており、世界中のパブリッシャーやマーケターと提携関係を結んでいます。
当社の子会社であるZemanta Inc.には、別のプライバシー・ポリシーがあります（詳しくは
こちら
）。
アウトブレインのミッション
当社のミッションは、お客様の興味関心に基づいて、レコメンデーションを提供することです。そのため、以下のパートナーと提携関係を結んでいます。
関連するコンテンツを読者に勧めることを希望するオンラインパブリッシャー及びパートナー（関連する契約を
Outbrain Engage
といいます。）
コンテンツを読者に配信することを希望するアドバタイザー（関連する契約を
Outbrain Amplify
といいます。）
関連するレコメンデーションの提供に寄与するサードパーティパートナー
Amplify（アドバタイザー）サービスの詳細については
こちら
、Engage（パブリッシャー）サービスについては
こちら
をご覧ください。
ご連絡先
アウトブレインは、プライバシー・ポリシーを遵守していることを定期的に確認しています。プライバシー・ポリシーに関する質問、コメント及びご要望は、メール（
privacy@outbrain.com
）又は郵送（Outbrain Inc., 222 Broadway 19th Floor, New York, NY 10038, Attn: Privacy Questions.）によりお寄せください。
もし十分な回答が得られない場合、次の窓口にご連絡いただくことができます。
外部のData Protection Officer（以下、「DPO」といいます。）：ePrivacy GmbH 担当者：Christoph Bauer博士 ePrivacy GmbHに連絡する場合、
dpo@outbrain.com
宛に直接ご連絡ください。」
アウトブレインを監督する欧州の
Information Commissioner’s Office
2. アライアンスと遵守
+
当社は、
Digital Advertising Alliance
（DAA）及び
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance
（EDAA）が定める自主規制原則を遵守します。
当社は、データ収集及びデジタル広告の使用を担当する団体である
Network Advertising Initiative
（NAI）の会員です。また、「WebとモバイルのためのNAI行動規範」を遵守しています。アウトブレインはまた、オンライン行動広告のための対話型広告局（IAB）の自己規制原則、及びIAB欧州OBAフレームワークを遵守しています。
JICWEBS DTSG Brand Safetyによる認証は、
こちら
から確認できます。
3. アウトブレインのユーザータイプ（オプトアウトを含む）
+
このプライバシー・ポリシーは、お客様がアウトブレインに提供する情報の提供方法に基づいてセクションに分けられています。お客様は、サイト訪問者、ユーザー又はビジネスパートナー（以下に定義します）のいずれに該当するか、ご確認ください。ユーザータイプごとに、当社が収集する情報とその理由、当社が使用するクッキーやその他の類似技術、当社がそのような情報をどのように共有するか、及びお客様の権利について説明しています。
サイト訪問者：Outbrain.com （又はOutbrain.co.uk、Outbrain.fr、outbrain.de等）（以下、「当社サイト」といいます。） において、ウェブサイト、ウェブページ、インタラクティブ機能、ブログ、及びこれらの内容にアクセスする場合、サイト訪問者に該当します。詳しくはこちらをご覧ください。詳しくは
こちらへ
。
（a）情報収集の方法と理由
当社は、当社のサイトでどのようなサービスがお客様の興味を引くかを理解したいと考えており、また、お客様が当社サイトにアクセスしていないときに、当社が提供するサービスについてお客様にご覧いただきたいと考えています。このため、当社はお客様のデバイスから以下の情報を収集します。（i） IPアドレス、（ii）ユーザーエージェントデータ：デバイスの種類（iPhone等）、ブラウザの種類（Chrome等）、オペレーティングシステム（iOS等）、（iii）当社サイトで訪問したページ（アウトブレインの「会社概要」ページ等）、（iv）訪問時間（及び対応するタイムゾーン）、（v）参照URL及びHTTPリクエストで通常送信されるその他の情報（お客様が当社サイトにどのようにたどり着いたかを伝える情報等）。
さらに、お客様が当社サイトを介して、当社にお客様の詳細な情報を送信することに同意した場合（当社のニュースレターを受信するためにサインアップする等）、当社は、お客様の名前と電子メールアドレスを収集することがあります。
（b） 使用するクッキーその他の類似技術
お客様が当社サイトを訪問した際に使用される可能性のあるファーストパーティ及びサードパーティのクッキー（及びそれに対応する保持期間）の詳細なリストについては、随時更新される
クッキーテーブル
の「サイト訪問者」の項目をご覧ください。
（c） 情報共有の方法
当社が当社サイトで取得したお客様の情報の共有
当社は、マーケティングや広告の目的で、お客様の個人情報をサードパーティに共有したり、販売したりすることはありません。当社は、お客様へのマーケティングや広告を行うために、様々なサードパーティ（
クッキーテーブル
に記載されています）を利用することがあります。当社は、これらのサードパーティや企業が、適用されるすべてのデータ保護法を遵守し、当社から共有されるすべての情報を秘密にし、当社に対する義務を履行するためにのみ情報を使用することに同意することを要求します。当社は、これを、個人データを処理するすべてのサードパーティとの間で契約を締結することにより行います。
当社のブログへのコメントについては、その内容と情報が公開されます。コメントを削除したい場合、
support@outbrain.com
までご連絡ください。
当社サイトでのサードパーティサービスの利用
当社サイトには、当社が所有又は運営していないウェブサイトへのリンクが含まれています。当社は、これらのサードパーティのウェブサイトのコンテンツ、製品、サービス、プライバシー・ポリシー又は運用を管理、推奨又は保証していません。例えば、当社サイトでは、当社のFacebookページやLinkedInページに移動するクリック可能なアイコンが表示されています。これらのリンクをクリックする場合、これらのサイトは当社が所有又は運営しているわけではないため、サードパーティのウェブサイトは独自のクッキーをお客様のデバイスに送信し、独自に個人データを収集する可能性があります。したがって、サードパーティのウェブサイトのプライバシー・ポリシーをよく理解しておくことが重要です。
プライバシー・ポリシーの「共有」の項目も参照してください。
(d)
お客様の権利
当社の
利用規約
は、お客様による当社サイトの利用を規定し、お客様が当社サイトにアクセスする際に適用されます。お客様はいつでも当社サイトの使用を停止することができます。その場合、当社サイトへのアクセスに使用されたデバイスから、当社が送信したクッキーを削除することもできます。当社サイトの利用中にお客様がメールアドレスを提供した場合、当社から送信するメールには、「配信停止」のオプションが含まれています。さらに、お客様は、
support@outbrain.com
にメールを送信することで、ダイレクトマーケティングをオプトアウトすることもできます。
欧州地域
のサイト訪問者のために、当社は、当社サイトに同意管理プラットフォーム（
One Trust
が提供）を実装しており、クッキー及び類似のトラッキング技術に同意するかどうかを決める機会を提供しています。当社サイトにアクセスすると、ページの中央に当社が使用するクッキーに関する情報が記載されたバナーが表示されます。このバナーをクリックすると、不可欠なクッキーではない（クッキーテーブルに定義されています）クッキーをオプトアウトすることができます（例えば、パフォーマンスクッキーやターゲティングクッキー）。バナーの「同意する」を押すことで、クッキーや類似のトラッキング技術を受け入れたことになります。当社が、当社サイト上で欧州地域のサイト訪問者の個人データを処理するための合法的な根拠は、
Cookies Settings
.。お客様はいつでも同意を撤回することができます。欧州地域以外のサイト訪問者に関しては、当社は個人データを処理するための正当な利益に依拠していますが、欧州地域以外のサイト訪問者が、当社の同意管理プラットフォームを通じて、同意を撤回することは妨げられません。
ユーザー
：当社のウィジェットがインストールされている、又は当社のリコメンデーションが配置されている当社のパートナーのウェブサイト又はアプリケーション（以下「
パートナーサイト
」といいます。）のページにアクセスする場合、ユーザーに該当します。例えば
https://news.sky.com/uk
,
www.spiegel.de
,
www.cnn.com
といったサイトにアクセスした場合、当社のウィジェットはこれらのウェブサイトに実装されます。当社を参照している旨のテキスト（レコメンデーションの周辺の「Recommended by Outbrain」、「by Outbrain」等）が表示されることにより、当社のウィジェットが実装されていることを知ることができます。当社へのハイパーリンクをクリックすると、
詳細な通知
が表示され、当社の
インタレストポータル
及びプライバシー・ポリシーに移動し、パーソナライズされたリコメンデーションをオプトアウトすることができます。場合によっては、パートナーが自社のサービスのためにアウトブレインのサービスをホワイトラベル化している場合があります。そのような場合、パートナーは、プライバシー・ポリシーで当社の使用を開示しなければなりません。詳しくはこちらをご覧ください。詳しくは
こちらへ
。
当社のウィジェットの例
(a)
情報収集の内容と理由
当社は、UUID、IPアドレスその他の使用情報を使用して、興味関心に沿ったレコメンデーションを提供することができます。当社のレコメンデーションは、新しいウェブサイトにリンクしているアドバタイザーによって支払われている場合や、同じパートナーサイトの別のページにリンクするようなオーガニックなものである場合があります。
UUID.
ユーザーが初めてパートナーサイト（CNN.com等）にアクセスする時、UUIDを生成するために、当社はユーザーのデバイスにクッキーを送信します。また、パートナーのアプリケーションを使用して初めてパートナーにアクセスする場合、当社は、お客様のデバイスによって割り当てられたアドバタイザーIDを受け取ります。アウトブレインは、お客様がパートナーサイトで消費したコンテンツをカタログ化し、分析します。当社のレコメンデーションは、（i）UUIDの閲覧履歴、（ii）他のユーザーの類似の閲覧パターン、（iii）現時点でアウトブレインのユーザーから一般的に人気のあるレコメンデーション、（iv）多少のランダム性、（v）当社のAmplifyクライアントが提供又は要求する可能性のあるターゲティング要件に基づいています。一例として、UUID 123（例えば、Chromeブラウザを使用してiPhone XでThe Guardianを閲覧する人）は、遠く離れた避暑地についての記事を読むことが好きで、遠く離れた避暑地について読むことが好きな人は、エキゾチックな食べ物についての記事を読むことも好きだということを、当社は知ることができます。当社では、お客様が当社とやりとりする際に、メールアドレスや氏名等のいわゆる伝統的な個人情報を収集することはありませんので、お客様の氏名とUUIDを関連付けることはできません（例えば、John Smith がUUID 123であり、遠く離れた避暑地について読むことが好きだということはわかりません）。
UUIDは数字や文字の羅列です。このUUIDはデバイスに付加しており、ブラウザの組合せによって変化します。言い換えれば、当社は、パートナーサイトにアクセスする際に使用するデバイスやブラウザによって異なるUUIDを記録します。例えば、携帯電話からSafariブラウザを使用してパートナーサイトにアクセスした場合に1つのUUIDが、iPadからSafariブラウザを使用してパートナーサイトにアクセスした場合は別のUUIDが記録されます。当社は、ある携帯デバイス（携帯電話又はタブレット）でブラウザからアプリケーションにアクセスした場合（又はその逆）に、同じデバイスからアプリケーションにアクセスした場合のUUIDを組み合わせて統合します。私たちはクロスデバイストラッキングを行っておらず、携帯電話から私たちを使用しているユーザーを、デスクトップから私たちを使用している同じユーザーにリンクすることはできません。
IP
アドレス
お客様のUUIDに加えて、当社ではお客様のIPアドレスを認識しています。その後、この隠された情報を、他の信頼できるサードパーティのパートナー（MaxMind等）から受け取った情報と組み合わせて使用し、お客様がどこにいるのか（ニューヨーク等）を幅広く把握します。当社は、お客様がパーソナルトラッキングをオプトアウトした場合であっても、お客様のIPアドレスを認識します。これは、お客様にコンテキストベースのレコメンデーションを提供し続けるために必要な措置です。
その他の利用情報
当社は、お客様のUUIDとIPアドレスに加えて、次の情報を収集します。（a） デスクトップ及びモバイルウェブ上では、（i） ユーザーエージェントデータ：デバイスの種類（iPhone等）、ブラウザの種類（クローム等）、オペレーティングシステム（iOS等）、（ii）訪問したページ、（iii）訪問時間、（iv）参照URL及びHTTPリクエストで通常送信されるその他の情報。こうした統計的情報は、当社のウィジェットがインストールされているパートナーサイトの特定のページに何人のユーザーが訪問したか、各ユーザーがそのページに滞在した時間、クリックしたそのページのコンテンツの種類、及び一般的にどのようにそのページに関与したかについて、情報を提供するものです。（b）アプリケーション状では、（i）アプリケーションのバージョン（App Store又はPlay Storeに表示されているもの）、（ii）アプリケーションID又はパッケージ名（App Store又はPlay Storeに表示されているもの）、（iii）オペレーティングシステム（IOS又はAndroid等）、（iii）オペレーティングシステムのバージョン、（iv） デバイスのモデル（iPhone X等）。
当社がUUIDと関連付ける場合、これらの情報は個人データとみなされます。当社は、パートナーサイトにアクセスするユーザーと直接関係を持っていないため、当社が個人データを処理することができる合法的な根拠の判断は、パートナーに依拠しています。各パートナーサイトは以下のいずれかに依拠しています。
(b)
使用するクッキーその他の類似技術
アウトブレインのクッキー
アウトブレインのピクセル
サードパーティのピクセル
アウトブレインのクッキー
アウトブレインのテクノロジーが実装されているパートナーサイトにアクセスする際に使用する、ファーストパーティのクッキーの詳細については、
クッキーテーブル
under “Users” の「ユーザー」の項目を参照してください。
アウトブレインのピクセル
パートナーサイトに表示される当社の可視ウィジェットに加えて、特定の当社のアドバタイザーは、自社のウェブサイトに当社のピクセルを実装することができます。当社のピクセルは、特定のキャンペーンに関するレポートをアドバタイザーに提供するために、ピクセルが設置されたページに到達したユーザーが当社のUUIDを持っているかどうかを判断します。そのようなエンドユーザーに関連付けられたUUIDがある場合、当社は、アドバタイザーがそのUUIDをリターゲティングしたり、特定のページに到達したユーザーの総数（集計後の匿名ベース）をアドバタイザーに提供したりすることができます（例えば、アドバタイザーはUUID1234がコンバージョンしたことはわかりませんが、コンバージョンが1回発生したことは知ることができます）。当社は、アドバタイザーに個人データ（お客様のUUIDを含む）を渡したり、ピクセルを介して個人データを収集したりすることはありません。当社は、当社のピクセルから得られた情報をUUIDのプロファイルと組み合わせることはありません（例えば、当社は、UUID123がアドバタイザーが選択したページに到達した際、1つのコンバージョンが行われたことだけを追跡し、UUID123がコンバージョンしたことは追跡しません）。当社は、アドバタイザーに対して、自社のウェブサイトでの当社のピクセルの使用状況を開示するよう求めます
当社はまた、特定の信頼できるサードパーティのパートナーに、当社ウィジェットを通じて配信されるクッキーを介してデータを収集することを許可する場合があります。この場合、アウトブレインは、アウトブレインがユーザーについて収集したデータをこうしたサードパーティに渡すことはありませんが、不正行為防止やセキュリティ保護の目的で、又はアドバタイザーに測定情報（コンバージョン数やインプレッション数等）を提供するために、ウィジェットを介して直接、データ（個人データを含む）を収集することをサードパーティに許可しています。このような収集には、サードパーティのプライバシー・ポリシーが適用されます.
サードパーティのピクセル
お客様が当社のレコメンデーションへのリンクをクリックした場合、レコメンデーションのスポンサーとなっているアドバタイザーは、レコメンデーションの目的ページに到着する前、又は目的ページに到達した時点で、リダイレクトを通じて、お客様のデバイスにクッキー（又はアドバタイザーに代わって行動するサードパーティのクッキー）を置くことがあります。このようなクッキーは、アドバタイザーのキャンペーンに関する分析を、アドバタイザーに提供するために置かれます（例えば、アドバタイザーのキャンペーンを閲覧したユーザーの数を確認するため等）。当社は、アドバタイザーに対し、サードパーティのピクセルやクッキーの使用を、そのウェブサイトを介してエンドユーザーに開示するよう求めています。これらのクッキーやピクセルは、当社のアドバタイザーの独自の裁量で追加されるため、お客様はそのアドバタイザーのプライバシーに関する通知やプライバシー・ポリシーに従うことになります
(c)
情報共有の方法
パートナー
当社は、ユーザーのプロファイル全体をサードパーティと共有したり、販売したりすることはありません。ただし、ユーザーのプロファイルの特定の要素（例えば、UUID）を以下のパートナーと共有することがあります。
ブランドセーフティ、ブランド分析、ブランド詐欺防止に関するパートナー
デマンドサイドプラットフォーム（DSP）及びサプライサイドプラットフォーム（SSP）
アドエクスチェンジやアドネットワーク
デマンドマネジメントプラットフォーム
信頼できるパートナーのリストは
こちら
をご覧ください。加えて、当社は、OpenRTBに参加することにより、信頼できるパートナーと共に個人データを収集したり、共有したりすることがあります。これらのパートナーの多くは、IAB TCFグローバル・ベンダーとして登録されています。詳しくは
こちら
をご覧ください。
(d)
お客様の権利
デスクトップ及びモバイルウェブ上でのアウトブレインのオプトアウト
デスクトップ及びモバイルウェブ上でのアウトブレインのオプトアウト
お客様は、以下のボタンを操作することにより、いつで当社のパーソナルレコメンデーションをオプトアウトすることができます（また、オプトアウトした後に再度登録することもできます）。また、当社のInterestプロファイルは、当社がお客様について知っているデータの一般的な可視化を提供するウェブサイトであり、お客様は、当社の
Interestプロファイル
を介してパーソナルレコメンデーションをオプトアウトすることができます。
アプリケーション上でのアプトブレインのオプトアウト
アプリケーション上でのアプトブレインのオプトアウト
モバイルアプリケーション上でアウトブレインのオプトアウトを行うには、以下の手順に従ってください。
iOSデバイス：設定＞プライバシー＞広告＞追跡型広告を制限
Androidデバイス：Google設定アプリ＞広告＞興味ベースの広告のオプトアウト
当社のInterestプロファイルやプライバシー・ポリシーを介してオプトアウトした場合、お客様のアプリケーションにおけるパーソナルトラッキングはオプトアウトされませんのでご注意ください。このオプトアウトは、お客様のデバイスの設定で行う必要があります。
追加のオプトアウトオプション
.
追加のオプトアウトオプション
Yまた、NAIやDAAベースの各種ページ（DAA
http://www.aboutads.info/choices
、DAAC
www.youradchoices.ca/choices
、EDAA
www.youronlinechoices.eu
）等のツールを介して、当社や他の広告会社が提供するパーソナライズされた広告の受信をオプトアウトすることもできます。NAI、DAA、DAAC又はEDAAの利用者用選択ページにアクセスし、参加しているサービスの一部又は全部をオプトアウトすることができます。当社のオプトアウトとは異なり、これらのオプトアウトは、お客様が広告を受け取らなくなることを意味するものではありません。例えば、お客様が閲覧している特定のウェブサイトに基づいた広告（コンテクストベースの広告）は引き続き表示されます。また、DAA、DAAC、EDAAの消費者選択ページにアクセスした際、ブラウザがクッキーをオプトアウトするように設定されている場合、当社のオプトアウトはクッキーに基づいているため、お客様のオプトアウトが有効とならない可能性があります。
重要な情報
当社のパーソナルレコメンデーションをオプトアウトした場合であっても、
アウトブレインのレコメンデーションは表示されます。
アウトブレインのパーソナルトラッキングをオプトアウトしたからといって、アウトブレインからのレコメンデーションを受け取れなくなるわけではありません。その代わり、アウトブレインのレコメンデーションはパーソナライズされません（すなわち、コンテキストに基づいたレコメンデーションとなります）。
お客様のオプトアウトは、クッキーに基づいたデバイス／ブラウザ固有のものとなります。
お客様が複数のデバイスやブラウザからウェブを閲覧する場合、各デバイスやブラウザからオプトアウトする必要があります。同じ理由で、新しいデバイスを購入したり、ブラウザを変更したり、オプトアウトクッキーを削除（又はクリア）したりした場合も、再度オプトアウトする必要があります。パーソナライゼーショントラッキングをオプトアウトすることは、クッキーをブロックすることと同じではありません。
プロファイルの削除はお客様の
UUID
に関連付けられているため、少なくとも
21
日間はアウトブレインにオプトインしないでください。
.
当社のパーソナルレコメンデーションからのオプトアウトは直ちに有効となります。ただし、ご利用のブラウザがローカルストレージを許可しており、オプトアウトから21日以内に、当社のパーソナルレコメンデーションにオプトインした場合（例えば、クッキーバナーを受け入れる等）、以前のプロファイルがお客様のUUIDに再接続される可能性があります。21日以内にオプトインしなければ、お客様のプロファイルは復元されない形で削除されます。
ほとんどのオプトアウトクッキーと同様に、当社のブラウザのオプトアウトはクッキーに依存しています。
オプトアウトクッキーは、ユーザーの好みを尊重するために永続的であることが意図されています。しかし、iOS11の「インテリジェントトラッキング防止」機能は、24時間後のウェブサイト全体のクッキーの永続性に影響を与える可能性があります。別のブラウザを使用するか、ブラウザからすべてのサードパーティのクッキーをブロックすることで、企業ごとのオプトアウト方法に頼ることなく、「オプトアウト」されることをお勧めします。
お客様のローカルストレージはクリアされません。
当社のパーソナルレコメンデーションをオプトアウトしても、ローカルストレージは自動的にクリアされないため、オプトアウトに加えてブラウザレベルでクリアを行う必要があります。
ビジネスパートナー：Amplify又はEngageサービスを使用するため、会社を代表して登録する（又は当社にメールを送る）場合、ビジネスパートナーに該当します。詳しくはこちらをご覧ください。詳しくは
こちらへ
。
(a)
情報収集の方法と理由
お客様は、Amplify又はEngageサービスに登録する際、又は当社との通信その他のやりとりをする際、特定の個人データ（氏名やメールアドレス等）を提供することがあります。お客様がビジネスパートナーになることを申請する場合、当社はアドバタイザー申請書、記入申込書その他の様式を通じて、お客様に追加情報を依頼することがあります。また、アウトブレインのダッシュボードにおいて、お客様のユーザー名により行われた行動に関する情報は、自動的に収集されます。例えば、Amplifyビジネスパートナーとして、お客様がキャンペーンのクリック単価を変更した場合、当社の監査記録にこうしたアクションの全ての記録が残ります。
当社は、お客様とのビジネスパートナー（又は将来のビジネスパートナー）としての契約に基づく義務として、以下に掲げる業務を遂行するため、上記の個人データを収集し、処理します。
お客様からのご質問やご要望への回答
当社のAmplify又はEngageサービスの特定の機能や、機能へのアクセスのお客様への提供（例：お客様のダッシュボードアカウントの提供・維持）
本人確認
お客様のアカウント、当社の製品、及びお客様によるAmplify又はEngageサービスのご利用に関連する利用可能なプロモーションについて、お客様とやり取りを行うこと
(b)
使用するクッキーその他の類似技術
当社がビジネスパートナーとの間で使用するファーストパーティ及びサードパーティのクッキー（及びそれに対応する保持期間）の詳細なリストについては、
クッキーテーブル
の「ビジネスパートナー」の項目をご覧ください。
(c)
情報共有の方法
当社は、特定のビジネスパートナー情報を、ベンダー、委託先、又はサービスの提供（クレジットカードの処理等）により当社を支援するその他の者に開示することがあります。また、プライバシー・ポリシーの「共有」のセクションもご参照ください。
(d)
お客様の権利
ビジネスパートナーとして、自身の情報の確認、修正、更新、削除を希望する場合は、当社のダッシュボードにアクセスしてプロファイルの設定を編集するか、
support@outbrain.com
までご連絡ください。当社からのメールを受信している場合は、メールに記載されているリンクを使用して「配信停止」を行うことができます。配信停止は、Amplify又はEngageサービスの提供に不可欠な通知（電子請求書等）をオプトアウトするものではありません。
(e)
法的根拠
当社がビジネスパートナーの個人データを処理する合法的な根拠は、契約です。
4.
セキュリティ、EEA外への移転、共有及びデータ保持
+
セキュリティ
EU / EEA外へのデータ転送
共有
データの保持
セキュリティ
アウトブレインには専門のセキュリティチームがあります。当社が収集した個人データを厳重に管理し、ファイアウォールで保護されたデータベースに保管し、アクセス権を厳密に制限して管理し、安全性を確保しています。詳細については、当社の
セキュリティ基準
をご覧ください。
ビジネスパートナーは、Amplify又はEngageサービスの特定のパスワードで保護された機能に、アクセスすることができます。ビジネスパートナーは、このパスワードの機密性を保持し、従業員やその代理人が同様に機密性を保持するよう確保する責任があります。残念ながら、インターネットを介した情報伝達は完全に安全ではないことに留意する必要があります。よくあるインターネット詐欺に「なりすまし」や「フィッシング」があります。これは、合法的にみえる情報源から、個人情報を要求するメールを受信した場合に発生します。当社は、クレジットカードや銀行情報、その他の個人情報の確認を要求するメールを送信することはありませんので、ご注意ください。当社からと思われる電子メールで、こうした個人情報を要求するものを受け取った場合は、返信をせず、電子メール内のリンクをクリックしないようにしてください。インターネット詐欺の可能性がある場合は、当社で調査を行いますので、
legal@outbrain.com
, までメールをご転送ください。
EU / EEA外へのデータ転送
当社が欧州経済領域（EEA）から個人データを転送する場合、当社は、該当する場合、EU標準契約条項、欧州委員会の十分性認定（指令95/46/EC第25条6項又はGDPR第45条によるもの）を含む、関連するデータ保護法を遵守していることを確認します。言い換えれば、お客様の権利と保護はお客様のデータとともにあり、当社は、お客様の個人データの受信者がデータを確実に保護するように設計され、承認された契約条項その他の手段を使用しています。アウトブレインは、EEA域外へのデータ転送を管理するために、アウトブレインの事業体間の標準契約条項を定めています。
共有
当社は、ユーザーの種類ごとに規定されるお客様の個人情報の開示方法に加えて、以下のとおり個人情報を開示することがあります。
アウトブレインが管理する企業グループ内における内部的な理由（主として事業及び業務上の目的）のために、個人情報が開示されることがあります。
合併、他社による買収、又は当社資産の全部又は一部の売却等、当社が企業組織の再編を行う場合、お客様の個人情報は譲渡される資産の中に含まれる可能性が高いです。
法的に要求された場合（法執行機関の調査やその他の法的手続に協力する場合等）は、個人情報が開示されることがあります。
非常に緊急の事態に対応するため、個人情報が開示されることがあります。
また、お客様の個人情報は、他のユーザーの個人情報と組み合わせて、傾向情報やユーザー統計を集計してサードパーティと共有するために、常に匿名で集計されています。
データの保持
アウトブレインが使用するクッキー（当社独自のものであるか、サードパーティによる代行であるかを問いません）の保存期間は、
クッキーテーブル
. に記載されています。具体的には、クリック等のユーザーの行動を追跡するために使用される当社のクッキー（Obuid）は、ユーザーが当社ネットワーク内の特定のサイトを訪問してから3ヶ月後に、有効期限が到来しますが、ユーザーが同じサイトに戻ったり、当社ネットワーク内の別のサイトに戻ったりした場合、このクッキーはリセットされます。また、当社はユーザーの個々のデータポイントを13ヶ月以上保持することはありません。例えば、UUID 123が2018年12月31日に記事を読んだ場合、2019年2月1日には、その記事はUUID 123のプロファイルの一部ではなくなります。
当社はまた、特定のデータが法的に又は事業目的のために合理的に必要とされる期間を分析した上で、個人データの保持期間を詳細に定めたデータ保持ポリシーを維持しています。個人データを必要としなくなった場合は、安全に削除又は破棄します。集計データのうち、デバイスやブラウザ（又は個人）を特定できず、レポートや分析の目的で使用されるものは、商業的に必要な限り維持されます。
5.
未成年者及び機微なデータ
+
未成年者
当社のサービスは、16歳未満の未成年者を意図的に対象としたものではありません。当社は、16歳未満の方から意図して個人データを収集することはありません。サイト訪問者、ユーザー、又はビジネスパートナーが16歳未満であることが個人データの収集時に判明した場合、当社は、その人の個人データを使用したり、維持したりすることはありません。当社が意図せずに16歳未満の方から個人データを収集していることに気づいた場合、当社は、そのような情報を記録から削除するための合理的な努力を行います。もしあなたが子供である場合、アウトブレインを使用するよりも庭で遊びましょう！
機微なデータ
当社は、個人データのうち、機微なカテゴリーのものを収集したり、受け取ったりすることはありません。
6.
欧州地域の訪問者
+
特定の個人情報保護法、特にEU一般データ保護規則（GDPR）に基づき、当社は、当社にアクセスする個人に対して、アクセス、訂正、異議申立て、苦情、削除、ブロックといった特定の追加的権利を提供しています。より具体的には、以下が該当します。
個人データが当社によって処理されているかどうか、どの個人データが処理されているかについて情報を要求する権利及び個人データの修正や訂正を要求する権利
個人データの削除を要求する権利
個人データの処理を制限することを要求する権利
個人データの処理と使用に対する同意を完全に又は部分的に撤回することを申請する権利
個人データを、一般的に整理された機械的に読み取り可能な形式で入手する権利
個人情報保護及び個人情報の処理に関する当社の声明に関連して、ご質問、ご意見、苦情、ご要望がある場合、当社のDPOに連絡する権利
個人データの処理が法律に違反していると思われる場合には、責任ある監督当局に違反を申し出る権利
上記に加えて、プライバシー・ポリシーでは、欧州地域の住民のための特定の権利が参照されます。GDPRに従い、「欧州地域」とは、欧州経済領域（EEA）、欧州自由貿易地域（EFTA）、スイスを意味します。プライバシー・ポリシーにおいて、「欧州地域」という用語には、英国がEUから離脱した後も、英国を含むものとします。
上記の権利の行使に関するご質問は、
Privacy@outbrain.com
までメールでお問い合わせください。
7.
「Do Not Track」の開示
+
一部のブラウザは、ウェブサイトにDo Not Track（DNT）信号を送信します。DNT信号をどのように解釈するかについての共通の理解は未だ確立していないため、当社は現在、これらのブラウザからのDNT要求や信号に対応していません。当社は、今後もこの分野における業界の活動を注視し、必要に応じて当社のDNTに関する運用を見直していきます。その間、お客様は、ユーザーセクションのパーソナルレコメンデーションの受信をオプトアウトする機能を含む、データの収集と使用を制御するために当社が提供する様々なツールを使用することができます。
8.
プライバシー・ポリシーの更新
+
当社は、このプライバシー・ポリシーを随時変更することができます。当社は、サイト訪問者やビジネスパートナーの目に触れるよう、プライバシー・ポリシーを目立つ場所に掲載しますが、当社は、お客様に対し個別に更新を通知する方法を有していません。プライバシー・ポリシーが更新されたかどうかは、定期的にこちらをチェックして確認してください。
Effective February 16th 2022
Download
Privacybeleid
Outbrain zet zich in voor de bescherming van uw persoonsgegevens. Dit privacybeleid ("
Privacybeleid
") regelt het gebruik van de door ons verzamelde gegevens door Outbrain, met inbegrip van alle persoonsgegevens. Persoonsgegevens zijn informatie die betrekking heeft op u en die u kan identificeren als individu. Wij gebruiken uw persoonsgegevens in overeenstemming met alle toepasselijke wetten. Om de naleving te garanderen en om aan te sluiten bij de waarden van Outbrain op het gebied van vertrouwen en transparantie, hebben we een team van privacyvoorvechters die verantwoordelijk zijn voor de voortdurende implementatie van ons wereldwijde privacyprogramma.
+ EXPAND ALL
– COLLAPSE ALL
1.
Wie we zijn, Wat we doen, Hoe u contact kunt opnemen met Outbrain, onze gegevensbeschermingsfunctionaris of de relevante autoriteiten
+
Wie we zijn:
Dit privacybeleid is van toepassing op Outbrain Inc., een onderneming uit Delaware, VS, met hoofdkantoor in New York; en haar gelieerde dochterondernemingen (gezamenlijk, "
Outbrain
," of "
wij
", "
ons
", "
onze
"). We zijn actief in verschillende kantoren in de hele wereld en we werken samen met uitgevers en marketeers over de hele wereld.
Dochteronderneming Zemanta Inc van Outbrain heeft een apart Privacybeleid, dat
hier
kan worden gevonden.
Wat we doen:
De missie van Outbrain is om u interessante aanbevelingen te doen op basis van wat volgens ons uw interesses zijn. Om onze missie te bereiken sluiten we overeenkomsten met:
online uitgevers en partners die relevante inhoud aan hun lezers willen aanbevelen (dit is Outbrain Engage);
adverteerders die willen dat de lezers hun content bekijken (dit is
Outbrain Amplify
); en
externe partners die ons helpen relevante aanbevelingen te doen.
Zie
hier
voor meer informatie over onze Amplify-diensten (voor adverteerders) en
hier
voor onze Engage-diensten (voor uitgevers).
Hoe u contact met ons kunt opnemen:
Wij controleren regelmatig onze naleving van dit Privacybeleid. Vragen, opmerkingen en verzoeken met betrekking tot dit Privacybeleid zijn welkom en dienen in eerste instantie te worden gericht aan
privacy@outbrain.com
of per post aan
Outbrain Inc., 222 Broadway 19th Floor, New York, NY 10038, Attn: Privacy Questions
.
Als Outbrain uw vragen of zorgen niet naar tevredenheid beantwoordt, kunt u voor advies, ondersteuning of klachten ook contact opnemen met:
de externe gegevensbeschermingsfunctionaris ("DPO" van Outbrain: ePrivacy GmbH, vertegenwoordigd door Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. ePrivacy GmbH is rechtstreeks te bereiken op dpo@outbrain.com ; en/of
de
Information Commissioner’s Officer
, die de belangrijkste toezichthoudende dienst is voor Outbrain binnen de Europese gebieden.
2.
Allianties en naleving
+
Wij leven de zelfreguleringsprincipes na die zijn opgesteld door de
Digital Advertising Alliance
(DAA) en de
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance
(EDAA);
Wij zijn lid van het
Network Advertising Initiative
(NAI), een vereniging die zich inzet voor het verantwoord verzamelen van gegevens en het gebruik ervan voor digitale reclame. We houden ons ook aan de Code of Conduct for Web and Mobile van het NAI. Outbrain leeft ook de Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising van het Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) na, alsmede het IAB Europe OBA Framework; en
We zijn ook
hier
JICWEBS DTSG Brand Safety Certified
.
3.
Types Outbrain-gebruikers (inclusief opt-outopties)
+
Een groot deel van dit Privacybeleid is onderverdeeld in secties op basis van de manier waarop u met Outbrain kunt communiceren. U bent een Bezoeker van de site, een Gebruiker en/of een Business Partner (zoals hieronder gedefinieerd). Bepaal welk type gebruiker u bent. Voor elk type gebruiker hebben we uitgelegd welke informatie we verzamelen en waarom, welke cookies en andere soortgelijke technologieën we gebruiken, hoe we deze informatie delen en wat uw rechten zijn.
Bezoekers van de site:
U bent een Bezoeker van de site wanneer u
onze
websites, webpagina's, interactieve functies, blogs en hun respectievelijke inhoud op
Outbrain.com
(of een afgeleide daarvan, zoals Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; outbrain.de etc.) ("
Onze sites
") bezoekt en er interactie mee hebt . Kijk hier voor meer
informatie
.
（a）
Welke informatie we verzamelen en waarom
We willen begrijpen welke diensten op Onze sites u interesseren en we willen u herinneren aan de diensten die we aanbieden wanneer u niet op Onze sites bent. Om dit te doen, verzamelen we de volgende informatie van uw apparaat: (i) IP-adres; (ii) User Agent-gegevens: apparaattype (bijv. iPhone), browsertype (bijv. Chrome), besturingssysteem (bijv. iOS); (iii) de pagina's die u op Onze sites bezoekt (bijv. de "About"-pagina van Outbrain); (iv) het tijdstip van het bezoek (en de bijbehorende tijdzone); en (v) verwijzende URL's en andere informatie die normaal gesproken in HTTP-verzoeken wordt verzonden (bijv. informatie die ons vertelt hoe u op Onze sites bent terechtgekomen).
Daarnaast kunnen wij ook uw naam en e-mailadres verzamelen als u ermee akkoord gaat dat uw gegevens via Onze sites naar ons worden verzonden (bijvoorbeeld door u aan te melden voor onze nieuwsbrief).
（b）
Welke cookies en andere soortgelijke technologieën we gebruiken
Zie deze
Cookietabel
, die van tijd tot tijd wordt bijgewerkt, onder de sectie "Bezoekers van de site" voor een gedetailleerde lijst met eigen en externe cookies (en de bijbehorende bewaartermijnen) die kunnen worden gebruikt wanneer u Onze sites bezoekt.
（c）
Hoe we informatie kunnen delen
Delen van informatie die we over u verzamelen op Onze sites.
Wij verkopen en/of delen geen persoonsgegevens over u met derden voor marketing- of reclamedoeleinden van derden.  Wij maken mogelijk gebruik van verschillende derden (elk vermeld in de
Cookietabel
) die ons kunnen helpen bij het marketen of adverteren aan u.  Wij verplichten deze derde partijen en bedrijven om zich te houden aan alle toepasselijke wetten op het gebied van gegevensbescherming, alle informatie die met hen wordt gedeeld vertrouwelijk te houden en de informatie alleen te gebruiken om hun verplichtingen jegens ons na te komen. Dit doen we door overeenkomsten te sluiten met alle derden die persoonsgegevens verwerken.
Als u een bericht plaatst op onze blog, is uw commentaar en informatie openbaar. Neem contact op met
support@outbrain.com
als u uw commentaar wilt verwijderen.
Gebruiken van diensten van derden op Onze sites.
Onze sites bevatten links naar andere websites die wij niet bezitten of exploiteren. Wij hebben geen controle over de inhoud, de producten, de diensten, het privacybeleid of de praktijken van deze websites van derden, noch bevelen wij deze aan, noch onderschrijven wij deze. Op Onze sites ziet u bijvoorbeeld klikbare pictogrammen die u naar de Outbrain-pagina op Facebook of de Outbrain-pagina op LinkedIn brengen. Als u ervoor kiest om op deze links te klikken, moet u weten dat deze sites geen eigendom zijn van Outbrain of worden beheerd door Outbrain en dat deze websites van derden daarom hun eigen cookies naar uw apparaat kunnen sturen en onafhankelijk van ons persoonsgegevens kunnen verzamelen. Het is daarom belangrijk dat u zich vertrouwd maakt met het privacybeleid van deze websites van derden.
Zie ook de sectie
Delen
van dit Privacybeleid.
(d)
Uw rechten
Onze
Gebruiksvoorwaarden
regelen uw gebruik van Onze sites en zijn op u van toepassing wanneer u communiceert met Onze sites. U kunt op elk moment stoppen met het gebruik van Onze sites. Als u dat doet, kunt u ook de cookies verwijderen die we hebben geplaatst op elk apparaat dat u hebt gebruikt om toegang te krijgen tot Onze sites. U kunt dit doen via uw browser. Als u tijdens het gebruik van Onze sites uw e-mailadres hebt opgegeven, bevat elke e-mail die u van Outbrain ontvangt de optie "unsubscribe" (afmelden). Daarnaast kunt u zich ook afmelden (opt-out) voor direct marketing door een e-mail te sturen naar
support@outbrain.com
.
Voor Bezoekers van de site in de
Europese gebieden
heeft Outbrain een platform voor toestemmingsbeheer (ondersteund door
One Trust
) op Onze sites geïmplementeerd, dat u de mogelijkheid biedt om al dan niet toestemming te geven voor cookies en soortgelijke traceertechnologieën. Bij toegang tot Onze sites ziet u midden op de pagina een banner met informatie over de cookies die wij gebruiken. U kunt op de banner klikken om alle cookies te weigeren (bijvoorbeeld prestatiecookies of targeting cookies) die niet strikt noodzakelijk zijn (zoals gedefinieerd in de cookietabel). Door op "I Accept" (Accepteren) op de banner te drukken geeft u aan dat u cookies en soortgelijke traceertechnologieën accepteert. De wettelijke grondslag van Outbrain voor het verwerken van persoonsgegevens van Bezoekers van de site uit de Europees gebieden op Onze Sites is toestemming U kunt uw toestemming te allen tijde intrekken
Cookies Settings
. Met betrekking tot alle andere Bezoekers van de site die zich niet in Europese gebieden bevinden, vertrouwen wij op ons legitieme belang voor de verwerking van persoonsgegevens, maar dit sluit niet uit dat Bezoekers van de site vanuit niet-Europese gebieden hun toestemming te allen tijde kunnen intrekken via ons platform voor toestemmingsbeheer.
Gebruikers:
U bent een Gebruiker wanneer u een pagina van een website of een app van een van de partners van Outbrain bezoekt waarop of waarin de Outbrain-widget is geïnstalleerd of onze aanbevelingen zijn geplaatst ("
Partnersites
"). Als u bijvoorbeeld
https://news.sky.com/uk
,
www.spiegel.de
of
www.cnn.com
bezoekt, is de Outbrain-widget op die websites geïmplementeerd. U weet dat u een Outbrain-widget gebruikt wanneer u tekst ziet die verwijst naar Outbrain (bijvoorbeeld "Recommended by Outbrain", "by Outbrain" in de buurt van aanbevelingen). Als u op de hyperlink naar Outbrain klikt, ziet u een
gedetailleerde kennisgeving
die u in staat stelt om naar
het Interest Portal van Outbrain
en dit Privacybeleid te navigeren, waar u zich kunt afmelden voor gepersonaliseerde aanbevelingen. In sommige gevallen kan een partner een white-label Outbrain-service hebben voor zijn eigen aanbod. In een dergelijk geval moeten deze partners hun gebruik van Outbrain bekendmaken in hun privacybeleid. Kijk hier voor meer
informatie
.
Voorbeeld van een Outbrain-widget.
(a)
Welke informatie we verzamelen en waarom
We gebruiken UUID's, IP-adressen en andere Gebruiksinformatie zodat we interessante aanbevelingen kunnen doen. De aanbevelingen van Outbrain kunnen worden betaald door een adverteerder die u naar een nieuwe website linkt, of ze kunnen organisch zijn, zodat de link verwijst naar een andere pagina op dezelfde Partnersite.
UUID.
Wanneer u als Gebruiker voor het eerst een Partnersite (bijv. CNN.com) bezoekt, laat Outbrain een cookie op uw apparaat achter om een UUID te genereren. Als u voor het eerst met een Partner communiceert via de app van die Partner, ontvangt Outbrain uw adverteerders-ID die door uw apparaat aan u is toegewezen. Wij catalogiseren en analyseren de content die u gebruikt op de verschillende Partnersites. Onze aanbevelingen zijn gebaseerd op: (i) de browsegeschiedenis van een UUID; (ii) vergelijkbare browsepatronen van andere Gebruikers; (iii) aanbevelingen die in het algemeen op dit moment populair zijn bij het publiek van Outbrain; (iv) enige willekeurigheid, en (v) targetingeisen die door onze Amplify-klanten kunnen worden geleverd of gevraagd. Outbrain kan bijvoorbeeld weten dat UUID 123 (dat zou u kunnen zijn op uw iPhone X die met Chrome als uw browser The Guardian bezoekt) graag leest over verre vakantiebestemmingen en dat mensen die graag over verre vakantiebestemmingen lezen ook graag lezen over exotisch eten. Als u contact hebt met Outbrain, verzamelen we geen traditionele persoonsgegevens van u, zoals uw e-mailadres of naam, dus we kunnen uw naam niet koppelen aan uw UUID (we weten bijvoorbeeld niet dat Jan de Vries, die ook UUID 123 is, graag leest over verre vakantiebestemmingen).
De UUID is een reeks cijfers en/of letters. Deze UUID koppelt zichzelf aan uw apparaat en varieert afhankelijk van uw browsercombinatie. Met andere woorden: Outbrain registreert verschillende UUID's afhankelijk van welk apparaat en/of welke browser u gebruikt bij het bezoeken van de Partnersites. U hebt bijvoorbeeld een bepaalde UUID wanneer u een Partnersite met de browser Safari vanaf uw mobiele telefoon bezoekt, en een andere UUID wanneer u een Partnersite met de browser Safari vanaf uw iPad bezoekt. Outbrain combineert en consolideert een UUID uit een mobiel apparaat (handheld of tablet) vanuit een browser die vervolgens een app bezoekt (of omgekeerd) vanaf datzelfde apparaat. Outbrain voert geen cross-devicetracking uit en kan daarom een gebruiker die op zijn telefoon communiceert met Outbrain niet koppelen aan dezelfde gebruiker die op zijn pc communiceert met Outbrain.
IP-adres
Naast uw UUID herkennen we uw IP-adres, dat we vertalen naar uw geolocatie, waarbij we het laatste octet verwijderen om de identificerende informatie te maskeren. We gebruiken deze gemaskeerde informatie vervolgens in combinatie met informatie die we hebben ontvangen van andere vertrouwde derde partijen (zoals MaxMind) om een globaal inzicht te krijgen in waar u zich bevindt (bijvoorbeeld in New York). Outbrain herkent uw IP-adres ook als u zich afmeldt voor gepersonaliseerde tracking, omdat dit nodig is om u te kunnen blijven voorzien van contextgebaseerde aanbevelingen. In dergelijke gevallen wordt uw IP-adres echter niet gekoppeld aan uw UUID en maakt het geen deel uit van gebruikersprofielen.
Andere Gebruiksinformatie
Naast uw UUID en IP-adres verzamelen we ook de volgende informatie van u op (a) desktop en mobiel internet: (i) User Agent-gegevens: apparaattype (bijv. iPhone), browsertype (bijv. Chrome), besturingssysteem (bijv. iOS); (ii) de bezochte pagina's; (iii) het tijdstip van het bezoek; en (iv) verwijzende URL's en andere informatie die normaal gesproken in HTTP-verzoeken wordt verzonden.De bovenstaande statistische informatie geeft ons informatie over hoeveel Gebruikers een specifieke pagina op onze Partnersites hebben bezocht waarop de Outbrain-widget is geïnstalleerd, hoe lang elke Gebruiker op die pagina is gebleven, het type inhoud op die pagina waarop hij heeft geklikt en hoe hij zich over het algemeen met die pagina heeft beziggehouden; en (b) op apps (i) appversie (zoals die verschijnt in de App Store of Play Store); (ii) app-ID of pakketnaam (zoals die verschijnt in de App Store of Play Store); (iii) besturingssysteem (bijv. iOS of Android); (iii) versie van het besturingssysteem; en (iv) model van het apparaat (bijv. iPhone X). Deze informatie wordt beschouwd als persoonsgegevens indien Outbrain ze koppelt aan een UUID.
Aangezien Outbrain geen directe relatie heeft met Gebruikers die de Partnersites gebruiken, vertrouwt Outbrain op zijn partners om te bepalen op welke wettelijke grondslag Outbrain persoonsgegevens mag verwerken. Elke Partnersite vertrouwt op
(b)
Welke cookies en andere soortgelijke technologieën we gebruiken
Outbrain-cookies
Outbrain-pixels
Pixels van derden
Outbrain-cookies
Zie de
Cookietabel
under “Users” onder "Gebruikers" voor een gedetailleerde lijst van de Eigen cookies die we gebruiken als u Partnersites bezoekt waarop de Outbrain-technologie is geïmplementeerd.
Outbrain-pixels
Naast de zichtbare widget van Outbrain op Partnersites, kunnen bepaalde Outbrain-adverteerders de Outbrain-pixel op hun websites implementeren. De Outbrain-pixel bepaalt of de Gebruiker die de pagina bezoekt waar de pixel is geïnstalleerd een Outbrain-UUID heeft, om te kunnen rapporteren aan adverteerders met betrekking tot hun specifieke campagne. Als er een UUID aan een dergelijke eindgebruiker is gekoppeld, staat Outbrain adverteerders toe om die UUID's te retargeten en/of levert het adverteerders het totale aantal Gebruikers (op geaggregeerde en geanonimiseerde basis) die een bepaalde pagina hebben bezocht (een adverteerder weet bijvoorbeeld niet dat UUID1234 geconverteerd is, maar alleen dat er 1 conversie heeft plaatsgevonden). Outbrain geeft zijn adverteerders geen persoonsgegevens door (inclusief uw UUID) en verzamelt geen verdere persoonsgegevens via de pixel. Outbrain combineert geen van de Outbrain-pixel ontvangen informatie met het profiel van een UUID (Outbrain houdt bijvoorbeeld alleen bij dat er 1 conversie heeft plaatsgevonden en niet dat UUID123 is geconverteerd wanneer deze de gekozen pagina van de adverteerder bereikt). Wij eisen van adverteerders dat zij het gebruik van de Outbrain-pixel bekend maken op hun eigen website.
OOutbrain kan ook bepaalde vertrouwde externe partners toestaan om gegevens te verzamelen via cookies die via de Outbrain-widget worden geleverd. In dergelijke gevallen geeft Outbrain deze derden niet de gegevens door die Outbrain over zijn Gebruikers verzamelt, maar staat het deze derden toe om via de widget rechtstreeks gegevens (inclusief persoonsgegevens) te verzamelen voor fraude- en/of veiligheidsdoeleinden of om meetgegevens te verstrekken aan adverteerders (zoals het aantal conversies en/of impressies). Dergelijke vormen van verzamelen vallen onder het privacybeleid van de desbetreffende derden.
Pixels van derden
Als u op een link naar een van onze aanbevelingen klikt, kan de adverteerder die de aanbeveling sponsort, cookies (of cookies van derden die namens de adverteerder handelen) op uw apparaat plaatsen, hetzij via redirects voordat u op de bestemmingspagina van de aanbevelingen komt, hetzij bij het bereiken van de bestemmingspagina. Dergelijke cookies worden geplaatst om de adverteerder te voorzien van analyses met betrekking tot de campagne van de adverteerder (bijvoorbeeld om te zien hoeveel gebruikers de campagne van de adverteerder hebben bekeken). Wij eisen van onze adverteerders dat zij het gebruik van pixels en/of cookies van derden bekend maken via hun website. Aangezien deze cookies en/of pixels naar eigen goeddunken van onze adverteerders worden toegevoegd, bent u onderworpen aan de privacyverklaring en/of het privacybeleid van die adverteerder.
Hoe we informatie kunnen delen
●
Onze partners
Outbrain deelt en/of verkoopt geen volledige profielen van een Gebruiker met en/of aan derden. We kunnen echter bepaalde elementen van een gebruikersprofiel (bijvoorbeeld een UUID) delen met de volgende partners, waaronder:
Partners op het gebied van merkveiligheid, analyse en fraude;
DSP's (Demand Side Platforms) en SSP's (Supply Side Platforms);
Ad exchanges en/of advertentienetwerken; en
Demand Management Platforms.
Zie
hier
voor een lijst met enkele van onze vertrouwde partners.   Daarnaast kunnen we enkele persoonsgegevens verzamelen en/of delen met vertrouwde partners op grond van deelname aan de OpenRTB. Veel van deze partners zijn geregistreerd als IAB TCF Global Vendors en zijn
hier
te vinden.
(d)
Uw rechten
Outbrain opt-out op desktop en mobiel internet
Outbrain opt-out op desktop en mobiel internet.
U kunt zich op elk moment afmelden voor de gepersonaliseerde aanbevelingen van Outbrain (of, als u zich hebt afgemeld en zich weer wilt aanmelden) door de schakelaar hieronder te verplaatsen. U kunt zich ook afmelden voor gepersonaliseerde aanbevelingen via het
interesseprofiel
van Outbrain, een website die een algemene visualisatie geeft van de gegevens die Outbrain over u weet en kan gebruiken om zijn aanbevelingen te doen.
Outbrain opt-out op apps
Outbrain opt-out op apps
Om u af te melden voor de aanbevelingen van Outbrain op uw mobiele apps, kunt u de onderstaande stappen volgen:
iOS-apparaten: Instellingen > Privacy > Reclame > Beperk reclametracking
Android-apparaten: Google-instellingen > Advertenties > Afmelden voor personalisatie van advertenties
Houd er rekening mee dat een opt-out via ons Interesseprofiel en/of dit Privacybeleid geen opt-out is van gepersonaliseerde tracking op uw apps. Deze opt-out moet gebeuren via de instellingen van uw apparaat.
Aanvullende opt-outopties
.
Aanvullende opt-outopties.
U kunt zich ook afmelden voor het ontvangen van gepersonaliseerde advertenties die door ons of andere reclamebedrijven worden aangeboden via door de sector aangeboden tools zoals het NAI of de verschillende op DAA gebaseerde pagina's (DAA,
http://www.aboutads.info/choices
; DAAC,
www.youradchoices.ca/choices
en/of EDAA
www.youronlinechoices.eu
). Wanneer u de consumentenkeuzepagina's van NAI, DAA, DAAC of EDAA bezoekt, kunt u zich afmelden voor alle of een deel van de diensten van de deelnemende leden. Net zoals bij de opt-out van Outbrain betekent deze opt-out niet dat u geen reclame meer ontvangt, de advertenties zijn gewoon niet op u afgestemd. U blijft reclame ontvangen, bijvoorbeeld op basis van de website die u bekijkt (dus op context gebaseerde advertenties). Als uw browsers zo zijn geconfigureerd dat cookies worden geweigerd als u de consumentenkeuzepagina's van DAA, DAAC of EDAA bezoekt, kan het bovendien zo zijn dat uw opt-out niet effectief is, omdat onze opt-out gebaseerd is op cookies.
BELANGRIJKE informatie
Ook als u zich hebt afgemeld van de gepersonaliseerde aanbevelingen van Outbrain, geldt:
U blijft aanbevelingen van Outbrain zien.
Uw opt-out voor personaliseringstracking door Outbrain betekent niet dat u geen aanbevelingen van Outbrain meer krijgt. Het betekent wel dat de aanbevelingen van Outbrain niet meer gepersonaliseerd zijn (het worden dus op context gebaseerde aanbevelingen).
Uw opt-out is gebaseerd op cookies en is apparaat-/browserspecifiek.
Als u vanaf verschillende apparaten en/of browsers op het web surft, moet u zich vanaf elk apparaat en/of elke browser afmelden om ervoor te zorgen dat we personaliseringstracking op alle apparaten en browsers voorkomen. Om dezelfde reden moet u zich opnieuw afmelden als u een nieuw apparaat koopt, een andere browser gaat gebruiken of de opt-outcookie verwijdert (of wist). Een opt-out van personaliseringstracking is niet hetzelfde als het blokkeren van cookies.
U moet zich ten minste 21 dagen niet aanmelden bij Outbrain, omdat het verwijderen van uw profiel is gekoppeld aan uw UUID
.
Uw opt-out voor persoonlijke aanbevelingen van Outbrain is onmiddellijk van kracht. Als uw browser echter lokale opslag toestaat en u zich binnen 21 dagen na uw opt-out opnieuw aanmeldt voor de gepersonaliseerde aanbevelingen van Outbrain (bijvoorbeeld door een cookiebanner te accepteren), is het mogelijk dat uw eerdere profiel opnieuw aan uw UUID wordt gekoppeld. Als u zich niet binnen 21 dagen aanmeldt, wordt uw profiel verwijderd en kan het niet meer worden teruggehaald.
Zoals bij de meeste opt-outcookies is de browseropt-out van Outbrain afhankelijk van een cookie.
Het is de bedoeling dat de opt-outcookie blijvend voldoet aan de voorkeuren van de gebruiker. De ITP-functie (Intelligent Tracking Prevention) van iOS11 kan echter invloed hebben op de blijvende aanwezigheid van cookies op websites na een venster van 24 uur. Wij raden u aan een andere browser te gebruiken of te overwegen om alle cookies van derden van de browser te blokkeren, zodat u "opted-out" bent zonder dat u afhankelijk bent van de specifieke opt-outmethode van bedrijven.
Uw lokale opslag wordt niet gewist.
Hoewel u zich hebt afgemeld voor de gepersonaliseerde aanbevelingen van Outbrain, wordt uw lokale opslag niet automatisch gewist en moet u naast uw afmelding deze dus ook op browserniveau wissen.
Business Partners:
U bent een Business Partner wanneer u zich namens het bedrijf waarvoor u werkt registreert (of e-mailt met Outbrain) voor gebruik van de diensten van Outbrain Amplify of Outbrain Engage. Kijk hier voor meer
informatie
.
(a)
Welke informatie we verzamelen en waarom
U kunt bepaalde persoonsgegevens (zoals uw naam en/of e-mailadres) opgeven wanneer u zich aanmeldt voor de diensten van Amplify of Engage of wanneer u op een andere manier met ons communiceert. Als u zich aanmeldt om Business Partner te worden, kunnen wij u om aanvullende informatie vragen via aanmeldingsformulieren voor adverteerders, plaatsingsopdrachten en andere formulieren. Daarnaast verzamelen we automatisch informatie over de acties van uw gebruikersnaam in het Outbrain-dashboard. Een voorbeeld: als u als Amplify Business Partner de kosten-per-klik voor een van uw campagnes wijzigt, bevat het auditspoor van Outbrain een overzicht van al die acties.
Wij verzamelen en verwerken de bovenstaande persoonsgegevens om onze verplichtingen uit hoofde van onze overeenkomst als Business Partner (of toekomstige Business Partner) met u te kunnen nakomen, onder andere om:
antwoord te geven op uw vragen en verzoeken;
u toegang te geven tot bepaalde functies en kenmerken van onze Amplify- of Engage-diensten (bijv. om uw dashboardaccount te leveren en onderhouden);
uw identiteit te verifiëren; en
met u te communiceren over uw account, onze producten en beschikbare promoties die relevant zijn voor uw gebruik van de Amplify- of Engage-dienst.
(b)
Welke cookies en andere soortgelijke technologieën we gebruiken
Zie deze
Cookietabel
onder "Business Partners" voor een gedetailleerde lijst met eigen en externe cookies (en de bijbehorende bewaartermijnen) die wij gebruiken bij Business Partners.
(c)
Hoe we informatie met anderen kunnen delen
We kunnen bepaalde informatie van Business Partners openbaar maken aan verkopers, aannemers of anderen die Outbrain helpen bij het leveren van de diensten (bijv. bij de verwerking van creditcards). Zie ook de sectie Delen van dit Privacybeleid.
(d)
Uw rechten
Als u als Business Partner uw gegevens wilt controleren, corrigeren, bijwerken of het deactiveren van uw gegevens wilt aanvragen, kunt u naar het Outbrain-dashboard gaan om uw profielvoorkeuren aan te passen of contact met ons opnemen via
support@outbrain.com
. Als u e-mails van Outbrain ontvangt, kunt u zich afmelden via een "unsubscribe"-link in de e-mail. Houd er rekening mee dat u zich niet kunt afmelden van meldingen die cruciaal zijn voor het leveren van de Amplify- of Engage-diensten (bijv. facturen via e-mail).
(e)
Wettelijke grondslag
De wettelijke grondslag van Outbrain voor het verwerken van persoonsgegevens van Business Partners is contractueel.
4.
Beveiligingsmaatregelen, doorgifte buiten de EER, delen en bewaren van gegevens
+
Beveiliging
Gegevensoverdracht buiten de EU/EER
Delen
Bewaren van gegevens
Beveiliging
Outbrain heeft een gespecialiseerd beveiligingsteam. We zorgen voor een strikte controle op de persoonsgegevens die we verzamelen en bewaren deze in met firewalls afgeschermde en beveiligde databases met strikt beperkte en gecontroleerde toegangsrechten, om ervoor te zorgen dat ze veilig zijn. Zie onze
veiligheidsstandaarden
voor meer informatie.
Business Partners hebben toegang tot bepaalde met een wachtwoord beveiligde functies van de Amplify- of Engage-dienst. Business Partners zijn verantwoordelijk voor het geheimhouden van dit wachtwoord en moeten ervoor zorgen dat hun medewerkers en/of hun agenten hetzelfde doen. Vergeet niet dat de overdracht van informatie via het internet helaas nooit volledig veilig is. Een veel voorkomende vorm van internetoplichting staat bekend als "spoofing" of "phishing". Daarbij ontvangt u een e-mail van wat een legitieme bron lijkt te zijn, waarin u om persoonsgegevens wordt gevraagd. Wij sturen u geen e-mails waarin we u vragen uw creditcard, bankgegevens of andere persoonsgegevens te verifiëren. Als u ooit een e-mail ontvangt die van ons lijkt te zijn en waarin u om dergelijke informatie wordt gevraagd, reageer er dan niet op en klik niet op de links in de e-mail. In plaats daarvan kunt u de e-mail naar ons doorsturen via
legal@outbrain.com
, omdat wij gevallen van mogelijke internetfraude onderzoeken.
Gegevensoverdracht buiten de EU/EER
Wanneer wij persoonsgegevens uit de Europese Economische Ruimte (EER) overdragen, zorgen wij ervoor dat deze overdrachten in overeenstemming zijn met de relevante wetgeving inzake gegevensbescherming, met inbegrip van, indien van toepassing, standaardcontractbepalingen van de EU of een positieve beschikking van de Europese Commissie op grond van artikel 25, lid 6, van Richtlijn 95/46/EG of artikel 45 van de AVG. Met andere woorden, uw rechten en bescherming blijven gelden voor uw gegevens en wij gebruiken goedgekeurde contractuele clausules en andere maatregelen om ervoor te zorgen dat de ontvangers van uw persoonsgegevens deze beschermen. Outbrain hanteert de standaardcontractbepalingen tussen Outbrain-entiteiten voor de overdracht van gegevens buiten de EER.
Delen
Naast de beschrijving van de manier waarop wij uw persoonsgegevens voor elk type gebruiker kunnen bekendmaken, kunnen wij ook op de volgende manieren persoonsgegevens bekendmaken:
Om interne redenen binnen de familie van bedrijven die door Outbrain worden gecontroleerd, voornamelijk voor zakelijke en operationele doeleinden;
Als we een bedrijfstransitie doormaken, zoals een fusie, overname door een ander bedrijf of de verkoop van alle of een deel van onze activa, zullen uw persoonsgegevens waarschijnlijk deel uitmaken van de overgedragen activa;
Wanneer dit wettelijk verplicht is (bijvoorbeeld om mee te werken aan rechtshandhavingsonderzoeken of andere juridische procedures); en/of
Om te kunnen reageren op een echte noodsituatie.
Daarnaast combineren wij uw persoonsgegevens met die van andere gebruikers om trendinformatie en geaggregeerde gebruikersstatistieken te delen met derden, altijd in geaggregeerde en geanonimiseerde vorm.
Bewaren van gegevens
De bewaartermijn voor elk van de door Outbrain gebruikte cookies (zowel onze eigen cookies als door derden namens ons gebruikte cookies) wordt vermeld in de
Cookietabel
. Meer specifiek: de Outbrain-cookie (Obuid), die wordt gebruikt voor het tracken van acties van de gebruiker zoals kliks, vervalt drie(3) maanden nadat een gebruiker een bepaalde site binnen ons netwerkwerk heeft bezocht; deze cookie wordt echter gereset als een gebruiker terugkeert naar dezelfde site of een andere site binnen ons netwerk. Bovendien bewaren wij geen individuele gegevenspunten van een Gebruiker langer dan 13 maanden. Als UUID 123 bijvoorbeeld op 31 december 2018 een artikel heeft gelezen, maakt dat artikel op 1 februari 2019 geen deel meer uit van het profiel van UUID 123 Outbrain hanteert ook een beleid voor het bewaren van gegevens, waarbij de bewaartermijn voor persoonsgegevens wordt bepaald op basis van onze analyse van hoe lang de specifieke gegevens redelijkerwijs nodig zijn voor wettelijke of zakelijke doeleinden. Wanneer we persoonsgegevens niet meer nodig hebben, verwijderen of vernietigen we deze op een veilige manier. Geaggregeerde gegevens, die niet een apparaat/browser (of individu) kunnen identificeren en die worden gebruikt voor rapportage- en analysedoeleinden, worden zo lang als commercieel noodzakelijk is bewaard.
5.
Kinderen en gevoelige gegevens
+
Kinderen
Geen van onze diensten is opzettelijk gericht op kinderen onder de 16 jaar. We verzamelen niet bewust persoonsgegevens van personen onder de 16 jaar. Indien wij bij het verzamelen van de gegevens vaststellen dat een Bezoeker van de site, een Gebruiker of een Business Partner jonger is dan 16 jaar, zullen wij zijn of haar persoonsgegevens niet gebruiken of bewaren. Als we er achter komen dat we onbewust persoonsgegevens van een kind onder de 16 jaar hebben verzameld, zullen we redelijke inspanningen leveren om dergelijke informatie uit onze gegevens te verwijderen. Als je een kind bent, ga dan lekker buiten spelen en gebruik Outbrain niet!
Gevoelige gegevens
Wij verzamelen of ontvangen geen gevoelige persoonsgegevens.
6.
Bezoekers uit Europese gebieden
+
In overeenstemming met bepaalde privacywetten, in het bijzonder de Europese Algemene Verordening inzake Gegevensbescherming (AVG), voorziet Outbrain in specifieke aanvullende rechten voor personen die met Outbrain in contact komen, zoals het recht op toegang, rectificatie en bezwaar, het recht om een klacht in te dienen, het recht om gegevens te laten wissen en het recht op blokkering. Meer specifiek en onder bepaalde omstandigheden:
het recht om informatie op te vragen over of en welke persoonsgegevens door ons worden verwerkt, en het recht om te eisen dat persoonsgegevens worden gecorrigeerd of gewijzigd.
het recht om te verzoeken dat persoonsgegevens worden gewist.
het recht om te eisen dat de verwerking van persoonsgegevens wordt beperkt.
uw toestemming voor de verwerking en het gebruik van uw gegevens te allen tijde geheel of gedeeltelijk in te trekken bij een toekomstige aanvraag.
het recht om uw persoonsgegevens te verkrijgen in een gebruikelijke, gestructureerde en mechanisch leesbare indeling.
contact op te nemen met onze functionaris voor gegevensbescherming als er vragen, opmerkingen, klachten of verzoeken zijn in verband met onze verklaring over gegevensbescherming en de verwerking van uw persoonsgegevens.
het recht om een klacht in te dienen bij de verantwoordelijke toezichthoudende autoriteit indien u van mening bent dat de verwerking van uw persoonsgegevens in strijd is met de wetgeving.
In aanvulling op het bovenstaande verwijzen we in dit Privacybeleid naar bepaalde rechten voor burgers van de Europese gebieden. Volgens de AVG wordt onder burgers uit "
Europese gebieden
" verstaan de Europese Economische Ruimte (EER), de Europese Vrijhandelszone (EVA) en Zwitserland. In het kader van dit Privacybeleid zal de term "Europese gebieden" het Verenigd Koninkrijk blijven omvatten, zelfs nadat het Verenigd Koninkrijk de Europese Economische Ruimte na Brexit heeft verlaten.
Stuur een e-mail naar
Privacy@outbrain.com
met eventuele vragen over het uitoefenen van een van de bovenstaande rechten.
7.
Bekendmaking over "Do Not Track"
+
Sommige browsers verzenden DNT-signalen (Do Not Track) naar websites. Omdat er geen algemene overeenkomst is over hoe het DNT-signaal moet worden geïnterpreteerd, verandert of wijzigt Outbrain op dit moment niets aan DNT-verzoeken of -signalen van deze browsers en reageert het ook niet op deze verzoeken of signalen. Wij zullen de activiteiten van de sector op dit gebied blijven volgen en onze DNT-praktijken waar nodig opnieuw beoordelen. Intussen kunt u gebruik maken van het scala aan andere tools die wij aanbieden om het verzamelen en gebruiken van gegevens te beheren, inclusief de mogelijkheid om af te zien van het ontvangen van gepersonaliseerde aanbevelingen in de sectie Gebruikers.
8.
Hoe dit Privacybeleid kan veranderen
+
Wij kunnen dit Privacybeleid van tijd tot tijd wijzigen. We plaatsen een opvallend bericht dat zichtbaar is voor u als Bezoeker van de site of als Business Partner, maar we hebben geen mogelijkheid om gebruikers via een bericht op de hoogte te stellen van een update. U kunt hier regelmatig controleren of het Privacybeleid is bijgewerkt, aangezien we altijd de datum van de laatste wijziging van het Privacybeleid boven aan de pagina weergeven, zodat u kunt zien wanneer het voor het laatst is gewijzigd.
Effective February 16th 2022
Download
Política de Privacidade
A Outbrain tem o compromisso de proteger seus dados pessoais. Esta política de privacidade (
“Política de Privacidade”
) rege o uso pela Outbrain dos dados coletados por nós, incluindo todos e quaisquer dados pessoais. Dados pessoais são informações relacionadas a você e que podem identificá-lo como indivíduo. Usamos seus dados pessoais cumprindo todas as leis vigentes. Para garantir a conformidade e o alinhamento aos valores da Outbrain de confiança e transparência nós temos uma equipe de especialistas responsáveis por implementar continuamente o nosso programa global de privacidade.
+ EXPAND ALL
– COLLAPSE ALL
1.
Quem somos, o que fazemos, como contatar a Outbrain, nosso DPO ou as autoridades competentes
+
Quem somos:
Outbrain representa a Outbrain Inc., empresa de Delaware, EUA com sede em Nova York; e suas subsidiárias afiliadas (coletivamente denominadas “Outbrain” ou “nós”, “nos”, “nosso(as)”). Operamos a partir de 12 escritórios globais e trabalhamos em parceria com editores de conteúdo e marketing do mundo todo.
O que fazemos:
A missão da Outbrain é oferecer recomendações interessantes aos seus Usuários com base nos interesses dos Usuários. Para cumprir nossa missão, firmamos acordos com:
Produtores e Divulgadores de conteúdo on-line e parceiros que desejam recomendar conteúdo relevante aos seus leitores (na
Outbrain Engage
); e
anunciantes que desejam que leitores visualizem seu conteúdo (na
Outbrain Amplify
).
Parceiros que nos ajudam a direcionar recomendações relevantes.
Para mais informações sobre nossos serviços Amplify (anunciante), consulte
aqui
e nossos serviços Engage (Divulgador), veja
aqui
.
Como nos contatar:
Nós fazemos, regularmente, verificações de conformidade com base nesta Política de Privacidade. Perguntas, comentários e solicitações relacionados a esta Política de Privacidade são bem-vindas e devem ser encaminhadas a privacy@outbrain.com ou via correio a Outbrain Inc., 222 Broadway 19th Floor, New York, NY 10038, USA, Attn: Privacy Questions.
Caso a Outbrain não forneça resposta satisfatória para suas perguntas ou preocupações, também é possível contatar o seguinte departamento para orientações, suporte ou reclamações:
responsável externa Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) da Outbrain: ePrivacy GmbH, representada pelo Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer. A ePrivacy GmbH pode ser contatada diretamente via dpo@outbrain.com; e/ou
Information Commissioner’s Officer
, que é o principal serviço supervisor da Outbrain nos Territórios Europeus.
2.
Alianças e Adesões
+
Nós aderimos ainda, aos princípios de auto-regulamentação estabelecidos pela
Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA)
e pela
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance
(EDAA);
Nós somos membros e com atestado de bons antecedentes da
Network Advertising Initiative
(NAI),  que é uma associação dedicada à coleta responsável de dados e do seu uso para publicidade digital. Também aderimos ao Código de Conduta da NAI para Web e dispositivos móveis. A Outbrain também adere aos princípios auto regulatórios do Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) para publicidade comportamental on-line e à estrutura OBA da IAB Europe; e
Também somos certificados pela JICWEBS DTSG Brand Safety
aqui
.
3.
Tipos de usuários da Outbrain (incluindo as Opções de ser Excluído)
+
Parte desta Política de Privacidade está dividida em seções baseadas no seu modo de interagir com a Outbrain. Você pode ser Visitante, Usuário e/ou um Parceiro de Comercial (conforme definido abaixo). Por favor, determine o tipo de usuário você se enquadra . Para cada tipo de usuário, explicamos que tipo de informação coletamos e por que, quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares usamos, como compartilhamos essas informações e quais são os seus direitos.
Visitantes do Site:
Você é um “Visitante do Site” ao visitar e interagir com os nossos websites, páginas na web, recursos interativos, blogs e seus respectivos conteúdos na Outbrain.com (ou qualquer página derivada, como Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; Outbrain.de, etc.) (“
Nossos Sites
“). Veja mais
aqui
.
（a）
Quais informações coletamos e por quê
Queremos entender quais serviços dos Nossos Sites interessam a você e lembrá-lo dos serviços que oferecemos quando você não está nos Nossos Sites. Para fazer isso, coletamos as seguintes informações de seus dispositivos: (i) endereço IP; (ii) dados do Agente do Usuário: tipo de dispositivo (ex.: iPhone), tipo de navegador (ex.: Chrome), sistema operacional (ex.: iOS); (iii) páginas visitadas no Nosso Site (ex.: página “Sobre nós” da Outbrain); (iv) horário da visita (e respectivo fuso horário); e (v) URLs de encaminhamento e outras informações normalmente transmitidas em solicitações HTTP (ex.: essas informações nos dizem como você chegou aos Nossos Sites).
Além disso, também podemos coletar seu nome e endereço de e-mail, caso você concorde em enviar seus dados para nós através de Nossos Sites (por exemplo, ao se inscrever para receber nossa newsletter).
（b）
Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
Por favor, veja  esta
Tabela de Cookies
, a qual é atualizada constantemente, na sessão de
“Visitantes do Site” para uma lista detalhada dos cookies de primeira e terceira partes (e os respectivos períodos de retenção) que podem ser usados quando você visita os Nossos Sites.
（c）
Como podemos compartilhar informações
Compartilhamento de informações que tomamos ciência sobre você nos Nossos Sites.
Nós não comercializamos ou compartilhamos os seus dados pessoais seus com terceiros para fins de marketing ou publicidade. No entanto, podemos usar vários terceiros (todos listados nesta
Tabela de Cookies
) para nos ajudar a direcionar ou fazer publicidade para você.  Nós exigimos que esses terceiros e empresas concordem em cumprir  com todas as leis de proteção de dados vigentes, mantenham confidenciais todas as informações compartilhadas com eles e a usem as informações somente para cumprir suas obrigações conosco. Nós fazemos isso firmando acordos com todos os terceiros que processam dados pessoais em nosso nome para garantir que eles processem seus dados pessoais.
Se você publicar em nosso blog, seu comentário e suas informações ficarão visíveis publicamente. Por favor, entre em contato com support@outbrain.com para solicitar a remoção do seu comentário.
Usando serviços de terceiros nos Nossos Sites.
Nossos Sites contêm links para outros websites que não operamos nem são de nossa propriedade. Não controlamos, recomendamos ou endossamos o conteúdo, os produtos, serviços, políticas de privacidade ou práticas desses websites de terceiros. Por exemplo: nos Nossos Sites, você notará ícones clicáveis que o levam à página da Outbrain no Facebook ou no LinkedIn. Ao escolher clicar nesses links, você deve estar ciente de que esses sites não pertencem ou tampouco são operados pela Outbrain e, portanto,  esses websites de terceiros podem enviar seus próprios cookies ao seu aparelho, que podem coletar dados pessoais de maneira independente. Por isso, é importante que você leia e se familiarize com as políticas de privacidade dos websites de terceiros.
Consulte também a seção de Compartilhamento desta Política de Privacidade.
(d)
Seus direitos
Os
Termos de Uso
no Nosso Site regem o uso do Nosso Site e também se aplicam quando você interage com os Nossos Sites. Você pode interromper o uso do Nosso Site a qualquer momento. Ao fazê-lo, você também tem a opção de remover quaisquer cookies que tenhamos colocado em qualquer dispositivo usado para acessar o Nosso Site. Se você forneceu seu endereço de e-mail durante o uso dos Nossos Sites, todos os e-mails que você receber da Outbrain incluirão a opção de se “descadastrar”. Além disso, você tem a opção de solicitar a exclusão de marketing direto por e-mail support@outbrain.com.
Para Visitantes, no Território Europeu, a Outbrain implementou uma plataforma de gestão de consentimento (operada pela
One Trust
) nos Nossos Sites que dá aos visitantes a oportunidade de autorizar ou não cookies e tecnologias similares de rastreamento nos Nossos Sites. Ao acessar Nossos Sites, você verá um banner no centro da página com informações sobre os cookies que usamos. Você pode clicar no banner para rejeitar quaisquer cookies (por exemplo, cookies de desempenho ou cookies de segmentação) que não sejam cookies estritamente necessários (conforme definido na Tabela de Cookies). Ao pressionar " eu Aceito" no banner, você indica sua aceitação de cookies e das tecnologias de rastreamento semelhantes. O fundamento legal da Outbrain para o processamento de dados pessoais dos visitantes do site do Território Europeu em nossos sites é consentido. Você pode retirar seu consentimento a qualquer momento
Cookies Settings
. Em relação a todos os outros visitantes do site não localizados em territórios europeus, nós confiamos em nosso legítimo interesse em processar quaisquer dados pessoais, no entanto, isso não impede que visitantes de sites de fora do território europeu não retirem o consentimento a qualquer momento por meio de nossa plataforma de gerenciamento de consentimentos.
Usuários:
Você é um “Usuário” ao visitar uma página de um website ou aplicativo de um dos parceiros da Outbrain onde a ferramenta da Outbrain esteja instalada (“Sites Parceiros”). Por exemplo, ao visitar
https://news.sky.com/uk
,
www.bild.de
ou
www.cnn.com
, a ferramenta da Outbrain está implementada nesses sites. Ao interagir com a ferramenta da Outbrain, você é informado por um texto que faz referência à Outbrain (ex.: “Recomendado pela Outbrain” ou “by Outbrain” ao lado das recomendações). Ao clicar no link que faz referência à Outbrain, você verá um
aviso detalhado
que permite acessar o
Perfil de Interesse da Outbrain
, que fornece uma visualização geral dos tipos de categorias de dados da Outbrain que podem ser usados para fazer suas recomendações. Em alguns casos, o parceiro ou divulgador pode ter uma marca branca dos Serviços da Outbrain pelas suas próprias ofertas. Nesse caso, esses parceiros e/ou divulgadores devem informar o uso da Outbrain em suas políticas de privacidade. Veja mais
aqui
.
Exemplo de ferramenta da Outbrain
(a)
Quais informações coletamos e por quê
Usamos UUIDs, endereço IP e outras Informações de Uso para poder lhe oferecer recomendações interessantes. As recomendações da Outbrain podem ser pagas por um anunciante que direciona você para um novo website ou podem ser orgânicas, com link para outra página no site do mesmo anunciante.
UUID.
Quando, como usuário, você visita pela primeira vez um Site Parceiro (ex.: CNN.com), a Outbrain instala um cookie no seu dispositivo para gerar um UUID (identificador único de usuário). Alternativamente, se   você interagir primeiro com um Parceiro usando um aplicativo do Parceiro, a Outbrain receberá a sua identificação anunciante atribuído a você pelo seu dispositivo.  Nós catalogamos e analisamos o conteúdo que você visualiza nos Sites Parceiros. Nossas recomendações baseiam-se em: (i) um UUID de histórico de navegação; (ii) padrões de navegação similares de outros Usuários; (ii) recomendações geralmente populares entre o público da Outbrain atualmente; (iv) um certo grau de aleatoriedade; e (v) requisitos de público-alvo que podem ser fornecidos ou solicitados por nossos clientes Amplify. Por exemplo, a Outbrain pode saber que o UUID 123 (que poderia ser você no seu iPhone X acessando o jornal Guardian usando o Chrome como navegador) gosta de ler sobre destinos de férias remotos e que pessoas que gostam de ler sobre destinos de férias remotos também gostam de ler sobre comida exótica. Quando você interage com a Outbrain, nós não coletamos seus dados pessoais tradicionais, como seu endereço de e-mail ou nome, portanto, não podemos associar seu nome ao seu UUID (por exemplo, não sabemos que John Smith, que também é UUID 123, gosta para ler sobre destinos de férias distantes).
O UUID é uma sequência de números e/ou letras. Esse UUID vincula-se ao seu dispositivo e varia conforme  a sua combinação de  navegador. Em outras palavras, a Outbrain registra um UUID diferente dependendo do aparelho e/ou navegador que você está usando ao acessar os Sites Parceiros. Por exemplo, isso significa que você terá um UUID quando visitar um Site Parceiro a partir do seu celular usando o navegador Safari e outro UUID ao visitar um Site Parceiro do seu iPad usando o navegador Safari. A Outbrain combinará e consolidará o UUID de um aparelho móvel (celular ou tablet) por um navegador que depois acessa um aplicativo (ou vice-versa) a partir do mesmo dispositivo. A Outbrain nós não realiza o rastreamento entre dispositivos e, portanto, não pode vincular um usuário que interaja com a Outbrain, pelo telefone, como o mesmo usuário que está interagindo com a Outbrain na área de trabalho (desktop).
Endereço IP.
Além do seu UUID,  nós reconhecemos o seu endereço de IP, que traduzimos em geolocalização e excluímos o último octeto para mascarar as informações de identificação. Em seguida, usamos essas informações mascaradas, em conjunto com as informações recebidas de outros parceiros confiáveis (como MaxMind) para determinar com um amplo entendimento de onde você está localizado (por exemplo, Nova York). A Outbrain ainda reconhecerá seu endereço IP, mesmo se você optar por não seguir o rastreamento personalizado, pois isso é necessário para que possamos continuar atendendo a recomendações baseadas em contexto. No entanto, nesses casos, seu endereço IP não está associado ao seu UUID e não faria parte de nenhum perfil de usuário
Outras Informações de Uso.
Além do seu UUID e endereço IP, nós também coletamos as seguintes informações da área de trabalho (Desktop) e na Web móvel: (i) dados do Agente de Usuário: tipo de dispositivo (por exemplo, iphone), tipo de navegador (por exemplo, chrome), operação sistema (por exemplo, iOS); (ii) as páginas visitadas; (iii) a hora da visita; e (iv) referencias de URLs e outras informações normalmente transmitidas em solicitações HTTP. As informações de estatísticas acima nos fornecem dados sobre quantos Usuários visitaram uma página específica Sites de nossos Parceiros nos quais a ferramenta da Outbrain está instalada, quanto tempo cada Usuário permaneceu na página, o tipo de conteúdo na página em que clicaram e como geralmente envolveram-se com essa página; e (b) nos aplicativos (i) versão do aplicativo (como aparece na App Store ou na Play Store); (ii) Identificação do aplicativo ou nome do pacote (como aparece na App Store ou na Play Store); (iii) sistema operacional (por exemplo, IOS ou Android); (iii) versão do sistema operacional; e (iv) modelo do dispositivo (por exemplo, iPhone X). Essas informações são consideradas dados pessoais se a Outbrain as associar a um UUID.
Como a Outbrain não possui um relacionamento direto com os Usuários que interagem com os Sites Parceiros, a Outbrain confia em seus parceiros para determinar o fundamento legal com a qual a Outbrain pode processar os dados pessoais. Cada Site Parceiro depende de
(b)
Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
Cookies de Outbrain
Píxeles de Outbrain
Píxeles de terceros
Cookies de Outbrain
Consulte en la
Tabla de cookies
under “Users” en el apartado «Usuarios» para obtener un listado detallado de las cookies de origen que utilizamos cuando usted interactúa con Sitios asociados en los que está implementada la tecnología de Outbrain.
Píxeles de Outbrain
Ademas del widget visible de Outbrain en los Sitios asociados, algunos anunciantes de Outbrain pueden implementar el píxel de Outbrain en sus sitios web. El píxel de Outbrain determina si un Usuario que accede a la página en la que está instalado el píxel tiene un UUID de Outbrain con el fin de proporcionar informes a los anunciantes en relación con su campaña particular. Si hay un UUID asociado a un usuario final, Outbrain permite a los anunciantes o bien redestinar dichos UUID y/o notifica a los anunciantes el número total de Usuarios (de forma acumulada y anónima) que han accedido a una página en particular (por ejemplo, un anunciante no puede saber que el UUID1234 se ha convertido, sino solamente que se ha producido una conversión). Outbrain no transfiere a sus anunciantes ningún dato personal (incluido su UUID) ni recopila ninguna otra información personal a través del píxel. Outbrain no combina la información recibida de la información de píxel de Outbrain con un perfil de UUID (por ejemplo, Outbrain solamente registra que se ha producido una conversión, y no que el UUID123 se ha convertido al acceder a la página elegida del anunciante). Exigimos a los anunciantes que revelen el uso del píxel de Outbrain en sus propios sitios web.
Outbrain también puede permitir a determinados terceros asociados de confianza recopilar datos a través de cookies suministradas por medio del widget de Outbrain. En tales casos, Outbrain no transfiere esta información recolectada sobre sus usuarios a dichos terceros, pero sí que les permite a estos terceros recopilar información directamente (incluyendo datos personales) mediante el widget para la prevención de fraudes y/o fines de seguridad o para proporcionar información de mediciones a anunciantes (tales como el numero de conversiones o impresiones). Esta recopilación de información se rige por las políticas de privacidad de los terceros.
Píxeles de terceros
Si hace clic en un enlace a una de nuestras recomendaciones, el anunciante que patrocina la recomendación puede colocar cookies (o cookies de terceros pertenecientes a terceros que actúan en nombre del anunciante ) en su dispositivo, bien a través de redireccionamiento antes de llegar a la página de destino de las recomendaciones o al llegar a la página de destino. Estas cookies se colocan con el fin de proporcionar análisis al anunciante relacionado con la campaña del mismo (por ejemplo, para ver cuántos usuarios han visto la campaña del anunciante). Exigimos a nuestros anunciantes que revelen el uso de píxeles de terceros y/o cookies para los usuarios finales a través su sitio web. Estas cookies y/o píxeles se agregan a discreción única de nuestros anunciantes, por lo que usted queda sujeto al aviso de privacidad del anunciante y/o a su política de privacidad.
(c)
Como podemos compartilhar informações
Nossos Parceiros
A Outbrain não compartilha e/ou comercializa perfis de Usuário com nenhum terceiro. Contudo, podemos compartilhar alguns elementos do seu perfil (como por exemplo, UUID) com o parceiro, incluindo-se:
Parceiros de segurança de marca, análise e fraude;
2. Plataformas do Lado da Demanda (DSP) e Plataformas do Lado da Oferta (SSP);
3. Intercâmbio de Anúncios e/ou Redes; e
4. Plataformas de Gerenciamento de Demanda.
Por favor, veja
aqui
uma lista de alguns de nossos parceiros confiáveis. Além disso, podemos coletar e/ou compartilhar alguns dos seus dados pessoais com parceiros confiáveis em virtude da participação no OpenRTB. Muitos desses parceiros estão registrados como fornecedores globais do IAB TCF e podem ser encontrados
aqui
.
(d)
Seus direitos
Opção de exclusão na Web para computadores e dispositivos móveis
Opção de exclusão na Web para computadores e dispositivos móveis.
Você pode, a qualquer momento, optar por não receber as recomendações personalizadas da Outbrain (ou, se tiver optado por não participar e quiser voltar a participar), movendo o botão de alternância abaixo. Você também pode optar por não receber recomendações personalizadas, por meio do Perfil de interesse da Outbrain, que é um site que fornece uma visualização geral dos dados que a Outbrain tem conhecimento sobre você e pode usar para fazer suas recomendações.
Opção de exclusão em Aplicativos
Opção de exclusão em Aplicativos.
Para desativar as recomendações da Outbrain em seus aplicativos de dispositivos móveis, siga as etapas abaixo:
Dispositivos iOS: Configurações> Privacidade> Publicidade> Limitar o Rastreamento de Anúncios
Dispositivos Android: aplicativo de Configurações do Google> Anúncios> Desativar Publicidade Baseada em Interesses
Observe que a desativação, através do nosso Perfil de Interesse  /ou desta Política de Privacidade, não impedirá o acompanhamento personalizado de seus aplicativos. Essa desativação deve ser feita através das configurações do seu aparelho.
Opções Adicionais de Exclusão
.
Opções Adicionais de Exclusão
YVocê também pode optar por não receber anúncios personalizados veiculados por nós ou outras empresas de publicidade, através de ferramentas do setor, como o NAI ou várias páginas baseadas em DAA (DAA, http://www.aboutads.info/choices; DAAC, www. youradchoices.ca/choices e / ou EDAA www.youronlinechoices.eu). O acesso das páginas de escolha do consumidor do NAI, DAA, DAAC ou EDAA permite desativar todos ou alguns dos serviços dos membros participantes. Como as opções de exclusão da Outbrain, essas opções  não significam que você não receberá mais publicidade; mas apenas que os anúncios não serão personalizados para você. Você continuará recebendo anúncios, por exemplo, com base no site específico que está visualizando (ou seja, anúncios contextuais). Além disso, se seus navegadores estiverem configurados para rejeitar cookies, quando você visitar as páginas de escolha do consumidor DAA, DAAC ou EDAA, sua exclusão poderá não ser eficaz, pois nossa exclusão é baseada em cookies.
Informação IMPORTANTE
Mesmo que você tenha optado por não receber as recomendações personalizadas da Outbrain:
Você ainda verá recomendações da Outbrain.
A opção de exclusão personalizada  de rastreamento da Outbrain, não significa que você deixará de receber recomendações da Outbrain. Em vez disso, significa que as recomendações da Outbrain não serão personalizadas.  (por exemplo, serão recomendações baseadas no contexto).
A opção de exclusão baseia-se em cookies e é específica para cada dispositivo/navegador.
Se você navegar na internet em diferentes dispositivos e/ou navegadores, você precisará fazer a opção de exclusão  em cada aparelho e/ou navegador para que possamos impedir o rastreamento para personalização em todos eles. Pela mesma razão, se você comprar um novo dispositivo, mudar de navegador ou excluir (ou limpar) o cookie de recusa, será necessário fazer a opção de exclusão novamente. A opção de exclusão  de rastreamento para personalização não significa bloquear cookies.
Você deve optar pela opção de exclusão da  Outbrain por pelo menos 21 dias, pois a exclusão do seu perfil está vinculada ao seu UUID.
.
Sua exclusão das recomendações personalizadas da Outbrain é efetiva imediatamente. No entanto, se o seu navegador permitir armazenamento local e você optar pelas recomendações personalizadas da Outbrain (por exemplo, ao aceitar um banner de cookie) dentro de 21 dias após a sua exclusão, é possível que seu perfil anterior seja reconectado ao seu UUID. Se você não optar pela exclusão dentro de 21 dias, seu perfil será excluído e não poderá ser recuperado.
Como na maioria dos cookies de exclusão, o navegador Outbrain depende de um cookie.
O cookie de exclusão  deve ser persistente para atender às preferências do usuário. No entanto, o recurso de "Prevenção de RastreamentoInteligente" no iOS11 pode afetar a persistência de cookies nos websites postados em uma janela de 24 horas. Nós sugerimos usar outro navegador ou considerar o bloqueio de todos os cookies de terceiros do navegador para que você "desative-os" sem precisar confiar na metodologia de desativação real de qualquer empresa.
Seu armazenamento local não será limpo.
Mesmo que você tenha optado por não receber as recomendações personalizadas da Outbrain, seu armazenamento local não será limpado automaticamente e, portanto, você precisará limpá-lo no nível do navegador, além da sua exclusão.
Parceiros Comerciais:
Você é um “Parceiro Comercial” ao se cadastrar (ou trocar e-mails com a Outbrain) em nome da empresa para a qual trabalha para utilizar os serviços Outbrain Amplify ou Outbrain Engage. Veja mais
aqui
.
(a)
Quais informações coletamos e por quê
Você pode fornecer determinados dados pessoais (como endereço de e-mail) ao se inscrever para os serviços Amplify ou Engage ou se comunicar ou interagir conosco por outros meios. Se você se inscrever para se tornar Parceiro Comercial, podemos solicitar informações adicionais suas via formulários de inscrição para anunciante, pedidos de inserção e outros meios. Coletamos informações automaticamente sobre as ações do seu nome de usuário no painel da Outbrain. Por exemplo, se como Parceiro Comercial Amplify você alterar o custo por clique de uma de suas campanhas, o registro de auditoria da Outbrain terá o histórico de todas essas ações.
Coletamos e processamos os dados pessoais acima para cumprir nossas obrigações nos termos do nosso acordo como Parceiro Comercial (ou potencial Parceiro Comercial) seu, inclusive para:
responder às suas perguntas e solicitações;
fornecer acesso a determinadas funções e recursos dos nossos serviços Amplify ou Engage (ex.: para fornecimento e manutenção da sua conta no painel de controle);
verificar sua identidade; e,
nos comunicar com você sobre sua conta, nossos produtos e promoções disponíveis relevantes para o seu uso do serviço Amplify ou Engage.
(b)
Quais cookies e outras tecnologias similares utilizamos
Consulte esta
Tabela de Cookies
em “Parceiros Comerciais” para uma lista detalhada dos cookies (e os respectivos períodos de retenção) que usamos com Parceiros Comerciais.
(c)
Como podemos compartilhar informações
Podemos revelar determinadas informações de Parceiros Comerciais a fornecedores, prestadores de serviços ou outros que auxiliem a Outbrain na prestação dos seus serviços (ex.: processamento de cartões de crédito). Consulte também a seção de
Compartilhamento
desta Política de Privacidade.
(d)
Seus direitos
Se, como Parceiro Comercial, você deseja verificar, corrigir, atualizar ou solicitar desativação das suas informações, você pode acessar o painel da Outbrain para editar suas preferências de perfil ou nos contatar em support@outbrain.com. Se você está recebendo e-mails da Outbrain, você pode se “descadastrar” acessando o link nos e-mails. Observe que o descadastramento pode não desativar o recebimento de notificações importantes para o fornecimento dos serviços Amplify ou Engage (ex.: faturas por e-mail).
(e) Fundamentação Legal
A fundamentação legal da Outbrain para processar dados pessoais dos Parceiros Comerciais é contratual.
4.
Medidas de Segurança , Transferências para fora do EEE, Compartilhamento e Períodos de Retenção de dados
+
Seguridad
Transferencias de datos fuera de la UE/EEE
Intercambio
Retención de datos
Seguridad
Outbrain tiene un equipo de seguridad específico. Mantenemos un estricto control de los datos personales que recopilamos y los retenemos en bases de datos seguras y protegidas por cortafuegos con derechos de acceso estrictamente limitados y controlados, para garantizar su seguridad. Consulte nuestras
normas de seguridad
para obtener más información.
Los socios comerciales tienen acceso a determinadas funciones protegidas por contraseña del servicio Amplify o Engage. Los Socios comerciales son responsables de mantener la confidencialidad de la contraseña y de asegurar que lo hagan igualmente sus empleados y/o agentes. No olvide que, lamentablemente, la transmisión de información a través de internet nunca es completamente segura. El «spoofing» o «phishing» son algunas de las estafas más comunes en Internet. Esto se produce cuando recibe un correo electrónico que parece proceder de una fuente legítima que le solicita datos personales. Tenga en cuenta que no le enviaremos ningún correo electrónico solicitándole que verifique la información de su tarjeta de crédito, bancaria o cualquier otro dato personal. Si alguna vez recibe un correo electrónico que parece ser de nuestra parte solicitándole dicha información, no responda a él y no haga clic en ninguno de los enlaces que aparecen en el correo electrónico. En su lugar, reenvíenos el correo electrónico a
legal@outbrain.com
, ya que investigaremos casos de posible fraude en Internet.
Transferencias de datos fuera de la UE/EEE
Cuando transferimos datos personales desde el Espacio Económico Europeo (EEE) garantizamos que dichas transferencias se realizan de conformidad con las leyes de protección de datos relevantes, incluidas, si son de aplicación, las cláusulas contractuales tipo de la UE o una decisión de adecuación de la Comisión Europea en virtud del artículo 25(6) de la Directiva 95/46/CE o el artículo 45 del RGPD. Expresado de otro modo, sus derechos y protecciones quedan adheridos a sus datos y nosotros hacemos uso de cláusulas contractuales aprobadas y otras medidas destinadas a garantizar que los destinatarios de sus datos personales se encarguen de protegerlos. Outbrain ha establecido las cláusulas contractuales tipo entre las entidades de Outbrain para gestionar la transferencia de datos fuera del EEE.
Intercambio
Además de la descripción de cómo podemos revelar sus datos personales en función de cada tipo de usuario, también podemos revelar datos personales de la siguiente manera:
Dentro de la familia de empresas controladas por Outbrain por razones internas, principalmente con fines comerciales y operativos.
Si pasamos por una transición de negocios, como una fusión, adquisición por otra compañía o venta de todos o parte de nuestros activos, es probable que sus datos personales se encuentren entre los activos transferidos.
Cuando la ley así lo requiera (por ejemplo, para cooperar con investigaciones de las fuerzas del orden u otros procedimientos legales).
Para responder a una verdadera emergencia.
Además, combinamos sus datos personales con los de otros usuarios para compartir información sobre tendencias y acumular estadísticas de usuarios con terceros, siempre de forma agregada y anonimizada.
Retención de datos
El período de retención para cada una de las cookies que utiliza Outbrain (ya sea por su cuenta o en nuestro nombre por parte de terceros) se indica en la
Tabla de cookies
. Más específicamente, la cookie de Outbrain (Obuid), que se utiliza para el seguimiento de acciones de los usuarios, tales como clics, expira tres (3) meses después de que un usuario visite un sitio en particular dentro de nuestra red, si bien esta cookie se restablecerá si el usuario vuelve a visitar el mismo sitio u otro sitio de nuestra red. Del mismo modo, no retenemos ningún punto de datos individual de un usuario durante más de 13 meses. Por ejemplo, si el UUID 123 leyó un artículo el 31 de diciembre de 2018, el 1 de febrero de 2019 dicho artículo dejó de formar parte del perfil del UUID 123.
Outbrain también mantiene una Política de Retención de Datos que detalla el período de retención de datos personales sobre la base de nuestro análisis sobre cuánto tiempo es necesario retener razonablemente los datos específicos para fines legales o comerciales. Cuando ya no necesitamos datos personales, los borraremos o destruiremos de forma segura. Los datos agregados, que no puedan identificar un dispositivo/navegador (o a una persona) y se utilicen con fines de información y análisis, se mantendrán durante el tiempo que sea necesario desde el punto de vista comercial.
5.
Crianças e Dados Sensíveis
+
Crianças
Nenhum dos nossos serviços é destinado a crianças menores de 16 anos. Não coletamos deliberadamente dados pessoais de menores de 16 anos de idade. Se durante a coleta constatarmos que um Visitante do Site, Usuário ou Parceiro Comercial é menor de 16 anos, não usaremos ou manteremos seus dados pessoais. Se tomarmos ciência de que involuntariamente coletamos dados pessoais de uma criança menor de 16 anos, tomaremos medidas razoáveis para excluir tais informações dos nossos registros. Se você é criança, pedimos que vá brincar no quintal em vez de usar ou interagir com a Outbrain!
Dados Sensíveis
Nós não coletamos ou recebemos nenhum dado sensível de categorias de dados pessoais.
6.
Visitantes do Território Europeu
+
Em conformidade com as leis de privacidade europeias, especialmente com o Regulamento Geral de Proteção de Dados da União Europeia (RGPD), a Outbrain fornece direitos adicionais específicos para indivíduos que interagem com a Outbrain como o direito de acesso, retificação, contestação, reclamação, exclusão e bloqueio. Mais especificamente:
o direito de perguntar se ou quais dados pessoais estão sendo processados por nós e o direito de solicitar que os dados pessoais sejam corrigidos ou alterados;
o direito de solicitar a exclusão de dados pessoais;
o direito de exigir restrições no processamento de dados pessoais;
o direito de cancelar seu consentimento para processamento e uso dos seus dados, total ou parcialmente e a qualquer momento, com validade para o futuro;
o direito de receber seus dados pessoais em formato comum, estruturado e mecanicamente legível;
o direito de contatar nosso responsável pela proteção dos dados se tiver perguntas, comentários, reclamações ou solicitações relacionadas à nossa declaração sobre proteção de dados e o processamento dos seus dados pessoais;
o direito de reclamar à autoridade supervisora responsável caso acredite que o processamento dos seus dados pessoais está violando a legislação.
Além dos itens acima, relacionamos determinados direitos para cidadãos do Território Europeu ao longo desta Política de Privacidade. Nos termos do RGPD, são considerados “
Territórios Europeus
” o Espaço Econômico Europeu (EEE) e a Suíça. Para os fins desta Política de Privacidade, o termo “Territórios Europeus” deve continuar a incluir o Reino Unido mesmo após sua retirada do Espaço Econômico Europeu em decorrência do Brexit.
Em caso de perguntas sobre o exercício de quaisquer dos direitos acima, envie um e-mail a privacy@outbrain.com.
7.
Comunicação Anti-rastreamento  (“Do Not Track”)
+
Alguns navegadores transmitem sinais Do Not Track (DNT), ou Não Rastrear, aos websites. Como não há consenso sobre como interpretar o sinal DNT, a Outbrain atualmente não altera, modifica ou responde a solicitações ou sinais DNT desses navegadores. Continuaremos a monitorar a atuação do setor nesse âmbito e reavaliaremos nossas práticas relacionadas a DNT se necessário. Enquanto isso, você pode utilizar as várias outras ferramentas que fornecemos para controlar a coleta e o uso de dados, incluindo a possibilidade de optar por ser excluído do recebimento de recomendações personalizadas na seção Usuários.
8.
Como esta Política de Privacidade pode mudar
+
De tempos em tempos, podemos fazer alterações nesta Política de Privacidade. Nesse caso, colocaremos um aviso em destaque, visível para você como Visitante do Site ou Parceiro Comercial. Contudo, não temos meios para alertar Usuários sobre atualizações. Recomendamos que você verifique
aqui
periodicamente se a Política de Privacidade foi atualizada. Sempre exibiremos a data da última alteração da Política de Privacidade no topo da página, para que você saiba a última vez em que foi revisada.
Effective January 22nd 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Effective Date: December 17
, 2024
The Amplify Terms vary according to the country where your billing address is located. Please use your billing country below to view the applicable Amplify Terms.
My billing address is located in:
United States of America
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua & Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bonaire
Bosnia & Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Ter
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Canary Islands
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Channel Islands
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos Island
Colombia
Comoros
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Ter
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Great Britain
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guyana
Haiti
Hawaii
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Korea South
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lesotho
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malaysia
Malawi
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Midway Islands
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Nambia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherland Antilles
Netherlands (Holland, Europe)
Nevis
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau Island
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Island
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Republic of Montenegro
Republic of Serbia
Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
St Barthelemy
St Eustatius
St Helena
St Kitts-Nevis
St Lucia
St Maarten
St Pierre & Miquelon
St Vincent & Grenadines
Saipan
Samoa
Samoa American
San Marino
Sao Tome & Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
South Africa
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Tahiti
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad & Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks & Caicos Is
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City State
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands (Brit)
Virgin Islands (USA)
Wake Island
Wallis & Futana Is
Yemen
Zaire
Zambia
These terms were last revised as of the effective date set forth above. Outbrain reserves the right to change these terms from time to time.
Amplify Terms and Conditions
These Amplify Terms and Conditions (“
Terms
”) are entered into by
Outbrain UK Limited
(“
Outbrain
”) and the entity executing an Insertion Order or using the Outbrain dashboard (“
Customer
”). These Terms govern Customer’s use of the Outbrain (Service (as defined below), and together with an Insertion Order (or the information entered through the Outbrain dashboard (“
Dashboard
”) comprise the "
Agreement
" between Outbrain and Customer.  If there is any inconsistency between: (i) the terms of a signed Insertion Order or those entered through the Dashboard (either “
Campaign Details
”) and (ii) these Terms, the Campaign Details as applicable, shall prevail.
1.         Services
1.1       Outbrain partners with a network of online properties (the “
Network
”) to display a user interface containing links that navigate to websites. Outbrain uses its proprietary algorithms serving methodology, and advanced buying tools to deliver ads on behalf of clients to relevant audiences throughout the Network (the “
Service
”).
1.2       Outbrain shall display links to graphical, textual, video and/or auditory content selected by Customer on the Network.  Such links, together with the headlines, images, and/or video that may accompany the links and the destination page reached from any such  link are the “
Content
”. Outbrain shall continue to distribute the Content on the Network until the earlier of: (i) the end date of Customer’s campaign or (ii)  reaching of Customer’s budget; or (iii) the disabling of a campaign (provided that Outbrain reserves the right to charge for additional Actions (as defined in Section 5.1) as the Content is removed from circulation – see
FAQs
for more details).
1.3       Outbrain does not guarantee: (i) the placement, positioning or the timing of delivery of any Content; (ii) clicks or impressions (including clicks from a particular audience segment); or (iii) conversions.  If Fees (as defined in Section 5) do not reach Customer’s budget, Customer's sole remedies shall be to: (i) subject to Section 2 below, extend the end date of the applicable campaign; (ii) replace or add to the existing Content with other Content; or (iii) to pay only for accrued Fees. In no event shall Outbrain be liable for failure to deliver clicks, impressions and/or views to Content.
1.4       Outbrain will make reports available to Customer regarding the campaign(s). The final monthly reports (which may differ from the daily reports) will provide the conclusive basis for Outbrain's calculation of Fees owed by Customer. Customer may submit its own Outbrain-compatible tracker. If there is a ten percent (10%) discrepancy or more between Customer's numbers  and Outbrain's numbers then the parties agree to work in good faith to identify the correct amount to be paid to Outbrain. If the discrepancy is less than ten percent (10%), Outbrain's numbers shall be conclusive.
2.         Content
2.1       Customer is solely responsible for the Content. Customer has the right to and authorises Outbrain to place the Content on the Network. Customer is authorised to use and/or has approved all images and words of the Content’s headline (whether created or generated by Customer or on Customer’s behalf). Content headlines and images must accurately reflect the tone and subject matter of the Content. To the extent Outbrain (and/or integrated tools) provide recommendations as to the Content, headlines and/or campaign, Customer remains solely responsible.
2.2       Customer shall not, directly or indirectly, provide Content that: (i) is obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous, pornographic, violent, profane, indecent or unlawful; (ii) is factually inaccurate, misleading or deceptive; and/or (iii) facilitates or promotes any type of illegal activity, including without limitation pyramid schemes, gambling, the sale or use of illicit drugs, or discrimination or harassment of any individual or group. Further, Content may not (a) redirect to a destination other than as originally submitted to the Service, and/or (b) be substantively different from the Content originally submitted to Outbrain.
2.3       Content must comply with Outbrain's
Advertising Guidelines
, as may be updated from time to time by Outbrain. Outbrain may at any time (at its sole discretion) reject or remove Content.
2.4 Customer acknowledges and agrees that certain Content may change during the course of a campaign (e.g., due to revisions by the Content's author, comments from readers, or otherwise). Customer's recourse in the event of such change shall be to direct Outbrain to remove such Content from its then-current campaign and/or select other Content. Customer further acknowledges that, if there is an objection to the Content (whether from the Content author or publisher, or otherwise), Outbrain will act in accordance with Section 2 of its
Terms of Use
and may cease (at its sole discretion) including the Content in the Service or require Customer to make changes to the Content.
2.5       Both parties shall implement anti-malware scanning processes of the Content. Upon notice, both parties shall take immediate action to remove any suspicious Content from the Network.
3.         Term and Cancellation
The Campaign Details will set forth the start and end date of a particular campaign. However, the Agreement, or an individual campaign may be suspended or terminated: (i) by Customer for any reason upon two (2) business days' written notice to Outbrain or within twelve (12) hours through the Dashboard; or (ii) by Outbrain for any reason upon two (2) days’ written notice to Customer. During the notice period, all previously contracted campaigns shall continue to run pursuant to the Campaign Details and Customer shall be responsible for paying Outbrain for all Fees accrued up to and including the last day of such notice period. Outbrain also reserves the right  at its sole discretion to immediately suspend or terminate all or part of Customer's use of the Service if Outbrain reasonably believes Customer is in breach of the terms of this Agreement.
4.         Campaign Details
If Customer utilizes Outbrain’s Dashboard, Customer will have access to certain online reports and control over its campaign(s). To the extent Customer registers and has access to the Dashboard, Outbrain may collect certain personal data of Customer. For further information on how we may collect and use our business partner's personally identifiable information, please see our Business Partner Privacy Policy. Outbrain collects and processes this personal data in order to respond to Customer questions or requests, provide Customer’s with access to certain services, verify Customer’s identity and communicate with Customers about the use of the Service. Customer is solely responsible for all changes requested or approved (either directly or via Outbrain’s API) including those made through the Dashboard using its login. Customer is solely responsible for protecting its login and password to the Dashboard. Customer can manage campaigns using the Dashboard by modifying the Campaign Details and/or Customer may have the option of working with an Outbrain account manager, as determined by Outbrain.
5.         Fees and Payment Terms
5.1       Ads displayed on the Network are  paid for via one of following payment methods: (i) cost-per-click (“
CPC
”); (ii) cost-per thousand impressions (“
CPM
”); (iii) cost-per-completed view (“
CPCv
”) where completed view means fifty percent (50%) of the video Ad/Content is in view continuously from beginning to the end of video;  (iv) cost-per thousand Viewable Impressions (“
vCPM
”); and/or (v) other desired actions agreed between the parties from time to time (each, an “
Action
”). A viewable impression is counted as viewable if fifty percent (50%) of the video ad is in view continuously for 2 seconds. Outbrain fees will be based on the number of Actions, plus the cost of the Service (the “
Fees
”), which will not exceed Customer’s pre-designated maximum budget. Customer shall pay the Fees as measured by Outbrain's tracking system up to the maximum budget designated in the Campaign Details. Outbrain may charge any applicable national, state, or local sales or use taxes, value added taxes or country-specific fees. If CPC is being used for campaign measurement, such CPC may not be less than Outbrain’s then-in-effect minimum CPC (which may vary by market). If Customer is utilizing Outbrain’s automatic bidding feature, Customer grants Outbrain the right to set and modify Customer’s CPC at Outbrain’s discretion to aid in achieving Customer’s targets for its campaign. Customer shall be solely responsible for any additional fees incurred for utilizing third party services on its campaign(s).  For the avoidance of doubt, Outbrain will not cover, credit or reimburse any third party fees, including, but not limited to, use of any third-party tracker(s) on Customer’s campaign(s). Customer may increase or decrease its budget through the Dashboard or through a signed amendment to an Insertion Order.
5.2       If Customer has signed an Insertion Order, Fees will generally be invoiced by Outbrain to Customer by the end of the following calendar month, unless otherwise set forth in an Insertion Order. Customer shall pay all invoices within thirty (30) days from receipt.  Any portion of a charge not disputed (pursuant to Section 5.3) in good faith must be paid in full. If Customer has provided the Campaign Details through the Dashboard or has signed an Insertion Order and has used a credit card for billing purposes, Outbrain shall charge the Outbrain fees (including processing fees) to Customer’s credit card at such intervals as Outbrain determines in its sole discretion. The decision as to whether to allow Customer to choose between invoice and/or credit card and/or require a prepayment (prior to the start of a campaign) rests solely with Outbrain.  Outbrain shall review all billing inquiries, including refund requests on a case-by-case basis and reserves the right to approve or deny any request in its sole discretion.
5.3       If Customer disputes any amount on an invoice, Customer must provide written notice to Outbrain (email is sufficient) within thirty (30) days of receipt of any invoice or the right to dispute shall be deemed waived. Customer’s email must include the amount disputed and provide adequate information to support any such claim. Customer may not withhold payment for any undisputed amounts, and any portion of a charge not disputed in good faith must be paid in full.
5.4            If payment is not made when due and not properly disputed pursuant to Section 5.3, Outbrain may charge interest at the rate of two percent (2%) per annum above the prevailing base rate of Barclays Bank PLC from the due date until the date of actual payment, whether before or after judgment. Outbrain also reserves the right to suspend or terminate any or all of Customer's use of the Service until Customer has paid all amounts due. Outbrain reserves the right to charge Customer for all costs of collection, including collection agency and reasonable legal fees and court costs. Customer authorises Outbrain to investigate Customer's credit record. If applicable, Customer agrees to provide such further financial information and documentation as may be required from time to time by Outbrain as a condition for the continued extension of credit.  Customer acknowledges and agrees that any account, credit card and related billing and payment information which Customer provides to Outbrain may be shared by Outbrain with companies who work on Outbrain's behalf solely for the purpose of performing credit checks, effecting payment to Outbrain, collecting debts owed to Outbrain and/or servicing Customer's account. Outbrain may, in its sole discretion, extend, revise or revoke credit at any time.  In addition, Outbrain reserves the right to require immediate payment of any outstanding balance that exceeds Customer’s credit limit and / or past the payment terms defined in this Agreement.
6.         Additional Features and Terms
6.1       Outbrain may also make additional Service features available to Customer from time to time and use of such features may be subject to Customer’s agreement to certain additional terms and conditions (“
Additional Terms
”) (e.g., via an online click-through agreement or via the Dashboard). Such features will be provided at Outbrain’s discretion to Customer and may include fees in addition to those described in Section 5.1. Customer’s acceptance of the Additional Terms will constitute a binding and enforceable agreement as between Outbrain and Customer. In the event of any inconsistency between these Terms, the Additional Terms, and the Campaign Details, the order of precedence is: (i) Additional Terms, (ii) Campaign Details, and (iii) these Terms. Customers who choose to utilize LiveRamp services (via the Outbrain Dashboard or otherwise) for purposes of their Outbrain campaign(s) are subject to
LiveRamp Terms.
6.2       Subject to Customer’s compliance with Section 8 below, Customer may place on Customer’s website, application pages or landing pages: (i) Outbrain pixel(s) (the “
Outbrain Pixel
”) on Customer’s website or application pages and/or (ii) third party pixels or tags (the “
Third Party Pixels
”) for the purpose of providing analytics related to Customer’s campaign, enhanced targeting functionality and/or creating segments (the Outbrain Pixel and Third Party Pixels together are the “
Pixels
”). Customer represents and warrants that: (a) its use of the Pixels are in accordance with Data Protection Laws; and (b) it has provided appropriate notice to users regarding use of the Pixels, including an explanation: (x) that third parties, including Outbrain, may use cookies or similar technologies to collect or receive information from Customer’s website(s), and may use that information to provide measurement services and target ads; and (y) as to how users opt-out of the collection of information for targeting purposes; and (z) it will not use the Pixels on websites or application pages that target minors and/or contain sensitive categories of data (e.g. physical or mental health conditions). Customer shall not use the Pixels unless and until it has complied with the provisions of this Section 6.2. Further, if an end-user has opted out of behavioral advertising via Customer’s site(s) (or a mechanism such as settings within an advertiser application), Customer shall be fully responsible for not loading the Outbrain Pixel. Outbrain may update, change, or substitute the Outbrain Pixel functionality at any time in its reasonable discretion provided that it does not disrupt the functioning of Customer’s landing page and serves the same purpose.
6.3       If Customer utilizes third party segments for enhanced targeting of its campaign(s) (“
3rd Party Targeting
”), Customer shall pay for its use of 3rd Party Targeting (“
3rd Party Data Costs
”) including any applicable taxes. Customer’s invoice for each campaign shall include both the Fees, and the 3rd Party Data Costs (if applicable). Customer agrees that 3rd Party Data costs will be based on Outbrain’s reporting metrics. If Customer utilizes 3rd Party Targeting Customer shall: (x) disclose this to users via an appropriate notice and/or in its privacy policy (as applicable); and (y) represent and warrant that its use of 3rd Party Targeting shall, at all times, be compliant with Data Protection Laws and satisfy the requirements for an appropriate legal basis for processing. Customer shall not, at any time, use 3rd Party Targeting: (i) for discriminatory purposes; (ii) to target minors under the age of sixteen(16); (iii) based on Special Categories of Personal Data; (iv) based on Personal Data relating to alleged or confirmed criminal convictions or offenses; and/or (v) otherwise in violation of any applicable law in any country where the campaign is performed.
7.         Confidentiality
7.1       Each party agrees that with respect to any Confidential Information (as defined below) that is disclosed by one party to the other in connection with the Agreement, the party receiving such Confidential Information shall not disclose such Confidential Information to any third party, or use it for any purpose, except in connection with its rights and obligations under the Agreement. "
Confidential Information
" means all information concerning a party or any of its subsidiaries or affiliates that is not generally known to the public, which information is marked confidential or proprietary, or which under the circumstances ought reasonably to be treated as confidential or proprietary, and includes, without limitation, the terms of the Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information does not include information that: (i) is, as of the time of disclosure, or thereafter becomes, part of the public domain through a source other than the receiving party; (ii) was lawfully in the possession of the receiving party as of the time of disclosure; (iii) is independently developed by the receiving party without reference to the Confidential Information; or (iv) is subsequently obtained from a third party not subject to an obligation of confidentiality with respect to the information disclosed.
7.2       Confidential Information shall be kept in the strictest confidence and shall be protected by all reasonable and necessary security measures. Confidential Information shall not be released by the receiving party to anyone except an employee or agent, who has a need to know the same, and who is bound by confidentiality obligations at least as restrictive as these contained herein. Neither party will use any portion of Confidential Information provided by the other party pursuant to the Agreement for any purpose other than as expressly set forth under the Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, either party may disclose Confidential Information strictly necessary to comply with the demands of any court order, law or governmental agency and Outbrain may share Confidential Information of Customer with any holding company of Customer or with any subsidiary company of Customer’s holding company.
7.3        If Customer is acting on behalf of a Content provider, Customer authorises Outbrain to grant such Content provider (or any subsequent third party appointed by the Content provider) access to and a right to use the Campaign Details.
8.         Representations and Warranties
8.1       Each party represents and warrants to the other party that: (i) it has all necessary rights and authority to enter into the Agreement and grant the rights and licences under the Agreement; (ii) it shall comply with Applicable Laws, and (iii) the execution or acceptance of the Agreement (which includes the Campaign Details), and the performance of its respective obligations and duties pursuant to the Agreement, do not and will not violate any agreement to which such party is bound. “
Applicable Laws
” means any applicable federal, national, state or foreign laws or regulations or any industry self-regulatory rules or guidelines (including the Interactive Advertising Bureau Guidelines, Standards & Best Practices, the NAI Code of Conduct, the DAA Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising. Any Applicable Laws related to the privacy of personal data are referred to as “
Data Protection Laws
”.
8.2        Customer represents and warrants that: (i) the Content (which for the avoidance of doubt, includes the headline, images, videos and, landing pages) does not violate any Applicable Laws, and will not contain any material which may be harmful, abusive, obscene, threatening or defamatory; (ii) it has all necessary rights licenses and clearances to grant rights granted herein, including for Outbrain to use, host, cache, route, store, copy, modify, distribute, reformat, reproduce, publish, display, transmit and distribute the Content; (iii)  the Content will not infringe any intellectual property rights of any third party; (iv) it will not provide Content that is targeted to children under the age of sixteen (16); (v) Content complies with Outbrain's
Advertising Guidelines
, as may be updated from time to time by Outbrain; (vi) Content shall not (a) redirect to a destination other than as originally submitted to the Service, and/or (b) be substantively different from the Content originally submitted to the Service;  (vii) it will not use the Service in a manner that provides an unintended advantage or interferes with the integrity and/or overall performance of the Service; (viii) if using the Dashboard, Customer will adhere to any rules of such use as solely determined by Outbrain (e.g. not using source bidding to whitelist any particular Network source);  (ix) it is not subject to nor owned or controlled by any person that is subject to sanctions or export control restrictions imposed pursuant to U.S. law or the laws of any other jurisdiction applicable to the performance of the agreement norit will take any action that could result in economic sanctions or other trade control restrictions or penalties being imposed on Outbrain; and (x) all business and payment information provided to Outbrain is true, correct, and accurate.
8.3       If Customer is an agency (or other third party acting on behalf of the provider of the Content), Customer represents and warrants that: (i) it is the authorised agent of the provider of the Content; (ii) it has the legal authority to enter into the Agreement and make all decisions and take all actions relating to the provider of the Content; (iii) it has entered into a written agreement granting the agent the authority to represent the provider of the Content in accordance with (i) and (ii) above (and shall submit such agreement to Outbrain on demand).  Customer further agrees that it is not acting on behalf of a French company or a foreign company whose advertising content mainly targets French territory exclusively through the Dashboard. If Customer is acting on behalf of a French content provider whose advertising mainly targets the French territory, please contact info@outbrain.com for more information on how to purchase Outbrain Services.
8.4       No conditions, warranties or other terms apply to any Outbrain services supplied by Outbrain under this Agreement unless expressly set out in this Agreement. No implied conditions, warranties or other terms apply (including without limitation any implied terms as to satisfactory quality, fitness for purpose or conformance with description or any warranties arising from a course of dealing, usage or trade practice or regarding the performance or success of any campaigns made by it on behalf of Customer or that the Services will operate uninterrupted, secure or error free).
9.         Data Protection
The provisions of the
Data Sharing Agreement
shall be incorporated into, and form part of, this Agreement.
10.       Indemnification
10.1      Each party shall defend, indemnify and hold harmless the other party and its respective agents, affiliates, subsidiaries, directors, officers, employees, contractors and Network partners (as applicable), against any and all third party claims resulting from the breach of such party's representations and warranties under this Agreement.
10.2      In connection with any such claim: (i) the indemnified party shall provide prompt written notice to the indemnifying party of any such claim (provided that the failure to provide such prompt notice shall not relieve the indemnifying party of its indemnification obligations in the Agreement, except to the extent it has been damaged thereby); (ii) the indemnifying party shall have sole control of the defense or settlement of the claim (provided that the indemnifying party may not enter into any settlement that may adversely affect the rights or obligations of the indemnified party without the indemnified party's prior written consent); (iii) at the indemnifying party's request and expense, the indemnified party cooperating in the investigation and defense of such claim; and (iv) the indemnified party shall have the right to participate in its defense with counsel of its own choosing at the indemnified party's expense.
11.       Limitation of Liability
11.1      Nothing in the Agreement excludes or limits either party’s liability: (i) for death or personal injury resulting from the negligence of either party or their servants, agents or employees; (ii) for fraud or fraudulent misrepresentation; (iii) for anything which cannot be excluded or limited by law.
11.2      Except with respect to claims arising from the indemnity obligations or a breach of clause 6 (confidentiality) and/or non-payment of fees owed, the maximum aggregate liability of either party and its’ directors, officers, employees, Network partners, vendors or agents arising from any given event or series of connected events arising under or related in any way to this Agreement or its implementation shall be limited to the greater of: (i) £50,000; and (ii) 100% of the amount of fees paid or payable by Customer under Agreement in the 12 months immediately preceding the month in which the event (or first in a series of connected events) occurred.
11.3      In no event shall either party be liable for: (i) loss of revenues; (ii) loss of profits; (iii) loss of contracts; (iv) loss of business or anticipated savings; (v) loss of data; (vi) loss of goodwill or reputation; or (vii) for any consequential, special or indirect losses whether or not such losses were within the contemplation of the parties at the date of this Agreement, suffered or incurred by that party arising out of or in connection with the provisions of, or any matter under, this Agreement.
12.       Miscellaneous
12.1      Neither Party may assign the Agreement, in whole or in part, by operation of law or otherwise, without the prior written consent of the other; provided, however that either party may assign its rights or delegate its duties under the Agreement, in whole or in part, without the other's consent, in connection with a merger, reorganisation or sale of all, or substantially all, of the assignor's assets, provided that the successor entity shall have sufficient resources to fully perform the Agreement and shall assume the obligation to fully perform the Agreement.
12.2      This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with English law and the parties hereby submit to the exclusive jurisdiction of the English courts in respect of any dispute or matter arising out of or connected with this Agreement. The prevailing party in any action arising out of or to enforce this Agreement shall be entitled to recover its reasonable legal fees and costs. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event of Customer’s default of its obligations in Section 5 above, Outbrain shall have the right, if it so chooses, to commence an action against Customer for such default in the appropriate court in the venue and jurisdiction in which Customer resides or maintains assets.
12.3      No press releases or general public announcements shall be made without the mutual written consent of Customer and Outbrain. Outbrain shall have the right to include Customer's name including, but not limited to, in Outbrain's client list and in other marketing materials. Customer shall not use Outbrain’s name, logo or trademark without Outbrain’s prior written consent.
12.4      All notices under the Agreement will be in writing via email, to the address of the receiving party set forth on the Insertion Order or Dashboard, or at such different address as may be designated by such party by written notice to the other party from time to time. Notice will be effective on receipt.
12.5      No failure of either party to enforce any of its rights under the Agreement will act as a waiver of such rights. If one or more provisions of the Agreement are held to be unenforceable under Applicable Laws, then such provision(s) shall be excluded from the Agreement, and the balance of the Agreement shall be enforceable in accordance with its terms.
12.6      Neither party shall be liable for any delay or failure to perform any of its obligations set forth in the Agreement due to causes beyond its reasonable control. Neither party shall be liable for any unavailability or inoperability of the Internet, technical malfunction, or computer error or corruption resulting in loss of data or other harm. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Customer shall not be relieved from any of its obligations as to Fees due hereunder.
12.7      Sections
7, 8, 9, 10, 11
and
12
, together with any outstanding undisputed payment obligation, shall survive the termination of the Agreement.
12.8      Customer and Outbrain shall each act as independent contractors. Nothing in the Agreement shall be deemed or construed as creating a joint venture or partnership between the parties.
12.9      The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof and may not be modified without the prior written consent of both parties. In no event shall any inconsistent or conflicting terms and conditions contained in any purchase order, insertion order, invoice or other document submitted by Customer concerning the subject matter hereof have any force or effect unless accepted or signed by Outbrain.
Effective February 16th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
Please note that Outbrain Cookie Table has moved here:
https://www.zemanta.com/privacy/cookies
Effective March 4th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Data de Vigência: 4 de março de 2024
The Amplify Terms vary according to the country where your billing address is located. Please use your billing country below to view the applicable Amplify Terms.
My billing address is located in:
United States of America
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua & Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bonaire
Bosnia & Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Ter
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Canary Islands
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Channel Islands
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos Island
Colombia
Comoros
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Ter
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Great Britain
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guyana
Haiti
Hawaii
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Korea South
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lesotho
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malaysia
Malawi
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Midway Islands
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Nambia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherland Antilles
Netherlands (Holland, Europe)
Nevis
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau Island
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Island
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Republic of Montenegro
Republic of Serbia
Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
St Barthelemy
St Eustatius
St Helena
St Kitts-Nevis
St Lucia
St Maarten
St Pierre & Miquelon
St Vincent & Grenadines
Saipan
Samoa
Samoa American
San Marino
Sao Tome & Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
South Africa
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Tahiti
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad & Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks & Caicos Is
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City State
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands (Brit)
Virgin Islands (USA)
Wake Island
Wallis & Futana Is
Yemen
Zaire
Zambia
Estes Termos e Condições foram revisados e estão atualizados na data efetiva estabelecida acima. Outbrain reserva-se o direito de alterar esses Termos e Condições de tempos em tempos.
Termos e Condições Amplify
Estes Termos e Condições Amplify (“Termos”) são celebrados pela Outbrain Services Monetização de Conteúdo LTDA. (“Outbrain”) e entre a entidade executante de uma Ordem de Inserção ou usuária do Painel de Controle da Outbrain (“Cliente”). Estes Termos regem o uso pelo Cliente do Serviço (conforme definido abaixo) e, juntamente com um Pedido de Inserção (ou com as informações inseridas através do painel de controle da Outbrain (“Painel de Controle”) constitui o “Contrato” entre a Outbrain e o Cliente. Se houver qualquer inconsistência entre: (i) os termos de um Pedido de Inserção assinados ou aqueles inseridos através do Painel de Controle (ambos “Detalhes da Campanha”), e (ii) estes Termos, os Detalhes de Campanha, conforme aplicável, deverão prevalecer.
1. Serviços
1.1 A Outbrain tem uma parceria com uma rede de propriedades online (a “Rede”) para exibir uma interface de usuários que contém links que navegam para os sites. A Outbrain usa seus algoritmos, fornecendo metodologia de veiculação e as suas ferramentas avançadas de compra para apresentar anúncios em nome dos clientes a audiências relevantes em toda a Rede (o “Serviço”).
1.2 A Outbrain deve exibir links para conteúdo gráfico, textual, vídeo e/ou sonoro selecionado pelo Cliente na Rede. Tais links, juntamente com os títulos,  imagens e/ou vídeos que podem acompanhar os links e a página de destino alcançada a partir de qualquer um desses links são o “Conteúdo”. A Outbrain deve continuar distribuindo o Conteúdo na Rede até os seguintes fatos, prevalecendo o que acontecer primeiro: (i) o fim do prazo da Campanha do Cliente; ou (ii) quando alcançado o orçamento do Cliente; ou (iii) quando desativada a campanha (considerando que a Outbrain reserva-se o direito de cobrar por Ações adicionais (vide cláusula 5.1) caso o Conteúdo seja retirado de circulação - ver
FAQs
para maiores detalhes).
1.3 A Outbrain não garante: (i) a colocação, posicionamento ou o tempo de entrega de qualquer Conteúdo; (ii) cliques ou impressões (incluindo cliques de um segmento de público específico); e/ou ou (iii) conversões. Se os Honorários (conforme definidos na Cláusula 5), não atingirem o orçamento do Cliente, as únicas opções do Cliente são: (i) sujeito à cláusula 2, prorrogar a data final da campanha, (ii) substituir ou complementar o conteúdo existente com outro Conteúdo; ou (iii) pagar apenas pelos Honorários acumulados. Em nenhum caso a Outbrain será responsabilizada por não entregar cliques, impressões e/ou visualizações para o Conteúdo.
1.4 A Outbrain disponibilizará relatórios para o Cliente relativamente à(s) campanha(s). Os relatórios finais mensais (os quais podem ser diferentes dos relatórios diários) servirão de base para o cálculo conclusivo dos Honorários de serviço devidos pelo Cliente. O Cliente pode enviar o seu próprio rastreador de cliques se compatível com a Outbrain. Se houver um desvio de 10% (dez por cento) ou mais entre os números do Cliente e os números da Outbrain, então as partes concordam em trabalhar em boa-fé para identificarem a quantidade correta a ser paga à Outbrain. Se a discrepância for inferior a 10% (dez por cento), os números da Outbrain serão definitivos.
2. Conteúdo
2.1 O Cliente é o único responsável pelo Conteúdo. O Cliente tem o direito de e autoriza a Outbrain a colocar o Conteúdo na Rede. O Cliente está autorizado a utilizar e/ou aprovou todas as imagens e palavras do título do Conteúdo (quer sejam escritas, criadas ou geradas pelo Cliente ou em nome do Cliente). Os títulos e as imagens do Conteúdo devem refletir com precisão o tom e o assunto do Conteúdo. Na medida em que a Outbrain (e/ou ferramentas integradas) fornece recomendações sobre o Conteúdo, os títulos e/ou a campanha, o Cliente continua a ser o único responsável.
2.2 O Cliente não deverá, direta ou indiretamente, fornecer Conteúdo que: (i) seja obsceno, difamatório, calunioso, pornográfico, violento, profano, indecente ou ilegal; (ii) seja factualmente impreciso, enganoso ou ilegal e/ou; (iii) facilite ou promova qualquer tipo de atividade ilegal, incluindo, sem limitação, esquemas de pirâmide, apostas ilegais, a venda ou o consumo de drogas ilícitas, ou discriminação ou assédio de qualquer indivíduo ou grupo. Ademais, o Conteúdo não poderá (a) redirecionar para um destino diferente daquele originalmente submetido ao Serviço, e/ou (b) ser substancialmente diferente do Conteúdo originalmente submetido à Outbrain.
2.3 O Conteúdo deve estar em conformidade com as
Diretrizes de Publicidade da Outbrain
, que podem ser atualizadas periodicamente pela Outbrain. A Outbrain pode, a qualquer momento (e a seu exclusivo critério), rejeitar ou remover Conteúdos.
2.4 O Cliente reconhece e concorda que determinados Conteúdos podem ser alterados no decurso de uma campanha (por exemplo, devido a revisões efetuadas pelo autor do Conteúdo, comentários dos leitores ou outros). O recurso do Cliente no caso de tal alteração será instruir a Outbrain a remover esse Conteúdo da sua campanha em curso e/ou selecionar outro Conteúdo. O Cliente reconhece ainda que, em caso de objeção ao Conteúdo (seja por parte do autor ou editor do Conteúdo, ou de outra forma), a Outbrain agirá em conformidade com a Secção 2 dos seus Termos de Utilização e poderá deixar (a seu exclusivo critério) de incluir o Conteúdo no Serviço ou exigir que o Cliente faça alterações ao Conteúdo.
2.4 Ambas as partes devem implementar processos de verificação anti-malware do Conteúdo. Mediante notificação, ambas as partes devem tomar medidas imediatas para remover qualquer Conteúdo suspeito da Rede.
3. Prazo e Cancelamento
Nos Detalhes da Campanha ficarão estabelecidas a data de início e fim de uma campanha em particular. No entanto, o Contrato ou uma campanha individual podem ser suspensos ou cancelados: (i) pelo Cliente por qualquer motivo, mediante aviso prévio por escrito de dois (2) dias úteis para a Outbrain ou no prazo de 12 (doze) horas através do Painel de Controle, ou (ii) pela Outbrain, por qualquer motivo, mediante dois (2) dias de aviso prévio, por escrito, para o Cliente. Durante o período de aviso prévio, todas as campanhas anteriormente contratadas devem continuar a funcionar de acordo com o estabelecido nos Detalhes da Campanha e o Cliente será responsável pelo pagamento à Outbrain de todos os cliques recebidos incluso durante esse período de aviso prévio. A Outbrain também se reserva o direito de unilateralmente, a seu exclusivo critério, imediatamente suspender ou terminar o uso de todo e qualquer Serviço por parte do Cliente se a Outbrain, razoavelmente, acreditar que o Cliente está em violação dos termos deste Contrato.
4. Detalhes da Campanha
Se o Cliente utilizar o Painel de Controle da Outbrain, o Cliente terá acesso a determinados relatórios online e ao controle sobre sua(s) campanha(s). Na medida em que o Cliente registrar e tiver acesso ao Painel de Controle, a Outbrain poderá coletar certos dados pessoais do Cliente. A Outbrain coleta e processa esses dados pessoais com a finalidade de responder questões ou solicitações do Cliente, proporcionar ao Cliente o acesso a certos serviços, verificar a identidade do Cliente e para comunicar-se com o Cliente sobre o uso do Serviço. O Cliente é o único responsável por todas as alterações solicitadas ou aprovados (diretamente ou via API - Interface de Programação de Aplicativos - da Outbrain), inclusive as efetuadas através do Painel de Controle usando seu login. O Cliente é o único responsável por proteger o seu login e sua senha para o uso do Painel de Controle. O Cliente pode gerenciar campanhas usando o Painel para modificar Detalhes da Campanha, e/ou o Cliente pode ter a opção de trabalhar com um gerente de contas da Outbrain, conforme determinado pela Outbrain.
5. Honorários e Pagamento
5.1 Os Anúncios apresentados na Rede serão pagos através de um dos seguintes métodos: (i) custo por clique (“CPC”); (ii) custo por mil impressões (“CPM”); (iii) custo por visualização completa (“CPCv”) aonde ‘visualização completa’ significa que 50% (cinquenta por cento) do vídeo do Conteúdo está no campo de visão continuamente do começo ao fim do vídeo; (iv) custo por mil impressões visualizadas (“vCPM”); e/ou (v) outras ações desejadas e acordadas entre as partes, de tempos em tempos (cada uma denominada “Ação”). Uma impressão visualizada é considerada visualizada se 50% (cinquenta por cento) do anúncio em vídeo ficar no campo de visão por 2 segundos consecutivos. Os honorários da Outbrain serão baseados no número de Ações, somado o custo do Serviço (os “Honorários”), que não excederão o orçamento máximo pré-designado pelo Cliente. O Cliente deve pagar os Honorários à Outbrain conforme medida pelo sistema de rastreamento da Outbrain, até ao orçamento máximo designado nos Detalhes da Campanha. A Outbrain pode cobrar quaisquer impostos de uso ou vendas nacionais, estaduais ou locais aplicáveis, impostos de valor agregado ou taxas específicas do país, nos quais a Outbrain é legalmente obrigada a cobrar. Caso o CPC esteja sendo utilizado para medir a campanha, tal CPC não deverá ser menor que o CPC mínimo em vigor da Outbrain na época (o qual pode variar de acordo com o mercado). Se o Cliente estiver utilizando a ferramenta automática de leilão da Outbrain, o Cliente concede à Outbrain o direito de definir e modificar o CPC do Cliente, a critério da Outbrain, para que e Outbrain possa ajudar a alcançar as metas do Cliente para sua campanha. O Cliente deverá ser o único responsável por tarifas adicionais decorrentes da utilização de serviços terceiros em sua(s) campanha(s). Para que não existam dúvidas, a Outbrain não cobrirá, creditará ou reembolsará quaisquer valores de terceiros, incluindo-se, mas não se limitando, ao uso de quaisquer rastreadores de terceiros nas campanhas do Cliente. O Cliente pode aumentar ou diminuir seu orçamento através do Painel de Controle ou através do aditamento assinado do Pedido de Inserção.
5.2 Se o Cliente assinou um Pedido de Inserção, os Honorários serão geralmente faturados pela Outbrain ao Cliente no último dia do calendário do mês seguinte, salvo se de outra forma estabelecido no Pedido de Inserção. O Cliente deverá pagar todas as faturas no prazo de trinta (30) dias a partir do recebimento. Qualquer valor de uma cobrança não contestada (de acordo com a Seção 5.3) de boa-fé deve ser paga na íntegra. Se o Cliente forneceu os Detalhes da Campanha através do Painel de Controle ou assinou um Pedido de Inserção e usou um cartão de crédito para fins de faturamento, a Outbrain deverá cobrar seus Honorários (incluindo taxas de processamento) através do cartão de crédito do Cliente em intervalos determinados pela Outbrain, a seu exclusivo critério. A decisão sobre permitir ou não ao Cliente escolher entre fatura e cartão de crédito e/ou requerer pagamento antecipado (antes do início da campanha) recai exclusivamente sobre a Outbrain. A Outbrain deve analisar todos os pedidos de fatura, incluindo os pedidos de reembolso, caso-a-caso e se reserva o direito de aprovar ou negar qualquer pedido a seu exclusivo critério.
5.3 Se o Cliente contestar qualquer quantia em uma fatura, o Cliente deverá fornecer um aviso, por escrito, à Outbrain (por e-mail é suficiente) no prazo de trinta (30) dias após o recebimento de qualquer fatura, caso contrário será considerado como renúncia ao direito de contestar. O e-mail do Cliente deve incluir o valor contestado e fornecer informações adequadas para apoiar tal reivindicação. O Cliente não pode reter o pagamento de quaisquer quantias não contestadas, e qualquer parte de uma cobrança não contestada de boa fé deve ser paga integralmente.
5.4 Se o pagamento não for realizado no prazo previsto e não for devidamente contestado de acordo com a Cláusula 5.3, a Outbrain pode cobrar juros de mora à taxa de 6% (seis por cento) ao ano, a partir da data de vencimento até a data do efetivo pagamento, bem como correção monetária conforme a variação positiva do IGPM/FGV no período, seja antes ou após o julgamento. A Outbrain também se reserva o direito de suspender ou terminar, no todo ou em parte, o uso do Serviço do Cliente até que o Cliente pague todos os valores devidos. A Outbrain ainda tem direito de cobrar do Cliente todos os custos de cobrança, incluindo a agência de cobrança, honorários advocatícios contratuais de 20% (vinte por cento) e custas judiciais. O Cliente autoriza a Outbrain a investigar o histórico de crédito do Cliente. Se aplicável, o Cliente concorda em fornecer informações financeiras e documentação que possam ser solicitadas, de tempos em tempos pela Outbrain, como condição para a contínua extensão de crédito. O Cliente reconhece e concorda que qualquer conta, cartão de crédito e informações relacionadas a cobrança e pagamento que o Cliente forneça à Outbrain pode ser compartilhado pela Outbrain com empresas que trabalhem em seu benefício com a exclusiva finalidade de executar verificações de crédito, efetuar pagamento em favor da Outbrain, coletar dívidas para a Outbrain e/ou para fins de manutenção de conta do Cliente. A Outbrain pode, a seu exclusivo critério, prorrogar, rever ou revogar o crédito a qualquer tempo. A Outbrain reserva-se o direito de exigir o pagamento imediato de qualquer saldo devedor que exceda o limite de crédito do Cliente e/ou além dos prazos de pagamento definidos neste Contrato.
6. Recursos e Termos Adicionais
6.1 Outbrain também pode disponibilizar, de tempos em tempos, recursos adicionais de Serviços ao Cliente, os quais poderão estar sujeitos à concordância do Cliente de certos termos e condições adicionais (“Termos Adicionais”) (por exemplo, através de um acordo via acesso online ou através do Painel de Controle). Esses recursos serão fornecidos a critério da Outbrain, ao Cliente, e podem incluir honorários adicionais além dos descritos na Cláusula 5.1. A aceitação, pelo Cliente, dos Termos Adicionais constituirá acordo vinculativo e executável entre a Outbrain e o Cliente. Na hipótese de um conflito entre estes Termos, os Termos Adicionais e os Detalhes da Campanha, a ordem de precedência será a seguinte: (i) Termos Adicionais, (ii) Detalhes da Campanha, e (iii) estes Termos. Os Clientes que escolherem utilizar os serviços LiveRamp (através do Painel de Controle da Outbrain ou de outra forma), para fins da sua campanha na Outbrain, estão sujeitos aos
Termos da Outbrain LiveRamp
.
6.2 Sujeito ao cumprimento pelo Cliente o disposto na Cláusula 9 abaixo, o Cliente poderá colocar no seu site, páginas de aplicação ou páginas de destino: (i) o(s) pixel(s) da Outbrain (“Outbrain Pixel”); e/ou (ii) Tags ou Pixel de terceiros (“Pixels de Terceiros”) com a finalidade de proporcionar análises relacionadas à campanha do Cliente e/ou à funcionalidade de segmentação aprimorada (os Pixels da Outbrain e os Pixels de Terceiros são chamados conjuntamente de “Pixels”). O Cliente declara e garante que: (a) o uso dos Pixels está em conformidade com as Leis de Proteção de Dados aplicáveis, e (b) providenciou a devida notificação aos usuários a respeito do uso de pixels, incluindo explicações a respeito: (x) de que terceiros, incluindo a Outbrain, poderão utilizar cookies ou outras tecnologias similares para coletar ou receber de informações do site(s) do Cliente e que estas informações poderão ser utilizadas para proporcionar medidas de serviços e propaganda direcionada; e (y) como os usuários podem recusar a coleta de informações para fins de direcionamento de conteúdo; and (z) que não utilizará o Pixel em websites em páginas direcionadas à menores de idade e/ou que contenham categorias sensíveis de dados (por exemplo, condições de saúde física ou mental). O Cliente declara estar ciente de que não poderá utilizar pixels sem antes cumprir com o disposto nesta Cláusula 6.2. Além disso, se um usuário final tiver optado por não receber publicidade comportamental, através do(s) site(s) do Cliente (ou de mecanismo como configurações em um aplicativo de anunciante), o Cliente será inteiramente responsável por não carregar o Pixel da Outbrain. A Outbrain pode atualizar, alterar ou substituir a funcionalidade do Outbrain Pixel, ao seu critério, e a qualquer momento, desde que não interrompa o funcionamento da página de destino do Cliente e sirva o mesmo propósito.
6.3. Caso o Cliente tenha solicitado segmentos de terceiros para segmentação aprimorada (“Segmentação de Terceiros”) da sua campanha(s) o Cliente deverá pagar pelo uso da Segmentação de Terceiros (“Custos de Dados de Terceiros”), incluindo as taxas e os impostos aplicáveis. A nota fiscal do Cliente, para cada uma das campanhas, deve incluir tanto os Honorários, como os Custos de Dados de Terceiros (caso seja aplicável). O Cliente concorda que os Custos dos Dados de Terceiros se baseiam nas métricas de relatório da Outbrain. Se o Cliente utilizar Segmentação de Terceiros, ele deverá: (x) declarar isso aos usuários através de de um meio apropriado de aviso e/ou em sua política de privacidade (quando aplicável); e (y) declarar e garantir que o uso de Segmentação de Terceiros deverá estar, todo o tempo, em acordo com a as Leis de Proteção de Dados aplicáveis e satisfaçam os requisitos para uma base legal adequada para o processamento. O Cliente não deverá, em nenhum momento, usar a Segmentação de Terceiros: (i) para fins discriminatórios; (ii) visar menores de dezesseis (16) anos; (iii) com base em Categorias Especiais de Dados Pessoais; (iv) com base em Dados Pessoais relativos a condenações criminais ou infrações alegadas ou confirmadas; ou (v) de outra forma em violação de qualquer lei aplicável em qualquer país onde a campanha seja realizada.
7. Confidencialidade
7.1 Cada parte concorda em respeitar qualquer Informação Confidencial (como definido abaixo) que seja revelada de uma parte para a outra em relação ao Contrato, a parte que receber tal Informação Confidencial não a divulgará para quaisquer terceiros ou irá usá-la para qualquer fim exceto se relacionado a seus direitos e obrigações dentro do Contrato. “Informação Confidencial” significa toda informação relativa à parte ou quaisquer de suas subsidiárias ou afiliadas que não seja geralmente conhecida pelo público, a informação que seja marcada como confidencial ou de propriedade, ou como informações confidenciais ou de propriedade, ou que, sob as circunstâncias, deveriam razoavelmente ser tratadas como confidenciais ou de propriedade, e inclui, sem limitação, os termos do Contrato. Não obstante o acima descrito, Informações Confidenciais não incluem informações que: (i) a partir do momento da divulgação, ou após essa data tornam-se de domínio público através de uma fonte que não seja a parte que a recebeu; (ii) esteja legalmente em posse da parte que a recebeu a partir do momento da divulgação; (iii) tenha sido desenvolvida de forma independente pela parte receptora sem referência à Informação Confidencial; ou (iv) seja posteriormente obtida por um terceiro não sujeito a uma obrigação de confidencialidade com relação à informação divulgada.
7.2 Informações Confidenciais serão mantidas em sigilo estrito e devem ser protegidas com todas as medidas de segurança necessárias e razoáveis. Informações Confidenciais não serão liberadas pela parte receptora a ninguém, exceto um funcionário ou agente que tenha necessidade de conhecê-la e que esteja vinculado por obrigações de confidencialidade pelo menos tão restritas quanto estas aqui contidas. Nenhuma das partes vai usar qualquer porção das informações confidenciais fornecidas pela outra parte, nos termos do Contrato, para qualquer outra finalidade que não aquelas expressamente definidas no âmbito do Contrato. Não obstante, quaisquer das partes pode divulgar Informações Confidenciais estritamente necessárias para cumprir as exigências de qualquer ordem judicial, lei ou agência governamental e a Outbrain pode compartilhar informações confidenciais de Cliente com qualquer empresa holding do Cliente ou com qualquer empresa subsidiária da holding do Cliente.
7.3 Se o Cliente estiver agindo em nome de um provedor de Conteúdo, o Cliente autoriza a Outbrain a conceder a tal provedor de Conteúdo (ou qualquer terceiro subsequente nomeado pelo provedor de Conteúdo) o acesso e o direito de usar os Detalhes da Campanha.
8. Declarações e Garantias
8.1 Cada parte declara e garante à outra parte que: (i) possui todos os direitos e poderes necessários para celebrar o Contrato e garantir os direitos e licenças no âmbito do Contrato; (ii) cumprirá as Leis Aplicáveis; e (iii) a execução ou aceitação do Contrato (que inclui os Detalhes da Campanha), e o desempenho das suas respectivas obrigações e deveres, nos termos do Contrato, não irá violar qualquer contrato a qual tal parte esteja vinculada. “Leis Aplicáveis” significa quaisquer leis ou regulamentos federais, estaduais ou estrangeiros aplicáveis ou quaisquer regras ou diretrizes de autorregulamentação do setor (incluindo-se as Diretrizes, Padrões e Melhores Práticas do Interactive Advertising Bureau, Standards e Práticas de Conduta, o Código de Conduta da NAI, os Princípios de Autorregulação da DAA para Publicidade Comportamental Online. Quaisquer Leis Aplicáveis relacionadas à proteção nacional de dados são doravante designadas como “Leis de Proteção de Dados”.
8.2 O Cliente reconhece e declara que: (i) o Conteúdo (que, para evitar dúvidas, inclui o título, imagens, vídeos e as páginas de destino) não viola nenhuma das Leis Aplicáveis e não contêm qualquer material que possa ser prejudicial, abusivo, obsceno, ameaçador ou difamatório; (ii) tem todos os direitos, licenças e autorizações necessários para conceder os direitos aqui concedidos, incluindo para a Outbrain usar, hospedar, armazenar em cache, encaminhar, armazenar, copiar, modificar, distribuir, reformatar, reproduzir, publicar, exibir, transmitir e distribuir o Conteúdo; (iii) o Conteúdo não irá infringir quaisquer direitos de propriedade intelectual de terceiros; (iv) não fornecerá conteúdo destinado a crianças menores de treze 16 (dezesseis) anos; (v) o Conteúdo está em conformidade com as
Diretrizes de Publicidade da Outbrain
, que podem ser atualizadas periodicamente pela Outbrain; (vi) O Conteúdo não deve (a) redirecionar para um destino diferente do originalmente submetido ao Serviço, e/ou (b) ser substancialmente diferente do Conteúdo originalmente submetido ao Serviço; (vii) não usará o Serviço de maneira a obter uma vantagem inesperada ou interferir com a integridade e/ou performance geral do Serviço; (viii) se estiver usando o Painel de Controle, o Cliente adere a quaisquer regras de uso tal como determinado pela Outbrain (por exemplo, não usando “source bidding” para listar em “whitelist” qualquer fonte de Rede particular); (ix) não está sujeito, não pertence, não é controlado por qualquer pessoa que esteja sujeita a sanções ou restrições de controle de exportação, impostas de acordo com a legislação dos Estados Unidos ou as leis de qualquer outra jurisdição aplicável à execução do contrato e não realizará nenhuma ação que possa resultar em sanções econômicas ou outras restrições de controle comercial ou penalidades que poderiam ser impostas à Outbrain; e (x) todas as informações comerciais e de pagamento fornecidas à Outbrain são verdadeiras, corretas e precisas.
8.3 Se o Cliente é uma agência (ou outro tipo de terceiro agindo em nome do provedor do Conteúdo), o Cliente declara e garante que: (i) é o agente autorizado do provedor do Conteúdo; (ii) tem a autoridade legal para assinar o Contrato e tomar todas as decisões e ações relacionadas ao provedor do Conteúdo; e (iii) firmou um contrato por escrito que concede à agência autoridade para representar o provedor do Conteúdo, de acordo com (i) e (ii) acima (e deve submeter esse contrato à Outbrain sob demanda). O Cliente também concorda que não está agindo, através do Painel de Controle, em nome de uma empresa francesa ou estrangeira, cujo conteúdo de propaganda visa atingir principalmente o território francês. Se o Cliente está agindo em nome de um provedor que visa atingir o território francês, por favor, entre em contato com info@outbrain.com para obter mais informações sobre como adquirir Serviços Outbrain.
8.4 EXCETO SE EXPRESSAMENTE EXPOSTO ADIANTE NO CONTRATO, A OUTBRAIN NÃO FAZ QUAISQUER DECLARAÇÕES OU GARANTIAS, EXPRESSAS OU IMPLÍCITAS – INCLUSIVE, MAS NÃO LIMITANDO-SE À GARANTIAS DE COMERCIALIZAÇÃO, TÍTULO, NÃO-VIOLAÇÃO, OU ADEQUAÇÃO A UM DETERMINADO FIM, OU QUAISQUER GARANTIAS DECORRENTES DE UM CONTRATO, USO OU PRÁTICA COMERCIAL – SOBRE SEUS SERVIÇOS E O DESEMPENHO OU ÊXITO DE QUALQUER CAMPANHA REALIZADA EM BENEFÍCIO DO CLIENTE, OU QUE O SERVIÇO FUNCIONE ININTERRUPTAMENTE, DE FORMA SEGURA E SEM ERROS.
9. Proteção de Dados
As disposições do
Acordo de Compartilhamento de Dados
devem ser incorporadas neste Contrato, e fazem dele parte.
10. Indenização
10.1 Cada parte defenderá, indenizará e segurará a outra de qualquer má conduta assim como seus agentes representativos, afiliadas, subsidiárias, diretores, representantes legais, empregados, contratados, e sócios da Rede (se aplicável) em caso de toda e qualquer demanda de terceiros que resulte da quebra das obrigações e representações deste Contrato.
10.2 Em relação a quaisquer de tais demandas : (i) a parte a ser indenizada proverá uma pronta notificação por escrito para a parte a indenizar sobre quaisquer de tais demandas (tendo em vista que a falha em prover tal pronta notificação não exonerará a parte a indenizar de suas obrigações de indenização no Contrato, exceto à medida em que já tenha sofrido dano); (ii) a parte a indenizar deverá ter sozinha o controle de defesa e regularização da demanda (dado que a parte a indenizar não pode entrar em qualquer acordo que possa afetar de forma adversa os direitos e obrigações da parte a ser indenizada sem o consentimento prévio por escrito da parte a ser indenizada); (iii) a pedido e despesas da parte a indenizar, a parte a ser indenizada cooperará com a investigação e defesa de tal demanda; e (iv) a parte a ser indenizada terá o direito de participar na sua defesa com o advogado de sua própria escolha, a despesas da parte a ser indenizada.
11. Limitação de Responsabilidade
EXCETO COM RELAÇÃO A DEMANDAS DECORRENTES DE OBRIGAÇÕES DE INDENIZAÇÃO, DOLO, VIOLAÇÃO DAS NORMA DE CONFIDENCIALIDADE/PROVISÕES DE PROTEÇÃO DE DADOS E/OU NÃO PAGAMENTO DOS ENCARGOS DEVIDOS NO CONTRATO POR UMA DAS PARTES, A RESPONSABILIDADE TOTAL MÁXIMA AGREGADA DE UMA PARTE E SEUS DIRETORES, EXECUTIVOS, FUNCIONÁRIOS, FORNECEDORES, SÓCIOS DA REDE OU, AGENTES PARA QUALQUER AÇÃO, INDEPENDENTEMENTE DA FORMA DA AÇÃO, SEJA EM RESPONSABILIDADE CIVIL OU CONTRATO, SURGIDA OU RELACIONADA DE QUALQUER FORMA AO CONTRATO OU SUA APLICAÇÃO SERÁ LIMITADA AO MAIOR DE: (I) O VALOR DAS TAXAS DEVIDAS PELO CLIENTE NO ÂMBITO DO CONTRATO NOS 12 MESES IMEDIATAMENTE ANTERIORES AO EVENTO QUE ORIGINE UMA DEMANDA; E (II) US$ 50.000,00. EM NENHUMA HIPÓTESE QUALQUER UMA DAS PARTES SERÁ RESPONSÁVEL POR DANOS CONSEQUENCIAIS, ESPECIAIS, PUNITIVOS OU FORTUITOS OU POR OUTROS DANOS DE QUALQUER NATUREZA, INCLUINDO, SEM SE LIMITAR A, PERDA DE DADOS, PERDA DE RECEITAS OU PERDA DE LUCROS, DECORRENTES DE OU DE ALGUMA FORMA RELACIONADOS AO CONTRATO OU SUA EXECUÇÃO, MESMO QUE TAL PARTE TENHA SIDO AVISADA DA POSSIBILIDADE DE TAIS DANOS.
12. Disposições Gerais
12.1 Nenhuma das partes poderá outorgar o Contrato, no todo ou em parte, por força da lei ou de outra forma, sem o prévio consentimento por escrito da outra parte; previsto, entretanto que, quaisquer das partes pode outorgar seus direitos ou delegar a sua competência no âmbito do Contrato, no todo ou em parte, sem o consentimento do outro, se em caso de fusão, reorganização ou venda de todos ou substancialmente todos os ativos da outorgante, desde que a entidade sucessora disponha de recursos suficientes para executar plenamente o Contrato e assumir a obrigação de cumpri-lo plenamente.
12.2 O presente Contrato será regido e interpretado de acordo com as leis Brasileiras aplicáveis aos contratos celebrados e inteiramente executados dentro dele, sem levar em conta o corpo de lei relativo ao conflito de leis. Cada parte neste contrato de forma irrevogável e incondicional consente submeter-se à jurisdição exclusiva dos tribunais do Estado de São Paulo e da cidade de São Paulo, Brasil, para qualquer demanda resultante ou relacionada ao Contrato (e concorda em não começar qualquer reivindicação que lhe diga respeito que não seja em tais tribunais). A parte prevalecente em qualquer demanda decorrente do Contrato terá o direito de recuperar taxas e custos razoáveis de seu advogado. Não obstante o acima exposto, em caso de inadimplemento, por parte do Cliente, das obrigações estabelecidas a Cláusula 5 acima, a Outbrain terá o direito, se assim o desejar, de iniciar ação judicial ou extrajudicial contra o Cliente, devido ao inadimplemento, perante o foro apropriado e no local e jurisdição em que o Cliente reside ou mantém ativos.
12.3 Notas de imprensa ou anúncios públicos gerais não devem ser feitos sem o consentimento mútuo e por escrito do Cliente e da Outbrain. A Outbrain terá o direito de incluir o nome do Cliente na lista de clientes da Outbrain e em outros materiais de marketing. Clientes não poderão usar o nome, logo ou a marca registrada da Outbrain sem a autorização prévia e por escrito da mesma.
12.4 Todas as notificações no âmbito do Contrato devem ser por escrito para o endereço do destinatário definido na Ordem de Inserção, ou em qualquer outro endereço como pode ser indicado mediante notificação por escrito à outra parte, de tempos em tempos. A notificação será eficaz no recebimento.
12.5 Nenhuma falha de quaisquer das partes em aplicar quaisquer de seus direitos ao abrigo do Contrato atuará como uma renúncia a tais direitos. Se uma (1) ou mais disposições do Contrato forem considerados aplicáveis sob as Leis Aplicáveis, então essa (s) disposição (s) deve (m) ser excluída (s) do acordo, e o saldo do Contrato será executável de acordo com seus termos.
12.6 Nenhuma das partes será responsável por qualquer atraso ou falha em cumprir quaisquer de suas obrigações estabelecidas no Contrato devido a causas que estejam fora de seu controle razoável. Nenhuma das partes será responsável por qualquer indisponibilidade ou inoperabilidade da Internet, falha técnica ou erro ou corrupção de computador resultando em perda de dados ou outros danos. Independentemente do aqui estabelecido, o Cliente não será exonerado das suas obrigações de pagar os honorários devidos em conformidade com este Contrato.
12.7 As Cláusulas 7, 8, 9, 10, 11 e 12, em conjunto com qualquer disputa pendente de obrigação de pagamento sobreviverão à rescisão do Contrato.
12.8 O Cliente e a Outbrain atuarão como contratantes independentes. Nada no Contrato será considerado ou será interpretado como agindo para a criação de um empreendimento conjunto ou parceria entre as partes.
12.9 O Contrato constitui a totalidade do acordo entre as partes com relação ao assunto aqui tratado e não pode ser modificado sem o prévio consentimento por escrito de ambas as partes. Em nenhuma hipótese, quaisquer termos e condições inconsistentes ou conflitantes contidos em qualquer ordem de compra, ordem de inserção, fatura ou outro documento enviado pelo Cliente relativo ao assunto aqui tratado, tem qualquer força ou efeito, ainda que aceito e assinado pela Outbrain.
Code on Page
MSA Terms
HB Terms
Video Terms
SSP Terms
Effective June 20th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
標準的パートナー配信規約
適用開始日：2023年8月1日
The Engage Terms vary according to the country where your billing address is located. Please use your billing country below to view the applicable Engage Terms.
My billing address is located in:
United States of America
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua & Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bonaire
Bosnia & Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Ter
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Canary Islands
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Channel Islands
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos Island
Colombia
Comoros
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Ter
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Great Britain
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guyana
Haiti
Hawaii
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Korea South
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lesotho
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malaysia
Malawi
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Midway Islands
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Nambia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherland Antilles
Netherlands (Holland, Europe)
Nevis
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau Island
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Island
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Republic of Montenegro
Republic of Serbia
Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
St Barthelemy
St Eustatius
St Helena
St Kitts-Nevis
St Lucia
St Maarten
St Pierre & Miquelon
St Vincent & Grenadines
Saipan
Samoa
Samoa American
San Marino
Sao Tome & Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
South Africa
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Tahiti
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad & Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks & Caicos Is
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City State
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands (Brit)
Virgin Islands (USA)
Wake Island
Wallis & Futana Is
Yemen
Zaire
Zambia
本利用規約（下で定義する）は、請求先住所の存する国によって内容が異なります。適用のある本利用規約を確認するには、請求先住所の存在する国を選択してください。
パートナー登録フォーム記載のパートナーが、Outbrainが提供する商品、サービス及びテクノロジーを実装及び使用する際には、以下の標準的パートナー配信規約（以下「本利用規約」という。）が適用される。
1.       定義
1.1.      「Ads.txt」とは、許可されたデジタル販売者のテキストファイルをいう。Ads.txtへの言及は、App-ads.txtを含む。
1.2.      「広告型レコメンデーション」とは、Outbrainの広告主から提出されたOutbrainネットワーク上の（回遊型レコメンデーションではない）本レコメンデーションをいう。
1.3.      「本アプリケーション」とは、モバイル端末（電話又はタブレットを含む）上で動作するよう設計された内蔵ソフトウェアをいう。
1.4.      「本コンテンツ」とは、グラフィックコンテンツ、テキストコンテンツ及び／又はオーディオコンテンツ（テキスト、データ、情報、写真、画像、グラフィック、オーディオ、動画その他のコンテンツを含む場合がある）をいう。
1.5.      「本カード」とは、本レコメンデーションが表示される本テクノロジーを通じて利用することができるフォーマットをいう。
1.6.      「本データ」とは、本テクノロジーを通じてOutbrainが収集又は生成するすべてのデータを意味する。これには、本契約に基づいてパートナーに提供されるレポート又は他のデータが含まれる。
1.7.      「リンク先ページ」とは、本レコメンデーションをクリックすることによってアクセスされる、あらゆるウェブページ又はオンライン上の場所（本パートナーサイト又は他のウェブサイト若しくは本アプリケーションを含む場合がある）をいう。
1.8.      「エンドユーザー」とは、本テクノロジーが実装されている本パートナーサイトのウェブページ、本アプリケーション及び／又はプラットフォームの個人である閲覧者をいう。
1.9.      「知的財産権」とは、特許の有無及び登録の有無を問わず、発明、発見、概念、表現又は著作物をいう。これには、発見、組み合わせ、ノウハウ、手順、技術情報、プロセス、方法、数式、アルゴリズム、プロトコル、技術、意匠、図面及びトレードドレス、それらの物理的態様並びに特許、著作権、商標、工業デザイン、実用新案（及びそれらの出願又は拡張）、ドメイン、企業秘密又は現在若しくは将来の法域において認められるこれらに類似の権利を含み、これに限定されない。
1.10.    「本パートナーサイト」とは、パートナー登録フォームに明記されているウェブプロパティ、本アプリケーション又はプラットフォーム、並びに、事前に書面で（Eメール可）Outbrainの承認を受けてパートナーが本テクノロジーの実装を決めた追加的プロパティ をいう。
1.11.    「回遊型レコメンデーション」とは、本パートナーサイト上の本コンテンツにリンクする本レコメンデーション（広告型レコメンデーションではない）をいう。
1.12.    「本レコメンデーション」とは、Outbrainが閲覧者に配信する、本テクノロジーが実装されたウェブページ、本アプリケーション又はプラットフォームの本カードを通じた、広告型レコメンデーション及び回遊型レコメンデーションの表示をいう。
1.13.    「本収益」とは、広告型レコメンデーションから生じた純収入及び広告型レコメンデーションをOutbrainネットワーク上に表示するためにOutbrainに支払われる収益をいう。
1.14.    「本テクノロジー」とは、OutbrainのJavaScript、 API、SDK 及び関連プロトコルであって、ウェブサイト及び本アプリケーションに実装することにより、本カードの提供、選択及び注文のためのOutbrain独自の最適化技術により管理されるユーザーインターフェースを表示するものをいう。
1.15.    「本アップデート」とは、Outbrainが随時、独自の裁量で行う、本テクノロジーの更新、修正又は改善（Ads.txtの記載及びこれに類似する業界のスタンダードの追加が含まれるが、これらに限定されない）をいう。
1.16.    「OB生成リンク」とは、OBNews.Outbrain.com（又はOutbrainが随時提供する後継リンク若しくは追加リンク）の紹介リンクから生成されたパートナーサイト上のエンドユーザーのページビューをいう。
2.     テクノロジー、位置及び外観
2.1.       パートナーは、Outbrainによる技術的な指示及びOutbrainが提供する実装ガイド（これらは随時改訂される。）に従い、本テクノロジー（提供されるOutbrainのAds.txtを含む）を実装するものとする。Outbrainは、当該実装にあたり使用される本テクノロジーを、Outbrainが利用することができる本テクノロジー（例：JS、API、SDK又はこれに相当する他のもの）の中から、その独自の裁量により決定することができる。本テクノロジーは、本パートナーサイトの各ページ上のメインの本コンテンツのすぐ下、又は、書面にて（Eメール可）両当事者が合意した場所に配置されるものとする。実装は、書面で別途合意した場合を除き、1ページあたり1つの広告型レコメンデーションへのリンクを含むものとする。
2.2.       本契約期間中常に、パートナーは、すべての適用法及び自主規制規則（本レコメンデーションのソース又は内容の開示に関するものを含む）に準じて本テクノロジーを表示しなければならない。上記の義務のみならず、パートナーは、本テクノロジーの表示、表記又は識別の仕方についてOutbrainの合理的な指示に従うことに同意する。
2.3.       Outbrainは、随時、本アップデートを行うことができる。Outbrain が、パートナーに対して本アップデートを実装するよう要請した場合、パートナーは、Outbrainから当該通知を受領した後30歴日以内に本アップデートを実装しなければならない。当該アップデートが本パートナーサイトのパフォーマンスに重大な悪影響を及ぼすことをパートナーが実証した場合には、Outbrainは、パートナーの当該懸念に対処して合理的な満足が得られるようにし、又は、本アップデートの実装を行わないことに同意することを選択できる。
2.4.       本契約期間中、Outbrainは、パートナーの唯一かつ排他的な、直接的及び間接的なコンテンツレコメンデーションプロバイダとなる。「コンテンツレコメンデーション」とは、見出し又はエンドユーザーが本コンテンツ（リンク先ページがコンテンツであるか、記事広告であるか又は広告であるかを問わない）へ誘導されることを示すフレーズを含む1つ又は複数の有償又は無償のリンクのことをいう。
2.5.       Outbrainは、OB生成リンク又は回遊型レコメンデーションを通じて、エンドユーザーをパートナーサイトに誘導し、パートナーサイトのページビューを追加的に生成することができる。エンドユーザーがOB生成リンクから広告型レコメンデーションをクリックした場合、パートナーは、当該ページビューにより発生した広告収入を得ることができない。回遊型レコメンデーションの表示には、Outbrainの書面による事前承認（Eメール可）が必要であり、この承認は、最低限の広告型レコメンデーションの実装又はその他の料金が条件とされる場合がある。
2.6.       Outbrainは、本テクノロジーについて、試験的変更（本カードの順序、形式及び頻度の変更を含む）を加えることができる。パートナーが試験について管理を行っている場合には、かかる範囲に関し、パートナーは、少なくとも四半期毎に当該試験の要請に応じるものとする。
3.     収益及び支払
3.1.       本契約期間中、パートナーには、本収益のうちパートナー登録フォームに記載された割合が支払われる。Outbrainは、Outbrainが本収益を回収した歴月の末日から、パートナー登録フォームに記載された期間内に、当該支払を行う。疑義を避けるために、本収益は、特に、広告技術料、アウトブレインのプラットフォームに統合された第三者のデータサービス、無効なクリック／インプレッション並びに広告主及び代理店の割引／リベートを控除したものである。
3.2.       パートナーは、記入済みの正確な税務書類その他Outbrainが要求するこれに類する全ての資料（かかる税務書類及び資料を総称して「税務資料等」という。）を、Outbrainに対し速やかに提供しなければならない。本契約中の別段の定めにかかわらず、Outbrainは、(a) Outbrainがパートナーの税務資料等を受領するまでの間、本契約に基づきパートナーに対して行うべき支払を、違約金又は遅延損害金の支払義務を負うことなしに留保し、(b)本契約に基づきパートナーに対して負う支払額から、Outbrainが支払義務を負う税（適用のあるもの）を、法律の定めるところにより控除することができる。Outbrainは、税務資料等を受領した場合には、前記(a)に基づきパートナーへの支払いが留保されている金額を、実務上合理的に可能な範囲で速やかに支払うための商業的に合理的な努力を行う。
3.3.       パートナーは、Outbrainからの支払が適切に行われるよう、連絡先及び支払情報を書面により正確にOutbrainに届け出なければならない。また、支払いにあたり、パートナーの金融機関又は決済サービスプロバイダに対し手数料が生じる場合には、かかる手数料はパートナーにおいて負担するものとする。Outbrainは、パートナーに対して支払われるべき金額が5000円を下回る場合は、パートナーに対して支払うべき金額が累計5000円を超える歴月まで支払を留保するものとする。Outbrainの支払いに関する一切の紛争は、Outbrainに対して、当該支払いがなされた日から30歴日以内に書面で提起されなければならない。かかる期間経過後は、パートナーは、当該支払いにかかる請求を放棄したものとみなされる。パートナーに対して本明細が提供されてから6か月以内にOutbrainが請求書を受領しない場合、当該料金は放棄されたものとみなされる。
3.4.     Outbrainは、Outbrainが有する他の権利及び救済措置に加えて、(i) 本契約（契約の重大な違反の場合も含む）に基づきOutbrainがパートナーに負っている債務の支払いを留保し、又は、かかる債務を、本契約又は他の契約に基づきパートナーがOutbrainに対して負っている債務と相殺すること、及び、(ii) 過去にOutbrainからパートナーに対する過払いがあった場合には、Outbrainは、パートナーに対し、任意の請求書の発行から30歴日以内に、Outbrainに対し、当該金額の返金を行うよう求めることができる。本パートナーサイト上に広告型レコメンデーションを表示させているOutbrainの広告主又は顧客がOutbrainに対する支払を怠った場合、その理由にかかわらず、Outbrainは支払いを留保し、又は、パートナーの口座に返金を求めることができる。
4.     プライバシー
「
個人情報取扱規約
」の各条項は、本契約に組み込まれ、本契約の一部を構成するものとする。
5.     ライセンス
5.1.       本契約期間中、パートナーが本契約の定めを遵守することを条件に、Outbrainは、パートナーに対して、本パートナーサイト上で広告型レコメンデーション及び第2.5条において認められる範囲の回遊型レコメンデーションを既定のフォーム及びフォーマットで表示する目的で本テクノロジーを使用するための、限定的、非排他的かつ取消可能でサブライセンス権がない、譲渡不可能のライセンスを付与する。
5.2.       Outbrainは、本契約期間中、パートナーに対して、本テクノロジーに組み込まれているOutbrainの商標、サービスマーク及びロゴ（併せて「Outbrainマーク」という。）を本契約に基づくパートナーの権利及び義務に厳格に従って使用及び表示することができる限定的、非排他的かつ地域限定のない、ロイヤルティフリーのライセンスを付与する。パートナーによるOutbrainマークの使用により築かれた信用はOutbrainにのみ帰属する。Outbrainはカスタマー又はパートナーの総リストに、本テクノロジーを実装したパートナー及び本パートナーサイトの名前を載せることができる（マーケティング及び販売資料を含む）。前項の規定にかかわらず、各当事者は本契約に関するプレスリリース、又は、本契約で定める以外の自己のウェブサイト上で相手方当事者の名前を使用する場合は、相手方当事者の書面による同意を事前に得るものとする。
5.3.       当事者間の権利関係は以下のとおりとする。（a）Outbrainは、Outbrainマーク、本テクノロジー、本データ（ただし、パートナーが所有権を有する、本パートナーサイトからの本コンテンツは除く）、Outbrainのサイト（
www.outbrain.com
）及び本ダッシュボードに関する一切の権利、権限及び利益を保有する。また（b）パートナーは、本パートナーサイトに関する一切の権利、権限及び利益（ルックアンドフィールを含む）を保有する。ただし、上記（a）に記載された項目はその保有する範囲から除外される。
5.4.       本契約の下付与されるライセンスは、本契約によって具体的に定められ、黙示の権利は一切存在しない。本契約で明示的にパートナーに付与されていない権利は、すべてOutbrainが留保するものとする。
6.     禁止行為
6.1.       パートナーは、以下の行為を行ってはならない。
(i)      本レコメンデーションを編集、修正、切り取り、フィルター処理、又は本レコメンデーションの順序を変える行為
(ii)     リンク先ページを曖昧にし、変更し、又はエンドユーザーをリンク先ページからリダイレクトさせる行為、若しくは、本レコメンデーションとリンク先ページの間に本コンテンツを点在させる行為
(iii)    本テクノロジー本来の表示を縮小、削除又は阻害する行為
(iv)   本レコメンデーションのクリック又はインプレッションを人為的に水増しする行為、若しくは、インセンティブ或いは他の方法を用いて本レコメンデーションのクリックを勧奨したり要請したりする行為、及び／又は、エンドユーザーの意思によらないクリックを発生させることを目的とした、自動化された、欺瞞的な、不正な、無効な、インセンティブのある若しくはその他の方法に関与する行為
(v)     本テクノロジーに含まれる知的財産権に関する通知の一切を削除し、毀損し、曖昧にし、又は変更する行為
(vi)   本契約で明示的に規定されている方法や目的以外に、本テクノロジーにアクセス、複製又は使用する行為
(vii)  本テクノロジーの変更、翻案、翻訳、二次的著作物の作成、逆コンパイル、リバースエンジニアリング、逆アセンブル、その他本テクノロジーのソースコードを抽出しようと試みる行為、本テクノロジー又はそれに関連する機密情報の使用又はアクセスを通じて、代替物又は類似サービス若しくは製品を作成する行為又は第三者のために若しくは第三者に代わって本テクノロジーのその他の使用をする行為
(viii) 本テクノロジーの干渉又は妨害を試み、又は本契約に準じて実装された本テクノロジーを通じた方法以外の方法で、システム又はネットワークへのアクセスを確立しようとする行為
(ix)   本レコメンデーションを複製、キャッシュ、配信、表示、変更、その他使用する行為（又は、第三者の当該行為を承認又は幇助する行為）。ただし、本テクノロジーを通じて提供された本レコメンデーションは除く。
(x)     本テクノロジーをOutbrainが許可しない目的で使用する行為。パートナーに配布された実装ガイドラインに矛盾する目的で使用する行為を含む。
6.2.    パートナーは、本テクノロジーを、アダルトな本コンテンツ、猥褻な本コンテンツ、性的な本コンテンツ、名誉を毀損する本コンテンツ、中傷的な本コンテンツ、侵害的な本コンテンツ、虐待的な本コンテンツ、フェイク本コンテンツ、虚偽の本コンテンツ並びに、ヘイトスピーチ又は差別の勧奨、銃器及び違法薬物の売買、又は、違法な行為に加担し若しくは加担することを促す本コンテンツ、又は、16歳未満の児童向けの本コンテンツを表示し又はこうした本コンテンツを含むページに実装しない。Outbrainは、独自の裁量で、いつでも、本テクノロジーを無効にする権利を留保する。
7.     登録
パートナーは、Outbrainのダッシュボード（以下「本ダッシュボード」という。）に登録し、オンラインリポートの閲覧及び本テクノロジーの各種設定を管理することができる。パートナーが本ダッシュボードにアクセスができる状態にある限り、Outbrainはパートナー（又はパートナーに代わる個人）の本ダッシュボードのアクセスに関連する個人識別情報を収集することができる。パートナーは、パートナー自ら又はパートナーのために個人が本ダッシュボードを通して行った情報の変更に対し、単独で責任を負う。本ダッシュボードに表示されるパートナーに支払われた又は支払われる収益予想は、パートナーの利便性のためにのみ提供される。Outbrainは、これらの収益予想額（表示があった場合）が正確なものであり、本契約に基づいてパートナーに対し支払われる確定額となるかについては何らの保証も行わない。OutbrainダッシュボードへのアクセスはOutbrainの単独の裁量の下に置かれ、Outbrainはこれをいつでも中止することができる。
8.     テクノロジーの停止及び終了
8.1.    緊急事態が発生した場合（重大なセキュリティの侵害、ユーザーへのマルウェアその他のウィルスの拡散、不適切・不法・不正な使用など）、Outbrainは、随時、本テクノロジーの全部又は一部を停止若しくは打ち切ることができる（本テクノロジーの使用を不可にするなどの措置を含む）。
8.2.    いずれの当事者も、相手方当事者が本契約の定めについて重大な違反を犯し、違反当事者が書面による違反通知を受領してから14日経過しても当該違反が治癒されない場合、本契約を解除することができる。
8.3.    本契約は、パートナー登録フォームに別段の定めがない限り、14日前の書面による通知をもって終了することができる。これに加え、Outbrainは、Outbrainがパートナーに対し本テクノロジーを提供してから30日以内に本テクノロジーが実装されない場合には、本契約を解除することができる。本契約が終了した場合、本契約上の権利及び義務の一切は消滅するものとする。ただし、本利用規約第9.6条、9.7条、第10条、第11条、第14条その他当該条項の性質に鑑み、本契約の終了後も存続すべきものについては、本契約終了後も当事者を拘束し続けるものとする。
9.     限定的保証及び補償
9.1.       各当事者は相手方当事者に対して以下の事項を表明し保証する。
(a)    本契約を締結し、かつ、本契約に基づく義務を履行する権利、能力及び権限の一切を保有していること。
(b)     本契約の履行に際して、適用される法律、規則及び命令の一切を遵守すること。
9.2.       Outbrainは、（Outbrainにより提供及び提示され、本契約に基づいてパートナーにより実装された）本テクノロジーが、Outbrainの知る限りにおいて第三者の知的財産権を現に侵害しておらず、今後侵害することもないことを保証する。
9.3.       パートナーは、本パートナーサイトが、(i) 本パートナーサイトを運営する権利を有すること、(ii) Outbrainパートナーガイドライン及び／又はOutbrainのものと実質的に同等のパートナー自身のガイドラインに従うこと、(iii) 違法な本コンテンツ、第三者の持つ知的財産権を侵害する本コンテンツを含んでおらず、将来においてもこれらを含まないこと、(iv) 猥褻な内容、名誉を毀損する内容、誹謗的な内容、中傷的な内容、いかなる者のパブリシティ権、プライバシー権若しくは人格権を侵害する内容を将来において含まないこと、(v) 虚偽の事実の表示又は事実上の不正確性を知りながらこれを含んでおらず、将来においてもこれらを含まないことを表明し保証する。
9.4.       本契約に規定されたいかなる事項も、Outbrainが最低限のトラフィック量、クリック数、インプレッション数又は使用数などをパートナーに約束するものと解釈されてはならない。
9.5.       本契約で明確に表明された場合を除き、いずれの当事者も、本契約、本パートナーサイト、本テクノロジー、本テクノロジーを通じて使用可能な本コンテンツ及びその他の事項（目的の如何を問わず品質又は適合性が満足できるものであること、サービスを中断又はエラーもなく常時使用できること、サービス又は取引に際して生じる保証を含む）に関して、明示的若しくは黙示的かを問わず、一切、表明又は保証を行わない。
9.6.       Outbrainは、本テクノロジーに組み込まれている本コンテンツ、又は本テクノロジーを通してアクセスする本コンテンツ（広告型レコメンデーションを含み、これに限定されない）に関して一切の表明又は保証を行わない。Outbrainは、本テクノロジーを介して配信される本コンテンツの内容、正確性、本コンテンツによる知的財産権の侵害、合法性又は品位及びパートナーによるこれらの信頼について、一切責任を負わないものとする。
9.7.       各当事者（以下「補償当事者」という。）は、相手方当事者、相手方当事者の親会社及び関連会社、並びに当該会社の取締役、役員、株主、社員、代表者、従業員及び代理人（以下あわせて「被補償当事者」という。）を、本契約において定められた補償当事者の本契約上の表明保証の違反が原因で第三者により提起された訴えに関するすべての請求、損失、責任、損害、費用、和解金、規制当局による調査結果、罰金、過料及びその他の支出（合理的な弁護士費用を含む）（以下あわせて「本クレーム」という。）から補償し、防御し、何ら損失を被らせないものとする。被補償当事者は、本クレームを補償当事者に速やかに通知しなければならない。ただし、かかる通知の遅滞は、その遅滞により補償当事者が実際に損害を被った場合を除き、補償当事者の義務を一切軽減しない。被補償当事者は、補償当事者の指揮の下、自らが選任し、費用を負担する弁護士と共に、本クレームの防御及び和解に参加する権利を有する。
10.  秘密保持
10.1.     各当事者（以下「受領者」という。）は、相手方当事者（以下「開示者」）の営業、技術、製品及びサービスに関して、開示された状況を斟酌すると、当然、秘密情報とみなされる特定の情報及び資料（本契約の条項を含む）（以下「秘密情報」という。）にアクセスすることを確認する。秘密情報には以下のものは含まれない。
(a)     受領者が、開示者による開示前に既に知得していた情報
(b)     開示者の秘密情報を参照することなく、受領者が独立して開発した情報
(c)     受領者の責めに帰せずして、公知若しくは公知となった情報
(d)     秘密保持義務に一切違反することなく、第三者から受領者に開示された情報
10.2.     本契約で許可されている場合を除き、受領者は、(i) 秘密情報を自己又は第三者の利益のために一切使用せず、(ii) 本第10条に従い秘密情報を使用しないこと、及び秘密情報を知る必要があり、秘密情報の秘密性を保持することに合意した、受領者の取締役、従業員、請負業者、顧問、投資家又は潜在的な投資家以外には、秘密情報を一切開示しない。受領者は、開示者の書面による要請があった場合、速やかに、秘密情報を返還又は廃棄する。前述の定めにかかわらず、受領者は、適用法令又は法的手続きにより必要となった範囲で、秘密情報を開示することができる。ただし、受領者は、かかる開示請求があったことを速やかに書面により開示者に通知し、開示者が当該開示に異議を申し立て、又は開示範囲を限定する旨を求めた場合は、開示者に対し、開示者の費用をもって妥当な協力をする。
11.  責任制限
11.1.     以下の各号記載の場合には、当事者は、相手方当事者に対する賠償責任を除外又は制限されない。
(i)      当事者、又は自己の従業員若しくは請負業者の過失により引き起こされた死亡又は人身傷害
(ii)     詐欺又は詐欺的不実表示
(iii)    法律上、除外又は制限することを禁じられているその他の責任
11.2.     第11.1条の定めに該当する場合を除き、いずれの当事者も、本契約に関連し、又は、本契約違反により生じる(a) 特別損害、間接損害、付随損害、結果損害、(b) グッドウィル又は評判の損失、(c) 本データの損失、(d) 契約、取引、予想された節約の損失、(e) 利益の損失については、当該損失又は損害発生の可能性について当該当事者が知らされていたかどうかを問わず、また、当該損失又は損害がどのように発生したかを問わず、当該損害が契約法理論、不法行為（過失を含む）、法律上の義務又はその他の理論に基づくものであるかを問わず、一切の法的責任を負わない。
11.3.     第11.1条の定めに該当する場合及び当事者の一方が相手方の知的財産権の侵害又は不正流用を行ったことに起因する責任に関する場合を除き、いかなる場合も、本契約又は本契約の違反（契約法理論、不法行為（過失を含む）、法律上の義務又はその他の理論に基づくものであるかを問わない）に起因又は関連する当事者の責任総額は、(i) 1000万円、及び、 (ii) 責任の発生原因たる事象（一連の関連する事象である場合は、当該事象の最初の事象）の発生の直近12か月間にパートナーに支払われ又は支払われるべき本収益の金額の125％のいずれか大きい方を超えない。
11.4.     当事者は、本契約に規定された各当事者の責任に関する制限が、いかなる状況においても合理的であると受け入れることを相互に確認する。
12.  輸出管理
パートナーは、商務省、米国財務省外国資産管理局（以下「OFAC」という。）その他の米国又はその他の国の機関又は当局の輸出にかかる全ての関連法令、規則、制約を遵守しなければならず、かかる法令、規則、制約に違反して本テクノロジーを輸出し、又は、輸出若しくは再輸出を許可してはならない。本テクノロジーをダウンロード又は使用した場合、パートナーは、上記に同意し、また、制限国に所在しておらず、その支配下になく、又は制限国の国民若しくは居住者ではないことを表明し保証したものとする。パートナーは、パートナー、パートナーの持分又は支配権を有する個人、団体、組織（役員、取締役を含む）のいずれもが、米国の法律、規制又は行政命令が、米国企業及び個人に対して取引を禁止している個人、団体、組織（特定国籍業者リストに掲載されている者を含む）に該当しないことを表明し保証する。
13.  反社会勢力の排除
13.1.     各当事者は、以下に列挙する人物・事項に現在該当しないことを表明する。
暴力団、暴力団員、暴力団員でなくなってから５年が経過していない者、暴力団関連企業、総会屋、社会運動標榜ゴロ、特殊知能暴力集団及びこれらに相当するもの。
13.2.     当事者が虚偽の表明をした場合、相手方当事者は、他の権利及び救済手段に影響を与えることなく、本契約を終了することができる。
14.  一般条項
14.1.     本契約は、法の抵触に関する通則法の規定又は国際物品売買契約に関する国際連合条約の規定にかかわらず、日本法に準拠し、日本法に従って解釈される。
14.2.     各当事者は、本契約に関連して生じる一切の紛争については、東京簡易裁判所及び東京地方裁判所を専属的合意管轄裁判所とする。
14.3.     当事者は、本契約の各条項に対する違反がなされた場合、回復不可能な損害が生じる可能性があることに同意する。いずれの当事者も、法律上認められた救済措置に加え、本契約に対する違反行為の防止及び本契約の実効性を確保するために、必要な保全措置を講じることができる。
14.4.     当事者は、独立した契約者であり、本契約のいかなる事項も、パートナーシップ、ジョイントベンチャー、代理人その他の関係を当事者間に形成するものと解釈しない。
14.5.     一方の当事者が本契約に基づく自らの権利の一部を行使しない場合又は本契約に基づく他の一方の当事者の義務の履行を求めない場合にも、これらの権利ないし義務が放棄されたとはみなされず、またいずれかの当事者が本契約に対するある不履行ないし違反を免責されたとしても、その事実によってそれ以外の又はそれ以降の不履行ないし違反が免責されるわけではない。
14.6.     いずれの当事者も、その妥当な制御能力を超えた事由により本契約に基づく当該当事者の義務のいずれかを履行できない場合、かかる不履行に対する責任を一切負わない。
14.7.     本契約は、本契約の主題に関して、当事者間の完全かつ唯一の合意を構成するものであり、書面によるか口頭によるかを問わず、かかる主題に関する本契約締結前又は締結時におけるすべての合意又は了解に優先する。
14.8.     本契約の当事者は、本契約の条項が、1999年契約法（第三者の権利）又はその他の方法により、本契約の当事者でない者により執行できることを意図していない。
14.9.     パートナー登録フォームは、両当事者が署名した書面によってのみ、変更、修正又は差し替えをすることができる。
14.10.  本契約の条項に関する見出しは全て、参照の目的においてのみ挿入され、いかなる法的影響力も持たないものとする。
14.11.  本契約において参照される日数は、別途指定される場合を除き営業日とする。
14.12.  本契約は、複数の副本で締結することができ、それぞれの副本は原本とみなされるが、当該副本全ては、１個のかつ同一の文書を構成する。
14.13.  本契約の規定が、何らかの理由により、法的強制力がないものと判断された場合、かかる規定は、法的強制を可能とするために必要な範囲に限り修正され、それができない場合は、本契約から分離され、本契約の残りの規定引き続き完全で有効であるものとする。
14.14.  いずれの当事者も、相手方当事者の書面による事前同意を得ずに、本契約又は本契約に基づく権利又は義務を譲渡することはできない。ただし、(i) 法に基づく手続き、合併、再編成若しくは支配権の取得又は変更があった場合、(ii) OutbrainからOutbrainの子会社への譲渡の場合はこの限りでない。本契約は、両当事者及びその認められた承継人及び譲受人に対して拘束力を有し、またこれらの利益のために効力を生じる。
Effective July 31st 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Termos de Uso Padrão para Divulgadores
Vigência em 1 de agosto de 2023
The Engage Terms vary according to the country where your billing address is located. Please use your billing country below to view the applicable Engage Terms.
My billing address is located in:
United States of America
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua & Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bonaire
Bosnia & Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Ter
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Canary Islands
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Channel Islands
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos Island
Colombia
Comoros
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Ter
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Great Britain
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guyana
Haiti
Hawaii
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Korea South
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lesotho
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malaysia
Malawi
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Midway Islands
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Nambia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherland Antilles
Netherlands (Holland, Europe)
Nevis
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau Island
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Island
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Republic of Montenegro
Republic of Serbia
Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
St Barthelemy
St Eustatius
St Helena
St Kitts-Nevis
St Lucia
St Maarten
St Pierre & Miquelon
St Vincent & Grenadines
Saipan
Samoa
Samoa American
San Marino
Sao Tome & Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
South Africa
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Tahiti
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad & Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks & Caicos Is
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City State
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands (Brit)
Virgin Islands (USA)
Wake Island
Wallis & Futana Is
Yemen
Zaire
Zambia
Os Termos (definidos abaixo) variam de acordo com o país onde está localizado o endereço de cobrança. Por favor, use o endereço de cobrança do país abaixo para verificar quais os Termos aplicáveis.
Os seguintes Termos de Distribuição do Parceiro (“Termos”) regem a implementação e uso dos produtos, serviços, e tecnologia fornecidos pela Outbrain ao Parceiro, conforme identificado no Formulário de Inscrição de Parceiros.
1. DEFINIÇÕES.
1.1 “Ads.txt” significam um arquivo de texto de vendedores digitais autorizados. Todas as referências a Ads.txt incluem App-ads.txt.
1.2 “Recomendações de Anunciantes” significam Recomendações na rede da Outbrain (que não são Recomendações de Recirculação) enviadas pelos anunciantes da Outbrain.
1.3 “Aplicativo” significa programa de software autônomo desenvolvido para ser executado em um dispositivo móvel, incluindo um celular ou tablet.
1.4 “Conteúdo” significa conteúdo gráfico, textual e/ou auditivo (que poderá incluir texto, dados, informações, fotos, imagens, gráficos, conteúdo de áudio, vídeo ou outro conteúdo).
1.5 “Cartões” significam os formatos disponíveis através da Tecnologia onde aparecem as Recomendações.
1.6 “Dados” significam todos os dados coletados ou gerados pela Outbrain através da Tecnologia, incluindo relatórios ou outros dados disponibilizados ao Parceiro com relação a este Contrato.
1.7 “Página de Destino” significa qualquer página da internet ou outra localização online (que pode estar localizado em um Site(s) de Parceiro ou em outro site ou aplicativo) que possa ser acessada ao clicar nas Recomendações.
1.8 “Usuário Final” significa o visualizador humano individual de uma página da internet, Aplicativo ou plataforma do Site de Parceiro na qual a Tecnologia é implementada.
1.9 “Direitos de Propriedade Intelectual” incluem qualquer invenção, descoberta, conceito, expressão ou trabalho, patenteado ou não, registado ou não, incluindo, sem limitação, descobertas, composições, know-how, procedimentos, informações técnicas, processos, métodos, fórmulas, algoritmos, protocolos, técnicas, projetos e desenhos, imagens comerciais, qualquer incorporação física dos mesmos, e quaisquer patentes, direitos de autor, marcas comerciais, desenhos industriais e modelos de utilidade (e aplicações ou extensões dos mesmos), domínios e segredos comerciais ou direitos semelhantes aos direitos acima mencionados reconhecidos em qualquer jurisdição, agora ou no futuro.
1.10 “Sites do Parceiro” significam propriedades da web, Aplicativos ou plataformas identificadas no Formulário de Inscrição de Parceiros, juntamente com qualquer ou quaisquer propriedades adicionais nas quais o Parceiro escolha implementar a Tecnologia com autorização prévia e por escrito da Outbrain (sendo a autorização por e-mail suficiente).
1.11 "Recomendações de Recirculação” significa a apresentação de Recomendações (que não são Recomendações de Anunciantes), que conectam ao Conteúdo no Sites do Parceiro.
1.12 “Recomendações" significa a exibição de Recomendações de Anunciantes e/ou Recomendações de Recirculação através de Cartões que a Outbrain entrega ao visualizador de uma página da web, Aplicação ou plataforma na qual a Tecnologia está implementada.
1.13 “Receita” significa a receita líquida coletada pela Outbrain de Recomendações de Anunciantes e cobradas pela Outbrain para a exibição de tais Recomendações de Anunciantes na rede da Outbrain.
1.14 “Tecnologia” significa o Javascript, API, SDK e protocolos da Outbrain que, quando implementados nos sites e Aplicativos, apresentam a interface do usuário gerida pela tecnologia de otimização de propriedade da Outbrain para servir, selecionar e encomendar Cartões.
1.15 “Atualizações” significam atualizações, modificações e melhorias na Tecnologia, as quais serão feitas de tempos em tempos, ao critério exclusivo da Outbrain, incluindo-se, mas não estando limitado a adicionar linhas de Ads.txt ou quaisquer outras similares da indústria padrão.
1.16 “Links Gerados por OB” significa uma visualização de página de um Utilizador Final em um Site de Parceiro gerada a partir de uma ligação de referência de OBNews.Outbrain.com (ou ligação sucessora ou ligação(ões) adicional(is) que possa(m) ser fornecida(s) pela Outbrain ocasionalmente).
2. TECNOLOGIA; POSICIONAMENTO E APARÊNCIA.
2.1 O Parceiro deve implementar a Tecnologia (incluindo o Ads.txt fornecido pela Outbrain) em conformidade com as instruções técnicas da Outbrain e todos os guias de implementação disponibilizados pela Outbrain, os quais serão revisados periodicamente. A Outbrain, a seu exclusivo critério, pode determinar qual Tecnologia disponível na Outbrain (por exemplo, JS, API, SDK, ou qualquer outra equivalente) deve ser utilizada em cada implementação do Parceiro. Implementações da Tecnologia deverão aparecer diretamente abaixo do Conteúdo principal de cada página dos Sites do Parceiro nos quais a Tecnologia é instalada ou de outra forma mutuamente acordada por escrito (sendo a autorização por e-mail suficiente). A implementação deve incluir pelo menos um (1) link para as Recomendações de Anunciantes por página, exceto se acordado de outra forma por escrito.
2.2 O Parceiro deverá exibir a Tecnologia, durante o Prazo, em conformidade com todas as leis e regulamentos aplicáveis, inclusive no que diz respeito à divulgação da origem ou natureza das Recomendações. Sem prejuízo da obrigação anterior, o Parceiro concorda em cumprir as instruções razoáveis da Outbrain, relativas a como a Tecnologia deve ser exibida, marcada ou identificada.
2.3 A Outbrain pode fazer Atualizações, de tempos em tempos. Caso a Outbrain solicite ao Parceiro que implemente tais Atualizações, o Parceiro deverá fazer tais Atualizações em trinta (30) dias corridos contados do recebimento de referida notificação da Outbrain. Se o Parceiro demonstrar que a solicitação de tais Atualizações irá afetar substancialmente o despenho do Site(s) do Parceiro(s), a Outbrain poderá informar as suas preocupações para o Parceiro e assim solicitar ou não que o Parceiro implemente tais Atualizações.
2.4 Durante o Prazo, a Outbrain deverá ser o único e exclusivo provedor de recomendações de conteúdo diretas e indiretas do Parceiro, sendo que “recomendações de conteúdo" são um ou mais links pagos ou não pagos compostos por uma manchete ou frase indicando que um Usuário Final será conduzido ao Conteúdo (independentemente de a Página de Destino exibir conteúdo, editoriais ou propagandas).
2.5 A Outbrain pode conduzir Usuários Finais a Sites de Parceiros, gerando visualizações adicionais de páginas de Sites de Parceiros através de Links Gerados por OB ou Recomendações de Recirculação. Se um Utilizador Final clicar em uma Recomendação de Anunciante a partir de um Link Gerado por OB, o Parceiro não será compensado por quaisquer receitas de publicidade geradas por essas visualizações de página. Qualquer exibição de Recomendações de Recirculação exigirá a aprovação prévia por escrito da Outbrain (por e-mail é suficiente), que pode estar condicionada a uma implementação mínima de Recomendações de Anunciante ou a outras taxas.
2.6 A Outbrain pode realizar testes de alteração da Tecnologia, incluindo a ordem, o formato e a frequência dos Cartões. Na medida em que o Parceiro controle qualquer teste, o Parceiro deverá cumprir essas solicitações de teste pelo menos trimestralmente.
3. RECEITA E PAGAMENTO.
3.1 Durante o Prazo, o Parceiro será pago com uma percentagem da Receita Bruta Ajustada indicada no Acordo de Distribuição para Parceiros. A Outbrain deverá fazer esses pagamentos dentro do número de dias indicado no Acordo de Distribuição para Parceiros após o final de qualquer mês do calendário durante o qual o Outbrain cobre Receita. Para evitar dúvidas, a Receita é líquida, entre outras, de taxas de anunciantes, de dados de terceiros integrados na plataforma da Outbrain, cliques/impressões inválidos e descontos/reembolsos de anunciantes e agências.
3.2 O Parceiro deve fornecer, prontamente, à Outbrain formulários fiscais completos e precisos e todos os outros materiais similares que Outbrain exija, os quais podem incluir o formulário de imposto W-8BEN, W-8BEN-E ou W-9, caso aplicável (coletivamente, todos esses formulários e materiais, “Materiais Fiscais”). Não obstante qualquer disposição estabelecida em contrário neste Contrato, a Outbrain pode: (a) reter os pagamentos devidos ao Parceiro nestes Termos, sem multa ou taxa de atraso até que o Outbrain tenha recebido os Materiais Fiscais do Parceiro, e (b) deduzir quaisquer impostos a serem pagos pela Outbrain dos pagamentos devidos aos Parceiros, conforme exigido por lei. Uma vez que a Outbrain receba os Materiais Fiscais, a Outbrain usará esforços comercialmente razoáveis para pagar os montantes em aberto ao Parceiro, em conformidade com a subseção acima (a), assim que razoavelmente possível.
3.3 Para assegurar pagamento adequado, o Parceiro é responsável por notificar a Outbrain por escrito de informações precisas sobre contato e pagamento. O Parceiro também é responsável por quaisquer encargos avaliados pelo banco do Parceiro ou pelo provedor de pagamento. Se o montante devido ao Parceiro for inferior a R$ 150,00 Reais), tal valor será acumulado até o mês calendário em que o saldo dos pagamentos devidos ao Parceiro exceda R$ 150,00 Reais). Qualquer controvérsia em relação a um pagamento da Outbrain deve ser submetida à Outbrain por escrito dentro de trinta (30) dias consecutivos após a data de postagem ou transferência eletrônica desse pagamento ou a mesma será considerada renunciada. Se a Outbrain não receber uma fatura do Parceiro no prazo de seis (6) meses a contar da data da Declaração emitida ao Parceiro, considera-se que essas taxas foram renunciadas.
3.4 Além dos outros direitos e remédios jurídicos que a Outbrain possuir, a Outbrain pode (i) reter e compensar quaisquer pagamentos devidos ao Parceiro no Contrato (incluindo-se inadimplemento substancial) contra qualquer taxa que o Parceiro deva à Outbrain sob o Contrato ou qualquer outro contrato, e/ou (ii) exigir que o Parceiro reembolse a Outbrain dentro de trinta (30) dias consecutivos de qualquer fatura, qualquer montante que a Outbrain possa ter pago em excesso ao Parceiro em períodos anteriores. Se um anunciante ou cliente da Outbrain, cujas Recomendações de Anunciantes tiverem sido exibidas em qualquer Site do Parceiro, não efetuar à Outbrain o pagamento, por qualquer motivo, a Outbrain ficará autorizada a reter o pagamento ou cobrar a conta do Parceiro.
4. PRIVACIDADE.
As disposições do Acordo de Processamento de Dados devem ser totalmente incorporadas e fazer parte deste Contrato.
5. TERMOS DA LICENÇA.
5.1 Durante o Prazo e sujeito ao cumprimento de todos os termos do Contrato pelo Parceiro, a Outbrain concede ao Parceiro uma licença limitada, não exclusiva, revogável, não sublicenciável e intransferível para uso da Tecnologia para exibir Recomendações de Anunciantes, e na extensão permitida pela Secção 2.5 Recomendações de Recirculação, nos Sites do Parceiro na forma e formato fornecidos.
5.2 A Outbrain concede ao Parceiro, durante o Prazo, uma licença mundial limitada, não exclusiva e sem royalties, para usar e exibir as marcas registradas, marcas de serviço e logotipos da Outbrain (coletivamente, “Marcas Outbrain”), para serem incorporadas na Tecnologia, e em conformidade com a as obrigações e direitos do Parceiro no Contrato. Todo o resultado decorrente do uso, pelo Parceiro, de qualquer uma das Marcas da Outbrain deve ser feita apenas em benefício da Outbrain. A Outbrain terá o direito de se referir ao Parceiro e aos Sites do Parceiro em qualquer lista geral de anunciantes ou Parceiros (incluindo materiais de marketing e vendas) que tenham implementado a Tecnologia. Não obstante o acima exposto, cada parte solicitará consentimento prévio, por escrito, antes de emitir qualquer comunicado à imprensa sobre o Contrato ou usar o nome da outra parte em seu site, que não esteja de acordo com o Contrato.
5.3 É acordado entre as partes que: (a) a Outbrain possui todos os direitos, títulos e interesses nas Marcas, Tecnologia e Dados da Outbrain (excluindo qualquer Conteúdo dos Sites do Parceiro que será de propriedade do Parceiro), o site da Outbrain em
www.outbrain.com
e o Painel de Controle; e (b) o Parceiro possui todos os direitos, títulos e interesses no(s) Site(s) do Parceiro, incluindo a aparência, excluindo os itens descritos na alínea (a) acima.
5.4 As licenças concedidas nos termos deste Contrato são especificamente previstas neste instrumento; não existem direitos implícitos. Todos os direitos não concedidos expressamente ao Parceiro neste Contrato são reservados pela Outbrain.
6. ATIVIDADES PROIBIDAS.
6.1 O Parceiro não: (i) editará, modificará, truncará, filtrará ou alterará a ordem das Recomendações; (ii) obscurecerá, modificará ou redirecionará os Usuários do Site do Parceiro para outra página que não uma Página de Destino nem intercalará nenhum Conteúdo entre a Tecnologia e qualquer Página de Destino; (iii) minimizará, removerá ou de outra forma inibirá a exibição total e completa da Tecnologia; (iv) inflacionará artificialmente os cliques nas Recomendações, ou incentivará ou exigirá que qualquer pessoa clique em Recomendações utilizando incentivos ou outros métodos fraudulentos e/ou se envolver em qualquer método automatizado, enganoso, fraudulento, inválido, incentivado ou outro método desenvolvido para gerar cliques que não sejam ações voluntárias dos Usuários Finais; (v) removerá, deformará, obscurecerá ou alterará nenhuma notificação de Direitos de Propriedade Intelectual inclusos na Tecnologia; (vi) acessará, reproduzirá ou utilizará a Tecnologia de qualquer modo ou para qualquer fim que não conforme ao expressamente permitido neste instrumento; (vii) modificará, adaptará, traduzirá, preparará trabalhos derivativos de, descompilará, aplicará engenharia reversa, desarmará a Tecnologia ou de outra forma tentará derivar o código fonte da Tecnologia, nem tentará criar um serviço ou produto substituto ou semelhante por meio da utilização ou do acesso à Tecnologia ou a informações exclusivas a eles relacionadas ou de outra forma utilizar a Tecnologia em nome ou em benefício de terceiros; (viii) tentará interferir ou interromper a Tecnologia nem tentará obter acesso a nenhum sistema ou rede que se conecte a ele, exceto por meio da Tecnologia implementada de acordo com este Contrato; (ix) copiará, ocultará, distribuirá, exibirá, alterará ou de outra forma utilizará nenhuma Recomendação ou Conteúdo Promovido transmitidos por meio da Tecnologia (nem autorizará ou auxiliará nenhum terceiro a fazê-lo), exceto se tais Recomendações forem fornecidas por meio da Tecnologia; ou (x) usará a Tecnologia para qualquer outro fim que não o autorizado pela Outbrain, incluindo para qualquer fim que não seja consistente com os guias de Implementação fornecidos ao Parceiro.
6.2 O Parceiro não instalará a Tecnologia ou quaisquer propriedades que exibam conteúdo exclusivo para adultos, obsceno, pornográfico, difamatório, calunioso, transgressor, abusivo, ou ilegal, que promova o ódio ou a descriminação, facilite a venda de armas de fogo ou drogas ilegais, ou que participe ou incentive à participação em atividades ilegais ou que seja direcionado a menores de 16 anos. A Outbrain se reserva o direito de desativar a Tecnologia a seu exclusivo critério em qualquer site a qualquer momento.
7. REGISTRO.
O Parceiro pode registrar-se no painel de controle da Outbrain (o “Painel de Controle”) para acesso a relatórios online e controlar certas configurações da Tecnologia. Na medida em que o Parceiro tenha acesso ao Painel de Controle, a Outbrain poderá coletar informações de identificação pessoal do Parceiro (ou de indivíduos que atuem em nome do Parceiro) associadas com tal acesso ao Painel de Controle. O Parceiro terá a responsabilidade exclusiva por todas as alterações de dados feitas por ele, ou por indivíduos atuando em nome do Parceiro, através do Painel de Controle. As estimativas de receita pagas ou pagáveis apresentadas no Painel de Controle são fornecidas apenas para a conveniência do Parceiro. A Outbrain não garante que esses valores estimados exibidos, se existirem, devem ser precisos ou definitivamente devidos ao Parceiro nos termos do Contrato. O acesso ao Painel de Controle do Outbrain fica ainda exclusivamente a critério da Outbrain e pode ser interrompido pela Outbrain a qualquer momento.
8. SUSPENSÃO DA TECNOLOGIA; RESCISÃO.
8.1 A Outbrain poderá suspender ou interromper todo ou qualquer aspecto da Tecnologia, incluindo a sua disponibilidade, a qualquer momento, se for exigido por circunstâncias imperativas (tais como uma violação significativa de segurança, propagação de malware, outros vírus para usuários, etc.) ou quaisquer outras circunstâncias impróprias, ilegais fraudulentas ou enganosas.
8.2 Qualquer uma das partes pode rescindir o Contrato a qualquer momento em caso de violação material pela outra parte de qualquer disposição do Contrato, que permaneça sem remediação por quatorze (14) dias após o recebimento pela parte violadora de aviso, por escrito, notificando o descumprimento.
8.3 O Contrato pode ser rescindido com aviso prévio por escrito com quatorze (14) dias de antecedência, salvo indicação em contrário no Acordo de Distribuição. Além disso, a Outbrain pode rescindir unilateralmente o Contrato se a tecnologia não for implementada em 30 (trinta) dias do fornecimento pela Outbrain da Tecnologia para o Parceiro. Após o vencimento ou encerramento do Contrato, todos os direitos e obrigações das partes nos termos do Contrato serão extintos, exceto as cláusulas 9.6, 9.7, 10, 11, 12 & 13 dos Termos que sobreviverão a rescisão e continuarão a vincular as partes, bem como quaisquer outros termos deste Contrato que, por sua natureza, devem sobreviver à rescisão e continuar a vincular as partes.
9. GARANTIAS E INDENIZAÇÃO.
9.1 Cada parte declara e garante à outra que: (i) possui todos os direitos, poderes e autoridades necessários para celebrar este Contrato e cumprir suas obrigações, nos termos deste instrumento; e (ii) obriga-se a cumprir todas as leis, regulamentos, e quaisquer exigências aplicáveis no cumprimento deste Contrato.
9.2 O Outbrain garante que a Tecnologia (conforme fornecida e disponibilizada pela Outbrain e implementada pelo Parceiro de acordo com o Contrato) não infringe e não irá infringir, de acordo com o melhor conhecimento de Outbrain, qualquer Direito de Propriedade Intelectual de qualquer terceiro.
9.3 O Parceiro declara e garante que o(s) Site(s) do Parceiro: (i) é proprietário ou tem o direito de operar o(s) Site(s) do Parceiro; (ii) respeitará as Diretrizes de Parceiros da Outbrain e/ou as diretrizes do Parceiro, que deverão ser substancialmente semelhantes às da Outbrain; (iii) não conterá(rão) nenhum conteúdo que seja ilegal ou que infrinja qualquer Direito de Propriedade Intelectual de qualquer terceiro; (iv) não conterá qualquer material obsceno, difamatório, calunioso, injurioso ou que viole o direito de qualquer pessoa à publicidade, privacidade ou individualidade; e (v) não contêm e não conterá conscientemente uma falsa declaração de fato ou imprecisão factual.
9.4 Nada no Contrato deve ser interpretado como uma promessa de qualquer tipo de volume de tráfego mínimo, cliques, impressões ou uso ou quaisquer outros compromissos desse tipo da Outbrain ao Parceiro.
9.5 Exceto quando estabelecido expressamente neste instrumento, nenhuma das partes faz nenhuma declaração ou garantia expressa ou implícita com relação a este contrato, ao(s) Site(s) do Parceiro, a Tecnologia, qualquer conteúdo disponibilizado pela Outbrain através da Tecnologia ou quaisquer outros assuntos (incluindo qualquer termo implícito relacionado à satisfação de qualidade ou adequação a determinada finalidade, quaisquer garantias de disponibilidade ou desempenho ininterrupto ou livre de erros, quaisquer garantias que surjam no decurso de qualquer desempenho, negociação ou utilização comercial).
9.6 A Outbrain não faz nenhuma declaração ou fornece garantias no que diz respeito a qualquer Conteúdo que consta ou é acessado por meio da Tecnologia, incluindo, entre outros, Recomendações do Parceiro, e a Outbrain não será ainda responsável ou responsabilizada pelos conteúdos, precisão, respeito a direitos de propriedade intelectual, legalidade ou decoro do Conteúdo acessados por meio da Tecnologia ou pela confiança do Parceiro em um dos itens ora mencionados.
9.7 Cada parte (a “Parte Indenizadora”) deverá indenizar, defender e isentar a outra parte, suas controladoras, afiliadas e cada uma de suas respectivas afiliadas, conselheiros, diretores, acionistas, membros, representantes autorizados, empregados e prepostos (conjuntamente, a “Parte Indenizadora”) de e contra todas e quaisquer reivindicações, perdas, responsabilidades, danos, custos, acordos e outras despesas (incluindo honorários advocatícios razoáveis) (conjuntamente, “Reivindicações”) que surjam de qualquer reivindicação por terceiros ocasionada por qualquer violação de qualquer das declarações, garantias ou obrigações da Parte Indenizadora estabelecidas neste Contrato. A Parte Indenizada deverá notificar por escrito imediatamente a Parte Indenizadora sobre qualquer Reivindicação, estabelecido, contudo, que qualquer atraso na entrega dessa notificação não isentará a Parte Indenizadora de nenhuma de suas obrigações, salvo na medida em que a Parte Indenizadora for de fato prejudicada por esse atraso. A Parte Indenizada terá direito de participar da defesa e acordo da Reivindicação com o advogado de sua própria escolha e às suas próprias despesas, sujeita ao controle da Parte Indenizadora a esse respeito.
10. CONFIDENCIALIDADE.
Cada parte (a “Parte Receptora”) reconhece que terá acesso a certas informações e materiais, incluindo os termos do Contrato, relativos ao negócio, tecnologia, produtos e serviços da outra parte (a “Parte Divulgadora”) que são, ou razoavelmente devam ser consideradas, tendo em conta as circunstâncias da divulgação, confidenciais (“Informações Confidenciais”). As Informações Confidenciais não incluirão: (a) informações conhecidas da Parte Receptora antes da divulgação pela Parte Divulgadora; (b) informações obtidas de forma independente pela Parte Receptora sem referência a Informações Confidenciais da Parte Divulgadora; (c) informações que são ou tornam-se publicamente conhecidas sem culpa da Parte Receptora; ou (d) informações divulgadas à Parte Receptora por um terceiro sem violação de qualquer obrigação de confiança. Exceto conforme permitido a seguir, a Parte Receptora (i) não usará Informações Confidenciais para seu próprio benefício ou benefício de terceiros, e (ii) não divulgará nenhuma Informação Confidencial a terceiros que não sejam seus diretores, funcionários, contratados, conselheiros, investidores ou potenciais investidores que precisam saber de tal Informação Confidencial e que concordaram em não usar e manter a confidencialidade das Informações Confidenciais consistentes com esta Cláusula 10. A Parte Receptora retornará ou destruirá as Informações Confidenciais prontamente sobre pedido escrito da Parte Divulgadora. Não obstante o acima exposto, a Parte Receptora pode divulgar Informações Confidenciais na medida exigida por lei aplicável ou por decisão judicial, desde que a Parte Receptora forneça aviso prévio de qualquer divulgação necessária à Parte Divulgadora forneça uma cooperação razoável (às custas da Parte Divulgadora) com qualquer esforço da Parte Divulgadora para contestar ou limitar o alcance dessa divulgação.
11. LIMITAÇÃO DE RESPONSABILIDADE.
11.1 Nem Outbrain nem o Parceiro excluem ou limitam a responsabilidade do outro por: (i) morte ou ferimento pessoal causado por sua negligência ou a de seus empregados ou contratados; (ii) fraude ou representação fraudulenta; ou (iii) qualquer outra responsabilidade que não possa ser legalmente excluída ou limitada.
11.2 Sujeito sempre à Seção 11.1, nenhuma das partes será responsável por: (a) qualquer perda ou dano especial, indireto, incidental ou consequente; (b) qualquer perda de boa vontade ou reputação; (c) qualquer perda de Dados; (d) qualquer perda de contratos, negócios ou poupanças antecipadas; ou (e) qualquer perda de lucros resultante de ou em ligação com o Acordo ou qualquer violação do mesmo, quer essa parte tenha ou não sido avisada da possibilidade de tal perda ou dano, independentemente da forma como tenha ocorrido e quer ao abrigo de uma teoria de contrato, delito (incluindo negligência) dever estatutário ou outra.
11.3 Sujeito sempre à Seção 11.1 e exceto para responsabilidades resultantes da violação, apropriação indevida ou infração dos Direitos de Propriedade Intelectual de uma parte, em nenhuma circunstância a responsabilidade agregada de qualquer uma das partes resultante de ou relacionada com o Acordo ou qualquer violação (seja ao abrigo de uma teoria de contrato, delito (incluindo negligência), dever estatutário ou de outra forma) excederá mais do que (i) R$200.000,00; e (ii) 125% do montante das Receitas pagas ou a pagar ao Parceiro no período de doze (12) meses imediatamente anterior ao evento que deu origem à responsabilidade (ou, no caso de uma série de eventos relacionados, o primeiro desses eventos).
11.4 Cada parte reconhece que aceita que as restrições à responsabilidade da outra parte, tal como estabelecidas no Acordo, são razoáveis em todas as circunstâncias.
12. CONTROLES DE EXPORTAÇÃO.
O Parceiro fica obrigado a cumprir todas as leis de exportação e restrições e regulamentos do Departamento de Comércio, do Departamento de Tesouraria dos Estados Unidos do Escritório de Controle de Ativos Estrangeiros (Department of Commerce, the United States Department of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control – OFAC) ou de outra agência ou autoridade dos Estados Unidos ou estrangeiros, e não deverá exportar, ou permitir a exportação ou reexportação da Tecnologia em violação a tais restrições, leis ou regulamentos. Ao fazer o download ou utilizar a Tecnologia, o Parceiro concorda com o que precede e declara sob as penas da lei que não está localizado, ou sob o controle de nacional ou residente de qualquer país restrito. O Parceiro declara sob as penas da lei que nenhum deles, ou qualquer entidade ou organização que detenha qualquer participação no Parceiro, incluindo qualquer funcionário ou diretor, é um indivíduo, entidade, organização com quem qualquer lei, regulamento ou ordem executiva proíba as empresas e os indivíduos dos Estados Unidos de negociar, inclusive os nomes que aparecem na Lista de Nacionais Especialmente Designados (Specially Designated Nationals List).
13. DISPOSIÇÕES GERAIS.
Este Contrato será interpretado e regido pelas leis da República Federativa do Brasil, sem considerar as disposições de conflito de leis ou as Convenções das Nações Unidas para a Venda Internacional de Mercadorias. As partes elegem o Foro Central da Comarca da Capital do Estado de São Paulo para a resolução de quaisquer controvérsias decorrentes deste Contrato, excluindo quaisquer outros. As partes concordam que dano irreparável poderia ocorrer em caso de descumprimento ou violação de qualquer das disposições do Contrato. Por conseguinte, as partes concordam que cada um terá direito a uma medida cautelar para evitar violações do Contrato e para fazer cumprir especificamente os termos e disposições do Contrato, além de qualquer outro remédio para o qual tenham direito. As partes são contratadas independentes, e nenhuma disposição neste Contrato será interpretada de forma a criar uma parceria, joint venture, agenciamento ou outra relação entre as partes. A omissão de uma das Partes em fazer valer, a qualquer tempo, quaisquer disposições deste instrumento, ou de pleitear quaisquer direitos ou exercer qualquer opção prevista, não deverá ser considerada como uma renúncia a tais disposições, direitos ou opções, nem afetará de nenhuma maneira a validade deste Contrato ou de qualquer disposição do mesmo. Nenhuma das partes será responsável por qualquer falha em realizar devido a causas além do controle razoável da mesma parte. Este Contrato constitui o acordo integral entre as partes com relação a seu objeto e cancela e substitui todos os acordos ou entendimentos anteriores ou contemporâneos, escritos ou verbais com relação a esse objeto. O Contrato de Distribuição para Parceiro pode ser alterado, modificado ou substituído, apenas por um instrumento escrito assinado por ambas as partes. Os títulos neste instrumento e no Contrato são apenas para fins de conveniência de referência e não têm nenhum efeito legal. Qualquer referência a dias no Acordo será considerada como dias úteis, salvo indicação em contrário. Este Contrato poderá ser celebrado em vias, cada uma das quais será considerada um original, porém todas juntas constituirão um único e mesmo instrumento. Todas as disposições do Contrato que, por sua natureza, deveriam sobreviver à rescisão, sobreviverão à rescisão, incluindo, sem limitação, provisões de propriedade, indenizações de garantia e limitações de responsabilidade. Caso qualquer disposição deste Contrato seja considerada inexequível por qualquer motivo, essa disposição será reformada apenas na medida em que necessário para torná-la exequível, caso contrário, ela será separada do Contrato e o saldo do Contrato continuará em vigor e a produzir efeitos. Nenhuma das partes pode ceder o Contrato ou qualquer dos seus direitos ou obrigações de acordo sem o consentimento prévio e por escrito da outra parte, exceto (i) devido à operação de lei, fusão, reorganização ou como resultado de uma aquisição ou mudança de controle, ou (ii) pela Outbrain às suas subsidiárias. Sujeito ao acima exposto, o Contrato será vinculativo e operante para o benefício das partes e seus sucessores e cessionários que sejam permitidos.
Effective December 3rd 2023
Download
Table of Contents
aktualisiert: November 2021
https://www.outbrain.com/de/
wird angeboten von
Outbrain UK Limited
121 Kingsway, First Floor
London WC2B6PA
United Kingdom
Register-Nummer:
7479183 (London)
Ust-IdNr. (VAT): GB115005961
Vertretungsberechtigter (Geschäftsführer)
/ Authorized Representative (Managing Director):
Liesbeth Mack-de Boer
Anschrift des Vertretungsberechtigten:
Outbrain UK Limited
121 Kingsway, First Floor
London WC2B6PA
United Kingdom
Kontakt:
infode@outbrain.com
Telefon: +49 221 650 89 783
© Outbrain UK Limited 2023
ALLGEMEINE NUTZUNGSBEDINGUNGEN
1. EINLEITUNG.
Die folgenden Nutzungsbedingungen (diese „Nutzungsbedingungen“) regeln Ihre (im Folgenden Sie, Ihr, Benutzer) Benutzung der Produkte, Dienste und Leistungen, die über die Website mit der URL www.outbrain.com (die „Website“) zur Verfügung gestellt werden. Diese Website wurde und wird von Outbrain Inc. („Outbrain“) erstellt, kontrolliert und betrieben. Wie weiter unten näher beschrieben, enthält die Website Outbrains firmeneigene und geschützte Empfehlungstechnologie in ihren diversen Ausformungen (insgesamt der „Service“). Der Service kann auf der Website oder auf Ihrer Website bzw. denen Ihrer Partner mittels eines Programmcodes genutzt werden, den wir Ihnen in seiner jeweils aktuellen Form zur Verfügung stellen (ein solcher Benutzer wird im Folgenden als „Partner“ bezeichnet) und den Sie gemäß vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen verwenden dürfen. Indem Sie auf diese Website gehen oder einen beliebigen Teil des Services nutzen, erklären Sie Ihr Einverständnis damit, dass diese Nutzungsbedingungen für Sie verbindlich sind. Wenn Sie mit diesen Nutzungsbedingungen nicht einverstanden sind, dann dürfen Sie nicht auf die Website zugreifen oder den Service nutzen. Ihr Recht zur Benutzung der Website und des Services ist ausdrücklich an Ihre Zustimmung zu allen Regelungen aus vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen gebunden und schließt jegliche sonstigen Regelungen aus. Dieser Service steht nur Personen im Alter von mindestens 18 Jahren zur Verfügung, egal ob sie im eigenen Namen oder als bevollmächtigte Angestellte oder Vertreter eines Unternehmens oder einer anders gearteten geschäftlichen Einheit handeln. Wenn Sie diese Voraussetzung nicht erfüllen, dann versuchen Sie bitte nicht, sich für die Nutzung des Services zu registrieren.
2. ÄNDERUNGEN DER NUTZUNGSBEDINGUNGEN.
Outbrain behält sich das Recht vor, diese Nutzungsbedingungen jederzeit nach alleinigem Ermessen zu verändern oder durch andere zu ersetzen. Sie sollten diese Nutzungsbedingungen von Zeit zu Zeit wieder aufrufen und durchsehen, denn Sie sind alleinverantwortlich für die Kenntnisnahme und Berücksichtigung eventueller Änderungen. Die Nutzung des Services durch Sie bringt gemäß vorliegender Mitteilung Ihr Einverständnis mit den jeweils modifizierten Nutzungsbedingungen zum Ausdruck. Dies gilt auch dann, wenn Sie sich bereits zuvor für die Nutzung des Services für Ihre Website registriert hatten und diese Website fortgesetzt nicht erneut besuchen.
3. BESCHREIBUNG DES SERVICES.
Der Service liefert Ihnen Empfehlungen („Empfehlungen“) für neue Artikel, Grafiken, Fotografien, Bilder, Illustrationen und Software sowie Audio- und Videoclips („Content“). Manche Empfehlungen können Content betreffen, für den wir gegen Bezahlung seitens unserer Kunden werben („Promoteter Content“). Diese Empfehlungen generieren Einnahmen („Werbeeinnahmen“) für die Websites solcher Kunden, die Outbrain nach alleinigem Ermessen dafür auswählt. Wenn Sie den Service nutzen, ohne sich auf der Website zu registrieren, wird diese Empfehlungs-Funktion automatisch als Teil des Services zur Verfügung gestellt. Wenn Sie sich auf der Website registrieren, können Sie die Einstellungen für die Empfehlungs-Funktion festlegen, so wie auf Outbrains Dashboard und weiter unten in Abschnitt 6 beschrieben.
4. LIZENZ FÜR DEN SERVICE VON OUTBRAIN.
A. LIZENZGEWÄHRUNG.
Unter der Voraussetzung Ihrer uneingeschränkten Zustimmung zu allen Klauseln und Bedingungen aus diesen Nutzungsbedingungen gewährt Ihnen Outbrain eine begrenzte, nicht-exklusive, widerrufbare, nicht unterlizenzierbare und nicht übertragbare Lizenz zur Nutzung (i) des Services; (ii) sämtlicher Programmierschnittstellen der Anwendung oder anderer Programmcodes, die wir jeweils zum gegebenen Zeitpunkt seitens Outbrains zur Verfügung stellen (zusammengefasst das „Programm“); (iii) jeglicher Dokumentation Outbrains für Endanwender, wenn diese mit dem Service einhergeht; (iv) sämtlicher Upgrades, Aktualisierungen und neuer Versionen des Services, so wie weiter unten ausgeführt. Eine solche Lizenz umfasst das Recht zur Nutzung sämtlicher Schutz- und Urheberrechte Outbrains, die mit der Verwendung des Programms in Verbindung stehen oder mit anderen Aspekten einhergehen, die mit dem Service zusammenhängen. Ebenso umfasst sie die Benutzung der Schutz- und Urheberrechte für die Dokumentation Outbrains für Endanwender, doch ausschließlich in Verbindung mit der in den
FAQ
erläuterten Nutzung des Services.
B. BERECHTIGUNG ZUR VERGABE VON UNTERLIZENZEN.
In Anknüpfung an obenstehenden Abschnitt 4.A. sind Sie dazu berechtigt, (i) Berater und Auftragnehmer unter Vertrag zu nehmen, die dem alleinigen Zweck dienen, für die Benutzung des Services und des Programms durch Sie die notwendige Entwicklungsarbeit, Herstellung von Komponenten und Durchführung von Testaufgaben für Sie zu leisten sowie den Support der Anwendung für Sie zu übernehmen; (ii) Ihren Endanwendern gemäß den Regelungen aus untenstehendem Abschnitt 4.H. Unterlizenzen zu gewähren. Ausgenommen wie in Abschnitt 4.B. vorgesehen, sind Sie nicht dazu berechtigt, irgendwelche der Ihnen von diesen Nutzungsbedingungen zugestandenen Rechte an Berater, Auftragnehmer oder sonstige Dritte unterzulizenzieren.
C. LIZENZBESCHRÄNKUNGEN.
Sie dürfen das Programm nicht in Verbindung mit oder zum Bewerben von Produkten, Leistungen, Diensten oder Material verwenden die in einen der folgenden Bereiche fallen, dafür werben oder vorwiegend dafür verwendet werden, um in diesen Bereichen tätig zu sein: Spyware, Adware oder sonstige Schadprogramme, gefälschte Waren und Produkte, einem U.S.-Embargo unterliegende Produkte, unaufgeforderte und massive Verbreitung von E-Mails („Spam“), Multi-Level-Marketingangebote, hetzerisches Material, Material für das Hacking oder die Überwachung von Systemen, das Abfangen von Daten oder das Entschlüsseln von Codes, beleidigende, diffamierende, obszöne, pornografische, mit sexuellem Missbrauch in Verbindung stehende oder sonst wie anstößige Inhalte, Prostitution, Körperteile, Organe oder Körperflüssigkeiten, gestohlene Produkte und Gegenstände, die für Diebstahl und Raub verwendet werden, Feuerwerkskörper, Sprengstoff, Gefahrenstoffe, Ausweispapiere, Gegenstände für den polizeilichen Gebrauch, Glücksspiel, im Rahmen staatlicher Lizenzierungen regulierte Bereiche, Waffen und Waffenzubehör. Sie müssen den Service fristgerecht gemäß allen vertretbaren Anweisungen zur Anwendung bringen, die Outbrain Ihnen zum gegebenen Zeitpunkt vorgibt.
D. PLATZIERUNG, OPTIK UND HAPTIK DES SERVICE.
Sie werden den Service direkt unterhalb der Hauptinhalte auf allen Seiten Ihrer Website platzieren, auf denen der Service installiert ist. Kein anderer Service zur Content-Empfehlung darf parallel zu oder über Outbrains Service auf den Seiten Ihrer Website erscheinen, auf denen der Service installiert ist. Zudem müssen Sie den Service so zur Anwendung bringen, dass sein Aussehen und der erweckte Eindruck nicht zu Verwechslungen mit ähnlichen Content-Empfehlungsdiensten anderer Anbieter auf Ihrer Website führen kann.
E. WEITERE EINSCHRÄNKUNGEN.
Sofern in diesen Nutzungsbedingungen nicht ausdrücklich und eindeutig gestattet, sind Sie zu Folgendem nicht befugt: (i) Kopieren, Vermieten, Leasen, Verkaufen, Übertragen, Übereignen, Unterlizenzieren, Zerlegen, Rückentwickeln oder Dekompilieren (ausgenommen in dem begrenzten Maße, das vom anwendbaren Gesetzesrecht ausdrücklich zugelassen wird), Modifizieren oder Manipulieren von Teilen von (a) gemeinschaftlich erhobenen Daten und den zugehörigen Berichten (zusammengefasst „Daten“), die Outbrain Ihnen in verschiedenen Formaten zur Verfügung stellen kann, oder des (b) Programms; (ii) zur Benutzung des Programms oder des Services im Auftrag Dritter. Ausgenommen wie weiter unten in Abschnitt 4.G. dargelegt, geben Ihnen diese Nutzungsbedingungen keinerlei Anrecht auf die Benutzung von Markenzeichen, Dienstleistungsmarken, Handelsnamen oder andere markenrechtlich geschützte Elemente Outbrains oder anderer Lizenzgeber. Außer den ausdrücklich hier festgelegten Rechten und Lizenzen werden keine sonstigen Rechte und Lizenzen gewährt. Wenn Sie gegen eine der vorgenannten Einschränkungen verstoßen, ist Outbrain der Eigentümer aller Rechte, Ansprüche und Anteile, die mit jeglichen/m abgeleiteten Werken, Erfindungen und Entwicklungen, Werken mit Autorenrechten, Designs, Know-how, Ideen und Informationen in Verbindung stehen, die ganz oder teilweise mit der Nutzung des Services oder des Programms entstanden sind bzw. erworben, in die Praxis umgesetzt oder entwickelt wurden. Sie erklären sich hiermit dazu bereit, alle notwendigen Anweisungen zu geben, um die Erfüllung der vorgenannten, eigentumsrechtlichen Bedingungen zu gewährleisten.
F. NEUE VERSIONEN UND UPGRADES.
Outbrain kann Aktualisierungen, Upgrades und neue Versionen des Services oder des Programms herausbringen. Gleiches gilt für mit dem Service in Verbindung stehende Software. Die Einführung erfolgt jeweils gemäß den Anleitungen in den
FAQ
. Sie stimmen zu, dass jeglicher Zugriff auf oder Zugang zu Software, der Ihnen im Rahmen dieser Nutzungsbedingungen gewährt wird, nicht Outbrains Recht einschränkt, solcherlei Software in künftigen Versionen des Services zu verändern oder zu ersetzen. Die Ihnen hier gewährte Lizenz beinhaltet solcherlei Elemente.
G. MARKENRECHTLICHE LIZENZ.
Outbrain gewährt Ihnen hiermit eine persönliche, begrenzte, nicht-exklusive, nicht übertragbare und kostenpflichtige Lizenz zur Benutzung der Marken Outbrains (wie weiter unten in Abschnitt 18 definiert). Sie können Outbrains Marken in Verbindung mit Ihrer Nutzung des Programms, der Daten oder des Services auf jeder Ihrer Websites oder den Websites Ihrer Partner nutzen, über die Teile des Services abgewickelt werden. Sie können jederzeit und ohne Outbrains zusätzliche Genehmigung Blog-Beiträge in Ihrem Blog oder denen Ihrer Partner veröffentlichen, bei denen Outbrains Marken verwendet werden. Dies jedoch unter der Voraussetzung, dass Sie vernünftig vertretbare Anstrengungen unternehmen, Outbrain die Blog-Beiträge vor ihrer Veröffentlichung oder zeitgleich mit ihr zuzusenden. Nichts in vorliegender Vereinbarung gewährt Ihnen Eigentumsrechte oder sonstige Rechte bezüglich des Gebrauchs der Marken Outbrains, die nicht ausdrücklich aus vorliegender Lizenzgewährung hervorgehen. Unter keinerlei Umständen dürfen Sie die Marken Outbrains in Verruf bringen oder auf andere Art missbrauchen. Ebenso dürfen Sie unter keinen Umständen gegen die Verhaltensregeln für Benutzer verstoßen, die weiter unten in Abschnitt 5 dargelegt werden. Die Ihnen im Rahmen vorliegender Lizenzgewährung gewährten Rechte erlöschen mit vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen. Sollten diese gekündigt oder außer Kraft gesetzt werden, stellen Sie die Nutzung der Marken Outbrains ein.
H. KEINE SONSTIGEN LIZENZEN.
Alle im Rahmen dieser Vereinbarung gewährten Lizenzen sind ausdrücklich hier erwähnt. Es werden keine sonstigen Lizenzen oder Rechte eingeräumt, weder stillschweigend noch durch Rechtsverwirkung.
I. ENDBENUTZER-LIZENZEN.
Sie erklären sich damit einverstanden, dass jede Ihrer Websites und/oder jedes Ihrer Softwareprodukte, für die oder mit denen die in vorliegender Vereinbarung gewährten Rechte genutzt werden, allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen enthalten muss, die Folgendes sicherstellen: (i) Der Service, die Daten und das Programm müssen mindestens gleichwertig geschützt sein, wie Ihre firmeneigenen Softwareanwendungen, und (ii) solcherlei firmeneigene Softwareanwendungen Outbrains sind durch die Nutzungsbedingungen Ihrer Website ebenfalls geschützt. Darüber hinaus muss die Datenschutzrichtlinie der betreffenden Website und/oder der betreffenden Softwareprodukte erklären, dass die Daten zu einer dritten Partei geroutet werden, die der Eigentümer der betreffenden Daten ist, dass dieses Routing jedoch keinerlei die Person identifizierende Informationen enthält. Sie erklären sich damit einverstanden, dass Sie in solcherlei allgemeine Geschäftsbedingungen für die Nutzung des Services außerhalb der Vereinigten Staaten jegliche erforderlichen, landesspezifischen Regelungen aufnehmen werden, die notwendig sind, um die vorgenannten Regelungen wirksam zu machen. Sie erklären sich weiterhin damit einverstanden, dass Sie die allgemeinen Geschäftsbedingungen für die unter dieser Lizenz gewährte Nutzung des Services, der Daten und des Programms auch durchsetzen werden.
5. VERHALTENSREGELN FÜR BENUTZER.
Als Bedingung für die Benutzung verpflichten Sie sich dazu, den Service oder die Daten zu keinerlei ungesetzlichen, zu von diesen Nutzungsbedingungen ausgeschlossenen oder solchen Zwecken zu verwenden, die von Outbrain nach vernünftigem Ermessen nicht beabsichtigt sind. Hier ohne Anspruch auf Vollständigkeit einige Beispiele für Nutzungen, von denen Sie gemäß dieser Vereinbarung Abstand nehmen:
Missbrauch, Belästigung, Bedrohung, Vortäuschung einer fremden Indetität oder Einschüchterung anderer Benutzer von Outbrain oder von Content-Anbietern;
auf in irgendeiner Form verletzende, beleidigende, diffamierende, obszöne, pornografische, missbräuchliche, anstößige oder auf andere Art die Gesetze oder die Rechte Dritter verletzende Art und Weise;
für illegale oder unerlaubte Zwecke. Sie versichern, dass Sie alle vor Ort geltenden Gesetze hinsichtlich des Verhaltens im Internet und zulässiger Inhalte beachten werden;
zum Posten oder zur Weitergabe von Mitteilungen oder Aufforderungen, die dazu bestimmt oder entwickelt sind, Passwörter bzw. Kontoinformation oder private Angaben von Outbrain-Benutzern zu beschaffen. Ebenso sind Handlungen zu unterlassen, die das Posten oder die Weitergabe solcher Mitteilungen veranlassen;
das Erstellen oder Versenden von Spam an andere Outbrain-Benutzer oder URLs;
gesetzliche Vorschriften in Ihrer Gerichtsbarkeit zu verletzen (darunter zum Beispiel auch Gesetze zum Urheberrechtsschutz);
das Einsenden von Texten oder Kommentaren, die zu Partnerprogrammen verlinken, zu Angeboten im Bereich Multi-Level-Marketing, Websites/Blogs zur Wiederverwertung von Content und Geschichten (sogenannte Source-Hops) oder zu nicht zum Thema gehörenden Inhalten;
der Zugang zur Website unter Verwendung von Robotersystemen, Webcrawlern, Scrapern oder anderen automatisierten Funktionen, ausgenommen dies wurde ausdrücklich und schriftlich genehmigt;
solche Tätigkeiten ausführen, die nach unserem alleinigen Dafürhalten eine unangemessene und überdimensional große Belastung für die Infrastruktur des Services bedeuten oder bedeuten könnten;
das einwandfreie Funktionieren der Website oder anderer Funktionen und über die Website abgewickelter Aktivitäten beeinträchtigen oder zu beeinträchtigen versuchen;
das Umgehen jeglicher Art von Maßnahmen, mit deren Hilfe wir den Zugang zur Website verhindern oder einschränken;
Handlungen mit der Absicht, die Empfehlungen oder sonstige Dienste Outbrains künstlich zu verändern oder zu manipulieren. Dazu zählt etwa auch das Einrichten mehrerer Benutzerkonten, um die Dienste Outbrains künstlich zu verfälschen, das vorsätzliche Aufblähen von Klick-Zahlen oder Empfehlungen zu promotetem Content sowie die Beteiligung an jeglicher sonstigen Art von organisierten Bemühungen, die darauf abzielen, die Ergebnisse und Funktionsweise des Services zu verfälschen.
Den folgenden Websites ist die Benutzung des Services streng verboten und Outbrain wird die Benutzung des Services durch solche Sites aktiv unterbinden, von denen das Unternehmen der Ansicht ist, dass sie gegen dieses Verbot verstoßen: Websites, die nur für Erwachsene bestimmte, obszöne, pornografische, beleidigende, verletzende, zum Missbrauch auffordernde oder diffamierende Inhalte zeigen oder daran beteiligt sind. Gleiches gilt für solche Websites, die illegale Aktivitäten fördern oder begünstigen, zu Hass und Diskriminierung aufrufen oder diese fördern sowie dem Verkauf von Feuerwaffen oder illegalen Drogen dienen oder diesen Verkauf fördern. Zusätzlich behält sich Outbrain das Recht vor, den Service auf jeglicher Site im alleinigen Ermessen zu deaktivieren.
Outbrain kann jederzeit nach alleinigem Ermessen und aus beliebigen Gründen Content von der Website entfernen (darunter unter anderem etwa auf Beschwerden hin oder bei Einwänden Dritter oder von Behörden hinsichtlich solcher Inhalte). Wenn Sie Verstöße gegen diese Nutzungsbedingungen melden möchten, wenden Sie sich bitte per E-Mail an
abuse@outbrain.com
.
6. REGISTRIERUNG.
Zur Nutzung des Services ist es nicht notwendig, dass Sie sich auf der Website registrieren. Diese Nutzungsbedingungen sind für Sie jedoch auch dann verbindlich, wenn Sie sich nicht registrieren und den Service in Anspruch nehmen und nutzen. Wenn Sie sich auf der Website registrieren, haben Sie Zugang zu Online-Berichten und zum Outbrain-Dashboard, welches Ihnen die Kontrolle über eine Reihe von Einstellungen des Services ermöglicht. Um sich zu registrieren, müssen Sie bestimmte Angaben machen. Wenn Sie Blogger sind, müssen Sie zudem eine gültige Blog-URL angeben. Wenn Sie Partner sind, müssen Sie zusätzliche Kontaktangaben machen, darunter unter anderem auch Namen, Anschrift und eine gültige E-Mail-Adresse und weitere Kontaktangaben. Bevor Sie Ihre Registrierung abschließen, senden wir Ihnen an Ihre E-Mail-Adresse einen Link, den Sie anklicken müssen, um Ihr Outbrain-Konto zu aktivieren.
7. PROMOTETER CONTENT.
Durch Ihre Registrierung auf der Website haben Sie die Möglichkeit, das Outbrain-Dashboard zu benutzen und darüber neben weiteren Einstellungen diejenigen für die Empfehlungs-Funktion festzulegen. Wenn Sie die Option wählen, promoteten Content zuzulassen, können Sie zudem eine gemeinnützige Einrichtung oder Organisation wählen (aus einer Liste im Outbrain-Dashboard), der ein Teil Ihrer Einnahmen aus Werbung auf Ihrer Website und durch die Nutzung des Services zukommen soll. Outbrain zahlt nur dann einen Anteil an Werbeeinnahmen an Partner, wenn eine schriftliche, von vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen getrennte Einverständniserklärung Outbrains vorliegt.
8. EIGENTUMSRECHTE.
Sämtliche Rechte an, Ansprüche auf und Beteiligungen an der Website, dem Service, Zusammenstellungen, digitalen Speicherungen bzw. Umwandlungen, Software und sonstigem mit dem Service in Verbindung stehendem Material sind und bleiben stets exklusives Eigentum Outbrains und stehen unter dem Schutz der anwendbaren Gesetze und Abkommen zum geistigen Eigentum und Urheberrecht. Sämtliche im Zusammenhang mit der Website stehenden oder durch den Service über jede beliebige Website erhobenen Daten sind stets alleiniges Eigentum Outbrains. Sie nehmen zur Kenntnis, dass Sie keinerlei Eigentumsrechte am Service oder den über den Service gewonnenen und vermittelten Daten erwerben.
Outbrain behält sich sämtliche Rechte vor, die Ihnen im Rahmen vorliegender Nutzungsbedingungen nicht ausdrücklich gewährt werden.
9. EINGESANDTER UND ÜBER DEN SERVICE VERFÜGBAR GEMACHTER CONTENT.
Eingeschränkte Lizenz zur Nutzung von Content. Wenn Sie Partner sind und Content einsenden, gewähren Sie Outbrain hiermit ein beschränktes, nicht-exklusives, in voller Höhe beglichenes, lizenzfreies und weltweites Recht zur Nutzung besagten Contents sowie Ihrer registrierten und nicht registrierten Markenzeichen, Dienstleistungsmarken, Handelsaufmachungen, Grafiken oder Logos („Partner-Marken“) für alle folgenden Bereiche: (i) auf der Website sowie in sämtlichen Blogs und Newslettern Outbrains; (ii) im Rahmen jeder Geschäftsentwicklung, in Verkaufsmaterialien oder Pressemitteilungen; (iii) als beliebiger Bestandteil des Services; (iv) in jeder sonstigen, vernünftig vertretbaren Art und Weise, von der ein Partner ausgehen kann, dass Outbrain die Partner-Marken entsprechend verwendet.
10. GEWÄHRLEISTUNGSAUSSCHLUSS.
Sie bestätigen, dass Outbrain über Folgendes keinerlei Kontrolle hat und hinsichtlich folgender Aspekte in keiner Weise tätig werden muss: welche Benutzer auf den Service zugreifen; welche Auswirkungen der Service für Sie, Ihre Website oder Ihre Geräte und Systeme haben kann; die Richtigkeit des Services oder der Daten bzw. wie Sie diese interpretieren, sich auf sie verlassen oder diese verwenden. Dazu gehören zum Beispiel auch ein eventueller Ansehensverlust oder Rückgänge bei den Besucherzahlen Ihrer Website oder irgendwelcher Websites Ihrer Partner; Handlungen und Maßnahmen, die Sie in Folge Ihrer Nutzung des Services tätigen oder ergreifen. Sie bestätigen darüber hinaus und stimmen zu, dass Outbrain weder direkt oder indirekt verantwortlich oder haftbar ist für Schäden oder Verluste, die faktisch oder vorgeblich im Zusammenhang stehen mit der Benutzung von oder der Berücksichtigung von Content, Gütern oder Leistungen, die auf solchen Websites Dritter zugänglich sind, die mit dem Service verlinkt sind oder auf die über den Service oder über mit dem Service in Zusammenhang stehenden Daten hingewiesen wird. Sie stellen Outbrain von jeglicher Haftung hinsichtlich des Services sowie jeglicher Inhalte oder Daten frei, die über den Service oder die Website verfügbar gemacht werden oder zugänglich sind. Die Website kann Informationen oder Content enthalten, die von manchen Personen als beleidigend, anstößig oder unangebracht empfunden werden können, bzw. die Website kann zu Websites weiterleiten, die solcherlei Informationen oder Content enthalten. Outbrain enthält sich jeglicher Stellungnahme zu Daten oder Content, die über den Service oder die Website zugänglich oder in/auf ihnen erhältlich sind, darunter unter anderem auch promoteter Content. Outbrain ist weder verantwortlich noch haftbar für die Inhalte, ihre Richtigkeit, urheberrechtliche Gesetzmäßigkeit, Legalität oder Schicklichkeit des Contents Dritter oder der Dienste und Leistungen, die über den Service oder die Website zugänglich sind. Ebenso ist Outbrain nicht verantwortlich oder haftbar, wenn Sie sich auf solchen Content verlassen. DER SERVICE, DAS PROGRAMM UND DIE DATEN WERDEN IHNEN „IN VORLIEGENDER FORM“ ZUR VERFÜGUNG GESTELLT, OHNE JEGLICHE GEWÄHRLEISTUNG AUSGENOMMEN DERJENIGEN, DASS OUTBRAIN GEWÄHRLEISTET, IM BESITZ ALLER NOTWENDIGEN RECHTE, ANRECHTE UND BETEILIGUNGEN HINSICHTLICH SERVICE, WEBSITE UND PROGRAMM ZU SEIN, UM IHNEN DIE RECHTE UND LIZENZEN ZU GEWÄHREN, DIE GEGENSTAND VORLIEGENDER NUTZUNGSBEDINGUNGEN SIND. WENN IN VORLIEGENDER VEREINBARUNG NICHT ANDERSLAUTEND FESTGELEGT UND IM GESETZLICH ZULÄSSIGEN MASSE ÜBERNEHMEN OUTBRAIN UND SEINE VERTRETER KEINERLEI AUSDRÜCKLICHE, STILLSCHWEIGENDE ODER GESETZLICHE GEWÄHRLEISTUNGEN HINSICHTLICH DES SERVICES, DES PROGRAMMS ODER DER DATEN. DIESER GEWÄHRLEISTUNGSAUSSCHLUSS BETRIFFT UNTER ANDEREM AUCH ALLE IMPLIZITEN GEWÄHRLEISTUNGEN HINSICHTLICH MARKTGÄNGIGKEIT, RICHTIGKEIT, NUTZUNGSERGEBNISSEN, VERLÄSSLICHKEIT, EIGNUNG FÜR BESTIMMTE ZWECKE, BESITZANSPRÜCHEN, BEEINTRÄCHTIGUNGEN DER UNGESTÖRTEN NUTZUNG UND NICHTVERLETZUNG DER RECHTE DRITTER. OUTBRAIN ÜBERNIMMT KEINE GEWÄHRLEISTUNG DAFÜR, DASS IHRE NUTZUNG DES SERVICE, DES CODES ODER DER DATEN STETS UNUNTERBROCHEN UND FEHLERFREI SEIN WIRD. EINIGE STAATEN GESTATTEN DIE EINSCHRÄNKUNG DES ZEITRAUMS FÜR STILLSCHWEIGENDE GARANTIEN NICHT, SO DASS DIE OBENSTEHENDEN EINSCHRÄNKUNGEN EVENTUELL NICHT AUF SIE ZUTREFFEN.
11. HAFTUNGSBESCHRÄNKUNG.
UNABHÄNGIG DAVON, OB ANDERE HIER FESTGELEGTE RECHTSMITTEL IHREN ZWECK VERFEHLEN ODER OB ANDERE UNVORHERGESEHENE FÄLLE EINTRETEN, UND AUSGENOMMEN IM FALL VON KÖRPERVERLETZUNG, SIND OUTBRAIN ODER SEINE VERTRETER IHNEN ODER DRITTEN GEGENÜBER UNTER KEINEN UMSTÄNDEN IM RAHMEN VON SCHADENSERSATZRECHT ODER VERTRAGSANGELEGENHEITEN, WEGEN FAHRLÄSSIGKEIT ODER GEFÄHRDUNGSHAFTUNG ODER UNTER SONSTIGEN RECHTSTHEORETISCHEN BZW. VERGLEICHBAREN KONZEPTEN HAFTBAR FÜR (I) GEWINNEINBUSSEN, DATENVERLUST ODER BESCHÄDIGUNG VON DATEN, COMPUTERAUSFÄLLE ODER FUNKTIONSSTÖRUNGEN VON COMPUTERN, UNTERBRECHUNGEN DER GESCHÄFTSTÄTIGKEIT ODER ANDERE SPEZIFISCHE ODER INDIREKTE NEBEN- ODER FOLGESCHÄDEN JEDWEDER ART, DIE SICH AUS DER NUTZUNG ODER NICHTVERFÜGBARKEIT DER WEBSITE, DES SERVICES ODER DER DATEN ERGEBEN. DAS GILT AUCH DANN, WENN OUTBRAIN ÜBER DIE MÖGLICHKEIT INFORMIERT WURDE, DASS SOLCHE VERLUSTE ODER SCHÄDEN ENTSTEHEN KÖNNEN, UND ES GILT UNABHÄNGIG DAVON, OB SOLCHE VERLUSTE ODER SCHÄDEN VORHERSEHBAR WAREN, ODER (II) FÜR JEGLICHE ART VON DIREKTEN SCHÄDEN IM WERT VON MEHR ALS (ZUSAMMENGEFASST) 1.000 $. FORDERUNGEN IM ZUSAMMENHANG MIT DIESEN NUTZUNGSBEDINGUNGEN MÜSSEN VOR ABLAUF EINES (1) JAHRES NACH DEM MOMENT ERFOLGEN, IN DEM DER ENTSPRECHENDE VORFALL STATTGEFUNDEN HAT. OUTBRAIN ÜBERNIMMT KEINE HAFTUNG FÜR VERTRETER OUTBRAINS EGAL WELCHER ART. MANCHE STAATEN ERLAUBEN KEINEN HAFTUNGSAUSSCHLUSS FÜR NEBENSCHÄDEN ODER FOLGESCHÄDEN. IN DIESEM FALL KOMMEN DIE ENTSPRECHENDEN DER OBENSTEHENDEN HAFTUNGSAUSSCHLÜSSE NICHT ZUR ANWENDUNG.
SIE HABEN VERSTANDEN UND STIMMEN ZU, DASS IHR EINZIGES RECHT GEGENÜBER UND GEGEN OUTBRAIN DARIN BESTEHT, DIE NUTZUNG DES SERVICES ZU BEENDEN.
12. SCHADLOSHALTUNG.
Sie erklären sich damit einverstanden, Outbrain, seine Dachgesellschaften, Filialen, Partner, Kunden und Verkäufer sowie die jeweiligen Führungskräfte, Geschäftsführer und Angestellten gegen jede Art von Haftung, Schäden, Kosten oder Gebühren (darunter auch Anwaltskosten) schadlos zu halten, die sich folgendermaßen ergeben können: (i) Ansprüche oder Forderungen Dritter, die sich aus Ihrem Zugriff auf und Zugang zur Website ergeben; (ii) durch Ihre Nutzung des Services, des Programms oder der Daten sowie einen durch Sie begangenen Verstoß gegen die Nutzungsbedingungen; (iii) durch einen durch Sie oder Dritte begangenen Verstoß bei der Benutzung Ihres Outbrain-Kontos, einen Verstoß gegen Urheberrechte oder andere Rechte von Personen oder Rechtspersonen. Dies gilt allerdings unter der Voraussetzung, dass Sie nicht versucht haben, einen solchen Verstoß durch die Anwendung von Outbrains Datenschutzrichtlinie zu berichtigen und abzustellen, so wie in Abschnitt 19 weiter unten beschrieben.
13. GELTUNGSDAUER UND BEENDIGUNG.
Die Geltungsdauer der Nutzungsbedingungen und das Ende dieser Geltungsdauer werden in diesem Abschnitt festgelegt. Outbrain kann Benutzerkonten nach alleinigem Ermessen jederzeit, aus jedem beliebigen Grund oder auch ohne Grund und ohne Vorankündigung stornieren oder kündigen, ohne dass Ihnen daraus ein Haftungsanspruch erwächst. Mit der Kündigung Ihres Kontos erlöschen augenblicklich Ihre Nutzungsrechte für den Service. Wenn diese Nutzungsbedingungen aus beliebigem Grund gekündigt oder außer Kraft gesetzt werden, müssen Sie sämtliche Kopien des Services und des Programms sowie alle Daten umgehend von allen Ihren Computern und Festplatten, aus Ihren Netzwerken und von allen sonstigen Speichermedien löschen. Auf Wunsch Outbrains müssen Sie Outbrain bestätigen, dass dies erfolgt ist. Wenn Sie Ihr Konto bei Outbrain kündigen wollen, können Sie einfach die Nutzung des Services einstellen. All diejenigen Regelungen aus vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen, die ob ihres Inhalts über die Kündigung/Beendigung der Vereinbarung hinaus Bestand haben müssen, haben über die Beendigung der Vereinbarung hinaus uneingeschränkt Bestand. Dazu gehören unter anderem sämtliche Eigentumsregelungen, Haftungsausschlüsse, Schadloshaltungsklauseln und Haftungsbeschränkungen.
14. BENUTZUNG DURCH REGIERUNG UND BEHÖRDEN.
Wenn Sie einer Behörde, Abteilung oder Einrichtung der Regierung der Vereinigten Staaten („Regierung“) angehören, ist das Kopieren, Reproduzieren, Veröffentlichen, Modifizieren, Weitergeben oder Übertragen des Services bei zivilen Behörden entsprechend den Federal Acquisition Regulations eingeschränkt, und bei militärischen Einrichtungen und Behörden gemäß dem Defense Federal Acquisition Regulation Supplement. Der Service und die Daten sind jedes für sich „Handelsartikel“, „gewerbliche Computersoftware“ und „Dokumentation zu gewerblicher Computersoftware“. In Übereinstimmung mit diesen Regelungen richtet sich die Verwendung solcher Artikel durch die Regierung ausnahmslos nach diesen Nutzungsbedingungen.
15. EXPORTKONTROLLEN.
Sie müssen sämtliche für den Export maßgeblichen Gesetze und Beschränkungen sowie die Vorschriften des Department of Commerce (Handelsministerium), des United States Department of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control („OFAC“) oder sonstiger Behörden der Vereinigten Staaten bzw. anderer Länder befolgen und einhalten. Sie dürfen den Service nicht unter Verstoß gegen irgendeine/s solcher Handelsbeschränkungen, Gesetze oder Vorschriften exportieren oder seinen Export zulassen. Durch das Herunterladen oder die Nutzung des Services oder von Daten stimmen Sie dem Vorangehenden zu, und darüber hinaus erklären und gewährleisten Sie, dass Sie nicht in einem Land ansässig sind oder unter dessen Kontrolle stehen, das Beschränkungen irgendwelcher Art unterliegt, und dass Sie kein Bürger oder Bewohner eines solchen Landes sind.
16. VERSCHIEDENES.
Diese Nutzungsbedingungen sind den Vertragsgegenstand betreffend die vollständige und ungeteilte Vereinbarung zwischen Ihnen und Outbrain. Sie ersetzen jegliche schriftlichen und mündlichen Vereinbarungen hinsichtlich des Vertragsgegenstands. Im Rahmen dieser Nutzungsvereinbarung wird keinerlei Filiale, Partnerschaft, Joint Venture oder Angestelltenverhältnis begründet und Sie haben keinerlei Vollmachten oder Zuständigkeiten irgendwelcher Art, die Outbrain zu irgendetwas verpflichten könnten. Diese Nutzungsbedingungen und jegliche Streitfälle, die daraus oder hinsichtlich ihrer Auslegung erwachsen können, sind gemäß den Gesetzen des Bundesstaats New York zu entscheiden und zu interpretieren, so wie diese Gesetze bei Verträgen und Vereinbarungen zwischen Anwohnern New Yorks zur Anwendung kommen, die dort ihren Gerichtsstand haben. Kollisionsrechtlich bleiben dabei Konflikte mit anderen Gesetzen und Gerichtsbarkeiten unberücksichtigt und auch die Regelungen aus dem UN-Kaufrecht (United Nations Conventions for the International Sale of Goods) bleiben unberücksichtigt. Ausgenommen Outbrain legt an anderer Stelle Abweichendes fest, sind sämtliche Klagen oder Verfahren, die sich aus oder im Zusammenhang mit dieser Vereinbarung ergeben, bei einem Bundesgericht im Southern District of New York oder einem bundesstaatlichen Gericht in New York County, New York, vorzubringen. Beide Parteien unterstellen sich für Klagen, Verfahren und gerichtliche oder rechtliche Schritte jedweder Art unwiderruflich der Gerichtsbarkeit und dem Gerichtsstand der genannten Gerichte. Bei rechtlichen oder gerichtlichen Auseinandersetzungen im Zusammenhang mit dieser Vereinbarung hat die obsiegende Partei das Recht auf Erstattung der Anwaltshonorare und Kosten. Diese Nutzungsbedingungen können nur schriftlich und durch Outbrain verändert werden. Sollte eine Regelung aus vorliegender Vereinbarung sich aus beliebigem Grund als undurchsetzbar erweisen, so wird diese Regelung nur in dem Maße abgeändert, das notwendig ist, um sie durchsetzbar zu machen. Wenn Outbrain bei einem durch Sie oder Dritte begangenen Verstoß gegen diese Nutzungsbedingungen nicht tätig wird, so impliziert dies keinen Verzicht auf den betreffenden Anspruch und schränkt in keiner Weise Outbrains Rechte ein, die sich aus einem solchen Verstoß oder eventuellen neuen Verstößen ergeben. Diese Nutzungsbedingungen gelten für Sie persönlich und können aus keinerlei Gründen abgetreten oder übertragen werden (unter anderem auch nicht wegen, durch oder bei Abtretung kraft Gesetz, Fusionen, Unternehmenssanierungen, in Folge einer Geschäftsübernahme oder wegen eines Sie betreffenden Führungswechsels), es sei denn, Outbrain habe dies vorab schriftlich genehmigt. Jegliche Handlungen oder Verhaltensweisen, die Voranstehendem zuwiderhandeln, gelten als ungültig und bleiben unwirksam. Outbrain behält sich ausdrücklich das Recht vor, die vorliegenden Nutzungsbedingungen abzutreten und seine sich aus ihnen ergebenden Verpflichtungen zu übertragen.
17. DATENSCHUTZRICHTLINIE OUTBRAIN.
Outbrains geltende Datenschutzrichtlinie ist verfügbar unter
https://www.outbrain.com/privacy/de/
, und Sie gilt kraft vorliegender Erwähnung als in vorliegende Vereinbarung aufgenommen.
18. HANDELSMARKEN.
OUTBRAIN und Outbrains sonstige Marken, Grafiken, Logos, Designs, Seitenköpfe, Buttons-Icons, Scripts und Bezeichnungen von Diensten und Leistungen umfassen registrierte und nicht-registrierte Handelsmarken, Dienstleistungsmarken und Handelsaufmachungen Outbrains in den USA und/oder anderen Ländern („Outbrains Marken“). Sonstige Handelsmarken, Dienstleistungsmarken und Handelsnamen, die im Service verwendet werden, sind Eigentum ihrer jeweiligen Eigentümer. Sie erklären sich damit einverstanden, Outbrains Marken ohne Outbrains vorherige schriftliche Genehmigung nicht wiederzugeben oder in anderer Art und Weise zu verwenden. Ein Partner darf jedoch über seine Benutzung des Services jederzeit bloggen, ohne dafür eine solche Genehmigung zu benötigen, sofern der Partner den Blog-Eintrag Outbrain vorab oder im Moment der Veröffentlichung zukommen lässt.
19. URHEBERRECHTLICHE BESCHWERDEN.
Wir respektieren die Urheberrechte anderer und erwarten dasselbe von denjenigen, die den Service nutzen. Wenn Sie der Meinung sind, dass Ihre urheberrechtlich geschützte Arbeit auf eine Art und Weise kopiert oder wiedergegeben wurde, die eine Urheberrechtsverletzung darstellt, dann informieren Sie darüber bitte Outbrains weiter unten aufgeführten, gemäß Digital Millennium Copyright Act, 17 U.S.C. Section 512(c)(2) benannten Urheberrechts-Beauftragten und machen Sie dabei die folgenden Angaben:
die Unterschrift der Person, die ermächtigt ist, im Namen des Urheberrechtsinhabers zu handeln;
eine Beschreibung der urheberrechtlich geschützten Arbeit, von der Sie behaupten, Ihre Rechte seien verletzt worden;
eine Beschreibung, wo im Service das Ihrer Ansicht nach das Urheberrecht verletzende Material zu finden ist;
Ihre Anschrift, Telefonnummer und E-Mail-Adresse;
eine Erklärung Ihrerseits, dass Sie nach Treu und Glauben der Ansicht sind, dass die beanstandete Verwendung nicht vom Inhaber der Urheberrechte genehmigt wurde, die entsprechende Begründung oder das zugrundeliegende Gesetz;
eine eidesstattliche Erklärung Ihrerseits, dass die oben genannten, Ihre Eingabe begleitenden Angaben korrekt sind und dass Sie der Eigentümer der Urheberrechte oder dazu befugt sind, im Namen des Eigentümers der Urheberrechte zu handeln.
Copyright-Beauftragter:
Outbrain Inc., c/o legal counsel, 222 Broadway 19th Floor, New York, NY 10038, USA;
legal@outbrain.com
FRAGEN UND ANMERKUNGEN
Mit Fragen oder Anmerkungen zum oder Problemen mit dem Service wenden Sie sich bitte an den Website-Administrator unter
admin@outbrain.com
.
Effective April 13th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
Welcome to Outbrain’s Terms of Use (the “Terms”). These Terms govern your (hereafter “ you”, “your” or “user ”) use of this website and the products and services available at this website, www.outbrain.com, and any related website linked to this URL address, including pages related to Outbrain’s Engage and Amplify services (collectively the “ Site”) and/or created, controlled or operated by Outbrain Inc. (hereafter “Outbrain ”, “we” “us ” or “our”). The Site features Outbrain's proprietary recommendation technology in its various forms and other services Outbrain may make available from time to time (collectively, the “Service"). By accessing the Site or using any part of the Service, you agree to be bound by these Terms. If you do not agree to these Terms, then you may not access the Site or use the Service.
1. General Use.
Subject to these Terms, Outbrain hereby grants you a limited, non-exclusive, and non-transferable license to use the Site. You can simply visit and use the Site and you do not need to register with Outbrain to do so. We reserve the right to modify these Terms at any time. By continuing to access or use the Site or Service, you agree to such modifications.
2. Intellectual Property, Digital Millennium Copyright Act (DMCA) and Takedown Notice.
2.1 Intellectual Property Ownership and Use. You acknowledge and agree that all of our trademarks, logos, copyrights, and all other intellectual property rights in all material or content contained within the Site shall remain at all times vested in us. You may not modify, edit, copy, reproduce, create derivative works of, reverse engineer, alter, enhance or in any way exploit any of the Site or its materials in any manner. In cases where we use material or content under authority from a third party, such rights remain vested in the owner of such material or content. All Site content and all materials contained within the Site are owned by Outbrain or used by Outbrain under authorization, and are protected by applicable trademark and copyright laws.
2.2. DMCA. If you believe that your work has been copied and posted on the Site or through Outbrain’s Service in a way that constitutes copyright infringement, please provide us with the following information:
(a) an electronic or physical signature of the person authorized to act on behalf of the owner of the copyright interest;
(b) a description of the copyrighted work that you claim has been infringed;
(c) a description of where the material that you claim is infringing is located on the Site or in our Service;
(d) your address, telephone number, and email address;
(e) a written statement by you that you have a good faith belief that the disputed use is not authorized by the copyright owner, its agent, or the law; and
(f) a statement by you, made under penalty of perjury, that the above information in your notice is accurate and that you are the copyright owner or authorized to act on the copyright owner's behalf.
Please send all of the above information to:
By e-mail:
dmca@outbrain.com
By mail: Outbrain Inc., 111 West 19th Street, New York, NY 10011; ATTN: DMCA
Agent and Legal Department
If you do not send us all of the required information, your notice/request may not be valid.
2.3. If you believe any of your other intellectual property rights, have been violated, please follow the same information and a takedown request sent to:
ipviolations@outbrain.com
.
2.4 Notice and Takedown. Outbrain does not control the content on its network however, we require our partners to comply with our
Advertiser Guidelines
and/or
Publisher Guidelines
(as applicable). Despite various safeguards, Outbrain recognises that from time to time content may be in breach of our guidelines, relevant copyright laws, contain references which may be regarded as defamatory, promote fake news and/or contain fraudulent or misleading information or links. If you have identified content of this nature, please email
ipviolations@outbrain.com
with the following information (i) your contact details (ii) the full details of the material in question (iii) the URL where you found the material and; (iv) the reason for your request e.g. complaint about defamatory content. Upon receipt of your notification, Outbrain will comply with the following Notice and Takedown procedure: (a) Outbrain will endeavour to acknowledge your complaint by email within 48 hours of receipt; (b) following confirmation of receipt, Outbrain will commence an investigation to assess the validity and plausibility of the complaint. Outbrain reserves the right to suspend partner’s use of the Outbrain technology or suspend/remove a particular complaint whilst an investigation is pending; (c) Outbrain may contact the relevant partner who is responsible for the content setting out the subject of the complaint, under what grounds the content is being investigation and request further comments or information from such partner; (d) following the finalization of Outbrain's investigation, Outbrain may either (i) allow the partner to continue to display the content unchanged; (ii) allow the partner to continue to display the content with changes; (iii) permanently remove the content from its network or prevent the use of its technology.
3. Privacy and Cookie Policy; Other Terms.
Your use of the Site or Service is also governed by Outbrain’s
Privacy Policy
. By using the Site or Service, you agree to the terms applicable to “Site Visitor’s set forth in that policy. Your use of Outbrain’s Engage or Amplify services will further be subject to other terms specific to those services. In addition, we may use cookies or other automated means of data collection. Please read the “Site Visitor’s section our Privacy Policy and
Cookie Glossary
for more information.[AT2]
4. Disclaimer of Warranties and Limitation of Liability.
OUTBRAIN EXPRESSLY DISCLAIMS ANY AND ALL LIABILITY IN CONNECTION WITH THE SITE. EXCEPT FOR BODILY INJURY, IN NO EVENT WILL OUTBRAIN OR ITS AGENTS BE LIABLE TO YOU OR TO ANY THIRD PARTY UNDER ANY TORT, CONTRACT, NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY OR OTHER LEGAL OR EQUITABLE THEORY (I) FOR ANY LOST PROFITS, LOST OR CORRUPTED DATA, COMPUTER FAILURE OR MALFUNCTION, INTERRUPTION OF BUSINESS, OR OTHER SPECIAL, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES OF ANY KIND ARISING OUT OF THE USE OR INABILITY TO USE THE SITE, THE SERVICE, AND THE DATA, WHETHER OR NOT SUCH LOSS OR DAMAGES ARE FORESEEABLE; (II) ANY UNAUTHORIZED ACCESS TO OR USE OF THE SITES; OR (III) FOR ANY DIRECT DAMAGES IN EXCESS OF (IN THE AGGREGATE) $1,000. ANY CLAIM ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THESE TERMS MUST BE BROUGHT WITHIN ONE (1) YEAR AFTER THE OCCURRENCE OF THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO SUCH CLAIM. OUTBRAIN DISCLAIMS ALL LIABILITY OF ANY KIND OF OUTBRAIN'S AGENTS. SOME STATES DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION OR LIMITATION OF INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES, SO THE ABOVE LIMITATIONS AND EXCLUSIONS MAY NOT APPLY TO YOU. YOU UNDERSTAND AND AGREE THAT YOUR SOLE RIGHT AND REMEDY AGAINST OUTBRAIN IS TO DISCONTINUE USE OF THE SITE.
5. Indemnity.
You agree to indemnify, defend and hold harmless Outbrain, its parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, customers and vendors, and their respective officers, directors and employees from any liability, damage, cost, or fees (including reasonable attorneys' fees) arising from: (i) any claim or demand made by any third party due to or arising out of your access to the Site; (ii) your use of the Service or Site, and/or violation of the Terms; (iii) or the infringement by you, or any third party using your Outbrain account, of any intellectual property or other right of any person or entity.
6. Governing Law.
6.1. These Terms shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York in the United States, without regard to its choice of law provisions. You agree to submit to personal jurisdiction in the State of New York and further agree that any cause of action arising from or relating to the use of the Site or these Terms shall be brought exclusively in the Federal or State Courts residing in New York, New York.
To the fullest extent of the law, you agree that any claim or cause of action arising from or relating to use of the Site or these Terms must be filed within one (1) year after such claim or cause of action arose, or be forever barred.
6.2. Under California Civil Code Section 1789.3, residents of California who use the Site are entitled to know that they may file grievances and complaints with: Complaint Assistance Unit of the Division of Consumer Services of the California Department of Consumer Affairs, in writing at 400 R Street, Suite 1080, Sacramento, California 95814, or by telephone at (916) 445-1254 or (800) 952-5210, or by email at dca@dca.ca.gov.
7. Termination.
Outbrain, in its sole discretion, may terminate or suspend use of the Sites at any time for any reason or for no reason at all, without prior notice or liability to you. All provisions of these Terms which by their nature should survive termination shall survive termination, including, without limitation, ownership provisions, warranty disclaimers, indemnity, and limitations of liability.
8. Miscellaneous.
8.1. We are not responsible for the availability of any websites, applications, or other offerings owned or controlled by third-parties. We do not endorse and are not responsible or liable for, directly or indirectly, the operation of such third-party websites, their privacy practices and/or the content (including misrepresentative or defamatory content), including (without limitation) any advertising, products, or other materials or services on or available from such websites or resources; nor for any damage, loss, or offense caused or alleged to be caused by, or in connection with, the use of or reliance on any such content, goods, or services available on such third-party external sites or resources.
8.2 When using the Site, you agree to comply with all laws in your jurisdiction (including but not limited to copyright laws) and not use the Site for any purpose that is unlawful or prohibited by these Terms. By way of example, you shall not: (i) post or transmit any communication or solicitation intended to obtain password, account, or private information from any Outbrain user; (ii) create or submit spam to any Outbrain users or any URL; (iii) use any robot, spider, scraper or other automated means to access the Site for any purpose without our express written permission; (iv) interfere or attempt to interfere with the proper working of the Site or any activities conducted on the Site or Service; and (v) bypass any measures we may use to prevent or restrict access to the Site.
8.3. If any part of these Terms shall be deemed unlawful, void, or for any reason unenforceable, then that provision shall be deemed to be severable from these Terms and shall not affect the validity and enforceability of any of the remaining provisions of the Terms.
9. Electronic Communications.
Please send any questions or concerns regarding these Terms to
legal@outbrain.com
. By communicating with us electronically you acknowledge that communications by email are not considered confidential.
Effective November 8th 2019
Download
Table of Contents
Gambling Content
“Acceptable Gambling Content” means: (i) Content related to sports betting or casino gaming; (ii) Content providing sports betting or casino gaming related tutorials, information, or tips; and (iii)) online fantasy sports Content, or (iv) any other Content as accepted by Outbrain and aligned with its Advertising Guidelines.
Customer acknowledges and agrees that:
1) Customer has and will maintain the necessary and valid gambling license or authorization which permits Customer to operate its business and promote the Acceptable Gambling Content in the states or countries in which Customer operates and runs Acceptable Gambling Content(the “Gambling License”). Customer shall provide a copy of its Gambling License or other materials necessary for Outbrain to evaluate Customer’s ability to market with Outbrain, prior to running campaign(s) relating to Acceptable Gambling Content. Outbrain may refuse Acceptable Gambling Content for any reason, including if it is not satisfied of the validity of the Gambling License provided by the Customer; and
2) the Customer represents and warrants that it is not currently subject to any consent decree, regulatory investigation, or other legal action relating to the legality of Customer’s services and/or practices, and that its Gambling License will remain valid for the duration of its campaign(s) and all other agreements entered into between Outbrain and Customer relating to Acceptable Gambling Content; and
3) During the term of any campaign(s) relating to Acceptable Gambling Content, Customer must notify Outbrain of any a) expiration, revocation, change in status, or other actual or threatened invalidity of Customer’s Gambling License, or b) regulatory or government investigation, or legislative or legal action relating to the current or future legality of Customer’s business and/or practices or Content. Upon notification of any of the preceding events, Outbrain shall be permitted to immediately terminate or suspend any such active campaign(s) and immediately taken down any Content. In the event of such termination, Customer will remain responsible for all fees due pursuant to the agreement governing its campaign(s)and
4) Customer shall only provide Outbrain with Acceptable Gambling Content. Customer shall not promote or provide or make available Content that a) is false or misleading, including, without limitation, the advertising of overstated, inaccurate, or unrepresentative odds, prizes, or winnings; c) depicts minors or anyone appearing to be under 21; d) contains any other content which is likely to be determined as sensitive or controversial gambling content; and
5) all Acceptable Gambling Content provided by the Customer shall comply with all applicable laws, regulations, and industry guidelines; and
6) it shall at all times display responsible gambling information on its online properties including the properties to which the Acceptable Gambling Content links to; and
7) Outbrain reserves the right in its sole discretion to remove any Acceptable Gambling Content for any reason.
8) Approval of Content or administration of any campaign or Insertion Order by Outbrain does not warrant compliance with any law, regulation, industry guideline, or these terms. Customer shall remain fully responsible at all times for its Content and campaign, including with respect to any geographic, age, or demographic targeting.
9) Customer shall defend, indemnify and hold harmless Outbrain and its respective agents, affiliates, subsidiaries, directors, officers, employees, contractors, and Network partners (as applicable) against any and all third party claims arising from or relating to Customer’s business or the nature of its gaming services; Customer’s Content or Campaign, including without limitation the delivery of Content in violation of applicable laws or regulations; or the breach or alleged breach of any of these terms.
Please refer
here
to U.S. state-by-state guidelines.
Effective January 7th 2019
Download
Table of Contents
Gambling Content (United Kingdom Only)
“Acceptable Gambling Content” means: (i) Content related to sports betting; (ii) lottery related Content; (iii) Content providing gambling related tutorials and tips; (iv) gambling related Content such as odds and tips; and (iv) online fantasy sports Content.
Customer acknowledges and agrees that:
1) the validity of this Insertion Order is conditional on the Customer having and maintaining the necessary and valid gambling licence which permits Customer to operate its business and promote the Acceptable Gambling Content in accordance with this Insertion Order (and more particularly regarding targeting UK) (the “Gambling Licence”). Customer shall provide a copy of its Gambling Licence prior to signing an Outbrain insertion order relating to Acceptable Gambling Content. Outbrain may refuse to sign any insertion order relating to Acceptable Gambling Content if it is not satisfied of the validity of the Gambling Licence provided by the Customer; and
2) the Customer is solely responsible for ensuring that its Gambling Licence remains valid for the duration of this Insertion Order and all other insertion orders entered into between Outbrain and Customer relating to Acceptable Gambling Content; and
3) Customer shall only provide Outbrain with Acceptable Gambling Content. Customer shall not promote or provide or make available Content related to “free bets” or “free money”, content related to fixed odds betting terminals or any other Content which is likely to be classed as sensitive or controversial gambling content; and
4) all Acceptable Gambling Content provided by the Customer shall comply with all applicable laws and regulations (including without limitation the CAP code and the Gambling Commission’s National Gambling Industry Code for Socially Responsible Advertising); and
5) it shall at all times display responsible gambling information on its online properties including the properties to which the Acceptable Gambling Content links to; and
6) Outbrain reserves the right in its sole discretion to remove any Acceptable Gambling Content for any reason.
Effective January 7th 2019
Download
Table of Contents
LiveRamp Terms
You and/or the company you represent ("
Customer
") has opted to use certain services provided by LiveRamp Inc. (the "
LiveRamp Services
") via the Outbrain dashboard. Pursuant to Customer's use of the LiveRamp Services, the customer may use the LiveRamp Quick Onboard API Service ("
Quick Onboard Services
") which allows a Customer to upload personal data associated with a particular audience ("
Customer Data
") into the Outbrain dashboard to be passed on to LiveRamp by Outbrain. You are authorized to act on behalf of the bind Customer.
Customer acknowledges and agrees that:
Customer is prohibited from the further resale or providing access to third parties of the LiveRamp Services;
Customer is prohibited from sending the following data to LiveRamp pursuant to the LiveRamp Services including (i) a government issued identification number (ii) a financial or customer account number, including financial institution or bank account number or a credit or debit card number; (iii) information regarding an individual’s sexual orientation, religion, or health or medical condition (iv) unique biometric data or digital representation of biometric data; (v) an individual’s full date of birth; (vi) maiden name of the individual's mother; (vii) individual's digitized or other electronic signature; (viii) a user name, email address or other unique electronic identifier or routing code, which is sent in combination with a personal identification code, password, or security question and answer that would permit access to an online account, (ix) any data associated with an individual’s status as a person under the age of eighteen, or (x) any information that would permit Client to uniquely re-identify (a) specific individuals, (b) specific households or (c) groups smaller than 25 individuals or values. If Customer does transfer any of the aforementioned data, Customer shall promptly notify Outbrain in writing.
LiveRamp is the intended third party beneficiary with respect to the Customer Data and accordingly has the right to enforce these terms directly against Customer; and
Customer may only use the Quick Onboard Services for the purposes of ad targeting, suppression and measures on the Customer’s platform and no other purposes.In order for the Customer to use the LiveRamp Services, LiveRamp requires that the Customer grant Outbrain a non-exclusive, recoverable, sub-licensable license to Outbrain to (a) access, download and receive Customer Data (b) store, reproduce, modify and use Customer Data in connection with the LiveRamp Services. Any Customer Data received by Outbrain, and passed by Outbrain to LiveRamp, will be encrypted so that Outbrain will not be able to identify the Customer Data once uploaded by the Customer via the dashboard. Customer represents, warrants and undertakes that it has (a) all necessary consents, licenses and/or authority to grant Outbrain the aforementioned license in respect of the Customer Data and; (b) has the appropriate lawful basis and/or consents to allow Outbrain and LiveRamp to access and/or use such Customer Data.
In order for the Customer to use the LiveRamp Services, LiveRamp requires that the Customer grant Outbrain a non-exclusive, recoverable, sub-licensable license to Outbrain to (a) access, download and receive Customer Data (b) store, reproduce, modify and use Customer Data in connection with the LiveRamp Services. Any Customer Data received by Outbrain, and passed by Outbrain to LiveRamp, will be encrypted so that Outbrain will not be able to identify the Customer Data once uploaded by the Customer via the dashboard. Customer represents, warrants and undertakes that it has (a) all necessary consents, licenses and/or authority to grant Outbrain the aforementioned license in respect of the Customer Data and; (b) has the appropriate lawful basis and/or consents to allow Outbrain and LiveRamp to access and/or use such Customer Data.
The Customer provides such Customer Data to Outbrain at its own risk and shall indemnify, keep indemnified and hold harmless Outbrain in respect of any loss and/or damage which arises as a result of the Customer’s breach of the terms set out herein and/or in respect of any third party claim (whether by an individual, government authority or otherwise) which arises pursuant to the Customer’s use of the LiveRamp Services via the Outbrain dashboard.
Outbrain has the right, by providing at least 10 business days written notice and at its own expense, to audit the Customer’s compliance with these terms.
Engage Master Services Agreement
Engage Code on Page Terms
Engage Header Bidding Terms
Engage Video Terms
Supply Side Platform Terms
Engage Data Sharing Agreement
SSP Data Sharing Agreement
Engage Terms
Effective June 16th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
This Data Sharing Agreement (“
DSA
”) is entered into by the Outbrain entity (“
Outbrain
”) and the individual or company (the “
Partner
”) identified in the Partner Enrollment Form (governed by the applicable
Standard Partner Distribution Terms
) between the parties from time to time (together, the “
Terms
”). From the Effective Date of the applicable Partner Enrollment Form, this DSA shall apply to any and all agreements between the parties and their Affiliates from time to time.
This DSA is incorporated into the Terms (as amended from time to time) and constitutes a legally binding agreement between the parties. Collectively, the Controller SCCs (as applicable), the DSA and the Terms (or information entered through the Outbrain dashboard) are referred to as the “
Agreement
”. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency between any of the terms of the Agreement the following order of precedence shall prevail: (i) the Controller SCCs (as applicable); (ii) this DSA; and (iii) the Terms.
Any capitalized terms not defined in this DSA shall have the respective meanings given to them in the Terms.
1. DEFINITIONS.
1.1. “
Affiliate(s)
” means in respect of either party at any time, any person or legal entity controlled by or controlling or under the common control of that party. Any reference to the parties shall include reference to their Affiliates;
1.2. “
Controller SCCs
” means the standard data protection clauses “MODULE ONE: Transfer controller to controller” in accordance with article 46 2. (c) GDPR adopted by the European Commission on 4 June 2021 (Commission Implementing Decision (EU) 2021/914) (as amended or superseded), containing contractual obligations on the Data Exporter and the Data Importer, and rights for EEA Data Subjects whose Personal Data is transferred, as amended or superseded from time to time by the European Commission;
1.3. “
Data Protection Laws
” means all laws, guidance or codes of practice issued by a relevant public authority applicable from time to time to Outbrain or Partner relating to the processing of Personal Data and the privacy of electronic communications, including U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws and EU Data Protection Laws, the Brazilian General Data Protection Law (LGPD), Federal Law no. 13,709/2018 and the Japanese Act on the Protection of Personal Information;
1.4. “
EEA
” means the European Economic Area;
1.5. “
End Users
” shall have the same meaning as given to this term under the Terms, and, for the purpose of this DSA, are Data Subjects or Consumers;
1.6. "
EU Data Protection Laws
" means all laws, guidance or codes of practice issued by a relevant Supervisory Authority (including, in the UK, the Information Commissioner’s Office (“ICO”)) applicable from time to time to Outbrain or Partner relating to the processing of Personal Data and the privacy of electronic communications in the EEA and the UK as amended or superseded, especially (i) the General Data Protection Regulation ((EU) 2016/679) (GDPR) and the UK Data Protection Act 2018; (ii) the Privacy and Electronic Communications Directive 2002/58/EC (as updated by Directive 2009/136/EC) (ePrivacy Directive) and the UK Privacy and Electronic Communications Regulations 2003 (SI 2003 No. 2426) (PECR) as updated; (iii) the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection 1992;
1.7. “
Outbrain User Data
” means Personal Data of an End User which Outbrain collects directly on Partner Sites and/or indirectly via third-party partners who connect Outbrain with Partner Sites and may include, but not be limited to: bid request unique identifier, Outbrain unique identifier, IP address, user agent data, browser and device type (desktop/mobile, brand, model, operating system and system version), application version, application ID or package name), device advertising identifiers, pages, content visited and events, time of visit, broad location, device time zone;
1.8. “
UK Adequacy Decision
” means the Commission Implementing Decision of 28 June 2021 on the adequate protection of Personal Data by the United Kingdom in accordance with article 45 GDPR;
1.9. "
U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws
" means the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020, the Colorado Privacy Act of 2021, the Connecticut Data Privacy Act of 2022, the Indiana Consumer Data Protection Act of 2023, the Iowa Consumer Data Protection Act of 2023, the Montana Consumer Data Privacy Act of 2023, the Tennessee Information Protection Act of 2023, the Utah Consumer Privacy Act of 2022, the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act  of 2021 and all other U.S. privacy laws, guidance or codes of practice issued by a relevant public authority applicable from time to time to Outbrain or Partner relating to the processing of Personal Information and the privacy of electronic communications, as amended or superseded by any federal, state or national law, regulation or regulatory guidance;
1.10. "
Controller
", “
Joint Controller
”, "
Processor
", “
Data Protection Impact Assessment
”, "
Data
Subject
", “
Personal Data Breach
”, "
Special Categories of Personal Data
" and “
Supervisory Authority
” shall have the meanings given in EU Data Protection Laws;
1.11. “
sale
”
(including the terms “sell,” “selling,” “sold,” and other variations thereof, including renting, disclosing, releasing, disseminating, making available, transferring, or otherwise communicating Personal Information for monetary or other valuable consideration), “
Consumer
”,
“Business
”, “
Third Party
”
and
“
Service Provider
”
shall have the meanings given to those terms under U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws, as applicable; and
1.12. “
Personal Data
” (and any variation thereof, including “Personal Information” under U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws) and “
process
”(including “processing”), shall have the meaning given under the applicable Data Protection Laws.
2. PURPOSE OF PROCESSING.
The parties collect and process Personal Data for the purposes of delivering Recommendations to End Users.
Outbrain processes Outbrain User Data for the following purposes: (i) storing and/or accessing information on a device; (ii) using limited data to select advertising; (iii) creating profiles for personalized advertising; (iv) using profiles to select personalized advertising; (v) creating profiles to personalize content; (vi) using profiles to select personalized content; (vii) measuring advertising performance; (viii) measuring content performance; (ix) understanding audiences through statistics; (x) developing and improving services; (xi) using limited data to select content; (xii) ensuring security, preventing and detecting fraud, and fixing errors; and (xiii) delivering and presenting advertising and content.
3. U.S. CONSUMER PRIVACY LAWS AND EU DATA PROTECTION LAWS SPECIFIC PROVISIONS.
3.1. Specific provisions applicable to U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws are located in
Sections 4.2 and 5.2 (iv)
.
3.2. Specific provisions applicable to EU Data protection Laws are located in
Sections 4.3, 5.2 (ii) and 11
.
4. ROLE OF PARTIES.
4.1. Each party shall comply with all relevant provisions of Data Protection Laws as it applies to matters under the Agreement and ensure that they process Personal Data fairly and lawfully in accordance with Data Protection Laws as applicable in the provision and receipt of the Technology.
4.2. Insofar as  U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws are applicable to the Service, Outbrain and Partner will be considered independent Businesses for the collection, processing and selling of any Personal Information, and no party shall be considered a Service Provider on anyone’s behalf, unless as strictly required under applicable U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws. In such case, the
IAB Multi-State Privacy Agreement
(the most recent version or successor thereto) shall be incorporated by reference into this DSA and shall govern the relationship between the parties with Partner as Business and Outbrain as Service Provider exclusively in respect of opted out traffic in the U.S., as applicable.
4.3. Insofar as EU Data Protection Laws are applicable to the Technology, the parties shall be deemed Joint Controllers under Article 26 GDPR solely with regards to the collection of Outbrain User Data through the implementation of the Technology on Partner Sites, and the parties shall be deemed independent Controllers for any further processing activity.
4.4. Each party shall remain solely and exclusively responsible for determining the means and purposes of processing for its respective processing activities.
5. PARTNER’S OBLIGATIONS.
5.1. Partner is responsible for implementing the Technology on Partner Sites in accordance with the Agreement and Data Protection Laws.
5.2. Partner shall:
(i) disclose, via an appropriate privacy notice, Outbrain to End Users as a Business or Controller collecting Personal Data for the purposes of delivering Recommendations as set out in
Section 2.
;
(ii) collect End Users’ consent choices via a consent management platform using the IAB Transparency & Consent Framework v2.2 (the most recent version or successor thereto) and pass Outbrain valid “consent”/”no consent” strings. The Partner must not, at any time, send Outbrain “null” or “invalid” signals;
(iii) provide a user choice mechanism such as the opt out page(s) of the
Network Advertising Initiative
, the
Digital Advertising Alliance
or the
European Digital Advertising Alliance
, as applicable; and
(iv) Insofar as U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws are applicable to the Service, collect “Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” or equivalent opt out choices via a consent management platform using the IAB Global Privacy Platform (the most recent version or successor thereto) and pass Outbrain valid “yes”/”no” strings.
5.3. Partner shall at all times satisfy the requirements for an appropriate legal basis for the processing of Personal Data. In any event, where an End User opted out or withdrew their consent to personalized advertising and/or the sharing their Personal Data with Outbrain through a mechanism alerting only the Partner (instead of Outbrain), such as device settings, Partner must not share such Personal Data with Outbrain.
6. OUTBRAIN’S OBLIGATIONS.
6.1. Outbrain shall disclose, via an appropriate privacy notice, all information relating to processing activities where the Personal Data is collected directly from the End User or where such Personal Data is collected via third parties, as required under Data Protection Laws. This information is available on
Outbrain’s Privacy Policy
.
6.2. Outbrain shall at all times satisfy the requirements for an appropriate legal basis for the processing of Outbrain User Data.
6.3. Outbrain shall comply with requests from End Users to exercise their rights under relevant Data Protection Laws, without undue delay and within the required time limits. Requests relating to right to access, erasure, withdrawing consent, objecting to profiling, or ”Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” can be exercised directly on
Outbrain Interest Profile
.
7. COOPERATION.
7.1. Each party shall develop, implement, and regularly review procedures to ensure they meet their respective obligations under Data Protection Laws.
7.2. Each party shall immediately inform the other party if any activity pursuant to the Agreement infringes any part of Data Protection Laws, and the parties shall review such activity accordingly. If during the term, Data Protection Laws change in a way that this DSA is no longer adequate for performing the processing activities necessary to the Terms, the parties agree to promptly negotiate in good faith to review this DSA in light of such changes.
7.3. In the event that either party receives any correspondence, enquiry or complaint from an End User, Supervisory Authority or any other third party related to the disclosure or processing of Personal Data pursuant to this DSA, or requests information from the other party when performing a Data Protection Impact Assessment, it shall promptly inform the other party giving full details of the same, and the other party shall provide such assistance as reasonably required (at each party’s sole cost and expense) and in good faith in order to respond in accordance with any requirements under Data Protection Laws.
8. DATA SECURITY.
8.1. Each party shall implement and maintain such appropriate technical and organizational measures as required by Data Protection Laws to ensure that the Personal Data is processed in a secure manner, including (but not limited to) (i) the pseudonymization and encryption of Personal Data; (ii) ensuring the confidentiality, integrity, availability and resilience of the services provided under the Agreement, including the ability to restore availability of, and access to, Personal Data in a timely manner in the event of a physical or technical incident; (iii) a process for regularly testing, assessing and evaluating the effectiveness of technical and organizational measures for ensuring the security of the processing; and (iv) regularly carrying information security risk assessments that take account of risk of accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure of, or access to, Personal Data.
8.2. An overview of Outbrain’s appropriate technical and organizational security measures are described on
Outbrain’s Security page
.
8.3. Upon becoming aware of a suspected or confirmed Personal Data Breach or Security Incident involving Outbrain User Data collected pursuant to this DSA, each party shall notify the other party without any undue delay, and provide such assistance as reasonably required to allow the other party to comply with its respective obligations under Data Protection Laws.
9. PERSONNEL.
Each party shall be responsible for ensuring that staff members are appropriately trained to handle and process the Personal Data in accordance with their internal technical and organizational security measures, where relevant, together with Data Protection Laws, and have entered into confidentiality agreements relating to the processing of Personal Data.
10. PROCESSORS – SERVICE PROVIDERS.
Each party shall remain independently responsible for appointing its respective Processors and/or Service Providers in accordance with Data Protection Laws.
11. INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS.
11.1. Insofar as Personal Data is collected from End Users located within the territory of the EEA or the UK by either party during the course of the Agreement, neither party shall process any Personal Data (nor permit any Personal Data to be processed) in a country outside of the EEA or the UK unless: (i) that country has been designated by the European Commission or the ICO (as applicable) as providing an adequate level of protection for Personal Data; or (ii) it has taken such measures as necessary to ensure the transfer is compliant with EU Data Protection Laws.
11.2. The parties agree that for the purposes of any transfer of Personal Data from Partner to Outbrain collected within the EEA to the UK, the requirements of the clause above shall be fully satisfied by the UK Adequacy Decision.
11.3. Outbrain shall be responsible for the onward transfer of Personal Data from the UK to any third party country outside of the EEA as required by (a) the UK Adequacy Decision and/or (b) EU Data Protection Laws, as applicable.
11.4. Within its Affiliates, Outbrain has entered into adequate intragroup data sharing agreements including supplementary measures complying with all requirements of EU Data Protection Laws, which consist of (i) encryption in transit ; (ii) pseudonymization; and (iii) not having received any legally binding request from a public authority, including judicial authorities, under the laws of the country of destination and not being aware of any direct access by public authorities.
11.5. In the event that the UK Adequacy Decision as the lawful ground for international transfers from the EEA to third party countries is no longer applicable, the parties agree that the Controller SCCs shall be incorporated by reference into this DSA and shall govern any international transfer of Personal Data outside of the EEA. For the purpose of the Controller SCCs, the parties fully agree that:
(i) Partner is the "Data Exporter" and Outbrain, the "Data Importer";
(ii) Clause 7 “Docking clause” is deleted;
(iii) The OPTION under Clause 11 “Redress” is deleted;
(iv) Clause 17 “Governing Law” is completed with “Republic of Ireland”
(v) Clause 18 (b) “Choice of forum and jurisdiction” is completed with “Dublin, Republic of Ireland”;
(vi) Annex I to the Controller SCCs shall be deemed to have been completed with Annex I to this DSA; and
(vii) Annex II to the Controller SCCs shall be deemed to have been completed by
Outbrain’s Security page
.
12. TERM AND TERMINATION.
This DSA shall commence on the Effective Date and shall continue as long as the Partner uses the Technology.
13. DATA RETENTION.
Outbrain shall not retain any individual data point collected in relation to the Technology for longer than 13 months, unless it constitutes anonymous data.
14. MISCELLANEOUS.
14.1. Neither party shall be in breach of this DSA nor liable for delay in performing, or failure to perform, any of its obligations under the Agreement if such delay or failure results from events, circumstances or causes beyond its reasonable control.
14.2. Failure or delay in exercising any right or remedy under this DSA shall not constitute a waiver of such (or any other) right or remedy under this DSA, the Agreement or Data Protection Laws.
14.3. Partner shall not assign or otherwise transfer its rights or its obligations under this Agreement, in whole or in part, without the prior written consent of Outbrain.
14.4 Except as expressly stated otherwise and to the extent applicable under Data Protection Laws, nothing in this DSA shall create or confer any rights or other benefits in favor of any person other than a party to this DSA.
14.5. The invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability of any term of this DSA shall not affect the remainder of the DSA.
14.6. This DSA shall be governed by the laws specified in the applicable Partner Enrollment Form.
ANNEX I
Description of Processing Activities
This Annex forms part of the DSA and describes the processing of Personal Data by Outbrain. When Section 11.5 of the DSA applies, Annex I to the Controller SCCs shall be deemed to have been completed with this Annex.
A. LIST OF PARTIES
Data Exporter:
Partner name, address and contact details as stated in the Partner Enrollment Form.
Activities relevant to the data transferred: Digital services or media delivered through a website or mobile application on which Partner has ownership and control.
Joint Controller (collection) and independent Controller (any other processing).
Data Importer:
Outbrain with address and contact details as stated in the Partner Enrollment Form.
Activities relevant to the data transferred: Digital advertising services.
Joint Controller (collection) and independent Controller (any other processing).
B. DESCRIPTION OF TRANSFER
Categories of Data Subjects whose Personal Data is transferred:
End Users (Data Subjects who visit or use Partner Sites or interact with Recommendations served by Outbrain on Partner Sites).
Categories of Personal Data transferred:
Bid request unique identifier
Outbrain unique identifier
IP address
User Agent data, browser and device type (desktop/mobile, brand, model, operating system and system version), application version, application ID or package name)
Device advertising identifiers
Pages, content visited and events
Time of visit
Broad location
Device time zone
Sensitive data transferred:
No Special Categories of Personal Data are transferred.
Frequency of the transfer:
Real time,
continuous basis.
Nature of the processing:
Receiving data, including collection, accessing, retrieval, recording, and data entry;
Holding data, including storage, organization and structuring;
Using data, including analyzing, consultation, testing, automated decision making and profiling;
Updating data, including correcting, adaptation, alteration, alignment and combination;
Protecting data, including restricting, encrypting, and security testing;
Sharing data, including disclosure, dissemination, allowing access or otherwise making available;
Returning data to the Data Exporter or Data Subject;
Erasing data, including destruction and deletion.
Purpose(s) of the data transfer and further processing:
Digital advertising services, which include:
Storing and/or accessing information on a device;
Using limited data to select advertising;
Creating profiles for personalized advertising;
Using profiles to select personalized advertising;
Creating profiles to personalize content;
Using profiles to select personalized content;
Measuring advertising performance;
Measuring content performance;
Understanding audiences through statistics;
Developing and improving services;
Using limited data to select content;
Ensuring security, preventing and detecting fraud, and fixing errors; and
Delivering and presenting advertising and content.
Retention period:
An individual data point is retained for no longer than
13 months.
Recipients:
The subject matter, nature and duration can be found on the
Outbrain Trusted Partners page
.
C. COMPETENT SUPERVISORY AUTHORITY
In the UK: The Information Commissioner’s Office.
In the EEA: The Supervisory Authority of the Member State of the Partner’s Registered Address as stated in the Partner Enrollment Form, or, if not applicable, the Supervisory Authority of the Member State in which the Data Subjects whose Personal Data is transferred under this Agreement in relation to the Technology are located.
Effective October 24th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Outbrain Inc. – Gambling Chart (United States)
STATE
DAILY FANTASY SPORTS (DFS) PERMITTED
ONLINE SPORTS BETTING PERMITTED
ONLINE CASINO GAMBLING PERMITTED
DOES THE STATE REQUIRE A VENDOR LICENCE?
Alabama
YES
N/A
NO
N/A
Alaska
YES
N/A
NO
N/A
Arizona
YES
YES
NO
NO
Arkansas
YES
YES
NO
YES, if over $150,000
California
YES
N/A
NO
N/A
Colorado
YES
YES
NO
YES (VENDOR MINOR LICENSE)
Connecticut
YES
YES
YES
N/A
Delaware
YES
NO
YES
NO
District of Columbia
YES
YES
NO
NO
Florida
YES
N/A
NO
N/A
Georgia
YES
N/A
NO
N/A
Hawaii
NO
N/A
NO
N/A
Idaho
NO
N/A
NO
N/A
Illinois
YES
YES
NO
NO
Indiana
YES
YES
NO
YES (SPORTS WAGERING REGISTRANT)
Iowa
YES
YES
NO
NO
Kansas
YES
YES
NO
NO
Kentucky
YES
YES
NO
NO
Louisiana
YES
YES
NO
NO
Maine
YES
YES
NO
NO
Maryland
YES
YES
NO
NO
Massachusetts
YES
YES
NO
YES
Michigan
YES
YES
YES
YES
Minnesota
YES
N/A
NO
N/A
Mississippi
YES
YES (IN-CASINO ONLY)
NO
NO
Missouri
YES
N/A
NO
N/A
Montana
NO
YES (IN-LOCATION ONLY)
NO
NO
Nebraska
YES
NO
NO
N/A
Nevada
NO
YES
YES
NO
New Hampshire
YES
YES
NO
NO
New Jersey
YES
YES
YES
YES
New Mexico
YES
NO
NO
NO
New York
YES
YES
NO
NO
North Carolina
YES
NO
NO
NO
North Dakota
YES
NO
NO
NO
Ohio
YES
YES
NO
NO
Oklahoma
YES
N/A
NO
N/A
Oregon
YES
YES
NO
NO
Pennsylvania
YES
YES
YES
YES (if over $100,000)
Rhode Island
YES
YES
NO
NO
South Carolina
YES
N/A
NO
N/A
South Dakota
YES
NO
NO
NO
Tennessee
YES
YES
NO
NO
Texas
YES
N/A
NO
N/A
Utah
YES
N/A
NO
N/A
Vermont
YES
NO
NO
N/A
Virginia
YES
YES
NO
YES (VENDOR’S LICENSE)
Washington
NO
YES (IN TRIBAL AREAS ONLY)
NO
NO
West Virginia
YES
YES
YES
NO
Wisconsin
YES
YES (IN TRIBAL AREAS ONLY)
NO
NO
Wyoming
YES
YES
NO
NO
“
DFS
” stands for “
Daily Fantasy Sports
,” but is used here to include all formats of paid fantasy sports games/contests (
i.e.
, season-long or daily). Paid fantasy sports games are contests with an entry fee in which participants select virtual teams based on real athletes. The participants and their virtual teams earn points based on the performance of real players in actual athletic events. Examples of paid fantasy sports operators include FanDuel, DraftKings, Yahoo! Sports, and FantasyDraft.
Sports betting
is a form of gambling based primarily on chance, in which participants wager on the occurrence (or non-occurrence) or outcome of a specific athletic event or act. Examples of sports betting providers include William Hill Sportsbook, Caesars Sportsbook, 888sport, BetAmerica, FanDuel Sportsbook, and DraftKings Sportsbook. Note that some companies operate in both verticals (
e.g.
, FanDuel and DraftKings), but the universe of DFS operators is larger than that of state-licensed sports betting providers.
Online casino gambling
is used here to refer to traditional betting games normally found in a casino, but which are played in a purely digital, online environment.
Effective February 16th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
Please note that Outbrain Security page has moved here:
https://www.outbrain.com/
security/
Effective November 4th 2019
Download
Table of Contents
COMMISSION - Rates are to be non-commissionable.
RELEASE FROM OBLIGATION- Supplier acknowledges that Outbrain’s performance of this Agreement is contingent upon the availability and suitability of facilities provided by this Hotel, and the Hotel agrees that Outbrain shall be released from any duties or performance of this Agreement should the facilities of this hotel be rendered unavailable or deemed unsuitable for Outbrain during the dates of this Agreement –i.e. room renovations, any fire or building code, and that it will maintain appropriate insurance.
INSURANCE-Supplier represents and warrants that it is and will remain in full compliance with all applicable laws and regulations relating to safety, including, without limitation, any fire or building code, and that it will maintain appropriate insurance.
INDEMNIFICATION- The Supplier shall indemnify and hold harmless Outbrain, its employees and officers against all loss, liability, expense, damage, claims or suits on account of any (i)  injury to the person or property of any registrant, guest or employees of Outbrain staffing arising out of the negligence or willful misconduct of the Supplier, its agents or employees, unless the same is caused by the gross negligent  or willful misconduct of Outbrain; ii) arising out of any actual or threatened breach by Supplier of its confidentiality obligations under this Agreement and (iii) imposed on or incurred by Outbrain due to any violation of applicable laws, rules and regulations by the Supplier, including without limitation, actual or threatened breach of data protection laws and Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and applicable anticorruption laws.
LIMIT OF LIABILITY - In no event shall either party be liable to the other party or any other person or entity for any special, exemplary, indirect, incidental, consequential or punitive damages of any kind or nature whatsoever (including, without limitation, lost revenues, profits,  savings or business, or contribution or indemnity in respect of any claim against the party) or loss of records or data, whether in an action based on contract, warranty, strict liability, tort (including, without limitation, negligence) or otherwise, even if such party has been informed in advance of the possibility of such damages or such damages could have been reasonably foreseen by such party. In no event shall Outbrain’s liability to Supplier or any other person or entity arising out of or in connection with this Agreement or the Services exceed, in the aggregate, the total fees payable by Outbrain to Supplier in the twelve months (12) months immediately preceding the date on which such damage arose.
CONFIDENTIALITY- Each party agrees to maintain the confidentiality of any information and/or the contents of any documents provided/made available to it by the other in connection with this Agreement and shall not, without the prior consent of the other, disclose the same to any third party unless it is required under any statute or by any statutory authority.
GOVERNING LAW- This Agreement will be governed by the laws of the State of New York, without regard to its conflict of law provisions.  Any action or proceeding arising from or relating to this Agreement must be brought in a federal court in the Southern District of New York or in state court in New York County, New York, and each party irrevocably submits to the jurisdiction and venue of any such court in any such action or proceeding.  The parties are independent contractors, and nothing in this Agreement will be construed to create a partnership, joint venture, agency or other relationship between the parties.
Hotel agrees to honor the pricing, terms, and amenities as offered in Lanyon.
Effective December 11th 2019
Download
Table of Contents
Amplify API Terms of Use
Thank you for using the Outbrain application programming interfaces (the “Outbrain APIs”). By using the Outbrain APIs, you agree to the terms below. Outbrain reserves the right to update and change these terms from time to time without notice.
1. Licensed Uses and Restrictions.
The Outbrain APIs are owned by Outbrain and are licensed to you on a worldwide (except as limited below), non-exclusive, non-sublicenseable basis on the terms and conditions set forth herein. These terms define legal use of the Outbrain APIs, including all updates, revisions, substitutions, and any copies of the Outbrain APIs made by or for you. All rights not expressly granted to you are reserved by Outbrain. You shall not:
(a) Use the Outbrain APIs to spam or otherwise harass others.
(b) Attempt to cloak or conceal your identity or your application’s identity when requesting authorization to use Outbrain APIs.
(c) Use the Outbrain APIs for any application that constitutes, promotes or is used in connection with spyware, adware, or any other malicious programs or code.
(d) Use the Outbrain APIs in any manner or for any purpose that violates any law or regulation, or any rights of any person, including but not limited to intellectual property rights, rights of privacy, or rights of personality.
(e) Use the Outbrain APIs in a manner that adversely impacts the stability of Outbrain’s servers or adversely impacts the behavior of other applications using the Outbrain APIs. Further, Outbrain reserves the right to rate limit or block applications that make a large number of calls to the API that are not primarily in response to direct user actions.
(f) Sell, lease, or sublicense the Outbrain APIs or access thereto or derive revenues from the use or provision of the Outbrain APIs, whether for direct commercial or monetary gain or otherwise, except as set forth below.
(g) Use the Outbrain APIs for any other purpose other than reviewing or analyzing your campaign performance.
2. Brand Assets.
Outbrain grants to you a limited, worldwide, non-exclusive, royalty free license to use, reproduce, publish, perform and display Outbrain’s trademarks, service marks and logos (collectively, “
Outbrain Marks
”), strictly in accordance with your obligations and rights hereof. You agree to adhere to Outbrain’s style guide with any use of the Outbrain Marks. Any deviation therefrom shall be subject to Outbrain’s sole discretion and prior written consent. All goodwill arising out of your use of any of the Outbrain Marks shall inure solely to the benefit of Outbrain.
3. Ownership and Relationship of Parties.
The Outbrain APIs may be protected by copyrights, trademarks, service marks, international treaties, and/or other proprietary rights and laws of the U.S. and other countries. Outbrain’s rights apply to the Outbrain APIs and all output and executables of the Outbrain APIs, excluding any software components developed by you which do not themselves incorporate the Outbrain APIs or any output or executables of the Outbrain APIs. You agree to abide by all applicable proprietary rights laws and other laws, as well as any additional copyright notices or restrictions contained in these terms. Outbrain owns all rights, title, and interest in and to the Outbrain APIs. These terms grant you no right, title, or interest in any intellectual property owned or licensed by Outbrain, including (but not limited to) the Outbrain APIs and Outbrain Marks. You shall properly disclose in your application via your online privacy policy or otherwise that you are utilizing Outbrain APIs.
4. Support.
Outbrain may elect to provide you with support or modifications for the Outbrain APIs (collectively, “
Support
”), in its sole discretion, and may terminate such Support at any time without notice to you. Outbrain may change, suspend, or discontinue any aspect of the Outbrain APIs at any time, including the availability of any Outbrain APIs. Outbrain may also impose limits on certain features and services or restrict your access to parts or all of the Outbrain APIs or the Outbrain web site without notice or liability.
5. Fees and Payments.
Outbrain is committed to free and open access to our APIs. However, providing the APIs does have real costs for Outbrain. For uses of Outbrain APIs over a certain rate or for certain types of commercial applications, Outbrain reserves the right to charge fees for future use of or access to the Outbrain APIs. Outbrain will provide prior written notice of any decision to charge Partner for its particular use.
6. Term.
The license granted for the Outbrain APIs hereunder shall continue until terminated by either party. You may terminate the license by discontinuing use of all or any of the Outbrain APIs. Outbrain may terminate the license at any time for any reason. Your rights to use the Outbrain APIs terminate automatically if (i) you violate any of these terms, (ii) Outbrain sends a written notice of termination to you, or (iii) Outbrain disables your access to the Outbrain APIs.
7. Disclaimer of Any Warranty.
Some of the Outbrain APIs may be experimental and not tested in any manner. Outbrain does not represent or warrant that any Outbrain APIs are free of inaccuracies, errors, bugs, or interruptions, or are reliable, accurate, complete, or otherwise valid. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Outbrain will use best efforts to correct any inaccuracies, errors, bugs, or interruptions to the Outbrain APIs in a timely manner.
The Outbrain APIs are provided “as is” with no warranty, express or implied, of any kind and Outbrain expressly disclaims any and all warranties and conditions, including, but not limited to, any implied warranty of merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, availability, security, title and/or non-infringement.
Your use of the Outbrain APIs is at your own discretion and risk, and you will be solely responsible for any damage that results from the use of any Outbrain APIs including, but not limited to, any damage to your computer system or loss of data.
8. Limitation of Liability.
Outbrain shall not, under any circumstances, be liable to you for any indirect, incidental, consequential, special or exemplary damages arising out of or in connection with use of the Outbrain APIs, whether based on breach of contract, breach of warranty, tort (including negligence, product liability or otherwise), or any other pecuniary loss, whether or not Outbrain has been advised of the possibility of such damages. Under no circumstances shall Outbrain be liable to you for any amount.
9. Exclusions and Limitations.
Some jurisdictions do not allow the exclusion of certain warranties or the limitation or exclusion of liability for incidental or consequential damages. Accordingly, some of the above limitations of sections 6 and 7 may not apply to you.
10. Release and Waiver.
To the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, you hereby release and waive all claims against Outbrain, and its subsidiaries, affiliates, officers, agents, licensors, co-branders or other partners, and employees from any and all liability for claims, damages (actual and/or consequential), costs and expenses (including litigation costs and attorneys’ fees) of every kind and nature, arising from or in any way related to your use of the Outbrain APIs. If you are a California resident, you waive your rights under California Civil Code 1542, which states, “A general release does not extend to claims which the creditor does not know or suspect to exist in his favor at the time of executing the release, which if known by him must have materially affected his settlement with the debtor.” You understand that any fact relating to any matter covered by this release may be found to be other than now believed to be true and you accept and assume the risk of such possible differences in fact. In addition, you expressly waive and relinquish any and all rights and benefits that you may have under any other state or federal statute or common law principle of similar effect, to the fullest extent permitted by law.
11. Hold Harmless and Indemnity.
To the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, you agree to hold harmless and indemnify Outbrain and its subsidiaries, affiliates, officers, agents, licensors, co-branders or other partners, and employees from and against any third-party claim arising from or in any way related to your use of the Outbrain APIs, including any liability or expense arising from all claims, losses, damages (actual and/or consequential), suits, judgments, litigation costs and attorneys’ fees, of every kind and nature. Outbrain shall use good faith efforts to provide you with written notice of such claim, suit or action.
12. General Terms.
Relationship of the Parties
. Notwithstanding any provision hereof, for all purposes hereof, you and Outbrain shall be and act independently and not as partner, joint venturer, agent, employee or employer of the other. You shall not have any authority to assume or create any obligation for or on behalf of Outbrain, express or implied, and you shall not attempt to bind Outbrain to any contract.
Invalidity of Specific Terms
. If any provision hereof is found by a court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the parties nevertheless agree that the court should endeavor to give effect to the parties’ intentions as reflected in the provision and that the other provisions remain in full force and effect.
Location of Lawsuit and Choice of Law
. These terms and the relationship between you and Outbrain shall be governed by the laws of the State of New York without regard to its conflict of law provisions. You and Outbrain agree to submit to the personal jurisdiction of the courts located within the county of New York.
No Waiver of Rights by Outbrain
. Outbrain’s failure to exercise or enforce any right or provision hereof shall not constitute a waiver of such right or provision.
Miscellaneous
. The section headings and subheadings contained in this agreement are included for convenience only, and shall not limit or otherwise affect the terms herein. Any construction or interpretation to be made hereof shall not be construed against the drafter.
Effective February 16th 2021
Download
Table of Contents
ACORDO DE   PROCESSAMENTO DE DADOS
Este Acordo de Processamento de Dados (“
APD
”) é celebrado entre a Outbrain (“
Outbrain
”) e o indivíduo ou empresa (“
Divulgador
”) devidamente identificado no Contrato de Distribuição (regido também   pelos Termos de Uso Padrão) firmado entre as partes de tempos em tempos (aqui denominados
“Termos”
)
.
Este APD tem aplicação desde a “
Data Vigência
” do Contrato de Distribuição, firmado entre as partes, e deve vigorar para todos os demais contratos firmados entre as partes e suas Afiliadas de tempos em tempos.
Este APD é incorporado aos Termos (conforme alterado de tempos em tempos) e constitui um contrato legalmente vigente entre as partes. Coletivamente, o SCCs do Controlador, o APD e os Termos (ou informações inseridas por meio do painel de controle da Outbrain) são coletivamente referidos como o “Contrato”. Em caso de conflito ou inconsistência entre qualquer um dos termos do Contrato, a seguinte ordem de precedência prevalecerá: (i) as SCCs do Controlador, (ii) este APD; e (iii) os Termos.
1. DEFINIÇÕES
1.1.
“Afiliada(s)”
”significa qualquer pessoa física ou jurídica controlada ou controladora ou sob o controle comum e, a qualquer momento, de qualquer uma das partes. Qualquer referência às partes, no Contrato, incluiu também referência às suas Afiliadas;
1.2.
"Leis de Proteção de Dados
" significa quaisquer leis aplicáveis, regras emitidas pelo governo, regulamentos, diretivas e requerimentos (conforme alterados de tempos em tempos) relacionadas à privacidade de Dados Pessoais e aplicáveis à Outbrain ou ao Divulgador incluindo-se, mas não se limitando, à Lei de 2018 de Privacidade do Consumidor da Califórnia e quaisquer alterações e regulamentos emitidos de acordo com a mesma ("CCPA") e as Leis de Proteção de Dados da UE.
1.3. “
EEE”
significa as Áreas Econômicas Européias;
1.4.
"Leis de proteção de dados da UE"
significam (i) os Regulamento 2016/679 do Parlamento Europeu e do Conselho sobre a proteção de pessoas naturais, no que diz respeito ao Processamento de Dados Pessoais e sobre a livre circulação de tais dados (Regulamento Geral de Proteção de Dados) (o "GDPR"); (ii) a Diretiva de E-Privacidade Eletrônica da UE (Diretiva 2002/58/CE); e (iii) todas e quaisquer leis nacionais de proteção de dados aplicáveis em conformidade com os itens (i) ou (ii) acima (incluindo, após o Brexit, as leis nacionais de proteção de dados do Reino Unido); em cada caso, conforme possa ser alterada ou substituída de tempos em tempos; e
1.5. "
Dados do Usuário da Outbrain
" significam Dados Pessoais de um Titular dos Dados que a Outbrain coleta do Titular dos Dados diretamente de seus parceiros Divulgadores e/ou terceiros que conectam Outbrain com os Divulgadores e podem incluir, mas não se limitam a identificadores de dispositivo, endereço IP de dados e dados do agente de usuário;
1.6. "
controlador", "processador", "titular dos dados
"
e "categorias especiais de dados pessoais
" tem os significados dados na Lei de Proteção de Dados da UE;
1.7.
“venda”
(incluindo-se os termos “vender”, “vendendo”, “vendeu” e outras variações), “
consumidor
” e “
empresa
” terão os significados atribuídos a esses termos em conformidade com a CCPA; e
1.8.
“Dados pessoais”
(e quaisquer variações dos mesmos, incluindo “informações pessoais”) e
“processo”
(incluindo “processamento”), terão o significado atribuído nas Leis de Proteção de Dados aplicáveis.
2. NATUREZA E ESCOPO DO PROCESSAMENTO.
A Outbrain processa os Dados de Usuário da Outbrain com o propósito de (i) armazenar e/ou acessar informações de um dispositivo; (ii) selecionar anúncios básicos e personalizados ou conteúdo personalizado; (iii) criar anúncios personalizados e/ou perfil de conteúdo; (iv) medir o desempenho do anúncio e do conteúdo; (v) aplicar pesquisas de mercado para gerar percepções do público; e (vi) desenvolvimento e aprimoramento de produtos.
3
. FUNÇÃO DAS PARTES.
As partes reconhecem e concordam que relativamente aos Dados Pessoais da Outbrain cada uma delas é considerada controladora e empresa, conforme definido nos termos das Leis de Proteção de Dados aplicáveis. Cada parte será individualmente e separadamente responsável pelo cumprimento das obrigações que se aplicam a ela de acordo com a Lei de Proteção de Dados aplicáveis. Na medida em que Outbrain receber e interpretar sinais de consentimento de mecanismos de gerenciamento de consentimento (incluindo, mas não se limitando a, IAB CCPA Compliance Framework), a Outbrain fará isso com o objetivo de obedecer a escolha do consumidor ou titular dos dados não devendo ser de nenhuma forma considerada provedora de serviços ou processador em nome de qualquer pessoa.
4.
COOPERAÇÃO.
No caso de qualquer uma das partes receber correspondências, consultas ou reclamações de um titular dos dados, reguladores ou terceiros relativamente à divulgação ou processamento de Dados Pessoais, de acordo com este APD, a parte obriga-se a informar imediatamente a outra parte de todos os detalhes do que foi recebido, sendo que as partes devem cooperar e agir de boa fé para responder o que foi recebido em conformidade com determinado nas Leis de Proteção de Dados. O e-mail de contato da Outbrain para questões relacionadas aos direitos do titular dos dados é
privacyquestions@outbrain.com
ou, se um Titular dos dados solicitar o cancelamento dos anúncios personalizados do Outbrain o Cliente deverá direcionar o Titular dos Dados para o
Perfil de Interesse do Outbrain
.
5. TRANSPARÊNCIA
. As partes reconhecem que estão obrigadas a cumprir as obrigações de transparência de Dados Pessoais processados e  obtidos diretamente do Titular dos Dados ou quando tais Dados Pessoais forem obtidos de terceiros. No que diz respeito aos Dados do Usuário da Outbrain, a Outbrain coleta esses dados diretamente de sites ou aplicativos do Divulgador ou através de parceiros terceirizados que conectam a Outbrain à sites ou aplicativos do Divulgador. O Divulgador reconhece, declara e compromete-se a (i) satisfazer todos os requisitos legais e legislações aplicáveis ao Processamento de Dados Pessoais; (ii) informar à Outbrain aos usuários por meio de avisos de privacidade apropriados (iii) quando necessário, o Divulgador  deve coletar o consentimento por meio de uma plataforma de gerenciamento de consentimento usando a Estrutura de Transparência e Consentimento do IAB (a versão mais recente ou sucessora) e enviar à Outbrain um consentimento claro ou sinal de não consentimento (ou seja, o Divulgador não deve enviar ao Outbrain um sinal nulo ou inválido); (iv), para fins da CCPA, o Divulgador deve enviar sinais de exclusão para Outbrain usando a estrutura CCPA do IAB; e (v) o Divulgador deve fornecer um mecanismo de escolha do usuário, como a(s) página(s) de exclusão da Network Advertising Initiative, da Digital Advertising Alliance, da European Digital Advertising Alliance.
6. SEGURANÇA DE DADOS.
Cada parte deverá manter medidas técnicas e organizacionais adequadas para a proteção da segurança, confidencialidade e integridade dos Dados Pessoais.
7. TRANSFERÊNCIAS INTERNACIONAIS.
7.1. Nenhuma das partes deve processar quaisquer Dados (nem permitir que quaisquer Dados sejam processados) em países fora do EEE ou (após Brexit) fora do Reino Unido, salvo se: (a) esse país não tenha sido designado pela Comissão Européia ou pela Autoridade da Proteção de Dados do Reino Unido (conforme aplicável) para fornecer um nível adequado de proteção para Dados; ou (b) tenha tomado as medidas necessárias para garantir que a transferência de dados esteja em conformidade com as Leis de Proteção de Dados Aplicáveis.
7.2. As Partes concordam que, para efeitos de qualquer transferência de Dados Pessoais do Divulgador para o Outbrain, os requisitos da Seção 7.1 devem ser atendidos da seguinte forma: (a) as cláusulas contratuais padrão da Comissão Européia de 2004 para transferências de controlador para controlador (conforme alterado ou substituído ) (as "SCCs do controlador") são incorporadas a este Contrato por meio de referência e devem reger qualquer processamento internacional de Dados fora do EEE ou do Reino Unido (conforme aplicável) e descrito na Seção 7.1; (b) para os fins dos SCCs do Controlador, o Divulgador será considerado o "exportador de dados" e a Outbrain, o "importador de dados"; e (c) o Anexo B aos SCCs do Controlador será considerado como tendo sido concluído com a descrição do processamento de dados estabelecida no
Anexo A
deste APD. No caso de as SCCs do Controlador serem alteradas ou atualizadas, pelas autoridades de proteção de dados, as partes concordam que tais cláusulas alteradas ou atualizadas devem ser observadas.
8. PRAZO E RESCISÃO
. Este APD tem início na Data de Vigência e deve vigorar até enquanto o Divulgador utilizar os serviços da Outbrain.
9.
Condições Gerais
.
9.1. Nenhuma das Partes será considerada inadimplente relativamente a este APD ou responsável pelo atraso na execução ou falha no cumprimento de qualquer uma de suas obrigações, nos termos do Contrato, se tal atraso ou falha resultar de eventos, circunstâncias ou causas além do razoável controle das partes.
9.2. A falha ou atraso no exercício de quaisquer direitos ou remédios jurídicos em conformidade com este APD não constituirá renúncia de tal (ou qualquer outro) direito ou remédio jurídico pela parte.
9.3. O Divulgador obriga-se a não ceder ou transferir seus direitos ou obrigações previstos neste Contrato, no todo ou em parte, sem o consentimento prévio por escrito da Outbrain.
9.4. Exceto quando expressamente declarado de outra forma nada neste APD cria ou confere quaisquer direitos ou outros benefícios em favor de terceiros que não sejam partes neste APD.
9.5. A invalidade, ilegalidade ou inexequibilidade de qualquer termo deste APD não afetará o restante deste APD.
9.6. Este APD será regido pelas leis especificadas no Contrato de Distribuição aplicável
Anexo A
Descrição de processamento de dados
Este Anexo faz parte do APD e descreve o processamento de Dados Pessoais pela Outbrain.
Exportador de dados
: Divulgador (Controlador)
Importador de dados
: Outbrain (Controlador)
Titular dos dados.
Usuários finais
Finalidades do processamento.
A Outbrain processa os Dados de Usuário da Outbrain com o propósito de (i) armazenar e/ou acessar informações de um dispositivo (ii) selecionar anúncios básicos e personalizados ou conteúdo personalizado (iii) criar anúncios personalizados e/ou perfil de conteúdo; (iv) medir o desempenho do anúncio e do conteúdo (v) aplicar pesquisas de mercado para gerar percepções do público; e (vi) desenvolvimento e aprimoramento de produtos.
Categorias de Dados Pessoais
Os Dados processados dizem respeito às seguintes categorias de dados pessoais:
• Identificador exclusivo da solicitação de lance
• Endereço de IP
• Identificadores de dispositivo e publicidade
• Navegador e tipo de dispositivo (desktop/ celular, marca, modelo, sistema operacional)
• Localização do dispositivo
• Fuso horário do dispositivo
• Propriedade digital / conteúdo visitado e eventos
Destinatários
Os dados processados podem ser divulgados apenas para os seguintes destinatários ou categorias de destinatários:
• Nossos
Divulgadores
de confiança;
Categorias especiais de dados
N/A
Effective March 8th 2021
Download
Table of Contents
個人情報取扱規約
この個人情報取扱規約（以下「
本個人情報取扱規約
」という）は、Outbrain Japan株式会社（以下「
Outbrain
」という）と、パートナー登録フォーム（パートナー登録フォームにはパートナー配信規約が適用される。以下、パートナー配信規約及びパートナー登録フォームを総称して「
本規約
」という）記載の自然人又は法人（以下「
パートナー
」という）との間で随時締結される。本個人情報取扱規約は、適用のあるパートナー登録フォームに記載の効力発生日（以下「
効力発生日
」という）以降、両当事者間及び各当事者の関連会社間で随時締結されるすべての契約に適用される。
本個人情報取扱規約は、本規約（随時変更される）に組み込まれ、両当事者間における法的拘束力を有する合意を形成する。以下、標準契約条項（定義は後述する）、本個人情報取扱規約及び本規約（又はOutbrainのダッシュボードに入力された情報）を総称して「
本契約
」という。本契約のいずれかの条件の間に矛盾又は不一致がある場合の優先順位は、（i）標準契約条項、（ii）本個人情報取扱規約、（iii）本規約の順とする。
1.
定義
1.1.「
本関連会社
」とは、当該当事者に支配される、又は当該当事者を支配する、若しくは当該当事者の共通支配下にある自然人又は法人を意味する。当事者にかかる規定は、全てその関連会社にも適用があるものとする。
1.2 .
「個人情報保護法令」
とは、Outbrain又はパートナーに適用される、個人情報の保護に関連する適用のある最新の法令、政令、規制、命令及び基準（カリフォルニア消費者プライバシー法（2018年）及び当該法律を改正する法律及び関連規制（以下「
CCPA
」という）、並びにEUデータ保護法を含む）を意味する。
1.3. 「
EEA
」とは、欧州経済領域を意味する。
1.4.「
EU
データ保護法
」とは、（i）EU一般データ保護規則（以下「
GDPR
」という）、（ii）EU e-プライバシー規則（指令2002/58/EC）及び（iii）（i）若しくは（ii）に基づき、又はそれらに従い制定された適用のあるすべてのデータ保護法であって国により制定されたもの（英国のEU離脱後の英国のデータ保護法を含む）を意味する。これらの法令は、随時改正され又は代替される可能性があるものとする。
1.5.「
Outbrain
ユーザーの個人情報
」とは、Outbrainがデータ主体から直接、又はパートナーから、又はOutbrainをパートナーに接続する第三者を通じて取得する、データ主体の個人情報を意味する。Outbrainユーザーデータには、デバイスID、IPアドレス及びユーザーエージェントデータを含む。
1.6. 「
管理者
」、「
取扱者
」、「
データ主体
」及び「
特別な種類の個人データ
」は、EUデータ保護法に定めるものと同じ意味を有する。
1.7. 「
販売
（「売る」等の関連用語を含む）」、「
消費者
」及び「
事業者
」は、CCPAに定めるものと同じ意味を有する。
1.8. 「
個人データ
（「個人情報」等の関連用語を含む）」及び「
取扱い
（「処理」を含む）」は、個人情報保護法令に定めるものと同じ意味を有する。
2.
取扱いの目的及び範囲
Outbrainは、次に掲げる事項を目的として、Outbrainユーザーデータを取扱う。（i）デバイス上の情報の保存及びアクセス、（ii）ベーシックなパーソナライズド広告又はパーソナライズドコンテンツの選択、（iii）パーソナライズドされた広告又はコンテンツのプロファイルの作成、（iv）広告及びコンテンツのパフォーマンスの測定、（v）オーディエンスインサイトの生成のための市場調査への利用、並びに（vi）製品の開発及び改善。
3.
当事者の役割
各当事者は、Outbrainユーザーデータの取扱いにあたり、それぞれが管理者かつ事業者であることを確認し、合意する。各当事者は、適用のある個人情報保護法令に基づく義務の遵守について、個別に独立して責任を負う。Outbrainが同意管理メカニズム（IABのCCPAコンプライアンスフレームワークを含む）から同意の信号を受信し、又はそのように解釈する限りにおいて、Outbrainは、消費者又はデータ主体の選択に従うために個人情報を取り扱っているのであり、Outbrainは、第三者のためのサービス提供者又は取扱者とはみなされない。
4.
協力
各当事者が、データ主体、規制当局その他の第三者から、個人情報の開示又は取扱いに関する連絡、照会又は要請を受けた場合、本個人情報取扱規約に基づき、速やかにその詳細を相手方当事者に通知するものとし、両当事者は、個人情報保護法令に定める要件に従い対応するため、合理的かつ誠意をもって協力するものとする。データ主体の権利に関するOutbrainに対する連絡の宛先は、
privacyquestions@outbrain.com
とする。データ主体がOutbrainのパーソナライズド広告のオプトアウトを希望する場合、パートナーは、データ主体に
Outbrain’s Interest Profile
を案内するものとする。
5.
透明性
両当事者は、取り扱う個人情報をデータ主体から直接取得し又は第三者から取得する場合に、透明性の原則を遵守するための義務を負うことを確認する。Outbrainは、パートナーのウェブサイトやアプリケーションから直接、又はOutbrainをパートナーのサイトやアプリケーションに接続する第三者を介して、Outbrainユーザーデータを収集する。パートナーは、次に掲げる事項について表明保証し、義務を負うものとする。（i）適切な法的根拠のもとに、個人情報の取扱いに必要な条件を常に満たすこと、（ii）適切なプライバシー通知によりユーザーにOutbrainを開示すること、（iii）必要な場合、IAB透明性及び同意フレームワーク（最新版又はその改正版）を使用した同意管理プラットフォームにより、ユーザーからの同意を得るものとし、明確な同意又は拒否の信号をOutbrainに送信すること（すなわち、パートナーはOutbrainに無効な信号を送ってはならない）、（iv）CCPAに関連して、IABのCCPAフレームワークを使用してOutbrainにオプトアウト信号を送信すること、及び（v）パートナーがNetwork Advertising Initiative、Digital Advertising Alliance、European Digital Advertising Allianceのオプトアウトページ等のユーザー選択メカニズムを提供すること。
6.
データの安全性
各当事者は、個人情報のセキュリティ、機密性、完全性を保護するために、適切な技術的・組織的措置を講じなければならない。
7.
第三国への移転
7.1. いずれの当事者も、次に掲げる場合を除き、EEA（EU離脱後の英国を含む）外の国において個人情報を取扱い、又は取り扱うことを許可してはならない。（a）当該国が、欧州委員会又は英国データ保護局（該当する場合）により、個人情報の適切な保護水準を満たしていると指定されている場合、又は（b）当該第三国への移転が、適用されるデータ保護法に準拠していることを保証するために必要な措置が講じられている場合。
7.2. 両当事者は、パートナーからOutbrainへの個人情報の移転については、次に掲げる措置により前項の要件を満たすものとすることに同意する。（a）欧州委員会決定（2004年）による個人情報の管理者間の移転に関する標準契約条項（修正又はより優先する法令により書き換えられた場合にはそれによる）（以下「
標準契約条項
」という）が、参照の形により本契約に組み込まれ、前項に定める通り、EEA又は英国（該当する場合）以外におけるデータの取扱いに適用され、（b）パートナーが標準契約条項における「データ輸出者」、Outbrainが標準契約条項における「データ輸入者」とみなされ、（c）標準契約条項の付属書類Bへの記入が、本個人情報取扱規約の別紙Aに個人情報の取扱い方法を記載することにより完了したものとみなされること。個人情報保護を所管する当局により、標準契約条項が改正され又は更新された場合には、両当事者は当該改正又は更新内容が適用されることに合意する。
7.3. 両当事者は、日本国内で取得した個人データをパートナーからOutbrainへ移転する場合には、前項に加え、あらかじめ外国にある第三者への提供を認める旨の本人の同意を得なければならないことに同意する。
8.
有効期間及び終了
本個人情報取扱規約は効力発生日に効力を有し、パートナーがOutbrainのサービスを利用する限り有効に存続するものとする。
9.
雑則
9.1. いずれの当事者も、当該当事者の合理的な支配を超える事由に起因する理由によって本個人情報取扱規約及び本契約に基づく義務の履行遅延又は不履行による責任を負わない。
9.2. 本個人情報取扱規約に基づく権利の不履行又は遅延は当該権利の放棄と解釈されず、当該権利、その他の権利若しくは救済の行使を妨げないものとする。
9.3. パートナーは、Outbrainの書面による事前の同意を得ることなく、本契約に基づく権利又は義務の全部又は一部を譲渡してはならない。
9.4. 別段の明示の規定がある場合を除き、本個人情報取扱規約のいかなる規定も、本個人情報取扱規約の当事者以外の者に有利な権利又はその他の利益を創出し又は付与するものではない。
9.5. 本個人情報取扱規約のいずれかの条項が無効、違法又は執行不能である場合であっても、本個人情報取扱規約の他の条項に影響を及ぼさない。
9.6. 本個人情報取扱規約は、パートナー配信規約に定める法令に準拠する。
Effective January 17th 2020
Download
Table of Contents
個人情報取扱規約
この個人情報取扱規約　(以下「
本個人情報取扱規約
」という。)　は、Outbrain Japan株式会社 (以下、「
Outbrain
」という。)　と広告掲載申込み及び/又はOutbrainダッシュボードの使用によって特定される自然人又は法人　(以下「
顧客
」という。)　との間で締結され、Outbrainが提供するサービスによる個人情報の取扱いに適用する。本個人情報取扱規約は、広告掲載申込みに規定される発効日及び/又はOutbrainダッシュボードの利用がされた日から、両当事者の間及び各当事者の関連会社の間で随時締結されるすべての契約に適用する。
本個人情報取扱規約は、アンプリファイ規約　(随時変更される)　に組み込まれ、両当事者間における法的拘束力を有する契約を構成する。以下、本個人情報取扱規約、広告掲載申込み（又はOutbrainダッシュボードを通じて入力された情報）及びアンプリファイ規約を総称して「
本契約
」という。本契約のいずれかの条件の間に矛盾又は不一致がある場合の各契約間の優先順位は以下のとおりである。(i) 広告掲載申込み（又はOutbrainダッシュボードを通じて入力された情報）
、
(ii)
本個人情報取扱規約、(iii) 拡張規約。
定義及び解釈‐
以下の定義が本個人情報取扱規約に適用される。
「
本関連会社
」とは、当該当事者に支配される、又は当該当事者を支配する、若しくは当該当事者の共同の支配下にある自然人又は法人を意味する。当事者を指す場合、その関連会社も含むものとする。
「
管理者
」とは、個人情報の取扱いの目的と方法を決定する法人を意味する。
「
顧客の個人情報
」とは、顧客が、Outbrainサービスを利用するために提供する個人情報（顧客の氏名及びメールアドレス等）、及びOutbrainが顧客のアカウントに提供するサービスの利用に必要な個人情報を意味する。
「
本データ主体
」とは、個人情報の主体である自然人を意味する。
「
個人情報保護法
」とは、Outbrain又は顧客に適用される、個人情報の保護に関連する最新の適用法令、省令、規制、命令及び要件を意味する。
「
EEA
」とは、欧州経済領域を意味する。
「
本エンドユーザー
」とは、Outbrainのパートナーネットワーク上にあるOutbrainウィジェットを利用する自然人であるエンドユーザーを意味する。
「
本エンドユーザーの個人情報
」とは、OutbrainがOutbrainウィジェットを通じてエンドユーザーから直接収集する本エンドユーザーに関する個人情報を意味する。それには、OutbrainのUUID、IPアドレス（Outbrainにより、地理位置情報に変換され、最後のオクテットが消去されたもの）、その他本エンドユーザーに関するエージェントデータ（本エンドユーザーが当該ウィジェットにアクセスするために使用しているデバイス及びブラウザに関する情報等）が含まれる。
「
個人情報
」とは、本契約に従ってOutbrainが取り扱う（該当する場合には、本エンドユーザーの個人情報及び／又は顧客の個人情報を含む）特定された又は特定され得る自然人又は家族に関する情報を意味する。
「
個人情報の侵害
」とは、Outbrainによって配信、保持又は取り扱われている顧客の個人情報に関する偶発的な又は違法な削除、損失、変更、無許可な開示、違法アクセスによるセキュリティ侵害を意味する。
「
本下請業者
」とは、Outbrainに代わって個人情報を取り扱う下請業者を意味する。
取扱いの目的及び範囲
‐
当事者は、本個人情報取扱規約及び適用法令に基づき、個人情報が取り扱われることに合意する。Outbrainは、以下の目的で個人情報を取り扱うものとする。
本エンドユーザーの個人情報については、Outbrainのパートナーネットワークを利用するエンドユーザーに推奨サービスを提供するため。発効日以降、Outbrainは本エンドユーザーの個人情報を送信及び／又は顧客から受信しない（Outbrainピクセルの経由を含む）。
顧客の個人情報については、顧客にサービスを提供するため。
各当事者の役割
‐
各当事者は、顧客の個人情報の取扱いにあたり、それぞれ独立した管理者かつ事業主体であることを確認し、それに合意する。Outbrainは、顧客、顧客のサイト又は顧客が有するOutbrainピクセルを経由して、本エンドユーザーの個人情報を収集、送信又は受信しない。したがって、Outbrainは、本エンドユーザーの個人情報に関して、発行元から独立した管理者である。各当事者は、個人情報保護法に基づく独立した管理者に適用する義務を遵守するものとする。
法的根拠
本エンドユーザーの個人情報
Outbrainは、本エンドユーザーの個人情報を、顧客からではなく、パートナーサイトから直接収集する。Outbrainは、個人情報保護法又はここに記載されるそれと同等の規定を遵守することを両当事者に要求する、適切な契約書を発行元と締結する。
パートナーの個人情報
‐
顧客は、Outbrainが顧客に対する本契約上の義務を遂行するためには顧客の個人情報が必要であるため、Outbrainが顧客の個人情報を取り扱う法的根拠が、契約上のものであることを確認する。
本データ主体の権利
‐
顧客は、本契約に従い、顧客の個人データに関して個人情報保護法に基づいて権利を行使する要求を本データ主体から受け取った場合、速やかにOutbrainに通知するものとする。かかる場合、顧客は、本データ主体の要求に直接対応できるように、Outbrainに本データ主体を紹介するものとする。Outbrainは，本データ主体からの要求に対応するため及び／又は個人情報保護法における独立した管理者としての必須義務を遂行するため，取扱いの性質によって、当該顧客に，（当該顧客が書面で要求した場合、当該顧客の費用で）合理的な支援を提供する。
情報提供義務
‐
両当事者は、個人情報を取り扱う際に本データ主体から直接又は第三者を通じて個人情報が提供される場合、情報提供義務を遂行する義務があることを確認する。そのために、両当事者は、本エンドユーザーに対して，適用される個人情報保護法に準拠して、適切なプライバシー通知を表示するものとする。データ主体の権利に関するOutbrainの連絡メールは次の通りである：
privacyquestions@outbrain.com
従業員
‐
Outbrainは、個人情報の取扱いに従事する従業員に個人情報を秘密に保持することの必要性について教育し、適切な研修を受けさせ、当該従業員と秘密保持契約を締結することに同意する。また、Outbrainは、個人情報にアクセスできる従業員を本契約に基づくサービスを提供するために必要な従業員に限定する。
個人情報の共有
‐顧客は、 (i) 名前やメールアドレス等、本データ主体を直接特定することができる個人情報（顧客の個人情報を除く）及び／又は (ii) 特別な種類の個人情報を含む個人情報を、Outbrainと共有しないことに同意する。
本下請業者
‐
顧客は、Outbrainが本契約に基づくサービスの提供に関連して、第三者（関連会社を含む）に業務を委託することができることを確認する。Outbrainは、本個人情報取扱規約に含まれる個人情報保護義務に劣らない個人情報保護義務を有する本下請業者と契約を締結するものとする。
個人情報保護に関するセキュリティ対策
‐Outbrainは、個人情報の秘密性及び完全性を保護するための適切な技術的及び組織的措置を維持する。Outbrainが個人情報を保護するために使用するセキュリティ対策は、
個人情報保護方針
に概説されている。Outbrainは、顧客の個人情報に対する侵害を発見した場合、遅滞なく(ただし、発覚後48時間以内に)、顧客に書面にて通知するものとし、個人情報の侵害の原因を是正するために、必要且つ合理的とみなす措置を講ずるものとする。
データの保持
‐顧客からの要求がある場合、Outbrainは顧客の個人情報を消去するものとする。
コンプライアンス
‐Outbrainは、書面による事前の要求がある場合、顧客の費用負担で、本個人情報取扱規約に基づく義務を遵守していることを証明するために必要な情報を顧客に提供する。さらに、各当事者は、(i)　相手方の指示が個人情報保護法に違反していると把握した場合、又は (ii) 本個人情報取扱規約又は本契約に基づいて提供されるサービスに関連する個人情報保護法の違反を指摘する、データ保護監督機関又はそれに類似する機関からの申立て又は通知を受領した場合、書面で相手方当事者に通知する。
国際的な個人情報の移転
‐Outbrainは、EEA域外に(本下請業者による移転を含む)個人情報を移転又は取扱うことがあるが、当該移転は、個人情報保護法(EU標準契約条項、EU-US Privacy Shieldに基づく認証、又はGDPR第45条に基づく欧州委員会の十分制認定も、適用のある限りで含まれる)を遵守して行われることを条件とする。Outbrainは、EU-US Privacy Shieldの認証を受け、グループ企業間移転に関するEU標準契約条項を締結している。
CCPA
‐ Outbrainは、改正カリフォルニア消費者プライバシー法
（
2018
年）
（
以下
「CCPA」
という
）にお
いて、
「事業主体」であり、「サービスプロバイダー」ではない。Outbrainは、本エンドユーザーの選択に従う
ことを目的として
、パートナーの同意を管理する
システム
（IAB CCPAコンプライアンスフレームワークを含むが、これに限定されない）から同意の信号を受信し、解釈し、サービスを提供するのであって、パートナーに代わ
る
サービスプロバイダーと
はみなされない
。
契約期間及び解除
‐本個人情報取扱規約は、パートナー登録フォームに記載されている発効日に開始し、顧客のキャンペーンがOutbrainのパートナーネットワーク上で公開されている限り継続する。
雑則
いずれの当事者も、当該当事者の合理的な支配を超える事由に起因する理由によって本個人情報取扱規約及び本契約に基づく義務の履行遅延又は不履行による責任を負わない。
本個人情報取扱規約に基づく権利の不履行又は遅延は当該権利の放棄と解釈されず、当該権利、その他の権利若しくは救済の行使を妨げないものとする。
顧客は、Outbrainの書面による事前の同意を得ることなく、本契約に基づく権利又は義務の全部又は一部を譲渡してはならない。
別段の明示の規定がある場合を除き、本個人情報取扱規約のいかなる規定も、本個人情報取扱規約の当事者以外の者に有利な権利又はその他の利益を創出し又は付与するものではない。
本個人情報取扱規約のいずれかの条項が無効、違法又は執行不能である場合であっても、本個人情報取扱規約の他の条項に影響を及ぼさない。
本個人情報取扱規約は、アンプリファイ規約に定める法令に準拠する。
Effective January 27th 2020
Download
Table of Contents
Glossary
Statutory category
Definition
(categories may overlap)
What we collect
Commercial Information
Records of personal property, products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
Contact data
Identity data
Transaction data
Communications
Marketing data
Financial Information
Bank account number, debit or credit card numbers, insurance policy number, and other financial information.
Financial data
Geolocation Data
Precise location, e.g., derived from GPS coordinates or telemetry data
N/A
Identifiers
Real name, alias, postal address, unique personal identifier, customer number, email address, account name, social security number, driver’s license number, passport number, or other similar identifiers.
Contact data
Identity data
Data about others
Inferences
The derivation of information, data, assumptions, or conclusions from any other category of Personal Information to create a profile about a person reflecting the person's preferences, characteristics, psychological trends, predispositions, behavior, attitudes, intelligence, abilities and aptitudes.
May be derived from your:
Device data
Online activity data
Internet or Network Information
Browsing history, search history, and information regarding a person’s interaction with an Internet website, application, or advertisement.
Device data
Online activity data
Online Identifiers
An online identifier or other persistent identifier that can be used to recognize a person, family or device, over time and across different services, including but not limited to, a device identifier; an Internet Protocol address; cookies, beacons, pixel tags, mobile ad identifiers, or similar technology; customer number, unique pseudonym, or user alias; telephone numbers, or other forms of persistent or probabilistic identifiers (i.e., the identification of a person or a device to a degree of certainty of more probable than not) that can be used to identify a particular person or device.
Device data
Identity data
Effective September 30th 2021
Download
Table of Contents
The following  terms (“Terms”) govern Outbrain and
Partner’s participation in a Unified Auction for Partner Inventory facilitated through one or more Unified Auction Service as defined in a Header Bidding Enrollment Form
.
CERTAIN DEFINITIONS
“Advertising Client(s)” means advertisers, agencies or other third-party sources of advertising demand.
"Advertiser Recs" means Recommendations in the Outbrain network submitted by Advertising Clients.
"Content" means graphical, textual and/or auditory content (which may include text, data, information, photos, images, graphics, audio, video or other content).
"Data" means all data collected or generated by Outbrain through the Unified Auction Service, including any reports or other data made available to Partner in connection with the Agreement.
"Destination Page" means any webpage or other online location that may be accessed by clicking on Recommendations.
"End User" means individual human end users of Partner Inventory.
"Partner Inventory"   means inventory appearing on the Partner websites applications or platforms, as may be made available to Outbrain by Partner through a Unified Auction Service and in any particular Unified Auction.
"Recommendations" means the display of Content that Outbrain delivers to Partner Inventory via the Unified Auction Service. For clarity, Recommendations are Advertiser Recs.
“Unified Auction” means any programmatic auction for Partner Inventory that occurs within any Unified Auction Service in which Outbrain participates.
“Unified Auction Service” means a service or integration, which may be operated by a third party, that facilitates a programmatic auction, wherein programmatic supply-side partners and other programmatic buyers’ bid for Partner Inventory on behalf of Advertising Clients.
REVENUE & PAYMENT
Partner must promptly provide Outbrain completed and accurate tax forms and all other similar materials Outbrain requires, which may include tax form W-8BEN, W-8BEN-E or W-9 if applicable (collectively all such forms and materials, “Tax Materials”). Notwithstanding anything set forth to the contrary in this Agreement, Outbrain may (a) withhold payments owed to Partner hereunder without penalty or late fee until Outbrain has received Partner’s Tax Materials, and (b) deduct any applicable withholding taxes payable by Outbrain from payments owed to Partner by Outbrain hereunder as required by law. Once Outbrain has received the Tax Materials, Outbrain will use commercially reasonable efforts to pay any amounts not paid to Partner pursuant to the foregoing subsection (a) as soon as reasonably practicable. All payments to Partner shall be subject to withholding for income taxes and similar deductions, as required by applicable law.
To ensure proper payment, Partner is responsible for notifying Outbrain of accurate contact and payment information. Partner is also responsible for any charges assessed by Partner’s bank or payment provider. If the amount owed to Partner is less than US$50, then the amount owed will be accrued if and until the calendar month in which the balance of the payments due to Partner exceeds US$50. Any dispute regarding a payment from Outbrain must be submitted to Outbrain in writing within thirty (30) days of postage or wire transfer date of such payment or it shall be deemed waived.
Outbrain may withhold, set off, charge or credit back payments to Partner, if Outbrain, in its sole reasonable discretion, believes that the performance related to them are fraudulent or invalid in nature or if Outbrain was charged or credited back by the Advertiser Client. Invalid activity is determined by Outbrain in all cases and may include, but is not limited to, (i) invalid clicks on or impressions of Advertiser Recs generated by any person, bot, automated program or similar device, including through any clicks/impressions originating from Partner’s IP addresses or computers under Partner’s control; (ii) clicks/impressions solicited or generated by payment of money, false representation, or requests for End Users to click on Advertiser Recs or take other actions; and (iii) clicks/impressions co-mingled with a significant amount of the activity described in (i and ii) above.
In addition to Outbrain’s other rights and remedies, Outbrain may (i) withhold and offset any payments owed to Partner under the Agreement against any fees Partner owes Outbrain under the Agreement or any other agreement, and/or (ii) require Partner to refund Outbrain within thirty (30) days of any invoice, any amounts Outbrain may have overpaid to Partner in prior periods. If an Outbrain Advertiser Client whose Advertiser Recs are displayed on any Partner Inventory defaults on payment to Outbrain, Outbrain may withhold payment or charge back Partner’s account.
PRIVACY
Outbrain and Partner shall each maintain and display on their respective websites an easily accessible and discoverable privacy notice and/or policy that complies with all applicable laws, and with respect to Partner, that discloses usage of third-party technology to collect and use data in connection with the Partner Inventory. Outbrain's privacy policy is available
here
.
The parties are independent controllers in respect of End User data processed via the Partner Inventory and each party remains individually responsible for compliance with relevant data protection laws. It is Partner’s (and not Outbrain’s) responsibility to comply with all data protection legislation in respect of the placing and use of third party cookies  and the capturing of any consent to cookies required to be obtained from the relevant End User). Partner acknowledges that Outbrain relies on Partner’s lawful basis for processing End User data. Accordingly, Partner warrants that: (i) if Publisher relies on legitimate interest, it has completed a legitimate interest assessment which has considered Outbrain’s provision of the Outbrain Service; and (ii) if the Publisher relies on consent, the Publisher shall disclose Outbrain to an End User via a consent management platform (if applicable) using the IAB methodology and pass Outbrain a clear consent or no consent signal (i.e., the Publisher must not send Outbrain a null or invalid signal via a consent management platform). Publisher shall collect the consent string (if relying on consent) according to the IAB methodology and make it available to Outbrain as an object in any bid request. Regardless of the foregoing, the parties shall provide End Users access to a user-choice mechanism such as the opt out page(s) of the Network Advertising Initiative, the Digital Advertising Alliance, the European Digital Advertising Alliance, and/or a direct opt out of Outbrain through Outbrain’s privacy policy. If an End User has opted out of behavioral advertising through a mechanism alerting Publisher (instead of Outbrain), such as device settings, Publisher must not pass Outbrain such End User’s advertiser ID or other identifying mechanism. T
he provisions of the
Data Processing Agreement
shall be incorporated into, and form part of, this Agreement.
LICENSE TERMS
During the Term and subject to Partner’s full compliance with all of the terms of the Agreement, Outbrain grants Partner a limited, non-exclusive, revocable, non-sublicensable, non-transferable licencse to display the Recommendations on Partner Inventory in the form and format provided.
Outbrain grants Partner, during the Term, a limited, worldwide, non-exclusive, royalty-free licence to use and display Outbrain’s trademarks, service marks and logos (collectively, “Outbrain Marks”), strictly in accordance with Partner’s obligations and rights in the Agreement. All goodwill arising out of Partner’s use of any of the Outbrain Marks shall inure solely to the benefit of Outbrain. Outbrain shall have the right to refer to Partner and Partner Inventory in any general listing of advertisers or partners (including in marketing and sales materials). Notwithstanding the foregoing, each party will request prior written consent before issuing a press release regarding the Agreement or using the other party’s name on its website other than in accordance with the Agreement.
As between the parties: (a) Outbrain retains all right, title and interest in and to the Outbrain Marks, Data, and Content displayed on or made available by the Unified Auction Service (excluding any Content from the Partner Inventory which shall be owned by Partner); and (b) Partner retains all right, title and interest in and to the Partner Inventory including the look and feel, excluding the items described in subparagraph (a) above, (including without limitation all intellectual property rights in them).
The licences granted under the Agreement are specifically set forth in the Agreement; there are no implied rights. All rights not expressly granted to Partner in the Agreement are reserved by Outbrain.
PROHIBITED ACTIVITY
Partner will not deploy Advertiser Recs on any properties that display adult, obscene, pornographic, defamatory, libelous, infringing, abusive, or illegal Content, that promotes hate or discrimination, facilitates the sale of firearms or illegal drugs, or that participates or encourages participation in, illegal activities or is directed at children under of the age of 16.
TERMINATION
Either party may terminate the Agreement at any time in the event of a material breach by the other party of any provision of the Agreement that remains uncured for seven (7) days after the breaching party’s receipt of written notice of the breach.
The Agreement is terminable on thirty (30) days prior written notice unless otherwise stated on the Partner Enrollment Form. Upon expiration or termination of the Agreement, all rights and obligations of the parties under the Agreement will be extinguished, except that Sections 8, 9 & 11 of the Terms will survive termination, as well as any other terms of this Agreement which, by their nature should survive termination, and continue to bind the parties.
LIMITED WARRANTIES; INDEMNITY
Each party represents and warrants to the other that: (i) it has all right, power, and authority necessary to enter into the Agreement and perform its obligations under it; and (ii) it will comply with all applicable laws, regulations and orders in its performance of the Agreement.
Partner represents and warrants that the Partner Inventory does not and will not contain any Content that is: (i) illegal; (ii) infringes any Intellectual Property Right of any third party; (iii) is obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous material or material that violates any person’s right of publicity, privacy or personality; or (iv) knowingly contains a misrepresentation of fact or factual inaccuracy.
Nothing in the Agreement shall be construed as a promise of any sort of minimum traffic volumes, clicks, impressions or usage or any other such commitments by Outbrain to Partner.
Except as expressly provided in the Agreement, neither party makes any representations or warranties, express or implied in relation to the Agreement, the Partner Inventory, any Content made available by Outbrain or any other matters (including any implied terms relating to satisfactory quality or fitness for any purpose, any warranties of availability or uninterrupted or error free performance, any warranties arising out of any course of performance or dealing).
Outbrain makes no representations or warranties concerning any Content, including without limitation Advertiser Recs, and Outbrain will not be responsible or liable for the contents, accuracy, intellectual property infringement, legality or decency of or for Partner’s reliance on any of the foregoing.
Each party (the “Indemnifying Party”) shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless the other party and its parent and affiliates, and each of its and their respective affiliates, directors, officers, shareholders, members, authorised representatives, employees and agents (collectively, the “Indemnified Party”) from and against any and all claims, losses, liabilities, damages, costs, settlements, regulatory findings and/or fines and other expenses (including reasonable legal fees) (collectively, “Claims”) that arise out of any third party claim occasioned by any breach or alleged breach of any of the Indemnifying Party’s representations, warranties and obligations of the Agreement. The Indemnified Party shall promptly notify the Indemnifying Party of any Claim in writing, provided, however, that any delay in providing such notice shall not relieve the Indemnifying Party of any of its obligations except to the extent that the Indemnifying Party is actually prejudiced by such delay. The Indemnified Party shall have the right to participate in the defence and settlement of the Claim with counsel of its own choosing and its own expense, subject to the Indemnifying Party’s control thereof.
CONFIDENTIALITY
Each party (the “Receiving Party”) acknowledges that it will have access to certain information and materials, including the terms of the Agreement, concerning the business, technology, products and services of the other party (the “Disclosing Party”) that are, or reasonably should be considered given the circumstances of disclosure to be, confidential (“Confidential Information”). Confidential Information will not include: (a) information known to the Receiving Party prior to disclosure by the Disclosing Party; (b) information independently developed by the Receiving Party without reference to Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party; (c) information that is or becomes publicly known through no fault of the Receiving Party; or (d) information disclosed to the Receiving Party by a third party without breach of any obligation of confidence. Except as permitted hereunder, the Receiving Party (aa) will not use any Confidential Information for its own account or the account of any third party, and (bb) will not disclose any Confidential Information to any third party other than its directors, employees, contractors, advisors, investors or potential investors who have a need to know and who have agreed not to use, and to maintain the confidentiality of, the Confidential Information consistent with this Section 7. The Receiving Party will return or destroy the Confidential Information promptly upon the Disclosing Party’s written request. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Receiving Party may disclose Confidential Information to the extent required by applicable law or legal process, provided that the Receiving Party provides prompt written notice of any required disclosure to the Disclosing Party and provides reasonable cooperation (at the Disclosing Party’s expense) with any effort by the Disclosing Party to contest or limit the scope of such disclosure.
LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
Neither Outbrain nor the Partner exclude or limit liability to the other for: (i) death or personal injury caused by its negligence or that of its employees or contractors; (ii) fraud or fraudulent misrepresentation; or (iii) any other liability which cannot lawfully be excluded or limited.
Subject always to this Section , neither party will be liable for: (a) any special, indirect, incidental or consequential loss or damage; (b) any loss of goodwill or reputation; (c) any loss of data; (d) any loss of contracts, business or anticipated savings; or (e) any loss of profits arising out of or in connection with the Agreement or any breach hereof, whether or not such party has been advised of the possibility of such loss or damage, howsoever incurred and whether under a theory of contract, tort (including negligence) statutory duty or otherwise.
Subject always to this Section and except for liabilities arising out of a party’s violation, misappropriation or infringement of a party’s Intellectual Property Rights, in no event will either party’s aggregate liability arising out of or in connection with the Agreement or any breach (whether under a theory of contract, tort (including negligence), statutory duty, or otherwise) exceed the greater of: (i) £100,000 GBP; and (ii) 125% of the amount of revenues paid or payable to the Partner in the 12-month period immediately preceding the event giving rise to liability (or, in the case of a series of connected events, the first such event).
Each party acknowledges to each other that it accepts that the restrictions on the liability of each other party, as set out in the Agreement are reasonable in all the circumstances.
EXPORT CONTROLS
Partner will comply with all export laws and restrictions and regulations of the Department of Commerce, the United States Department of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control ("OFAC"), or other United States or foreign agency or authority, and shall not export, or allow the export or re-export of the Unified Auction Service in violation of any such restrictions, laws or regulations. Partner agrees to the foregoing and represent and warrants that it is not located in, under the control of, or a national or resident of any restricted country. Partner represents and warrants that none of it, or any individual, entity, or organisation holding any ownership interest or controlling interest in Partner, including any officer or director, is an individual, entity, organisation with whom any United States law, regulation, or executive order prohibits U.S. companies and individuals from dealing, including, names appearing on the Specially Designated Nationals List.
MISCELLANEOUS
The Agreement shall be interpreted and construed in accordance with and governed by the laws of England and Wales, without regard to its conflict of law provisions or the United Nations Conventions for the International Sale of Goods. Any action or proceeding arising from or relating to the Agreement must be submitted to the exclusive jurisdiction of English courts. The parties agree that irreparable damage would occur in the event that any of the provisions of the Agreement is not performed in accordance with these specific terms. Accordingly, the parties agree that each shall be entitled to injunctive relief to prevent breaches of the Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions of the Agreement, in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or in equity. The parties are independent contractors, and nothing in the Agreement will be construed to create a partnership, joint venture, agency or other relationship between the parties. No failure or forbearance by a party to enforce any of its rights under the Agreement or insist upon performance of the other party’s obligations under the Agreement will be deemed a waiver of such rights or obligations to any extent, and no waiver by either party of any default or breach of the Agreement will constitute a waiver of any other or subsequent default or breach. Neither party will be liable for any failure to perform due to causes beyond the party's reasonable control. The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties concerning its subject matter and supersedes all prior or contemporaneous agreements or understandings, written or oral, concerning such subject matter. The parties to this Agreement do not intend that any term of this Agreement should be enforceable, by virtue of the Contracts (Rights of Third Parties) Act 1999 or otherwise, by any person who is not a Party to this Agreement. The Partner Enrollment Form may be amended, modified or superseded, only by a written instrument signed by both parties. The headings in the Agreement are for the convenience of reference only and have no legal effect. The Agreement may be executed and delivered via electronic transmission or another means of complete and accurate reproduction, and copies of the Agreement delivered via such means will be deemed originals for all purposes. The Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original, but all of which together will constitute one and the same instrument. If any provision of the Agreement is held to be unenforceable for any reason, such provision shall be reformed only to the extent necessary to make it enforceable, failing which, it shall be severed from the Agreement and the balance of the Agreement shall continue in full force and effect. Neither party may assign the Agreement or any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the other party’s prior written consent, except (i) due to operation of law, merger, reorganisation, or as a result of an acquisition or change of control, and (ii) by Outbrain to its subsidiaries. Subject to the foregoing, the Agreement will be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties and their permitted successors and assigns.
Effective January 21st 2022
Download
Table of Contents
The following  terms (“Terms”) govern Outbrain and
Partner’s participation in a Unified Auction for Partner Inventory facilitated through one or more Unified Auction Service as defined in a Header Bidding Enrollment Form
.
CERTAIN DEFINITIONS
“Advertising Client(s)” means advertisers, agencies or other third-party sources of advertising demand.
"Advertiser Recs" means Recommendations in the Outbrain network submitted by Advertising Clients.
"Content" means graphical, textual and/or auditory content (which may include text, data, information, photos, images, graphics, audio, video or other content).
"Data" means all data collected or generated by Outbrain through the Unified Auction Service, including any reports or other data made available to Partner in connection with the Agreement.
"Destination Page" means any webpage or other online location that may be accessed by clicking on Recommendations.
"End User" means individual human end users of Partner Inventory.
"Partner Inventory"   means inventory appearing on the Partner websites applications or platforms, as may be made available to Outbrain by Partner through a Unified Auction Service and in any particular Unified Auction.
"Recommendations" means the display of Content that Outbrain delivers to Partner Inventory via the Unified Auction Service. For clarity, Recommendations are Advertiser Recs.
“Unified Auction” means any programmatic auction for Partner Inventory that occurs within any Unified Auction Service in which Outbrain participates.
“Unified Auction Service” means a service or integration, which may be operated by a third party, that facilitates a programmatic auction, wherein programmatic supply-side partners and other programmatic buyers’ bid for Partner Inventory on behalf of Advertising Clients.
REVENUE & PAYMENT
Partner must promptly provide Outbrain completed and accurate tax forms and all other similar materials Outbrain requires, which may include tax form W-8BEN, W-8BEN-E or W-9 if applicable (collectively all such forms and materials, “Tax Materials”). Notwithstanding anything set forth to the contrary in this Agreement, Outbrain may (a) withhold payments owed to Partner hereunder without penalty or late fee until Outbrain has received Partner’s Tax Materials, and (b) deduct any applicable withholding taxes payable by Outbrain from payments owed to Partner by Outbrain hereunder as required by law. Once Outbrain has received the Tax Materials, Outbrain will use commercially reasonable efforts to pay any amounts not paid to Partner pursuant to the foregoing subsection (a) as soon as reasonably practicable. All payments to Partner shall be subject to withholding for income taxes and similar deductions, as required by applicable law.
To ensure proper payment, Partner is responsible for notifying Outbrain of accurate contact and payment information. Partner is also responsible for any charges assessed by Partner’s bank or payment provider. If the amount owed to Partner is less than US$50, then the amount owed will be accrued if and until the calendar month in which the balance of the payments due to Partner exceeds US$50. Any dispute regarding a payment from Outbrain must be submitted to Outbrain in writing within thirty (30) days of postage or wire transfer date of such payment or it shall be deemed waived.
Outbrain may withhold, set off, charge or credit back payments to Partner, if Outbrain, in its sole reasonable discretion, believes that the performance related to them are fraudulent or invalid in nature or if Outbrain was charged or credited back by the Advertiser Client. Invalid activity is determined by Outbrain in all cases and may include, but is not limited to, (i) invalid clicks on or impressions of Advertiser Recs generated by any person, bot, automated program or similar device, including through any clicks/impressions originating from Partner’s IP addresses or computers under Partner’s control; (ii) clicks/impressions solicited or generated by payment of money, false representation, or requests for End Users to click on Advertiser Recs or take other actions; and (iii) clicks/impressions co-mingled with a significant amount of the activity described in (i and ii) above.
In addition to Outbrain’s other rights and remedies, Outbrain may (i) withhold and offset any payments owed to Partner under the Agreement against any fees Partner owes Outbrain under the Agreement or any other agreement, and/or (ii) require Partner to refund Outbrain within thirty (30) days of any invoice, any amounts Outbrain may have overpaid to Partner in prior periods. If an Outbrain Advertiser Client whose Advertiser Recs are displayed on any Partner Inventory defaults on payment to Outbrain, Outbrain may withhold payment or charge back Partner’s account.
PRIVACY
Outbrain and Partner shall each maintain and display on their respective websites an easily accessible and discoverable privacy notice and/or policy that complies with all applicable laws, and with respect to Partner, that discloses usage of third-party technology to collect and use data in connection with the Partner Inventory. Outbrain's privacy policy is available at
here
.
The parties are independent controllers in respect of End User data processed via the Partner Inventory and each party remains individually responsible for compliance with relevant data protection laws. It is Partner’s (and not Outbrain’s) responsibility to comply with all data protection legislation in respect of the placing and use of third party cookies  and the capturing of any consent to cookies required to be obtained from the relevant End User). Partner acknowledges that Outbrain relies on Partner’s lawful basis for processing End User data. Accordingly, Partner warrants that: (i) if Publisher relies on legitimate interest, it has completed a legitimate interest assessment which has considered Outbrain’s provision of the Outbrain Service; and (ii) if the Publisher relies on consent, the Publisher shall disclose Outbrain to an End User via a consent management platform (if applicable) using the IAB methodology and pass Outbrain a clear consent or no consent signal (i.e., the Publisher must not send Outbrain a null or invalid signal via a consent management platform). Publisher shall collect the consent string (if relying on consent) according to the IAB methodology and make it available to Outbrain as an object in any bid request. Regardless of the foregoing, the parties shall provide End Users access to a user-choice mechanism such as the opt out page(s) of the Network Advertising Initiative, the Digital Advertising Alliance, the European Digital Advertising Alliance, and/or a direct opt out of Outbrain through Outbrain’s privacy policy. If an End User has opted out of behavioral advertising through a mechanism alerting Publisher (instead of Outbrain), such as device settings, Publisher must not pass Outbrain such End User’s advertiser ID or other identifying mechanism. T
he provisions of the
Data Processing Agreement
shall be incorporated into, and form part of, this Agreement.
LICENSE TERMS
During the Term and subject to Partner’s full compliance with all of the terms of the Agreement, Outbrain grants Partner a limited, non-exclusive, revocable, non-sublicensable, non-transferable licence to  display the Recommendations on Partner Inventory in the form and format provided.
Outbrain grants Partner, during the Term, a limited, worldwide, non-exclusive, royalty-free licence to use and display Outbrain’s trademarks, service marks and logos (collectively, “Outbrain Marks”), strictly in accordance with Partner’s obligations and rights in the Agreement. All goodwill arising out of Partner’s use of any of the Outbrain Marks shall inure solely to the benefit of Outbrain. Outbrain shall have the right to refer to Partner and Partner Inventory in any general listing of advertisers or partners (including in marketing and sales materials). Notwithstanding the foregoing, each party will request prior written consent before issuing a press release regarding the Agreement or using the other party’s name on its website other than in accordance with the Agreement.
As between the parties: (a) Outbrain retains all right, title and interest in and to the Outbrain Marks, Data, and Content displayed on or made available by the Unified Auction Service (excluding any Content from the Partner Inventory which shall be owned by Partner); and (b) Partner retains all right, title and interest in and to the Partner Inventory including the look and feel, excluding the items described in subparagraph (a) above, (including without limitation all intellectual property rights in them).
The licences granted under the Agreement are specifically set forth in the Agreement; there are no implied rights. All rights not expressly granted to Partner in the Agreement are reserved by Outbrain.
PROHIBITED ACTIVITY
Partner will not deploy Advertiser Recs on any properties that display adult, obscene, pornographic, defamatory, libelous, infringing, abusive, or illegal Content, that promotes hate or discrimination, facilitates the sale of firearms or illegal drugs, or that participates or encourages participation in, illegal activities or is directed at children under of the age of 16.
Except as expressly and unambiguously authorised under the Agreement, Partner will not copy, rent, lease, sell, transfer, assign, sublicense, disassemble, reverse engineer or decompile (except to the limited extent expressly authorised by applicable statutory law), modify or alter any part of the Technology or otherwise use the Technology on behalf of or for the benefit of any third party.
TERMINATION
Either party may terminate the Agreement at any time in the event of a material breach by the other party of any provision of the Agreement that remains uncured for seven (7) days after the breaching party’s receipt of written notice of the breach.
The Agreement is terminable on thirty (30) days prior written notice unless otherwise stated on the Partner Enrollment Form. Upon expiration or termination of the Agreement, all rights and obligations of the parties under the Agreement will be extinguished, except that Sections 8, 9 & 11 of the Terms will survive termination, as well as any other terms of this Agreement which, by their nature should survive termination, and continue to bind the parties.
LIMITED WARRANTIES; INDEMNITY
Each party represents and warrants to the other that: (i) it has all right, power, and authority necessary to enter into the Agreement and perform its obligations under it; and (ii) it will comply with all applicable laws, regulations and orders in its performance of the Agreement.
Partner represents and warrants that the Partner Inventory does not and will not contain any Content that is: (i) illegal; (ii) infringes any Intellectual Property Right of any third party; (iii) is obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous material or material that violates any person’s right of publicity, privacy or personality; or (iv) knowingly contains a misrepresentation of fact or factual inaccuracy.
Nothing in the Agreement shall be construed as a promise of any sort of minimum traffic volumes, clicks, impressions or usage or any other such commitments by Outbrain to Partner.
Except as expressly provided in the Agreement, neither party makes any representations or warranties, express or implied in relation to the Agreement, the Partner Inventory, any Content made available by Outbrain or any other matters (including any implied terms relating to satisfactory quality or fitness for any purpose, any warranties of availability or uninterrupted or error free performance, any warranties arising out of any course of performance or dealing).
Outbrain makes no representations or warranties concerning any Content, including without limitation Advertiser Recs, and Outbrain will not be responsible or liable for the contents, accuracy, intellectual property infringement, legality or decency of or for Partner’s reliance on any of the foregoing.
Each party (the “Indemnifying Party”) shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless the other party and its parent and affiliates, and each of its and their respective affiliates, directors, officers, shareholders, members, authorised representatives, employees and agents (collectively, the “Indemnified Party”) from and against any and all claims, losses, liabilities, damages, costs, settlements, regulatory findings and/or fines
and other expenses (including reasonable legal fees) (collectively, “Claims”) that arise out of any third party claim occasioned by any breach or alleged breach of any of the Indemnifying Party’s representations, warranties and obligations of the Agreement. The Indemnified Party shall promptly notify the Indemnifying Party of any Claim in writing, provided, however, that any delay in providing such notice shall not relieve the Indemnifying Party of any of its obligations except to the extent that the Indemnifying Party is actually prejudiced by such delay. The Indemnified Party shall have the right to participate in the defence and settlement of the Claim with counsel of its own choosing and its own expense, subject to the Indemnifying Party’s control thereof.
CONFIDENTIALITY
Each party (the “Receiving Party”) acknowledges that it will have access to certain information and materials, including the terms of the Agreement, concerning the business, technology, products and services of the other party (the “Disclosing Party”) that are, or reasonably should be considered given the circumstances of disclosure to be, confidential (“Confidential Information”). Confidential Information will not include: (a) information known to the Receiving Party prior to disclosure by the Disclosing Party; (b) information independently developed by the Receiving Party without reference to Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party; (c) information that is or becomes publicly known through no fault of the Receiving Party; or (d) information disclosed to the Receiving Party by a third party without breach of any obligation of confidence. Except as permitted hereunder, the Receiving Party (aa) will not use any Confidential Information for its own account or the account of any third party, and (bb) will not disclose any Confidential Information to any third party other than its directors, employees, contractors, advisors, investors or potential investors who have a need to know and who have agreed not to use, and to maintain the confidentiality of, the Confidential Information consistent with this Section 7. The Receiving Party will return or destroy the Confidential Information promptly upon the Disclosing Party’s written request. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Receiving Party may disclose Confidential Information to the extent required by applicable law or legal process, provided that the Receiving Party provides prompt written notice of any required disclosure to the Disclosing Party and provides reasonable cooperation (at the Disclosing Party’s expense) with any effort by the Disclosing Party to contest or limit the scope of such disclosure.
LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
Neither Outbrain nor the Partner exclude or limit liability to the other for: (i) death or personal injury caused by its negligence or that of its employees or contractors; (ii) fraud or fraudulent misrepresentation; or (iii) any other liability which cannot lawfully be excluded or limited.
EXCEPT IN CONNECTION WITH A PARTY’S INDEMNIFICATION OBLIGATIONS HEREUNDER, NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE FOR ANY SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE AGREEMENT OR ANY BREACH HEREOF (INCLUDING FOR LOSS OF DATA OR COST OF COVER), WHETHER OR NOT SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES, AND WHETHER UNDER A THEORY OF CONTRACT, TORT (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE) OR OTHERWISE.
EXCEPT FOR A PARTY’S INDEMNIFICATION OBLIGATIONS HEREUNDER OR LIABILITIES ARISING OUT OF A PARTY’S VIOLATION, MISAPPROPRIATION OR INFRINGEMENT OF A PARTY’S INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS, IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S AGGREGATE LIABILITY ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE AGREEMENT OR ANY BREACH HEREOF (WHETHER UNDER A THEORY OF CONTRACT, TORT (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE), WARRANTY OR OTHERWISE) EXCEED THE GREATER OF ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS ($100,000) OR THE AMOUNT OF ADJUSTED GROSS REVENUE PAID OR PAYABLE TO THE PARTNER IN THE 12-MONTH PERIOD IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO LIABILITY (OR, IN THE CASE OF A SERIES OF CONNECTED EVENTS, THE FIRST SUCH EVENT).
EXPORT CONTROLS
Partner will comply with all export laws and restrictions and regulations of the Department of Commerce, the United States Department of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control ("OFAC"), or other United States or foreign agency or authority, and shall not export, or allow the export or re-export of the Unified Auction Service in violation of any such restrictions, laws or regulations. Partner agrees to the foregoing and represent and warrants that it is not located in, under the control of, or a national or resident of any restricted country. Partner represents and warrants that none of it, or any individual, entity, or organisation holding any ownership interest or controlling interest in Partner, including any officer or director, is an individual, entity, organisation with whom any United States law, regulation, or executive order prohibits U.S. companies and individuals from dealing, including, names appearing on the Specially Designated Nationals List.
MISCELLANEOUS
The Agreement shall be interpreted and construed in accordance with and governed by the laws of the State of New York, without regard to its conflict of law provisions or the United Nations Conventions for the International Sale of Goods. Any action or proceeding arising from or relating to the Agreement must be brought in a federal court in the Southern District of New York or in state court in New York County, New York, and each party irrevocably submits to the jurisdiction and venue of any such court in any such action or proceeding. The parties agree that irreparable damage would occur in the event that any of the provisions of the Agreement is not performed in accordance with these specific terms. Accordingly, the parties agree that each shall be entitled to injunctive relief to prevent breaches of the Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions of the Agreement, in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or in equity. The parties are independent contractors, and nothing in the Agreement will be construed to create a partnership, joint venture, agency or other relationship between the parties. No failure or forbearance by a party to enforce any of its rights under the Agreement or insist upon performance of the other party’s obligations under the Agreement will be deemed a waiver of such rights or obligations to any extent, and no waiver by either party of any default or breach of the Agreement will constitute a waiver of any other or subsequent default or breach. Neither party will be liable for any failure to perform due to causes beyond the party's reasonable control. The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties concerning its subject matter and supersedes all prior or contemporaneous agreements or understandings, written or oral, concerning such subject matter. The Partner Enrollment Form may be amended, modified or superseded, only by a written instrument signed by both parties. The headings in the Agreement are for the convenience of reference only and have no legal effect. The Agreement may be executed and delivered via electronic transmission or another means of complete and accurate reproduction, and copies of the Agreement delivered via such means will be deemed originals for all purposes. The Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original, but all of which together will constitute one and the same instrument. If any provision of the Agreement is held to be unenforceable for any reason, such provision shall be reformed only to the extent necessary to make it enforceable, failing which, it shall be severed from the Agreement and the balance of the Agreement shall continue in full force and effect. Neither party may assign the Agreement or any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the other party’s prior written consent, except (i) due to operation of law, merger, reorganization, or as a result of an acquisition or change of control, and (ii) by Outbrain to its subsidiaries. Subject to the foregoing, the Agreement will be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties and their permitted successors and assigns.
Effective February 16th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
Please note that Outbrain list of trusted partners has moved here:
https://www.outbrain.com/privacy/outbrain-trusted-partners/
Effective June 16th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
This Data Sharing Agreement (“
DSA
”) is entered into by the Outbrain entity (“
Outbrain
”) and the individual or company (the “
Customer
”) identified in the Insertion Order (governed by the applicable
Amplify Terms and Conditions
) between the parties from time to time (together, the “
Terms
”) and/or using the Dashboard and governs the processing of Personal Data pursuant to the provision of the Service by Outbrain. This DSA shall apply to any and all agreements between the parties and their Affiliates from time to time.
This DSA is incorporated into the Terms (as amended from time to time) and constitutes a legally binding agreement between the parties. Collectively, the Controller SCCs (as applicable), the DSA and the Terms (or information entered through the Dashboard) are referred to as the “
Agreement
”.  In the event of any conflict or inconsistency between any of the terms of the Agreement the following order of precedence shall prevail: (i) the Controller SCCs (as applicable); (ii) this DSA; and (iii) the Terms.
Any capitalized terms not defined in this DSA shall have the respective meanings given to them in the Terms.
1. DEFINITIONS.
1.1. “
Affiliate(s)
” means in respect of either party at any time, any person or legal entity controlled by or controlling or under the common control of that party. Any reference to the parties shall include reference to their Affiliates;
1.2. “
Controller SCCs
” means the standard data protection clauses “MODULE ONE: Transfer controller to controller” in accordance with article 46 2. (c) GDPR adopted by the European Commission on 4 June 2021 (Commission Implementing Decision (EU) 2021/914) (as amended or superseded), containing contractual obligations on the Data Exporter and the Data Importer, and rights for EEA Data Subjects whose Personal Data is transferred, as amended or superseded from time to time by the European Commission;
1.3. “
Data Protection Laws
” means all laws, guidance or codes of practice issued by a relevant public authority applicable from time to time to Outbrain or Customer relating to the processing of Personal Data and the privacy of electronic communications, including U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws and EU Data Protection Laws, the Brazilian General Data Protection Law (LGPD), Federal Law no. 13,709/2018 and the Japanese Act on the Protection of Personal Information;
1.4. “
EEA
” means the European Economic Area;
1.5. “
End Users
” means Data Subjects or Consumers who use the Service across the Network;
1.6. "
EU Data Protection Laws
" means all laws, guidance or codes of practice issued by a relevant Supervisory Authority (including, in the UK, the Information Commissioner’s Office (“ICO”)) applicable from time to time to Outbrain or Customer relating to the processing of Personal Data and the privacy of electronic communications in the EEA and the UK as amended or superseded, especially (i) the General Data Protection Regulation ((EU) 2016/679) (GDPR) and the UK Data Protection Act 2018; (ii) the Privacy and Electronic Communications Directive 2002/58/EC (as updated by Directive 2009/136/EC) (ePrivacy Directive) and the UK Privacy and Electronic Communications Regulations 2003 (SI 2003 No. 2426) (PECR) as updated;  (iii) the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection 1992;
1.7.
“
Outbrain Pixel Data
” means the Personal Data which Outbrain may collect when the Customer implements the Outbrain Pixel on Customer’s website(s) or application(s) for the purpose of providing measurement services related to Customer’s campaign(s);
1.8.
“
Third Party Targeting
” means segments built independently by Customer or its third party partners, which the Customer shares with Outbrain for enhanced targeting of End Users;
1.9. “
UK Adequacy Decision
” means the Commission Implementing Decision of 28 June 2021 on the adequate protection of Personal Data by the United Kingdom in accordance with article 45 GDPR;
1.10. “
U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws
” means the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020, the Colorado Privacy Act of 2021, the Connecticut Data Privacy Act of 2022, the Indiana Consumer Data Protection Act of 2023, the Iowa Consumer Data Protection Act of 2023, the Montana Consumer Data Privacy Act of 2023, the Tennessee Information Protection Act of 2023, the Utah Consumer Privacy Act of 2022, the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act  of 2021 and all other U.S. privacy laws, guidance or codes of practice issued by a relevant public authority applicable from time to time to Outbrain or Customer relating to the processing of Personal Information and the privacy of electronic communications, as amended or superseded by any federal, state or national law, regulation or regulatory guidance;
1.11. "
Controller
", “
Joint Controller
”, "
Processor
", “
Data Protection Impact Assessment
”, "
Data Subject
", “
Personal Data Breach
”, "
Special Categories of Personal Data
" and “
Supervisory Authority
” shall have the meanings given in EU Data Protection Laws;
1.12. “
sale
” (including the terms “sell,” “selling,” “sold,” and other variations thereof, including renting, disclosing, releasing, disseminating, making available, transferring, or otherwise communicating Personal Information for monetary or other valuable consideration), “
Consumer
”, “
Business
”, “
Third Party
” and “
Service Provider
” shall have the meanings given to those terms under U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws, as applicable; and
1.13. “
Personal Data
” (and any variation thereof, including “Personal Information” U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws) and “
process
” (including “processing”), shall have the meaning given under the applicable Data Protection Laws.
2. PURPOSE OF PROCESSING.
Where implemented by Customer, Outbrain processes Outbrain Pixel Data for the purposes of providing aggregated analytics related to the performance of the Customer’s campaign(s) and/or for enhanced targeting functionality.
3. U.S. CONSUMER PRIVACY LAWS AND EU DATA PROTECTION LAWS SPECIFIC PROVISIONS.
3.1. Specific provisions applicable to
U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws
are located in
Sections 4.2, 5.3 and 5.4 (ii)
.
3.2. Specific provisions applicable to EU Data protection Laws are located in
Sections 4.3, 5.4 (i) and 11
.
4. ROLE OF PARTIES.
4.1. Each party shall comply with all relevant provisions of Data Protection Laws as it applies to matters under the Agreement and ensure that they process Personal Data fairly and lawfully in accordance with Data Protection Laws as applicable in the provision and receipt of the Service.
4.2. Insofar as  U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws are applicable to the Service, Outbrain and Customer will be considered independent Businesses for the collection, processing and selling of any Personal Information, and no party shall be considered a Service Provider on anyone’s behalf, unless as strictly required under applicable U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws. In such case, the
IAB Multi-State Privacy Agreement
(the most recent version or successor thereto) shall be incorporated by reference into this DSA and shall govern the relationship between the parties with Customer as Business and Outbrain as Service Provider exclusively in respect of opted out traffic in the U.S., as applicable.
4.3.
Insofar as EU Data Protection Laws are applicable to the Service, the parties shall be deemed Joint Controllers under Article 26 GDPR solely with regards to the implementation of Outbrain Pixel by Customer, and the parties shall be deemed independent Controllers for any other processing activity. In particular, the Customer shall strictly remain independent controller for any Third Party Targeting.
4.4. Each party shall remain solely and exclusively responsible for determining the means and purposes of processing for its respective processing activities.
5. CUSTOMER’S OBLIGATIONS.
5.1.
Customer represents and warrants that its use of Pixels or Third Party Targeting shall, at all times, be compliant with Data Protection Laws and satisfy the requirements for an appropriate legal basis for processing.
5.2.
Customer shall not, at any time, use Pixels or Third Party Targeting: (i) for discriminatory purposes; (ii) to target minors under the age of sixteen(16); (iii) based on Special Categories of Personal Data; (iv) based on Personal Data relating to alleged or confirmed criminal convictions or offenses; or (v) otherwise in violation of any applicable law in any country where the campaign is performed.
5.3.
Customer shall disclose to End Users, via an appropriate privacy notice, that it uses Third Party Targeting and/or Pixels, including an explanation that third parties, including Outbrain, may use cookies or similar technologies to collect or receive Personal Data from Customer’s website(s) or application(s), and may use that Personal Data for the purposes detailed in
Section 2
. Such privacy notice shall offer to End Users, as applicable, a consent or opt out choice mechanism regarding the collection and sharing of their Personal Data with third parties, including Outbrain (including, under U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws, a “Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” or equivalent opt out option) in compliance with applicable Data Protection Laws.
5.4. When implementing Outbrain Pixel on their website(s) or application(s), Customer shall, either:
(i) Insofar as EU Data Protection Laws are applicable to the Service, use a consent management platform using the IAB Transparency & Consent Framework v2.2 (the most recent version or successor thereto) and pass Outbrain valid “consent”/”no consent” strings; or
(ii) Insofar as U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws are applicable to the Service, collect “Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” or equivalent opt out choices via a consent management platform using the IAB Global Privacy Platform (the most recent version or successor thereto) and pass Outbrain valid “yes”/”no” strings; or
(iii) Where the Customer does not use any of the above consent management platforms, if an End User opted out or withdrew their consent to personalized advertising via Customer’s website(s) or a mechanism such as a setting within a Customer’s application(s), Customer shall be fully responsible for not loading the Outbrain Pixel.
5.5. Customer shall be fully responsible to ensure that no more Personal Data than necessary is shared with Outbrain via the Outbrain Pixel.
6. OUTBRAIN’S OBLIGATIONS.
6.1. Outbrain shall disclose, via an appropriate privacy notice, all information relating to processing activities where the Personal Data is collected directly from the End User or where such Personal Data is collected via third parties, as required under Data Protection Laws. This information is available on
Outbrain’s Privacy Policy
.
6.2. Outbrain shall at all times satisfy the requirements for an appropriate legal basis for the processing of Personal Data.
6.3. Outbrain shall enter into appropriate contractual arrangements with its publishers or third party partners, requiring all parties to comply with Data Protection Laws.
6.4. Outbrain shall comply with requests from End Users to exercise their rights under relevant Data Protection Laws, without undue delay and within the required time limits. Requests relating to right to access, erasure, withdrawing consent, objecting to profiling, or ”Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” can be exercised directly on
Outbrain Interest Profile
.
7. COOPERATION.
7.1. Each party shall develop, implement, and regularly review procedures to ensure they meet their respective obligations under Data Protection Laws.
7.2. Each party shall immediately inform the other party if any activity pursuant to the Agreement infringes any part of Data Protection Laws, and the parties shall review such activity accordingly. If during the term, Data Protection Laws change in a way that this DSA is no longer adequate for performing the processing activities necessary to the Terms, the parties agree to promptly negotiate in good faith to review this DSA in light of such changes.
7.3. In the event that either party receives any correspondence, enquiry or complaint from an End User, Supervisory Authority or any other third party related to the disclosure or processing of Personal Data pursuant to this DSA, or requests information from the other party when performing a Data Protection Impact Assessment, it shall promptly inform the other party giving full details of the same, and the other party shall provide such assistance as reasonably required (at each party’s sole cost and expense) and in good faith in order to respond in accordance with any requirements under Data Protection Laws.
8. DATA SECURITY.
8.1. Each party shall implement and maintain such appropriate technical and organizational measures as required by Data Protection Laws to ensure that the Personal Data is processed in a secure manner, including (but not limited to) (i) the pseudonymization and encryption of Personal Data; (ii) ensuring the confidentiality, integrity, availability and resilience of the services provided under the Agreement, including the ability to restore availability of, and access to, Personal Data in a timely manner in the event of a physical or technical incident; (iii) a process for regularly testing, assessing and evaluating the effectiveness of technical and organizational measures for ensuring the security of the processing; and (iv) regularly carrying information security risk assessments that take account of risk of accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure of, or access to, Personal Data.
8.2. An overview of Outbrain’s appropriate technical and organizational security measures are described on
Outbrain’s Security page
.
8.3. Upon becoming aware of a suspected or confirmed Personal Data Breach or Security Incident involving Outbrain Pixel Data collected pursuant to this DSA, each party shall notify the other party without any undue delay, and provide such assistance as reasonably required to allow the other party to comply with its respective obligations under Data Protection Laws.
9. PERSONNEL.
Each party shall be responsible for ensuring that staff members are appropriately trained to handle and process the Personal Data in accordance with their internal technical and organizational security measures, where relevant, together with Data Protection Laws, and have entered into confidentiality agreements relating to the processing of Personal Data.
10. PROCESSORS – SERVICE PROVIDERS.
Each party shall remain independently responsible for appointing its respective Processors and/or Service Providers in accordance with Data Protection Laws.
11. INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS.
11.1. Insofar as Personal Data is collected from End Users located within the territory of the EEA or the UK by either party during the course of the Agreement, neither party shall process any Personal Data (nor permit any Personal Data to be processed) in a country outside of the EEA or the UK unless: (i) that country has been designated by the European Commission or the ICO (as applicable) as providing an adequate level of protection for Personal Data; or (ii) it has taken such measures as necessary to ensure the transfer is compliant with EU Data Protection Laws.
11.2. The parties agree that for the purposes of any transfer of Personal Data from Customer to Outbrain collected within the EEA to the UK, the requirements of the clause above shall be fully satisfied by the UK Adequacy Decision.
11.3. Outbrain shall be responsible for the onward transfer of Personal Data from the UK to any third party country outside of the EEA as required by (a) the UK Adequacy Decision and/or (b) EU Data Protection Laws, as applicable.
11.4. Within its Affiliates, Outbrain has entered into adequate intragroup data sharing agreements including supplementary measures complying with all requirements of EU Data Protection Laws, which consist of (i) encryption in transit and encryption of UUIDs at rest which can only be decrypted with a private key stored in the EU; (ii) pseudonymization; and (iii) not having received any legally binding request from a public authority, including judicial authorities, under the laws of the country of destination and not being aware of any direct access by public authorities.
11.5. In the event that the UK Adequacy Decision as the lawful ground for international transfers from the EEA to third party countries is no longer applicable, the parties agree that the Controller SCCs shall be incorporated by reference into this DSA and shall govern any international transfer of Personal Data outside of the EEA. For the purpose of the Controller SCCs, the parties fully agree that:
(i) Customer is the "Data Exporter" and Outbrain, the "Data Importer";
(ii) Clause 7 “Docking clause” is deleted;
(iii) The OPTION under Clause 11 “Redress” is deleted;
(iv) Clause 17 “Governing Law” is completed with “Republic of Ireland”
(v) Clause 18 (b) “Choice of forum and jurisdiction” is completed with “Dublin, Republic of Ireland”;
(vi) Annex I to the Controller SCCs shall be deemed to have been completed with Annex I to this DSA; and
(vii) Annex II to the Controller SCCs shall be deemed to have been completed by
Outbrain’s Security page
.
12. TERM AND TERMINATION
. This DSA shall commence on the Effective Date and shall continue as long as Customer uses the Service.
13. DATA RETENTION.
Outbrain shall not retain any individual data point collected in relation to the Outbrain Pixel for longer than 13 months, unless it constitutes anonymous data.
14. MISCELLANEOUS.
14.1. Neither party shall be in breach of this DSA nor liable for delay in performing, or failure to perform, any of its obligations under the Agreement if such delay or failure results from events, circumstances or causes beyond its reasonable control.
14.2. Failure or delay in exercising any right or remedy under this DSA shall not constitute a waiver of such (or any other) right or remedy under this DSA, the Agreement or Data Protection Laws.
14.3. Customer shall not assign or otherwise transfer its rights or its obligations under this Agreement, in whole or in part, without the prior written consent of Outbrain.
14.4. Except as expressly stated otherwise and to the extent applicable under Data Protection Laws, nothing in this DSA shall create or confer any rights or other benefits in favor of any person other than a party to this DSA.
14.5. The invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability of any term of this DSA shall not affect the remainder of the DSA.
14.6. This DSA shall be governed by the laws specified in the Insertion Order.
ANNEX I
Description of Processing Activities
This Annex forms part of the DSA and describes the processing of Personal Data by Outbrain. When Section 11.5 of the DSA applies, Annex I to the Controller SCCs shall be deemed to have been completed with this Annex.
A. LIST OF PARTIES
Data Exporter:
Customer name, address and contact details as stated in the Insertion Order.
Activities relevant to the data transferred: Digital services or media delivered through a website or mobile application on which Customer has ownership and control.
Joint Controller (collection whenever Outbrain Pixel is implemented by Customer) and independent Controller (any other processing).
Data Importer:
Outbrain with address and contact details as stated in the Insertion Order.
Activities relevant to the data transferred: Digital advertising services.
Joint Controller (collection whenever Outbrain Pixel is implemented by Customer) and independent Controller (any other processing).
B. DESCRIPTION OF TRANSFER
Categories of Data Subjects whose Personal Data is transferred:
End Users (Data Subjects who visit or use Customer’s website or application pages or interact with Customer’s campaigns served by Outbrain).
Categories of Personal Data transferred:
Outbrain unique identifier in cookie (if present)
IP address
User Agent data, browser and device type (desktop/mobile, brand, model, operating system and system version), application version, application ID or package name)
Device advertising identifiers
Pages, content visited and events
Time of visit
Broad location
Device time zone
Sensitive data transferred:
No Special Categories of Personal Data are transferred.
Frequency of the transfer:
Whenever Outbrain Pixel is implemented and loaded on events determined by Customer, or whenever Customer shares Third Party Targeting with Outbrain.
Nature of the processing:
Receiving data, including collection, accessing, retrieval, recording, and data entry;
Holding data, including storage, organization and structuring;
Using data, including analyzing, consultation, testing, automated decision making and profiling;
Updating data, including correcting, adaptation, alteration, alignment and combination;
Protecting data, including restricting, encrypting, and security testing;
Sharing data, including disclosure, dissemination, allowing access or otherwise making available;
Returning data to the Data Exporter or Data Subject;
Erasing data, including destruction and deletion.
Purpose(s) of the data transfer and further processing:
Digital advertising services, which include include providing aggregated analytics related to the performance of the Customer’s campaign(s) and/or for enhanced targeting functionality.
Retention period:
An individual data point is retained for no longer than
13 months.
Recipients:
The subject matter, nature and duration can be found on the
Outbrain Trusted Partners page
.
C. COMPETENT SUPERVISORY AUTHORITY
In the UK: The Information Commissioner’s Office.
In the EEA: The Supervisory Authority of the Member State of the Customer’s Registered Address as stated in the Insertion Order, or, if not applicable, the Supervisory Authority of the Member State in which the Data Subjects whose Personal Data is transferred under this Agreement in relation to the Service are located.
Effective July 26th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
1.
Definitions.
Capitalized terms have the following meanings: (a) "Goods" means the goods, software, services and other items supplied or to be supplied under this Purchase Order (if any); (b) "Project" means all Goods and Services; (c) " “Buyer” means the entity specified as the Buyer on the first page of this Purchase Order; (d) "Services" mean the services provided or to be provided under this Purchase Order (if any); (e) “Statement of Work” means the document specifying, without limitation, the scope, objective, and time frame of Project that Supplier will perform for Buyer; (f) "Supplier” means the individual or entity specified as the supplier or vendor; (g) “PO Terms and Conditions” means the terms herein; and (h) “Affiliates” means, with respect to a particular person, any entity that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with such person.  The rights and obligations of Buyer in this agreement may only be waived or modified by Buyer, and this must be in writing.
2.
Purchase Order.
The Purchase Order, the PO Terms and Conditions, and any attachments and exhibits, specifications, drawings, notes, instructions and other information, whether physically attached or incorporated by reference (collectively the “Purchase Order”), constitutes the entire agreement between the Buyer and the Supplier. The Purchase Order does not constitute a “firm offer” within the meaning of Section 2-205 of the Uniform Commercial Code or any other laws or regulations with similar effect and may be revoked at any time prior to acceptance.
3.
Acceptance of deliverables.
Deliverables or services will be subject to inspection, test, acceptance or rejection in accordance with the acceptance or completion criteria as specified in the relevant Statement of Work ("SOW”) and/or work authorization. Buyer or Buyer's customer may, at its option, either reject deliverables or services that do not comply with the acceptance or completion criteria for a refund, or require Supplier, upon Buyer's written instruction, to repair or replace such deliverables or re-perform such services without charge and in a timely manner.
4.
Acceptance of the Terms.
Supplier will be deemed to have accepted the PO Terms and Conditions upon the earliest of (a) Supplier’ delivering/shipping the Goods to Buyer or invoicing the Buyer for such Goods, (b) Supplier starting performance of the Services or invoicing the Buyer for such Services, or (c) Supplier’s acceptance of this Purchase Order by other commercially acceptable means.
5.
Supplier Forms.
The Supplier may use its standard business forms to administer the Project under the PO Terms and Conditions, but use of such forms is for Supplier’s convenience only and does not alter the Purchase Order or the PO Terms and Conditions. BUYER WILL NOT BE BOUND BY, AND SPECIFICALLY, OBJECTS TO, ANY TERMS OR CONDITIONS THAT ARE DIFFERENT FROM, INCONSISTENT WITH, OR IN ADDITION TO THESE PO TERMS AND CONDITIONS, UNLESS THE BUYER (a) SPECIFICALLY AGREES TO SUCH TERM OR CONDITION IN A WRITING SIGNED BY BUYER AND (b) ACKNOWLEDGES IN THAT WRITING THAT SUCH TERM OR CONDITION REPLACES, OR IS IN ADDITION, TO THE TERMS OR CONDITIONS IN THESE PO TERMS AND CONDITIONS.
6.
Price and Payment.
Unless expressly stated in the Purchase Order, the price specified in the Purchase Order is inclusive of all applicable taxes, freight, packaging, insurance, handling, permits, approvals, licenses and other charges. Prices are not subject to increases or additional charges for any reason; however, Buyer will receive the benefit of any general reduction in Supplier’s prices prior to delivery. Discount periods, if applicable, will commence on the date shipment is received or accepted by Buyer or the date of receipt of invoice, whichever is later. Supplier will separately invoice Buyer (a) for each shipment of Goods, (b) in accordance with any schedule agreed to by Buyer (monthly, quarterly, etc.) and (c) for each milestone payment agreed to by Buyer. If no milestones or schedules have been agreed, Supplier will invoice at the completion of all Services under this Purchase Order. Supplier’s invoice will reference only the relevant Purchase Order and the amounts due thereunder (and no other purchase orders or other amounts due). Unless different payment terms are expressly stated on the purchase order, payment terms shall be net sixty (60) days from the later of: a) the Delivery Date; b) the date of Buyer’s acceptance of the Goods, Services, or Deliverables; or c) Buyer's receipt of Seller's correctly presented invoice. A "correctly presented invoice” will contain the purchase order number sent electronically to Outbrain via its designated invoicing portal or inbox.
7.
Taxes
. Each party will be responsible for identifying, paying and reporting to the relevant authorities all taxes and other governmental fees and charges (and any penalties, interest, and other charges) that are imposed on that party or otherwise required by the transactions governed by this Purchase Order. Supplier may charge and Buyer will pay applicable national, state or local sales or use taxes, value added taxes (“VAT”), or goods and services taxes or similar transaction taxes (“GST”) that Supplier is legally obligated to pay to governmental authorities (collectively, “Taxes”). Supplier’s original invoice to Buyer must state those Taxes separately and meet the requirements for a compliant tax invoice. Supplier will submit to Buyer a valid invoice for VAT, GST and similar Taxes, and comply with all applicable tax filing requirements with respect to payments under this Purchase Order. Buyer may withhold payment until Supplier provides invoices that comply with this Section 7. Buyer may provide Supplier with an exemption certificate or equivalent information acceptable to the relevant taxing authority, in which case, Supplier will not charge or collect the Taxes covered by that certificate. Buyer may deduct or withhold any Taxes that Buyer may be legally obligated to deduct or withhold from any amounts payable to Supplier under this Purchase Order, and payment to Supplier as reduced by those deductions or withholdings will constitute full payment and settlement to Supplier of amounts payable under this Purchase Order. Supplier will provide Buyer with any forms, documents, or certifications as may be required for Buyer to satisfy any information reporting or withholding tax obligations, and to establish Supplier’s compliance with applicable tax filing requirements, with respect to any payments under this Purchase Order.
8.
Cancellation and Modifications.
Buyer may terminate or modify all or any portion of this Purchase Order prior to shipment of any Goods or Supplier’s commencement of performance of Services at no charge and without liability by giving Supplier written notice of such termination or change. Buyer may terminate or modify this Purchase Order for any Goods after shipment and prior to Buyer’s acceptance of such Goods, and Buyer will pay only the shipping expenses for returning such Goods to Supplier’s shipping location and incur no further charge or liability. Upon cancellation of a Purchase Order related to Services after Supplier has commenced performance of such Services, Supplier will promptly terminate the Services and Buyer is only liable to pay for Services performed and liabilities incurred prior to cancellation (except that if the specified fees are a fixed amount, Buyer will pay a pro rata fee to the extent the Services are complete). Upon cancellation, Supplier will promptly deliver to Buyer, without request, all deliverables, Work Product and other items, and all data, reports, summaries, estimates, and any other information or materials as Supplier may have collected or created in performing Services. Supplier is not entitled to payment under any outstanding invoice until delivery of the foregoing items to Buyer is complete.
9.
Audit.
Buyer may upon reasonable notice and during normal business hours examine and make copies of all books and records relating to the Project or, if applicable, make a physical inspection of Supplier’s premises relating to Supplier’s performance of its obligations under the Purchase Order. Supplier will provide reasonable assistance in collecting and reporting data requested by Buyer for the purposes of investigation or audit. For a period of three years after Buyer makes its last payment due under this Purchase Order, or such time frame as required by applicable law, Supplier will keep (in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards), and Buyer may (upon five business days’ notice and during normal business hours) examine, undertake an audit of, and make copies of, all books and records relating to this Purchase Order. If any audit reveals that Supplier has failed to comply with any material obligation under this Purchase Order, Supplier will cure the noncompliance within thirty (30) days of the audit.
10.
Intellectual Property and Other Indemnifications.
Supplier grants Buyer all rights and licenses necessary for Buyer (including Buyer's parent, subsidiaries, or other related legal entities) to use, assign, pass- through, and sell the products or services specified in the PO and to exercise the rights granted under the PO. Supplier agrees to defend, hold harmless, and indemnify Buyer from any claim that Supplier's product or service infringes any intellectual property rights or any claim arising from the failure of Supplier to comply with its warranties and obligations under the PO. If a claim of infringement is made, Supplier will, at its own expense, exercise the first of the following remedies that is practicable:
a) obtain for Buyer the rights granted under the PO;
b) modify the products or services so they are non- infringing and in compliance with the PO;
c) replace the products or services with non-infringing ones that comply with the PO or accept the return of infringing products and the cancellation of infringing services and refund any amount paid. Buyer may return non-conforming goods to Supplier at Supplier's expense.
d) ensure that all authors waive all their rights to the products and services integrity and to be associated with them as authors.
11.
Confidential Information; Publicity.
Supplier and its Affiliates will comply with the terms of any nondisclosure agreement between Supplier (or any of Supplier’s Affiliates) and Buyer (or any of Buyer’s Affiliates) (the "NDA"). If no such agreement exists or the NDA has expired or is no longer in full force and effect, Supplier, its Affiliates and its Personnel will (a) keep confidential the terms and existence of this Purchase Order and all information obtained from Buyer that is identified as confidential or proprietary or that, given the nature of such information or the manner of its disclosure, reasonably should be considered confidential or proprietary and (b) use such information only for the purposes of this Purchase Order.
Buyer’s confidential information includes, without limitation, all supplies, blueprints, sketches, drawings, specifications and other technical or commercial information furnished by or developed for Buyer in connection with the Purchase Order, including Work Product of Supplier. All such information is Buyer’s exclusive property. Supplier will not use any trade name, trademark, service mark, logo or commercial symbol, or any other proprietary rights of Buyer or any of its Affiliates in any manner without prior written authorization. Supplier will not issue any press release or other publicity that relates to Buyer or its Affiliates or this Purchase Order, or reference Buyer or its Affiliates in any brochures, advertisements, client lists or other promotional materials.
12.
Product and Ownership of IP.
If Supplier delivers or is required to deliver to Buyer any deliverable in connection with the Project that is work product, including but not limited to concepts, works, inventions, information, drawings, designs, specifications, customizations, documentation, programs, data, developments, hardware, software, or technology, in each case whether developed by Supplier or its Personnel, either alone or with others, and whether completed or in-progress (any and all of the foregoing, “Work Product”), Buyer owns all right, title and interest (including, but not limited to, all copyrights and any other intellectual property rights) in such Work Product and all precursor Work Product developed in connection with the Project. The Work Product has been specially ordered and commissioned by Buyer as "work made for hire” for copyright purposes. To the extent such deliverable does not so qualify as “work made for hire”, and to the extent such deliverable includes material subject to copyright, patent, trade secret, or any other proprietary right, Supplier hereby assigns to Buyer, its successors and assigns, all right, title and interest in and to the Work Product, including all proprietary rights therein. Supplier agrees to execute, acknowledge, deliver and cause to be duly filed all such further instruments and documents and to do all such other acts and things, as may be requested by Buyer from time to time to secure and preserve Buyer’s rights hereunder, or to enforce, defend or confirm Buyer’s right to exploit those rights. To the extent that ownership of Work Product cannot be transferred under applicable law, Supplier grants or undertakes to procure the grant to the Buyer of a perpetual and irrevocable, royalty free, worldwide license to use any and all proprietary rights. Supplier will, at its own expense and as expeditiously as possible, perform all acts required to perfect any of the foregoing.
13.
Representations and Warranties.
Supplier represents and warrants that (a) the Project is free from defects in design, materials, workmanship and title; (b) the Goods are of good and suitable quality and that all materials and other items incorporated in the Goods will be new (not refurbished or reconditioned), unused and suitable for their intended purpose; (c) the Project does not, in whole or in part, violate, misappropriate or infringe any patent, trademark, trade secret, trade dress, copyright or other right of any third party; (d) the Goods conform to the applicable drawings, specifications, and descriptions provided to Buyer, the requirements of this Purchase Order and are of comparable quality as any samples delivered to Buyer; (e) any Services will be provided in a competent and workmanlike manner in accordance with the level of professional care customarily observed by highly skilled and experienced professionals rendering similar services; (f) the Project (including the provision of Services by the Supplier’s Personnel) complies with, and will comply with after delivery and acceptance by the Buyer, all applicable laws, rules regulations and other requirements of applicable governmental authorities, including all applicable health, safety and environmental regulations (including as would be applied to Buyer, upon Buyer’s use and enjoyment of the Project) and all immigration and work status laws and regulations; (g) Supplier and its Personnel will hold and fully comply with all required licenses, permits and approvals to carry out and complete the Project (including, but not by way of limitation, all statutory and regulatory consents and permissions). If the Project is or contains software, Supplier further represents and warrants that: (a) the software does not and will not contain any copy protection, automatic shut-down, lockout, "time bomb" or similar mechanisms that could interfere with Buyer’s or its Affiliates’ exercise of their rights hereunder, (b) the software does not and will not contain any viruses, “trojan horses” or other harmful code; and (c) the software is not subject to any license or other terms that require that other software or documentation incorporating or used with such software be disclosed or distributed in source code form, be licensed for the purpose of making derivative works, or be redistributable at no charge. Supplier further represents and warrants that Supplier and its financial institution(s) are not subject to sanctions or otherwise designated on any list of prohibited or restricted parties or owned or controlled by such a party, including but not limited to the lists maintained by the United Nations Security Council, the US Government (e.g., the US Department of Treasury’s Specially Designated Nationals list and Foreign Sanctions Evaders list and the US Department of Commerce’s Entity List), the European Union or its member states, or other applicable government authority. Supplier will not directly or indirectly export, re-export, transmit, or cause to be exported, re-exported or transmitted, any commodities, software or technology to any country, individual, corporation, organization, or entity to which such export, re-export, or transmission is restricted or prohibited, including any country, individual, corporation, organization, or entity under sanctions or embargoes administered by the United Nations, US Departments of State, Treasury or Commerce, the European Union, or any other applicable government authority.
14.
Defense and Indemnity.
Supplier will defend and indemnify Buyer from any loss, damage, settlement, cost, expense and any other liability (including but not limited to reasonable attorney fees) arising out of any third-party claim arising from, related to or alleging (a) the design, manufacture, possession, ownership, use, sale or transfer of the Project, (b) breach of any of Supplier’s representations, warranties or other obligations under this Purchase Order, (c) any act or omission of Supplier or its Personnel related to the Project, except to the extent caused by the gross negligence or willful misconduct of Buyer as determined by a final, non-appealable order of a court having jurisdiction. Supplier’s duty to defend is independent of its duty to indemnify and Supplier’s obligations under this Section are independent of any other obligation of Buyer under this Purchase Order. If Supplier performs Services on Buyer’s premises, in connection with any action to enforce Supplier’s obligations under this section related to any claim arising out of bodily injury (including death) to any person directly or indirectly employed by Supplier, Supplier waives any immunity, defense or protection under any workers' compensation, industrial insurance or similar laws and assumes liability for such claim. This paragraph will not be interpreted or construed as a waiver of Supplier’s right to assert any such immunity, defense or protection directly against any of its own employees or such employees’ estate or other representatives.
15.
Limitation of Liability.
To the extent permitted by local law in no event will Buyer (including Buyer's parent company, subsidiaries or other related legal entities) and any subcontractor of Buyer be liable for any lost revenues, lost profits, incidental, indirect or consequential or punitive damages.
16.
Notices.
All notices given under this Purchase Order must be delivered to the recipient’s address on the first page of this Purchase Order in written form, and in English, and will be effective when received. Email shall suffice.
17.
Data Protection.
Each Party shall comply with all relevant provisions of applicable privacy, data protection and information security laws and regulations as it applies to matters under theseTerms and ensure that they process personal data fairly and lawfully in accordance with such laws and regulations in the provision and receipt of personal data.
18.
Applicable Law.
This Purchase Order will be interpreted and enforced in accordance with the laws of the State of New York without regard to conflicts of laws and excluding the U.N. Convention on the Contracts for the International Sale of Goods. Supplier irrevocably consents to the jurisdiction of the courts of the State of New York and of the United States of America, in each case located in the County of New York, for any claim arising out of or relating to this Purchase Order. Supplier waives any objections to jurisdiction and venue in such courts. To the extent permitted by law, all proceedings will be conducted in the English language.
19.
Code of Conduct
.
Supplier agrees to be bound to Outbrain's Vendor Code of Conduct which can be found here https://www.outbrain.com/legal#vendor-code-of-conduct (as updated from time to time).
Effective November 15th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Vendor Code of Conduct
Introduction
The Outbrain Inc. (“
Outbrain
”) Vendor Code of Conduct (“
Code
”) describes Outbrain and Outbrain’s group companies (collectively, the “
Outbrain Group
”) expectations of how its vendors conduct business. All vendors engaged in providing products and services to the Outbrain Group are expected to act in accordance with the Code, including aligning guidelines, policies and practices, and communicating and enforcing the Code provisions throughout their organization and across their supply chain, including to subcontractors.
Vendor Code of Conduct
Ethical Business Practices
The Outbrain Group is committed to conducting our business in accordance with the highest ethical standards and in compliance with all applicable laws, rules and regulations. We expect our vendors to share our principles and uphold our standards and for each to develop policies and programs as appropriate to ensure that all workers understand and adhere to these standards.
Anti-Bribery
The Outbrain Group does not tolerate corruption or bribery in any form and we expect our vendors to fully comply with requirements of all applicable anti-corruption laws, including but not limited to the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and the UK Bribery Act. Vendors will not directly or indirectly give, offer, or accept anything of value to obtain or retain business or favored treatment, to influence actions or to obtain an improper advantage for the Outbrain Group itself, or any third party. This includes any benefit, fee, commission, dividend, gift, cash, gratuity, services, consideration or any inducements of any kind to any Outbrain Group representatives, officers, agents or employees of the Outbrain Group. Furthermore, vendors will ensure the same of any affiliates, retained agents, subcontractors, intermediaries or workers. This prohibition extends not only to public officials, candidates for office, and workers of state-owned enterprises, but also to workers or officers of counterparties, clients/customers, suppliers, any agent of the aforementioned parties, or any other person with whom the business does or anticipates doing business.
Outbrain is fully committed to the international fight against corruption and bribery as well as to compliance with applicable sanction regimes, antiboycott and trade restriction laws. Vendors must not engage in, support or tolerate any activity which infringes or circumvents applicable laws against corruption, bribery, money laundering or terror financing, applicable sanctions, antiboycott and trade restriction or which otherwise could be interpreted as an illegal activity. Additionally, Vendors must not engage with persons, countries or organizations listed on the sanctions lists issued by including but not limited to the European Union (“EU”), the United Nations (“UN”), the US Office of Foreign Assets Control (“OFAC”), the US Bureau of International Security and Non-Proliferation (“US-ISN”), the US Department of State (“US-DOS”), the US Treasury (“US-TREAS”), and the United Kingdom’s (UK) HM Treasury in addition to all other locally- and regionally-applicable lists, nor shall Vendors associate themselves with criminal activities.
Privacy and Data Protection
We expect our vendors to protect confidential information. Vendors must adopt and maintain processes to provide reasonable protections for personal, proprietary and confidential information, including information that they access, receive or process on behalf of the Outbrain Group. Vendors should recognize that unauthorized use or disclosure of such information may have personal, legal, reputational and financial consequences for the vendor, individuals whose personal information may be implicated, and for the Outbrain Group. In addition, vendors must comply with all applicable privacy / data protection and information security laws and regulations.
Grievance Mechanism
We expect our vendors to have a process through which workers can raise workplace concerns without fear of retaliation. This grievance mechanism should be transparent and understandable to workers, and should ensure the protection of whistleblowers.
Anti-tax evasion and anti-facilitation of tax evasion
The Outbrain Group will not tolerate unlawful tax evasion or the facilitation of unlawful tax evasion. Vendors must not directly or indirectly engage in, or facilitate the engagement by others in, the deliberate and fraudulent diversion of funds from a tax authority. We also expect vendors to ensure the same of their agents, subcontractors, intermediaries and workers by adopting, maintaining and implementing reasonable processes that prevent such conduct.
Labour and Human Rights
The Outbrain Group recognizes its responsibility to protect human rights. Examples of such rights are articulated in internationally recognized standards, including the
Universal Declaration of Human Rights
, and the International Labour Organization (ILO) Core Conventions.
The Outbrain Group does not tolerate slavery, forced labour, child labour or human trafficking in any form and the Outbrain Group will not knowingly work with vendors who engage in these practices or permit their subcontractors to engage in these practices. We expect our vendors to fully comply with requirements of applicable slavery, forced labour and human trafficking laws, including without limitation the UK Modern Slavery Act 2015. Our Modern Slavery Statement is available
here
.
All work must be performed under and in accordance with contracts that have been entered into voluntarily. Vendors must not use involuntary labour of any kind, including prison labour, debt bondage, or forced labour by governments. Vendors must not engage in practices associated with forced labour. These practices,
identified by the International Labour Organization (ILO)
, include withholding of wages, retention of identity documents, and restriction of movement. Vendors should put into place measures that ensure workers are not exploited by third party labour providers, such as recruiters or agencies. Such measures include: caps on or elimination of recruitment fees; provision of contracts to all workers in their native language or other language which they are able to understand; elimination of deposits paid by workers to vendors or recruiters to secure jobs.
Additionally, vendors must not engage in or support human trafficking and are encouraged to implement due diligence measures to ensure that no human trafficking exists within their extended supply chains.
Vendor Diversity and Inclusion
The Outbrain Group believes that diversity is a social and economic imperative and looks to vendors to share this commitment in their operations and within their supply chain. Vendors are expected to take proactive steps to provide a full spectrum of businesses – based on the ownership structure (for example, women owned, locally owned), scale (for example, small or medium enterprise) or nature of the enterprise (for example, social enterprise) – with the opportunity to compete on a fair and equal basis for business.
Environmental Stewardship
Environmental stewardship is a key aspect of how the Outbrain Group operates our business. We encourage our vendors to adhere to similar environmental efforts as appropriate to their businesses and aligned with best practices locally and globally. This includes implementing processes to identify and manage risks and opportunities related to climate change and water.
We encourage our vendors to track, manage, and mitigate the environmental impact of their operations and strategies, including those of their suppliers. Where feasible, vendors should take steps to incorporate how they will mitigate the impact of climate change into their strategies and business resiliency plans, through establishing greenhouse gas (GHG) emission reduction targets, selecting low-GHG products and services, and other initiatives, where relevant.
Vendors are encouraged to take steps to conserve, reduce use of, and reuse water in their own operations. Vendors are also encouraged to manage water resources to ensure their operations do not prevent access to sufficient safe water for all users in surrounding communities, including those both up and downstream from their facilities.
Vendors are encouraged to take concrete steps to minimize or eliminate waste across their operations and those of their suppliers. Any waste, and in particular hazardous waste, must be managed in a responsible manner. Chemical and other materials posing a hazard if released to the environment should be identified and managed to ensure safe handling, movement, storage, recycling or reuse and disposal.
All materials used by vendors must comply with applicable rules, laws, and regulations regarding the prohibition or restriction of specific substances to ensure safe and responsible handling, storage, movement, reuse, recycling and disposal.
Management Systems
The Outbrain Group encourages our vendors to institute effective management systems that utilize the best available techniques and practices to adhere to this Code and continuously improve their performance. This should include a process for the identification and proactive mitigation of risks associated with compliance to this Code, as well as a process for ongoing monitoring and review of risk controls, and prompt and accurate reporting of all incidents.
Examples of management systems with a scope related to the content of this Code include: ISO 9001, ISO 14001, ISO 50001, SA8000, OHSAS 18001 and ISO22301.
Security
The Outbrain Group is committed to complying with the highest industry standards for IT and security. Vendors must acknowledge responsibility for guarding against unauthorized use or disclosure of Outbrain’s information resources and agree to comply with industry standards and/or the security rules  established by Outbrain. Vendor’s applications, databases, hosts, operating systems, or any other software used to facilitate the Services provided to Outbrain should be  delivered according to best practices and current industry standards. Vendors should provide awareness, education, and training for their employees and request contractors to do the same, with the appropriate handling of the company data and derived data.  Vendors should implement encryption standards for data transmission and storage, implement robust access controls to prevent unauthorized access to systems, and establish clear incident response procedures to address security breaches promptly.
Governance
This Code sets forth our expectations for current and future vendors. We expect all new and existing vendors to meet our minimum expectations and to aspire to make continuous improvements to their businesses as noted herein across ethical, human and labour rights, vendor diversity and inclusion and environmental areas.
Any facts or circumstances which are likely to lead to your inability to meet the requirements and expectations of this Code should be reported immediately to your Outbrain Group relationship manager in writing. Retaliation of any kind against an individual who reports concerns in good faith violates the Outbrain Group’s principles and will not be tolerated.
We expect our vendors to join us in our commitment to transparency and disclosure. If requested, vendors are expected to provide details and data about their performance on the topics included in this Code to the business or to other entities.
If a vendor is found to be in violation of the requirements of this Code, we will expect that vendor to inform us immediately or as soon as is practicable and remedy any such violation in a timely and sensitive manner. Failure by a vendor to do so may lead to review or termination of our relationship.
The Outbrain Group is committed to continuously reviewing and updating this Code. Therefore, this Code is subject to modification from time to time. The contents of this Code are additional to and do not in any way affect or prejudice any of the Outbrain Group’s rights and remedies under the relevant contracts with each vendor, if any.
The failure or omission by Outbrain Inc to insist upon strict performance and compliance with any of the provisions of this Code at any time shall in no way constitute a waiver of its rights. In the event of any conflict or ambiguity between any provision of this Code and the provisions of any relevant contract with any vendor, the provisions of that contract will prevail.
Questions
If you have any questions in relation to this Policy or any other policy, please contact ethics@outbrain.com.
Effective January 26th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
ヘッダー・ビディング規約
2022年2月1日制定
この規約（以下「
本規約
」という）は、Outbrain Japan株式会社（以下「
Outbrain
」という）及びヘッダー・ビディング登録フォーム記載のパートナーが、ヘッダー・ビディング登録フォームに規定に従って行われる、1つ又は複数のユニファイド・オークションサービスを通じて促進されるパートナー・インベントリのためのユニファイド・オークションへの参加について規定するものである。
定義
「
広告クライアント
」とは、広告主、代理店及びその他の広告需要を有するサードパーティーソースをいう。
「
広告型レコメンデーション
」とは、広告クライアントがOutbrainネットワークに提供する本レコメンデーションをいう。
「
本コンテンツ
」とは、グラフィックコンテンツ、テキストコンテンツ、オーディオコンテンツ（テキスト、データ、情報、写真、画像、グラフィック、オーディオ、動画その他のコンテンツを含む場合がある）をいう。
「
本データ
」とは、Outbrainがユニファイド・オークションサービスを通じて収集又は作成した全てのデータ（本契約に基づきパートナーに提供されたレポート又はその他のデータを含む）をいう。
「
リンク先ページ
」とは、本レコメンデーションをクリックすることによりアクセスできるウェブページ又はオンライン上の場所をいう。
「
エンドユーザー
」とは、パートナー・インベントリのエンドユーザーたる個人をいう。
「
パートナー・インベントリ
」とは、パートナーのウェブサイト、アプリケーション又はプラットフォーム上の在庫であって、ユニファイド・オークションサービスを通じて、又は、特定のユニファイド・オークションにおいて、パートナーがOutbrainに提供するものをいう。
「
本レコメンデーション
」とは、Outbrainが、ユニファイド・オークションサービスを通じてパートナー・インベントリに配信する本コンテンツの表示をいう。ここで、本レコメンデーションとは、広告型レコメンデーションと同義である。
「
ユニファイド・オークション
」とは、Outbrainが参加するユニファイド・オークションサービス内で行われる、パートナー・インベントリのためのプログラマティック・オークションをいう。
「
ユニファイド・オークションサービス
」とは、第三者が運営するサービス又は
システム的な接続であって、プログラマティック・オークションを促進し、プログラマティック・サプライ・サイド・パートナーその他のプログラマティック・バイヤーが、広告クライアントに代わってパートナー・インベントリへの入札を行うものをいう。
収益及び支払い
パートナーは、記入済みの正確な税務書類その他Outbrainが要求するこれに類する全ての資料（かかる税務書類及び資料を総称して「
税務資料等
」という）を、Outbrainに対し速やかに提供しなければならない。本契約中の別段の定めにかかわらず、Outbrainは、(a) Outbrainがパートナーの税務資料等を受領するまでの間、本契約に基づきパートナーに対して行うべき支払を、違約金又は遅延損害金の支払義務を負うことなしに留保し、(b)本契約に基づきOutbrainがパートナーに対して負う支払額から、Outbrainが支払義務を負う源泉徴収税（適用のあるもの）を、法律の定めるところにより控除することができる。Outbrainは、税務資料等を受領した場合には、前記(a)に基づきパートナーへの支払いが留保されている金額を、実務上合理的に可能な範囲で速やかに支払うための商業上合理的な努力を行う。パートナーへの全ての支払いは、適用される法律の規定に従い、所得税の源泉徴収及びこれに類似する控除の対象となる。
パートナーは、支払いが適切に行われるよう、連絡先及び支払情報を正確にOutbrainに届け出なければならない。また、支払いにあたり、Outbrainの金融機関又は決済サービスプロバイダではなく、パートナーの金融機関又は決済サービスプロバイダに対し手数料が生じる場合には、かかる手数料はパートナーにおいて負担するものとする。Outbrainは、パートナーに対して支払われるべき金額が5000円を下回る場合は、パートナーに対して支払うべき金額が累計5000円を超える月までこれを支払う義務を負わないものとする。Outbrainの支払いに関する一切の紛争は、Outbrainに対して、当該支払いがなされた日から30日以内に書面で提起されなければならない。かかる期間経過後は、パートナーは、当該支払いに関し争う権利を放棄したものとみなされる。
Outbrainが、その合理的な裁量の下、Outbrainがパートナーのパフォーマンスに不正若しくは無効な点があると考えるとき、又は、Outbrainが広告クライアントから返金を求められたときは、Outbrainは、パートナーへの支払いを留保し、相殺し、又は、当該支払いの返金を求める権利を有する。無効なアクティビティへの該当性は、いかなる場合にもOutbrainが判断を行う。無効なアクティビティは、以下の行為からなるものを含むがこれに限らない。
人物、ボット、自動プログラム又はそれに類似した手段により生成された広告型レコメンデーションの無効なクリック又はインプレッション（パートナーのIPアドレス又はパートナーの管理下にあるコンピューターからなされたクリック又はインプレッションを含む）
金銭の支払いを伴うクリック若しくはインプレッション、虚偽の表示により生成されたクリック若しくはインプレッション、又は、エンドユーザーに広告型レコメンデーションのクリックを行うこと若しくはその他の行為を要請したことにより生成されたクリック若しくはインプレッション
(i)及び(ii)が相当量混ざりこんだクリック又はインプレッション
Outbrainは、Outbrainが有する他の権利及び救済に加えて、(i) 本契約に基づきOutbrainがパートナーに負っている債務の支払いを留保し、又は、かかる債務を、本契約又は他の契約に基づきパートナーがOutbrainに対して負っている債務と相殺すること、及び、(ii) 過去にOutbrainからパートナーに対する過払いがあった場合には、Outbrainは、パートナーに対し、任意の請求書の発行から30日以内に、Outbrainに対し、当該金額の返金を行うよう求めることができる。パートナー・インベントリに広告型レコメンデーションを掲載したOutbrainの広告クライアントがOutbrainに対する支払を怠った場合、Outbrainは支払いを留保し、又は、パートナーに返金を求めることができる。
プライバシー
Outbrain及びパートナーは、それぞれのウェブサイトにおいて、適用のある全ての法令に準拠したプライバシー通知又はプライバシーポリシーを、容易にアクセス及び発見が可能な形で継続的に掲載する。パートナーは、当該プライバシー通知又はプライバシーポリシーにおいて、パートナー・インベントリにおけるデータの収集及び利用にかかるサードパーティテクノロジーの使用について、開示を行わなければならない。Outbrainのプライバシーポリシーは、
このリンク
から閲覧することができる。
両当事者は、パートナー・インベントリを通じて取り扱われるエンドユーザーのデータに関しては、独立した管理者として位置づけられ、各当事者は、関連するデータ保護法の遵守については引き続き個別に責任を負うものとする。サードパーティークッキーの設置及び使用、並びに、該当するエンドユーザーからの取得が必要とされるクッキーに対する同意を取り付けることに関し全てのデータ保護法令を順守することは、パートナーの義務であり、Outbrainの義務ではない。パートナーは、Outbrainが、エンドユーザーのデータの取扱いに関して、パートナーが法令に即した取扱いをしていることに依拠していることを認識している。したがって、パートナーは、(i) パートナーが正当な利益（legitimate interest）に依拠する場合には、OutbrainによるOutbrainサービスの提供が考慮された正当な利益評価（legitimate interest assesment）をパートナーが完了していることを保証し、(ii) パートナーが同意に依拠する場合には、パートナーは、IAB Methodologyに則って（該当する場合）、同意管理プラットフォーム（consent management platformを指す。以下本号において同様とする。）を通じてエンドユーザーにOutbrainを開示し、Outbrainに対して明確な同意又は明確な不同意のシグナルを送信すること（すなわち、パートナーは、同意管理プラットフォームを通じて、Outbrainに対して、無効又は有効でないシグナルを送信してはならない。）を保証する。パートナーは、同意に依拠する場合には、IAB Methodologyに従ってコンセントストリング（consent string）を収集し、全てのビッドリクエスト（bid request）において、コンセントストリングをOutbrainにオブジェクトとして提供するものとする。上記にかかわらず、両当事者は、エンドユーザーに対し、ユーザー選択メカニズム（user-choice mechanism。Network Advertising Initiative、Digital Advertising Alliance、European Digital Advertising Allianceのオプトアウトページ、又は、Outbrainのプライバシーポリシーを通じた直接的なオプトアウト、又は、その両方等）へのアクセスを提供しなければならない。エンドユーザーが、（Outbrainではなく）パートナーに対して通知が送られるメカニズム（デバイスの設定等）を通じて行動ターゲティング広告をオプトアウトした場合、パートナーは、当該エンドユーザーの広告IDその他の識別メカニズムをOutbrainに送信してはならない。
Engage Data Sharing Agreement
（https://www.outbrain.com/legal#data-processing-agreement）の条項は、本契約に組み込まれ、本契約の一部を構成するものとする。
ライセンス
Outbrainは、本契約の有効期間（以下「
本契約期間
」という）中、パートナーが本契約の全ての条項を完全に遵守することを条件として、提供された様式及びフォーマットにてパートナー・インベントリにおいて本レコメンデーションの表示を行うことについての、限定的、非独占的、取消可能、サブライセンス不可、譲渡不可のライセンスをパートナーに許諾する。
Outbrainは、本契約期間中、パートナーに対し、広告型レコメンデーションに組み込まれているOutbrainの商標、サービスマーク及びロゴ（総称して「
Outbrainマーク
」という。）を、本契約に基づくパートナーの権利及び義務に厳格に従って使用及び表示するための限定的、全世界的、非独占的かつ無償のライセンスを付与する。パートナーによるOutbrainマークの使用により築かれた信用（good will）はOutbrainにのみ帰属する。Outbrainは広告型レコメンデーションを実装したパートナー又はパートナーのリストにパートナー及びパートナー・インベントリの名前を載せることができる（マーケティング資料及び販売資料を含む）。上記にかかわらず、各当事者は本契約に関するプレスリリース、又は、本契約で定める以外で自己のウェブサイト上で相手方の名前を使用する場合には、相手方の書面による同意を事前に得るものとする。
両当事者間においては、(a) ユニファイド・オークションサービスにおいて表示又は提供されるOutbrainマーク、本データ及び本コンテンツに関する全ての権利、権限及び利益（パートナー・インベントリに由来する本コンテンツであってパートナーに帰属するものを除く）は、Outbrainに帰属し、(b) 本項(a) に定めるものを除き、パートナー・インベントリに関する全ての権利、権限及び利益（ルックアンドフィールを含む。また、これらに関する全ての知的財産権を含む）はパートナーに帰属するものとする。
本契約に基づき許諾されるライセンスは、本契約に明示的に規定されているものに限定され、黙示的に付与される権利は存在しない。本契約においてパートナーに明示的に付与されていない全ての権利は、Outbrainに留保される。
禁止行為
パートナーは、広告型レコメンデーションを、アダルトコンテンツ、猥褻なコンテンツ、性的コンテンツ、名誉を毀損するコンテンツ、中傷的コンテンツ、侵害的コンテンツ、虐待的コンテンツ、フェイクコンテンツ、虚偽コンテンツ、違法コンテンツ、並びに、ヘイトスピーチ若しくは差別を促進させるコンテンツ、銃器及び違法薬物の売買を促進するコンテンツ、又は、違法な行為に加担し若しくは加担することを促すコンテンツ、又は、16歳未満の児童向けのコンテンツを表示し若しくはこうしたコンテンツを含むページに実装しない。Outbrainは、独自の裁量で、いつでも、広告型レコメンデーションを無効にする権利を留保する。
パートナーは、本契約において明示的かつ明確に許可された場合を除き、広告型レコメンデーションの複製、賃借、賃貸、売買、譲渡、移転、サブライセンス、逆アセンブル、リバースエンンニアリング、逆コンパイル（適用される法令により明示的に許可された範囲に限って行う場合を除く）を行ってはならず、また、広告型レコメンデーションの全部又は一部を修正若しくは変更し、又は、第三者のために若しくは第三者の利益のために使用してはならない。
契約解除
各当事者は、相手方が本契約に関し重大な違反を犯し、相手方が当該違反に関する書面による通知を受領してから7日間が経過しても当該違反が解消されない場合、いつでも本契約を解除することができる。
本契約は、ヘッダー・ビディング登録フォームに別段の定めがない限り、30日前の書面による予告通知をもって解除することができる。本契約の満了又は解除と同時に、本契約上の両当事者の全ての権利及び義務は消滅する。ただし、本契約第8条、第9条及び第11条並びにその性質上契約終了後も存続すべきその他の条項は、本契約の終了後も存続し、引き続き両当事者を拘束する。
限定的保証及び補償
各当事者は相手方に対して以下の事項を表明し保証する。
本契約を締結し、かつ、本契約に基づく義務を履行する権利、能力及び権限の一切を保有していること。
本契約の履行に際して、適用される法律、規則及び命令の一切を遵守すること。
パートナーは、パートナー・インベントリに、(i) 違法な本コンテンツ、(ii) 第三者の知的財産権を侵害する本コンテンツ、(iii) わいせつ、名誉毀損、中傷的な内容又は第三者のパブリシティ権、プライバシー権若しくは人格権を侵害する内容を含む本コンテンツ、(iv) 意図的に、事実と異なる内容を含ませ又は事実を正確に反映していない内容を含む本コンテンツが含まれておらず、今後も含まれないことを表明保証する。
本契約のいかなる規定も、Outbrainが最低トラフィック量、クリック量、インプレッション量、使用量その他の事項について、Outbrainがパートナーに対して約束するものとは解釈されない。
本契約で明確に規定された場合を除き、いずれの当事者も、本契約、パートナー・インベントリ、Outbrainが提供する本コンテンツ及びその他の事項に関して、明示黙示を問わず、一切、表明又は保証を行わない（満足できる品質を有していること、若しくは、特定の目的（目的が何であるかを問わない）に適合するものであることについての黙示の保証、又は、サービスが中断なく若しくはエラーなく常時使用できることについての保証、サービス若しくは取引に際して生じるあらゆる保証を含む。）。
Outbrainは、本コンテンツ（広告型レコメンデーションを含むがこれに限られない）に関していかなる表明保証も行わず、その内容、正確性、知的財産権の侵害、合法性及び品位、並びに、これらに対するパートナーの信頼について、責任や義務を負わないものとする。
各当事者（以下「
補償当事者
」という）は、相手方、相手方の親会社及び関連会社、並びに、それらの関連会社、取締役、役員、株主、社員、代表者、従業員及び代理人（以下あわせて「
被補償当事者
」という）を、本契約において定められた補償当事者の表明保証違反又は義務違反若しくはそのおそれが原因で第三者により提起された訴えに関するすべての請求、損失、責任、損害、費用、和解金、規制当局による調査結果、罰金、過料及びその他の支出（合理的な弁護士費用を含む）（以下総称して「
本クレーム
」という）から補償し、防御し、何ら損失を被らせないものとする。被補償当事者は、本クレームについて補償当事者に速やかに通知しなければならない。ただし、かかる通知の遅滞は、その遅滞により補償当事者が実際に損害を被った範囲を除き、補償当事者の義務を一切軽減しない。被補償当事者は、補償当事者の指揮の下、自らが選任し、費用を負担する弁護士と共に、本クレームの防御及び和解に参加する権利を有する。
秘密保持
各当事者（以下「
受領当事者
」という）は、相手方（以下「
開示当事者
」という）の事業、技術、商品及びサービスに関する一定の情報及び資料（本契約の条件を含む）であって、機密であるもの又は開示の状況から機密であることが合理的に判断されるもの（以下「
秘密情報
」という）を受領しうることになることを認識する。秘密情報には、(a) 開示当事者による開示の前に受領当事者が知っていた情報、(b) 受領当事者が開示当事者の秘密情報に関係なく独自に開発した情報、(c) 受領当事者の責によらずに公知であり又は公知となった情報、(d) 第三者が秘密保持義務に違反することなく受領当事者に開示した情報は含まれない。本契約ににおいて許可される場合を除き、受領当事者は、(aa) 自ら又は第三者のために秘密情報を使用せず、(bb) 自らの取締役、従業員、委託先、アドバイザー、投資家又は潜在的投資家であって、当該秘密情報を知る必要があり、かつ、当該秘密情報について本第8条と同等の秘密保持義務を負う者以外の第三者に秘密情報を開示してはならない。受領当事者は、開示当事者の書面による要請があった場合、遅滞なく秘密情報を返却又は破棄するものとする。上記にかかわらず、受領当事者は、適用される法令又は法令上の手続きにより要求される範囲において、秘密情報を開示することができる。ただし、当該開示は、受領当事者が、要求された開示について、開示当事者に対して遅滞なく書面による通知を行い、当該開示について異議を申し立て、又は、開示の範囲を制限するために開示当事者が行う努力に対し、（開示当事者の費用負担において）受領当事者が合理的な協力を提供した場合に限り、行うことができるものとする。
責任制限
当事者は、(i) 自ら又はその従業員若しくは下請業者の過失に起因する死亡又は人身傷害に関する責任、 (ii) 詐欺又は悪意の不実表示に関する責任、(iii) 法令上免除又は限定できない責任については、相手方に対する責任を免除又は限定されないものとする。
第11.1条の定めに該当する場合を除き、いずれの当事者も、本契約に関連し、又は、本契約違反により生じる(a) 特別損害、間接損害、付随損害、結果損害、(b) グッドウィル又は評判の損失、(c) データの損失、(d) 契約、取引、予想された節約の損失、(e) 利益の損失については、当該損失又は損害発生の可能性について当該当事者が知らされていたかどうかを問わず、また、当該損失又は損害がどのように発生したかを問わず、当該損害が契約法理論、不法行為（過失を含む）、法律上の義務又はその他の理論に基づくものであるかを問わず、一切の法的責任を負わない。
第11.1条の定めに該当する場合、及び、当事者の一方が相手方の知的財産の侵害又は不正流用を行ったことに起因する責任を除き、いかなる場合も、本契約又は本契約の違反（契約法理論、不法行為（過失を含む）、法律上の義務又はその他の理論に基づくものであるかを問わない）に起因又は関連する当事者の責任総額は、(i) 1000万円、又は、 (ii) 責任の発生原因たる事象（一連の関連する事象である場合は、当該事象の最初の事象）の発生の直近12ヶ月間にパートナーに支払われ又は支払われるべき本収益の金額の125％のいずれか大きい方を超えないものとする。
当事者は、本契約に規定された各当事者の責任に関する制限が、いかなる状況においても合理的であると受け入れることを相互に確認する。
輸出管理
パートナーは、輸出に関する全ての法律、規制、並びに米国商務省、米国財務省外国資産管理局（以下「
OFAC
」という）その他米国若しくはその他の国の機関若しくは当局の規則を遵守する。また、パートナーは、当該法律、規制、規則に違反してユニファイド・オークションサービスを輸出せず、また、輸出若しくは再輸出を許可しない。パートナーは、上記に同意し、また、パートナーが制限国に所在しておらず、制限国の支配下におかれておらず、制限国の国民又は居住者ではないことを表明保証する。パートナーは、パートナー又はパートナーの持分若しくは支配権を有する個人、団体、組織、取締役その他の役員が、米国の法律、規則、命令により米国企業及び個人が取引することを禁じられている個人、団体、組織（特定国籍業者リストに列挙されている者を含む）に該当しないことを表明し保証する。
反社会的勢力の排除
各当事者は、現在及び将来、以下に該当しないことを表明する。
暴力団、暴力団員、暴力団員でなくなってから５年が経過していない者、暴力団関連企業、総会屋、社会運動標榜ゴロ、特殊知能暴力集団及びこれらに相当する者。
当事者が11.aにつき虚偽の表明をした場合、相手方は、他の権利及び救済手段に影響を与えることなく、本契約を終了することができる。
雑則
本契約は日本法に準拠して解釈され、抵触法に関する規定や国連国際物品売買条約の適用はないものとする。
当事者は、本契約に関連して生じる一切の紛争について、東京地方裁判所を第一審の専属的合意管轄裁判所とする。
両当事者は、本契約の条項の記載に従って義務の履行がなされない場合、回復不可能な損害が生じ得ることを認識している。これにかんがみ、両当事者は、法令上認められる救済に加えて、本契約違反を防止し、本契約の実効性を確保するために、各当事者が差止による救済措置を受ける権利を有することに同意する。
各当事者は独立した契約者であり、本契約のいかなる内容も、当事者間にパートナーシップ、ジョイントベンチャー、代理その他の関係性を構築するものとは解釈されない。
当事者が本契約に基づく権利を行使せず、又は相手方の義務の履行を求めないことは、いかなる範囲においても、当該権利又は義務を放棄したものとはみなされない。また、当事者が、相手方による本契約上の義務の不履行又は違反に関して有する権利を放棄した場合であっても、本契約上の他の義務の不履行若しくは違反、又はその後の不履行若しくは違反に関して有することとなる権利を放棄したものとはみなされない。
いずれの当事者も、当事者の合理的な支配を超えた事由による義務の不履行について責任を負わないものとする。
本契約は、本契約の目的たる事項に関する当事者間の完全な合意を構成するものであり、当該目的に関する書面又は口頭による全ての事前又は同時に交わされた合意又は了解に取って代わるものとする。
ヘッダー・ビディング登録フォームは、両当事者が署名した書面によってのみ、修正又は、変更することができる。
本規約は、上記の日付より有効とする。Outbrainは、本規約を随時変更することができるものとし、変更後の契約条件は、変更後の利用規約によるものとする。
本契約の見出しは、参照の便宜を図るためのものにすぎず、法的な効力は有しない。
本契約は、電磁的記録の送信又は完全かつ正確な複製が可能なその他の方法により締結することができる。かかる方法によって交付された本契約の副本は、あらゆる目的においてその原本とみなされる。
本契約は、複数の副本により締結することができ、各副本はいずれも正本とみなされ、その全てが一体となって一つの契約を構成する。
本契約中の条項が、その理由にかかわらず有効ではないと判断された場合、当該条項は、当該条項が有効なものとなるために必要な限度で修正される。修正によって有効な条項とすることができない場合、当該条項は本契約から分離され、本契約の残りの条項は完全に有効なものとして存続する。
各当事者は、相手方の書面による事前の同意がない限り、本契約又は本契約上の権利若しくは義務を譲渡してはならない。ただし、(i) 法律の適用上当然に譲渡される場合、合併、組織再編、買収若しくは支配権の変更の結果として譲渡される場合、及び、(ii) Outbrainがグループ企業に対して譲渡する場合はこの限りではない。上記を条件として、本契約は、両当事者、及び、承継人又は譲受人となることを許された者を拘束し、それらの者の利益のために効力を生ずるものとする。
Effective February 28th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
1. Definitions
:
1.1. “
Consent
”
means
a statement or a clear affirmative action (opt in)
made by a Data Subject that is
freely given, distinct, specific, informed and unambiguous, with
each
different purpose
for processing
presented under different consent mechanisms;
1.2. “
Data Protection Laws
”
means all laws, guidance or codes of practice issued by a relevant public authority
or Supervisory Authority
(including, in the UK, the Information Commissioner’s Office)
applicable from time to time to Outbrain or
Vendor
relating to the processing of Personal Data and the privacy of electronic communications, including (
i
) the General Data Protection Regulation ((EU) 2016/679) (GDPR) and the UK Data Protection Act 2018; (ii) the Privacy and Electronic Communications Directive 2002/58/EC (as updated by Directive 2009/136/EC) (ePrivacy Directive) and the UK Privacy and Electronic Communications Regulations 2003 (SI 2003 No. 2426) (PECR) as updated from time to time
;
1.3. "
Controller
",
"
Processor
",
"
Data
Subject
", “
Personal Data
”,
“
process
”(including “
processing
”), "
Special Categories of Personal Data
" and “
Supervisory Authority
” shall have the meanings given in Data Protection Laws.
2. Vendor shall comply with all relevant provisions of Data Protection Laws as applicable and ensure that they process personal data fairly and lawfully in accordance with such laws in the provision and receipt of Personal Data.
3. Outbrain and Vendor shall be deemed independent controllers under Data Protection Laws and each party shall remain solely and exclusively responsible for determining the means and purposes of processing for its respective processing activities.
4.  Vendor is solely responsible for determining the means, purposes and appropriate legal bases for collecting and processing Personal Data from B2B leads, prospects, contacts and similar
Data Subjects prior to sharing this information with Outbrain
.
5. Vendor
shall disclose, via an appropriate privacy notice, all information relating to the processing activities
where the Personal Data being processed is obtained directly from the Data Subject or where such Personal Data is obtained from a third party or publicly available sources, as
required under Data Protection Laws.
Such information shall make clear that recipients of Personal Data
include Outbrain and shall include
information on the process to object to the
parties’
legitimate interest (opt out) or to withdraw consent,
as
applicable.
6. When collecting Personal Data from
Data Subjects
from publicly available sources (such as social networks), Vendor shall ensure to provide clear and comprehensive information to Data Subjects about the purposes of the collection and processing of any Personal Data at the earliest: (
i
) within one month of the collection; (ii) at the time of the first communication with the Data Subject; or (iii)
before the Personal Data is first disclosed to
Outbrain
.
7. If Vendor relies on legitimate interest as a legal basis to collect and process Personal Data, Vendor shall ensure that the following measures are implemented prior to the collection: (
i
) the Data Subject is given the possibility to object to the collection, processing and sharing of their Personal Data (opt out) at the time of the collection, or at the latest at the time of the first information of the Data Subject as referred to
in the clause above;
(ii)
a legitimate interest assessment is performed to document Vendor’s and other relevant third parties’ legitimate interest
whenever required by Data Protection Laws
; and
(iii)
Personal Data is only collected in jurisdictions where legitimate interest is a lawful legal basis for this given purpose.
8. Vendor
shall rely on Consent
w
here legitimate interest is not a
lawful
legal basis for processing Personal Data for a given purpose
. In such case
,
Vendor
will request clearly from Data Subjects, through a separate consent mechanism, to consent to their Personal Data to be shared with
Outbrain
.
9. Vendor
shall not collect and share
with Outbrain
any Special Categories of Personal Data
or
Personal Data relating or pertaining to
minors
.
10. Vendor shall not provide more Personal Data to Outbrain than strictly necessary for the purpose of processing
.
Vendor
is responsible for the cleansing and the accuracy of Personal Data collected through
t
hird
p
arty providers, including removing categories of Personal Data not necessary for the purpose
.
11. Vendor shall ensure that their providers and suppliers, whether they are Controllers or Processors under Data Protection Laws, including data brokers, collect and process all
Personal Data shared with Outbrain in compliance with Data Protection Laws. When collecting Personal Data from bought-in data sets and data brokers, Vendor shall ensure that such third parties are subject to all requirements of this
Addendum
, in particular that: (
i
) Data Subjects have been provided with clear and comprehensive information about the purposes of the collection and processing of their Personal Data, in a timely manner and as referred to in
this
Section 6.
; (ii) the source of the collection and the list of recipients (or categories of recipients)
of the Personal Data, including Outbrain;
(iii) t
he data providers have been relying upon a lawful legal basis for the collection and processing.
12. If
Vendor
is not able to provide reasonable assurance that Personal Data sets from data
brokers
have been sourced in compliance with Data Protection Laws,
such Personal Data must not be shared with
Outbrain.
Effective January 30th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
効力発生日：2024年1月1日
このアンプリファイ規約は、上記の効力発生日に修正され、同日から適用される取引条件となる。Outbrain Japan株式会社はアンプリファイ規約を随時変更、修正、又は更新することができる。
アンプリファイ規約
The Amplify Terms vary according to the country where your billing address is located. Please use your billing country below to view the applicable Amplify Terms.
My billing address is located in:
United States of America
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua & Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bonaire
Bosnia & Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Ter
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Canary Islands
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Channel Islands
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos Island
Colombia
Comoros
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Ter
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Great Britain
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guyana
Haiti
Hawaii
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Korea South
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lesotho
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malaysia
Malawi
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Midway Islands
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Nambia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherland Antilles
Netherlands (Holland, Europe)
Nevis
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau Island
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Island
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Republic of Montenegro
Republic of Serbia
Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
St Barthelemy
St Eustatius
St Helena
St Kitts-Nevis
St Lucia
St Maarten
St Pierre & Miquelon
St Vincent & Grenadines
Saipan
Samoa
Samoa American
San Marino
Sao Tome & Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
South Africa
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Tahiti
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad & Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks & Caicos Is
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City State
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands (Brit)
Virgin Islands (USA)
Wake Island
Wallis & Futana Is
Yemen
Zaire
Zambia
アンプリファイ規約（以下「本規約」という）は、Outbrain Japan株式会社（以下「アウトブレイン」という）と、広告掲載申込書又はアウトブレインのダッシュボードを利用する事業主体（以下「顧客」という）との間で締結される。顧客は、本規約に準じて本サービス（以下第1.1条にて定義される）を利用し、本規約及び顧客の作成する広告掲載申込書又はアウトブレインダッシュボード（以下「ダッシュボード」という）を通じて入力された情報が両当事者間の全ての合意事項（以下「本契約」という）を構成するものとする。特別の定めがある場合を除き、 (i)広告掲載申込書の条件又はダッシュボードを通じて入力された条件（以下「キャンペーン詳細」という）と(ii) 本規約との間に齟齬がある場合には、キャンペーン詳細が優先する。
第1条 　サービス
第1.1条
アウトブレインは、オンラインプロパティのネットワーク（以下「ネットワーク」という）と提携し、ウェブサイトへの誘導を行うリンクが付されたユーザーインターフェイスの表示を行う。アウトブレインは、独自のアルゴリズム、配信手法、及び高度な購入ツールを使用して、顧客の代わりに関連するオーディエンスに広告を提供します（以下「本サービス」という）。
第1.2条
アウトブレインは、本サービスを通じて、ネットワーク上に、顧客の選択するグラフィック、テキスト、映像又は音声コンテンツへのリンクを表示する。当該リンク、リンクに付随する見出し、画像、ビデオ、及び、リンクからアクセスできる対象ページを総称して「本コンテンツ」という。アウトブレインは、(i) 顧客のキャンペーンの終了日、(ii) 顧客の予算に達した時点、又は(iii) キャンペーンが無効になった時点のいずれか最も早い時点までの間、ネットワークにおける本コンテンツの配信を継続する。（但し、アウトブレインは配信停止された本コンテンツに関する追加の本動作分(第5.1条にて定義される）について請求する権利を留保する。これについては、
FAQ
を参照。）
第1.3条
アウトブレインは、 (i) 本コンテンツの配置、位置付け、提供のタイミング、(ii) 本コンテンツ上のクリック又はインプレッション（特定オーディエンスセグメントのクリックも含む）、又は(iii)コンバージョンを保証しない。本料金（第5条にて定義される）が顧客の予算に達しない場合、顧客の救済措置は、(i) 第2条の規定に従って適用されるキャンペーンの終了日の延期、(ii) 予算を達成することを目的とした本コンテンツの置き換え、又は追加、(iii) 本コンテンツに対して発生した本料金の支払いのいずれかに限られるものとする。アウトブレインは、いかなる場合にも、本コンテンツへの誘導の失敗に関し責任を負わない。
第1.4条
アウトブレインは、キャンペーンに関するレポートを顧客に提供する。アウトブレインは、最終月次レポート（日次レポートと異なる場合がある）に基づいて、顧客が支払うべき料金の計算を行う。顧客は、アウトブレインと互換性のある自らのトラッカーを提出することができる。顧客の計測値とアウトブレインの計測値の間に10%以上の乖離がある場合には、両当事者は誠意を持って協力し、アウトブレインに支払われるべき正確な金額を決定する。乖離が10%に満たない場合には、アウトブレインの計算値を最終的な数値とする。
第2条　本コンテンツ
第2.1条
顧客は本コンテンツに対して完全な責任を負うものとする。顧客は、本コンテンツをネットワークに掲載することを許可する権利を有し、アウトブレインに対し許可する。作成者または生成者が顧客又は顧客の代理人のいずれであるかを問わず、顧客が本コンテンツの見出しのすべての文言及び画像を使用する権利を有し又はその旨の承諾を得ていなければならない。 本コンテンツの見出し及び画像が本コンテンツのトーン及び主題を正確に反映していなければならない。アウトブレイン（及び/又は統合されたツール）が本コンテンツ、見出し、及び/又はキャンペーンに関する推薦を提供する場合、顧客は引き続き完全に責任を負います。
第2.2条
顧客は、直接又は間接を問わず、(i) わいせつ、誹謗、中傷、名誉棄損、ポルノ、暴力的、冒涜的、社会通念上好ましくない若しくは非合法な内容のコンテンツ、(ii) 事実に関して不正確で誤解を招く若しくは欺瞞的なコンテンツ、又は、(iii) ねずみ講、賭博、違法薬物の販売ないし使用、特定の個人ないし集団に対する差別または嫌がらせ等、違法行為をあおり又は触発する本コンテンツを提供しないものとする。また、本コンテンツは、(a) 本サービスへの入稿時と異なるリンク先にリダイレクトしてはならず、 (b) アウトブレインへの入稿時の本コンテンツから記載内容を変更してはならない。
第2.3条
本コンテンツは、随時改定されるアウトブレインの
広告ガイドライン
に準拠しなければならない。アウトブレインは、その単独の裁量により、本コンテンツを拒否又は削除することができる。
第2.4条
顧客は、アウトブレインが本コンテンツに責任を負わないことを了承し、また、本コンテンツの作成者による修正又は読者からのコメント等により、本コンテンツがキャンペーン中に変更される場合があることを承諾する。顧客は、かかる変更の際、当該本コンテンツをキャンペーンから削除すること又は他の本コンテンツを選択することのいずれか又は両方をアウトブレインに指示しなければならない。本コンテンツの作成者又はパブリッシャー等が、本コンテンツに対して異議を唱えた場合、顧客は、アウトブレインが、
Terms of Use
の第2条に則り、その単独の裁量により、当該本コンテンツを本サービスから削除することまたは本コンテンツの修正を顧客に対して要求することを了承する。
第2.5条
両当事者は、本コンテンツのアンチマルウェアによるスキャン処理のシステムを導入するものとする。通知があった場合、両当事者は直ちにネットワークから不審な本コンテンツの削除を行わなくてはならない。
第3条　期間と解除
当事者は、キャンペーン詳細に、個別のキャンペーンの開始日と終了日を定めるものとする。かかる定めにかかわらず、(i) 顧客は、アウトブレインに対し、2営業日前までに書面をもって通知し又は12時間前までにダッシュボードを通じて通知することにより、理由を問わず本契約又は個別のキャンペーンを中断又は終了させることができ、(ii) アウトブレインは、顧客に対し、2日前までに書面をもって通知することにより、理由を問わず、本契約あるいは個別のキャンペーンを中断または終了させることができる。当該予告期間中、通知前に契約されたキャンペーンは、キャンペーン詳細に従って継続されるものとし、顧客は、アウトブレインに対し、予告期間の最終日までに発生した全ての本料金について支払う義務を負う。また、顧客が本契約の定めに違反していると合理的に判断した場合、アウトブレインは、その裁量により、顧客による本サービスの利用の全部又は一部を停止、もしくは終了する権利を留保する。
第4条　 キャンペーン詳細
顧客は、アウトブレインのダッシュボードを通じ、オンラインレポートにアクセスし、キャンペーンを管理することができる。なお、アウトブレインは、ダッシュボードに登録された顧客の特定の個人情報を取扱うことができる。アウトブレインは、顧客の質問及び要請に対応するために、当該個人情報を収集、処理することができ、顧客に特定の本サービスについてのアクセスを提供し、顧客の身元を承認し、また、本サービスの使用について顧客と連絡を取ることができる。顧客は、自らログインし、ダッシュボードから、要求又は承認したすべての変更（直接的、又は間接的にアウトブレインのAPIを介して行った変更を含む）について単独で責任を負う。顧客は、そのダッシュボードへのログイン及びパスワードの保護について単独で責任を負う。顧客は、ダッシュボードを用いてキャンペーン詳細を変更することによりキャンペーンを管理し、及び／又は、アウトブレインの定める通り、アウトブレインのアカウントマネージャーと相互に協力し合うオプションを有する。
第5条　料金及び支払い条件
第5.1条
ネットワーク上に表示される広告は以下のいずれかの支払い方法により決定される：(i)クリック単価（以下「CPC」という）、(ii)コスト・パー・ミル・インプレッション（以下「CPM」という）、(iii)視聴完了単価（以下「CPCｖ」といい、動画広告／コンテンツの50％以上が最初から最後まで継続的に再生されたとき、1つのコンプリーテッドビューとしてカウントされるものとする）、(iv)コスト・パー・ミル・ビューワブルインプレッション (以下「vCPM」といい、動画広告面積の50%以上の領域が2秒以上表示されたとき、1つのビューワブルインプレッションとしてカウントされるものとする。）、及び／又は (v)その他、当事者間で随時合意した望ましい動作（以下、それぞれを「本動作」という）。料金は顧客が事前に指定した最大予算内で、本動作の数及び本サービスにかかる費用（以下、「本料金」とする）に基づいて算出されるものとする。顧客は、キャンペーン詳細に指定された最大予算内でアウトブレインのトラッキングシステムで測定した本料金を、アウトブレインに対し支払うものとする。アウトブレインは、適用される国若しくは地域の消費税、事業税又は付加価値税を請求し、又は、法律上アウトブレインが請求しなければならないものとされている当該国固有の費用を請求することができる。CPCがキャンペーンの指標として使用される場合、当該CPCは、アウトブレインが指定する最低CPC（市場の状況により随時異なる）であって当該時点において有効な数値未満であってはならない。顧客がアウトブレインの自動入札機能を使用する場合、顧客は、アウトブレインに対し、顧客のキャンペーン目標達成のサポートのために、アウトブレインがその裁量により顧客のCPCを設定及び修正することができる権利を付与する。顧客は、キャンペーンのために利用した第三者の広告に関して発生するすべての費用を負担する。疑義を避けるために記載するが、アウトブレインは、顧客のキャンペーンに関し、顧客が第三者に対し支払った費用（サードパーティトラッカーの利用料を含むがこれに限られない）を負担する義務を負わない。顧客は、ダッシュボード又は広告掲載申込書の締結済修正案により、予算を増額もしくは減額することができる。
第5.2条
顧客が広告掲載申込書に署名した場合、広告掲載申込書に別途取決めがなされている場合を除き、通常、翌月末日までに、アウトブレインから顧客に対し料金の請求が行われる。顧客は当該掲載     月の末日から6     0日以内にすべての請求金額を支払うものとする。料金請求に関して、第5.3条に基づいて誠実な異議のない場合、顧客は全額を支払わなければならない。顧客がダッシュボードからキャンペーン詳細を設定、もしくは広告掲載申込書に署名し、及び料金請求のためにクレジットカードを使用する場合には、アウトブレインは、その単独裁量権により設定する間隔を空けて、顧客のクレジットカードに（その他手数料等を含む）アウトブレイン費用を請求する。但し、通常請求、クレジットカード請求及び／又は前払請求（キャンペーン開始前）の決定権は、アウトブレインのみにあるものとする。アウトブレインは、払戻請求を含め、すべての請求に関する照会を個別具体的に検討し、その単独の裁量により請求を承認又は拒否する権利を留保する。
第5.3条
顧客は、請求書に対し異議のある場合、請求書受領日から30日以内にアウトブレインに書面又は電子メールにて通知するものとし、当該通知がない場合、顧客はその内容を異議なく承諾したものとみなされる。顧客の通知メールは、異議のある金額及びその異議を裏付ける情報を含むものとする。顧客は、異議のない請求額に対し、支払いを保留してはならず、請求額のうち、誠実に異議のない額については、     全額を支払うものとする。
第5.4条
第5.3条に従った異議が申し立てられることなく、支払期日までに支払いがなされなかった場合には、アウトブレインは、支払期日から当該支払いがなされる日まで年6％の割合の遅延損害金を請求することができる。また、アウトブレインは、顧客が支払義務を負うすべての金額を支払うまでの間、顧客による本サービスの利用の全部又は一部を停止、もしくは終了することができる。アウトブレインは、回収会社への費用、合理的な弁護士費用、裁判費用を含む全ての回収費用を顧客に請求する権利を留保する。必要に応じて、顧客は、アウトブレインが顧客の信用情報を調査することを許可する。場合によっては、顧客は、アウトブレインが信用拡大の条件として随時要求することのある財務情報及び書類を提供することに同意する。顧客は、信用の確認、アウトブレインへの支払いの履行、アウトブレインへの負債の回収又は顧客の口座への支払いのみを目的として、アウトブレインが、その代理として処理する会社に対し、顧客がアウトブレインに提供する口座情報、及びクレジットカード又は関連する請求及び支払い情報の共有を承諾し、同意する。アウトブレインは、いつでもその単独の裁量により、信用の拡大、修正、又は取り消しをすることができる。また、アウトブレインは、顧客の信用限度額を超える債務、及び、本契約に定められた支払期限を途過した債務について、即時の支払いを要求する権利を留保する。
第5.5条
当事者は、アウトブレインに対して支払われたすべての債務について、アウトブレインに確定的に帰属し、いかなる場合においても、返還の対象とはならないことを確認する。アウトブレインは、アウトブレインの顧客に対する債務があるときは、当該債務とアウトブレインの顧客に対する債権とを、その債権債務の弁済期のいかんにかかわらず、対当額にて相殺することができる。当該相殺によりアウトブレインの顧客に対する債権全額を消滅させることができないときは、アウトブレインは、自己の裁量により、その弁済の充当の順序・方法を定めることができ、顧客は何らの異議を述べない。
第6条　追加機能及び取引条件
第6.1条
アウトブレインは、本サービスにかかる追加機能を随時顧客に提案する。当該追加機能の使用は、（オンラインでのクリックによる同意もしくはダッシュボード等を通じた）顧客の特定の追加取引条件に合意によるものとする（以下「追加取引条件」という）。当該機能は、アウトブレインの裁量により顧客に提供され、第5.1条に明記されている料金に加えて、追加の料金が含まれる場合がある。顧客の追加取引条件の受諾により、アウトブレイン及び顧客間で拘束力のある、法的強制力のある合意の成立とする。本規約、追加取引条件及びキャンペーン詳細に齟齬のある場合には、(i) 追加取引条件、(ii) キャンペーン詳細、 (iii) 本規約を優先順位とする。アウトブレインのキャンペーンを目的として（アウトブレインダッシュボード等を通じ）LiveRampサービスを利用する顧客は、LiveRamp取引条件を遵守するものとする。
第6.2条
以下第９条の顧客の遵守を条件として、顧客のキャンペーンのより強化されたターゲティング機能及び／又はセグメント作成に関連したアナリティクスを提供するために、顧客は、顧客のウェブサイト又はアプリケーションページ上において、(i)アウトブレインのピクセル（以下「アウトブレインピクセル」という）及び／又は、(ii) 第三者のピクセル又はタグ（以下「第三者ピクセル」という）を設置することができる（以下、アウトブレインピクセル及び第三者ピクセルを合わせて「ピクセル」という）。顧客は、(a) ピクセルの使用が個人情報保護法に準拠していること、及び(b) ピクセルの使用についてユーザーへ的確な通知をすることを表明し、保証する。当該通知として、(ⅹ) アウトブレインを含む第三者がクッキー又は同様のテクノロジーを使用し、顧客のウェブサイトから情報を収集又は受信し、測定サービス及びターゲット広告等を提供するために当該情報を使用すること、(y) ターゲットを絞るための情報収集から、 ユーザーがどのようにオプトアウトするか、(z)未成年者を標的する、又は、その他慎重に扱うべき種類のデータを含まれるウエブサイト又はアプリケーションページ上ピクセルを使用しないことを含むものとする。エンドユーザーが顧客のウェブサイト（又は広告主のアプリケーション内の設定等のメカニズム）を介したターゲティング広告をオプトアウトした場合、顧客は、アウトブレインピクセルをローディングしないことに全ての責任を負うものとする。。顧客は、当該第6.2条の規定を遵守しなければ、ピクセルを使用してはならない。アウトブレインは、顧客のランディング・ページの機能を妨げず、同じ目的を果たすことを条件に、その合理的な裁量により、いつでもアウトブレインピクセルの機能を更新、変更又は代替することができる。
第6.3条
キャンペーンのターゲティングをより強化するために、第三者セグメントを利用する場合（以下「第三者ターゲティング」という）は、顧客は該当する税金等を含む、第三者ターゲティングの使用料（以下「第三者データコスト」という）を支払う。各キャンペーンに関する顧客の請求書は、本料金、及び、（該当する場合）第三者ターゲティングの使用にかかる第三者データコストを含むものでなくてはならない。顧客は、アウトブレインのリポーティング指標に基づいて、第三者データコストが計上されることを承諾する。第三者ターゲティングを利用する場合、顧客は、x)本件について的確な通知及び／又は（該当する場合）プライバシーポリシーを通してユーザーに開示しなければならず、y) 第三者ターゲティングの利用が常にデータ保護法に準拠しなければならず、データ処理のため適切な法的根拠の要件を満たしていることを表明・保証するものとする。顧客は、いかなる場合であっても、(i)差別的目的のために、(ii)16歳未満の未成年を対象に、(iii)個人データの特殊カテゴリーに基づき、(iv)主張されたまたは確認された刑事上の有罪判決又は犯罪に関する個人データに基づき、又は(v)その他キャンペーンが実施される国における適用法に違反して、第三者ターゲティングを使用してはならない。
第7条 守秘義務
第7.1条
各当事者は、本契約に関連して一方の当事者から他方の当事者に開示された機密情報（以下に定義する）に関して、機密情報の開示を受けた側の当事者は、当該機密情報を第三者に漏洩せず、また本契約に基づくその権利と義務に関連する目的以外に使用しないことに合意する。「機密情報」とは、当事者又はその子会社ないし系列会社に関する情報で、一般に知られておらず、秘密又は所有権ありとの記載があり、あらゆる状況で機密又は所有権のあるものとして扱われるすべての情報を意味し、本契約の規定も機密情報に含まれる。但し、以下の(i)～(iv)のいずれかに該当する情報は、機密情報に含まれない。(i) 開示の時点ですでに公知であった情報又は開示後に被開示者以外の情報源から公知となった情報。(ii) 開示の時点で被開示者が合法的に所持していた情報。(iii) 機密情報を参照することなく被開示者が独自で開発した情報。(iv) 開示された情報に関する守秘義務を負わない第三者から開示後に取得した情報。
第7.2条
機密情報は厳重に秘密として保持し、あらゆる合理的かつ必要な措置により保護されるものとする。被開示者は、機密情報を知る必要がありかつ本契約書に記載の守秘義務と同等以上の守秘義務を負う自らの従業員、代理人、もしくは代理店以外の者に、機密情報を開示しないものとする。各当事者は、本契約に従って他方の当事者により提供される機密情報のいかなる部分も、本契約に基づき明確に規定されている目的以外に使用してはならない。但し、各当事者は裁判所の命令、法律または政府機関の要請に従うために必要な機密情報は開示することができる。アウトブレインは、顧客の親会社又は顧客の子会社との間で、顧客の機密情報を共有することができる。
第7.3条
顧客が本コンテンツの提供者（以下「コンテンツプロバイダー」という）の代理人もしくは代理店である場合、顧客は、アウトブレインが当該コンテンツプロバイダー（又は、その他コンテンツプロバイダーの指定する第三者）にキャンペーン詳細の閲覧及び使用権を付与することを承諾する。
第8条　表明及び保証
第8.1条
各当事者は他方の当事者に対し、次のことを表明し保証する。(i) 自らが本契約を締結し、本契約に基づく権利とライセンスを付与するために必要なすべての権利と権限を有すること、(ii) 適用法令も遵守すること、(iii) 本契約（キャンペーン詳細を含む）の締結と受け入れ、及び本契約に基づく自らの債務と義務の履行が自らが締結している別の契約と抵触しないこと。なお、「適用法令」とは、当事者の義務に対し適用される全ての連邦、国、州、又は外国の法令、又は業界の自主規制、又は自主ガイドライン等（Interactive Advertising Bureau（IAB）のガイドライン、スタンダード＆ベストプラクティス、NAI行動規範、DAAオンライン行動広告に関する自主規制原則を含む）を意味し、顧客またはアウトブレインに適用される。個人情報のプライバシーに関する適用法令を「個人情報保護法」という。
第8.2条
顧客は次のことを表明し、保証する。(i) 本コンテンツ（見出し、画像、ビデオ、誘導される対象ページを含む）が、適用法令に違反せず、有害、暴言、わいせつ、脅迫的あるいは名誉棄損と捉えられる可能性のある内容を含まないこと。(ii) アウトブレインがコンテンツを使用し、そのホストとなり、キャッシュ、ルーティング、保存、コピー、変更、配信、再フォーマット、複製、公開、表示、転送するために必要なすべての権利を本契約に基づいてアウトブレインに許可するための権利、ライセンス及びクリアランスを有していること。(iii)本コンテンツの利用が第三者の知的財産権を侵害しないこと。(iv) 13歳未満の子供向けの本コンテンツを提供しないこと。(v) 本コンテンツが随時改定されるアウトブレインの
広告ガイドライン
に準拠すること。 (vi) 本コンテンツは、(a)本サービスへの入稿時と異なるリンク先にリダイレクトしないこと；（b）アウトブレインへの入稿時の本コンテンツから記載内容を実質的に変更しないこと。(vii)意図していない利益を得るために本サービスを利用しないこと、または本サービスの整合性及び／又は総合的性能を阻害しないこと。(viii) ダッシュボードを使用する場合、顧客が、アウトブレインが単独で定義するダッシュボードの使用に関するルールを守ること（個別のネットワークソースをホワイトリストするための入札を使用する等を含む）。(ix) 顧客が日本法又は契約の履行に適用されるその他法令に従って課される制裁又は輸出規制の対象となる者に所有され又は支配されていないこと、及びアウトブレインに経済制裁その他の貿易管理上の制限又は罰則が課される可能性のある行為を行わないこと。(x)アウトブレインに提供されたすべての事業情報及び支払情報が真実、正確かつ的確であること。
第8.3条
顧客が代理人、もしくは代理店（その他、コンテンツプロバイダーの名で取引を行う第三者）である場合には、顧客は次のことを表明し、保証する。(i) 顧客は、正式に権限を付与されたコンテンツプロバイダーの代理人、もしくは代理店であること。(ii) 顧客は、本契約を締結し、及び、コンテンツプロバイダーに関する全ての意思決定をし、実行する法的権限を有すること。(iii) 上記 (i) 及び (ii) に従って、コンテンツプロバイダーに代理する権限を付与することを、書面による契約にて締結していること（及び、アウトブレインの要請により、当該契約書をアウトブレインに提出すること）。顧客は、ダッシュボードを通じて専らフランスを主なターゲットとする広告コンテンツを提供するフランス企業又は外国企業を代理しないことに同意する。顧客が、主にフランスをターゲットとするフランスのコンテンツプロバイダーを代理している場合、Outbrainサービスの購入方法については、info@outbrain.comに照会するものとする。
第8.4条
本契約に明記されているものを除き、アウトブレインは商品性、権原、非侵害、特定目的への適合性についての保証あるいは取引の過程、使用あるいは取引慣行に起因する保証を含め、そのサービス、顧客の代理として実施するキャンペーンの履行ないし成功について明示・黙示を問わずいかなる表明も保証を行わない。アウトブレインのサービスが途切れることなく続き、安全であり、又はエラー等が発生しないという表明や保証も行わない。
第9条　データ保護
個人情報取扱規約
の条項は、本契約に組み込まれ、その一部をなすものとする。
第10条　補償
第10.1条
本契約に基づく各当事者の表明保証に対する違反より生ずる第三者の請求から、他方の当事者、その代理人、もしくは代理店、関連会社、子会社、取締役、役員、従業員、その他契約関係に該当する場合はネットワークパートナーを保護及び補償し、損失を与えてはらなない。
第10.2条
当該請求に関連して、(i) 被補償当事者は、補償当事者に対し、迅速に書面にて請求があった旨を通知する（但し、迅速な通知が為されなかった場合にも、補償当事者が本契約の補償義務を免れることはなく、迅速な通知が為されなかったことにより補償当事者が被った損害についてはこの限りでない）。(ii) 補償当事者は単独で請求に対する弁護を行い、又は和解をすることができる（但し、補償当事者は、被補償当事者の書面による事前の同意がない限り、被補償当事者の権利又は義務に悪影響を及ぼす可能性がある和解を行うことはできない）。(iii) 補償当事者が要求し、その費用を負担するときには、被補償当事者は当該請求に関する調査検討及びこれに対する弁護に協力する。(iv) 被補償当事者は自らの費用負担により自ら選択する弁護士を使って、自らの権利を弁護する権利を有する。
第11条　責任制限
本契約で規定されている当事者の補償義務、故意の違法行為又は本契約の守秘義務違反又は費用の未払に起因する請求に関する場合を除き、不法行為又は契約等の形態にかかわらず、本契約あるいはその履行に起因し、又は、何らかの形でこれに関連して生じるあらゆる訴訟に関する各当事者とその取締役、役員、従業員、納入業者、ネットワークパートナー、代理人、もしくは代理店の賠償責任総額の上限は、(i) 当該行為が行われた直近12ヶ月間に本契約に基づいて顧客が支払うべき料金の額と(ii) 500万円のうち、いずれか大きい額を上限とする。各当事者は、たとえ損害の可能性について事前に知らされていた場合であっても、結果損害賠償、特別損害賠償、懲罰的損害賠償、付随的損害賠償や、本契約又はその履行に起因ないし関連して生じるデータの消失、逸失収益、逸失利益などその他いかなる損害についても責任を負わない。
第12条 　雑則
第12.1条
いずれの当事者も、法律の効果あるいはそれ以外の方法により、他方の当事者の書面による事前の同意なく第三者に対し本契約の全部又は一部を譲渡することはできない。但し、譲受人が本契約を履行するに十分な能力を有し、本契約の履行義務を引き受ける場合には、一方の当事者は、他方の当事者の同意を要することなく、合併、再生、資産の全部ないしその大半の譲渡を行い、本契約に基づく自らの権利の全部又は一部を譲渡し、義務の全部又は一部を承継させることができる。
第12.2条
本契約は、日本法に準拠し、それに従って解釈されるものとする。当事者は、本契約に起因又は関連して生じるあらゆる紛争について、東京地方裁判所を第一審の専属的合意管轄裁判所とすることに合意する。当該訴訟において勝訴をした当事者は、敗訴当事者に対し、本契約に基づき、合理的な範囲内の弁護士費用及び訴訟費用の支払いを請求することができる。上記に加え、顧客が第5条の義務に違反した場合、アウトブレインは、その選択により、顧客の本店所在地を管轄する裁判所に当該義務違反にかかる顧客に対する訴えを提起することができる。
第12.3条
いかなる新聞発表又は一般広告も、顧客とアウトブレインの相互の合意なく行わないものとする。アウトブレインは、自らの顧客リスト及びその他マーケティング資料に顧客の名称を記載する権利を有する。顧客は、アウトブレインの事前の承認を得ずにアウトブレインの名称、ロゴまたは商標を使用することはできない。
第12.4条
本契約に基づくすべての通知は電子メールにて行うものとし、広告掲載申込書又はダッシュボードに記載の相手方当事者の住所又は相手方が随時文書で指定するその他の住所に送付する。通知は受理された時点をもって有効となる。
第12.5条
一方の当事者が本契約に基づく自らの権利の1つを行使しなかった場合においても、当該権利を放棄したものとはみなされない。本契約の1つまたは複数の条項が準拠法に基づいて強制不能であると解釈される場合には、当該条項は本契約から除外され、合意の残りの条項は効力を失わない。
第12.6条
いずれの当事者も、合理的に制御できない事由により本契約に記載された自らの義務の履行遅滞、又は履行不能に賠償責任を負わない。また、いずれの当事者も、インターネットの接続や操作不能、技術的不具合、コンピュータのエラー、データ損傷によるデータの紛失その他の損害を受けた場合に賠償責任を負うことはない。ただし、顧客は、本契約に定める料金の支払いに関する義務について免責されることはない。
第12.7条
第7条、第8条、第9条、第10条、第11条、第12条及び異議の生じていない未払いに対する支払い義務は、本契約終了後も存続する。
第12.8条
顧客とアウトブレインは、相互に独立した契約当事者である。本契約に記載されたいかなる文言も、両当事者間での合弁関係又は提携関係と見なされず、解釈されてはならない。
第12.9条
本契約は、当該契約内容に関する両当事者の完全なる合意を表し、両当事者の書面による事前の合意がない限り修正することはできない。発注書、広告掲載申込書、請求書、又はその他本契約に照らして顧客の提出する書類に含まれる取引条件の内容に関して、齟齬または相反する規定のある場合は、アウトブレインが当該書類を受諾または署名・押印したとしても、一切効力を持たない。
第13条　反社会的勢力の排除
第13.1条
各当事者は、以下に列挙する人物・事項に現在該当しないことを表明する。暴力団、暴力団員、暴力団員でなくなってから５年が経過していない者、暴力団関連企業、総会屋、社会運動標榜ゴロ、特殊知能暴力集団及びこれらに相当するもの。
第13.2条
当事者が虚偽の表明をした場合、相手方当事者は、他の権利及び救済手段に影響を与えることなく、本契約を終了することができる。
Engage Master Services Agreement
Engage Code on Page Terms
Engage Header Bidding Terms
Engage Video Terms
Supply Side Platform Terms
Engage Data Sharing Agreement
SSP Data Sharing Agreement
Engage Terms
Effective June 16th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
This Data Sharing Agreement (“
DSA
”) is entered into by the Outbrain entity (“
Outbrain
”) and the company (the “
SSP
”) identified in the Master Supply Side Agreement between the parties from time to time (the “
Terms
”). From the Effective Date of the Terms, this DSA shall apply to any and all agreements between the parties and their Affiliates from time to time.
This DSA is incorporated into the Terms (as amended from time to time) and constitutes a legally binding agreement between the parties. Collectively, the Controller SCCs (as applicable), the DSA and the Terms are referred to as the “
Agreement
”. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency between any of the terms of the Agreement the following order of precedence shall prevail: (i) the Controller SCCs (as applicable); (ii) this DSA; and (iii) the Terms.
Any capitalized terms not defined in this DSA shall have the respective meanings given to them in the Terms.
1. DEFINITIONS.
1.1. “
Affiliate(s)
” means in respect of either party at any time, any person or legal entity controlled by or controlling or under the common control of that party. Any reference to the parties shall include reference to their Affiliates;
1.2. “
Controller SCCs
” means the standard data protection clauses “MODULE ONE: Transfer controller to controller” in accordance with article 46 2. (c) GDPR adopted by the European Commission on 4 June 2021 (Commission Implementing Decision (EU) 2021/914) (as amended or superseded), containing contractual obligations on the Data Exporter and the Data Importer, and rights for EEA Data Subjects whose Personal Data is transferred, as amended or superseded from time to time by the European Commission;
1.3. “
Data Protection Laws
” means all laws, guidance or codes of practice issued by a relevant public authority applicable from time to time to Outbrain or SSP relating to the processing of Personal Data and the privacy of electronic communications, including U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws and EU Data Protection Laws, the Brazilian General Data Protection Law (LGPD), Federal Law no. 13,709/2018 and the Japanese Act on the Protection of Personal Information;
1.4. “
EEA
” means the European Economic Area;
1.5. “
End Users
” are Data Subjects or Consumers who visit or use the impression inventory provided by SSP;
1.6. "
EU Data Protection Laws
" means all laws, guidance or codes of practice issued by a relevant Supervisory Authority (including, in the UK, the Information Commissioner’s Office (“ICO”)) applicable from time to time to Outbrain or SSP relating to the processing of Personal Data and the privacy of electronic communications in the EEA and the UK as amended or superseded, especially (i) the General Data Protection Regulation ((EU) 2016/679) (GDPR) and the UK Data Protection Act 2018; (ii) the Privacy and Electronic Communications Directive 2002/58/EC (as updated by Directive 2009/136/EC) (ePrivacy Directive) and the UK Privacy and Electronic Communications Regulations 2003 (SI 2003 No. 2426) (PECR) as updated; (iii) the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection 1992;
1.7. “
Outbrain User Data
” means Personal Data of an End User which Outbrain collects directly on the impression inventory;
1.8. “
UK Adequacy Decision
” means the Commission Implementing Decision of 28 June 2021 on the adequate protection of Personal Data by the United Kingdom in accordance with article 45 GDPR;
1.9. "
U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws
" means the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020, the Colorado Privacy Act of 2021, the Connecticut Data Privacy Act of 2022, the Indiana Consumer Data Protection Act of 2023, the Iowa Consumer Data Protection Act of 2023, the Montana Consumer Data Privacy Act of 2023, the Tennessee Information Protection Act of 2023, the Utah Consumer Privacy Act of 2022, the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act  of 2021 and all other U.S. privacy laws, guidance or codes of practice issued by a relevant public authority applicable from time to time to Outbrain or SSP relating to the processing of Personal Information and the privacy of electronic communications, as amended or superseded by any federal, state or national law, regulation or regulatory guidance;
1.10. "
Controller
", “
Joint Controller
”, "
Processor
", “
Data Protection Impact Assessment
”, "
Data
Subject
", “
Personal Data Breach
”, "
Special Categories of Personal Data
" and “
Supervisory Authority
” shall have the meanings given in EU Data Protection Laws;
1.11. “
sale
”
(including the terms “sell,” “selling,” “sold,” and other variations thereof, including renting, disclosing, releasing, disseminating, making available, transferring, or otherwise communicating Personal Information for monetary or other valuable consideration), “
Consumer
”,
“Business
”, “
Third Party
”
and
“
Service Provider
”
shall have the meanings given to those terms under U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws, as applicable; and
1.12. “
Personal Data
” (and any variation thereof, including “Personal Information” under U.S. Consumer Privacy LawsCCPA) and “
process
” (including “processing”), shall have the meaning given under the applicable Data Protection Laws.
2. PURPOSE OF PROCESSING.
The parties collect and process Personal Data for the purposes of delivering Outbrain’s clients’ advertising materials to End Users.
Outbrain processes Outbrain User Data for the following purposes: (i) storing and/or accessing information on a device; (ii) using limited data to select advertising; (iii) creating profiles for personalized advertising; (iv) using profiles to select personalized advertising; (v) creating profiles to personalize content; (vi) using profiles to select personalized content; (vii) measuring advertising performance; (viii) measuring content performance; (ix) understanding audiences through statistics; (x) developing and improving services; (xi) using limited data to select content; (xii) ensuring security, preventing and detecting fraud, and fixing errors; and (xiii) delivering and presenting advertising and content.
3.
U.S. CONSUMER PRIVACY LAWS
AND EU DATA PROTECTION LAWS SPECIFIC PROVISIONS.
3.1. Specific provisions applicable to CCPA are located in
Sections 4.2, 5.2 (iv) and 6.4
.
3.2. Specific provision applicable to EU Data protection Laws are located in
Sections 4.3, 5.2 (ii), 6.4 and 11
.
4. ROLE OF PARTIES.
4.1. Each party shall comply with all relevant provisions of Data Protection Laws as it applies to matters under the Agreement and ensure that they process Personal Data fairly and lawfully in accordance with Data Protection Laws as applicable in the provision and receipt of Personal Data.
4.2. Insofar as  U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws are applicable to the Service, Outbrain and SSP will be considered independent Businesses for the collection, processing and selling of any Personal Information, and no party shall be considered a Service Provider on anyone’s behalf, unless as strictly required under applicable U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws. In such case, the
IAB Multi-State Privacy Agreement
(the most recent version or successor thereto) shall be incorporated by reference into this DSA and shall govern the relationship between the parties with SSP’s partners as Businesses and SSP and Outbrain as Service Providers exclusively in respect of opted out traffic in the U.S., as applicable.
4.3. Insofar as EU Data Protection Laws are applicable to the Agreement, Outbrain and SSP will be considered independent Controllers under EU Data Protection Laws for the collection and any further processing of any Personal Data, and Outbrain shall not be considered a Processor on anyone’s behalf.
4.4. Each party shall remain solely and exclusively responsible for determining the means and purposes of processing for its respective processing activities.
5. SSP’S OBLIGATIONS.
5.1. SSP is solely responsible for implementing the online advertising exchange and the impression inventory under the Agreement and Data Protection Laws.
5.2. SSP shall:
(i) disclose (and, as applicable, require its own partners to disclose), via an appropriate privacy notice, Outbrain to End Users as a Business or Controller collecting Personal Data for the purposes of delivering Outbrain’s clients’ advertising materials as set out in
Section 2.
;
(ii) collect (and, as applicable, require its own partners to collect) End Users’ consent choices via a consent management platform using the IAB Transparency & Consent Framework v2.2 (the most recent version or successor thereto) and pass Outbrain valid “consent”/”no consent” strings. SSP must not, at any time, send Outbrain “null” or “invalid” signals;
(iii) provide a user choice mechanism such as the opt out page(s) of the
Network Advertising Initiative
, the
Digital Advertising Alliance
or the
European Digital Advertising Alliance
, as applicable; and
(iv) insofar as U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws are applicable to the Agreement, SSP shall collect (and, as applicable, require its own partners to collect) End Users’ “Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” or equivalent opt out choices via a consent management platform using the IAB Global Privacy Platform (the most recent version or successor thereto) and pass Outbrain valid “yes”/”no” strings.
5.3. SSP shall at all times satisfy the requirements for an appropriate legal basis for the processing of Personal Data. In any event, where an End User opted out or withdrew their consent to personalized advertising and/or the sharing their Personal Data with Outbrain through a mechanism alerting only SSP (instead of Outbrain), such as device settings, SSP must not share such Personal Data with Outbrain.
6. OUTBRAIN’S OBLIGATIONS.
6.1. Outbrain shall disclose, via an appropriate privacy notice, all information relating to processing activities where the Personal Data is collected directly from the End User or where such Personal Data is collected via third parties, as required under Data Protection Laws. This information is available on
Outbrain’s Privacy Policy
.
6.2. Outbrain shall at all times satisfy the requirements for an appropriate legal basis for the processing of Outbrain User Data.
6.3. Outbrain shall comply with requests from End Users to exercise their rights under relevant Data Protection Laws, without undue delay and within the required time limits.
Requests relating to right to access, erasure, withdrawing consent, objecting to profiling, or ”Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” can be exercised directly on
Outbrain Interest Profile
.
7. COOPERATION.
7.1. Each party shall develop, implement, and regularly review procedures to ensure they meet their respective obligations under Data Protection Laws.
7.2. Each party shall immediately inform the other party if any activity pursuant to the Agreement infringes any part of Data Protection Laws, and the parties shall review such activity accordingly. If during the term, Data Protection Laws change in a way that this DSA is no longer adequate for performing the processing activities necessary to the Terms, the parties agree to promptly negotiate in good faith to review this DSA in light of such changes.
7.3. In the event that either party receives any correspondence, enquiry or complaint from an End User, Supervisory Authority or any other third party related to the disclosure or processing of Personal Data pursuant to this DSA, or requests information from the other party when performing a Data Protection Impact Assessment, it shall promptly inform the other party giving full details of the same, and the other party shall provide such assistance as reasonably required (at each party’s sole cost and expense) and in good faith in order to respond in accordance with any requirements under Data Protection Laws.
8. DATA SECURITY.
8.1. Each party shall implement and maintain such appropriate technical and organizational measures as required by Data Protection Laws to ensure that the Personal Data is processed in a secure manner, including (but not limited to) (i) the pseudonymization and encryption of Personal Data; (ii) ensuring the confidentiality, integrity, availability and resilience of the services provided under the Agreement, including the ability to restore availability of, and access to, Personal Data in a timely manner in the event of a physical or technical incident; (iii) a process for regularly testing, assessing and evaluating the effectiveness of technical and organizational measures for ensuring the security of the processing; and (iv) regularly carrying information security risk assessments that take account of risk of accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure of, or access to, Personal Data.
8.2. An overview of Outbrain’s appropriate technical and organizational security measures are described on
Outbrain’s Security page
.
8.3. Upon becoming aware of a suspected or confirmed Personal Data Breach or Security Incident involving Outbrain User Data collected pursuant to this DSA, each party shall notify the other party without any undue delay, and provide such assistance as reasonably required to allow the other party to comply with its respective obligations under Data Protection Laws.
9. PERSONNEL.
Each party shall be responsible for ensuring that staff members are appropriately trained to handle and process the Personal Data in accordance with their internal technical and organizational security measures, where relevant, together with Data Protection Laws, and have entered into confidentiality agreements relating to the processing of Personal Data.
10. PROCESSORS – SERVICE PROVIDERS.
Each party shall remain independently responsible for appointing its respective Processors and/or Service Providers in accordance with Data Protection Laws.
11. INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS.
11.1. Insofar as Personal Data is collected from End Users located within the territory of the EEA or the UK by either party during the course of the Agreement, neither party shall process any Personal Data (nor permit any Personal Data to be processed) in a country outside of the EEA or the UK unless: (i) that country has been designated by the European Commission or the ICO (as applicable) as providing an adequate level of protection for Personal Data; or (ii) it has taken such measures as necessary to ensure the transfer is compliant with EU Data Protection Laws.
11.2. The parties agree that for the purposes of any transfer of Personal Data from SSP to Outbrain collected within the EEA to the UK, the requirements of the clause above shall be fully satisfied by the UK Adequacy Decision.
11.3. Outbrain shall be responsible for the onward transfer of Personal Data from the UK to any third party country outside of the EEA as required by (a) the UK Adequacy Decision and/or (b) EU Data Protection Laws, as applicable.
11.4. Within its Affiliates, Outbrain has entered into adequate intragroup data sharing agreements including supplementary measures complying with all requirements of EU Data Protection Laws, which consist of (i) encryption in transit and encryption of UUIDs at rest which can only be decrypted with a private key stored in the EU; (ii) pseudonymization; and (iii) not having received any legally binding request from a public authority, including judicial authorities, under the laws of the country of destination and not being aware of any direct access by public authorities.
11.5. In the event that the UK Adequacy Decision as the lawful ground for international transfers from the EEA to third party countries is no longer applicable, the parties agree that the Controller SCCs shall be incorporated by reference into this DSA and shall govern any international transfer of Personal Data outside of the EEA. For the purpose of the Controller SCCs, the parties fully agree that:
(i) SSP is the "Data Exporter" and Outbrain, the "Data Importer";
(ii) Clause 7 “Docking clause” is deleted;
(iii) The OPTION under Clause 11 “Redress” is deleted;
(iv) Clause 17 “Governing Law” is completed with “Republic of Ireland”
(v) Clause 18 (b) “Choice of forum and jurisdiction” is completed with “Dublin, Republic of Ireland”;
(vi) Annex I to the Controller SCCs shall be deemed to have been completed with Annex I to this DSA; and
(vii) Annex II to the Controller SCCs shall be deemed to have been completed by
Outbrain’s Security page
.
12. TERM AND TERMINATION.
This DSA shall commence on the Effective Date and shall continue as long as SSP provides the impression inventory to Outbrain.
13. DATA RETENTION.
Outbrain
shall not retain any individual data point collected in relation to the Agreement for longer than 13 months, unless it constitutes anonymous data.
14. MISCELLANEOUS.
14.1. Neither party shall be in breach of this DSA nor liable for delay in performing, or failure to perform, any of its obligations under the Agreement if such delay or failure results from events, circumstances or causes beyond its reasonable control.
14.2. Failure or delay in exercising any right or remedy under this DSA shall not constitute a waiver of such (or any other) right or remedy under this DSA, the Agreement or Data Protection Laws.
14.3. SSP shall not assign or otherwise transfer its rights or its obligations under this Agreement, in whole or in part, without the prior written consent of Outbrain.
14.4. Except as expressly stated otherwise and to the extent applicable under Data Protection Laws, nothing in this DSA shall create or confer any rights or other benefits in favor of any person other than a party to this DSA.
14.5. The invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability of any term of this DSA shall not affect the remainder of the DSA.
14.6. This DSA shall be governed by the laws specified in the applicable Master Supply Side Agreement.
ANNEX I
Description of Processing Activities
This Annex forms part of the DSA and describes the processing of Personal Data by Outbrain. When Section 11.5 of the DSA applies, Annex I to the Controller SCCs shall be deemed to have been completed with this Annex.
A. LIST OF PARTIES
Data Exporter:
SSP name, address and contact details as stated in the Master Supply Side Agreement.
Activities relevant to the data transferred: Online advertising exchange allowing the purchase of an impression inventory.
Independent Controller.
Data Importer:
Outbrain with address and contact details as stated in the Master Supply Side Agreement.
Activities relevant to the data transferred: Digital advertising services.
Independent Controller.
B. DESCRIPTION OF TRANSFER
Categories of Data Subjects whose Personal Data is transferred:
End Users (Data Subjects who visit or use the impression inventory provided by SSP or interact with Outbrain’s clients’ advertising materials served by Outbrain on the impression inventory).
Categories of Personal Data transferred:
Bid request unique identifier
Outbrain unique identifier
IP address
User Agent data, browser and device type (desktop/mobile, brand, model, operating system and system version), application version, application ID or package name)
Device advertising identifiers
Pages, content visited and events
Time of visit
Broad location
Device time zone
Sensitive data transferred:
No Special Categories of Personal Data are transferred.
Frequency of the transfer:
Real time,
continuous basis.
Nature of the processing:
Receiving data, including collection, accessing, retrieval, recording, and data entry;
Holding data, including storage, organization and structuring;
Using data, including analyzing, consultation, testing, automated decision making and profiling;
Updating data, including correcting, adaptation, alteration, alignment and combination;
Protecting data, including restricting, encrypting, and security testing;
Sharing data, including disclosure, dissemination, allowing access or otherwise making available;
Returning data to the Data Exporter or Data Subject;
Erasing data, including destruction and deletion.
Purpose(s) of the data transfer and further processing:
Digital advertising services, which include:
Storing and/or accessing information on a device;
Using limited data to select advertising;
Creating profiles for personalized advertising;
Using profiles to select personalized advertising;
Creating profiles to personalize content;
Using profiles to select personalized content;
Measuring advertising performance;
Measuring content performance;
Understanding audiences through statistics;
Developing and improving services;
Using limited data to select content;
Ensuring security, preventing and detecting fraud, and fixing errors; and
Delivering and presenting advertising and content.
Retention period:
An individual data point is retained for no longer than
13 months.
Recipients:
The subject matter, nature and duration can be found on the
Outbrain Trusted Partners page
.
C. COMPETENT SUPERVISORY AUTHORITY
In the UK: The Information Commissioner’s Office.
In the EEA: The Supervisory Authority of the Member State of the SSP’s Registered Address as stated in the Master Supply Side Agreement, or, if not applicable, the Supervisory Authority of the Member State in which the Data Subjects whose Personal Data is transferred under this Agreement are located.
Effective January 18th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
The following terms (“
Terms
”) govern Partner’s participation an auction to purchase certain digital advertising space or placements made available on Outbrain’s proprietary exchange or marketplace as defined in an Enrollment Form.
1.         Service
Access to the Service.
Demand Partner will use the Services only for its own use or for an advertiser or direct agent with which Demand Partner has a direct relationship (“
DP Client
”).  During the Term, Outbrain grants Demand Partner a non-exclusive, non-transferable, limited license to access and use the Service as reasonably necessary for Demand Partner’s normal use of the Service on a self-serve basis, in particular, for the purposes of bidding on and purchasing Partner Inventory on an ‘auction’ basis. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Outbrain, in its sole discretion, shall determine what percentage of its Partner Inventory to permit DP to bid on and to allocate to the Service generally.  Outbrain owns all right, title, and interest in and to the Service.  Aside from the limited rights and licenses expressly granted hereunder, no other license is granted.
Ads
.  Demand Partner has the right and authorizes Outbrain to place its, or DP Client’s, ads on the Partner Inventory, and is solely responsible for determining the propriety and legality of the ads (which includes all elements of the ad, including the photograph and headline).  Ads must comply with Outbrain’s Advertising Guidelines (available at
https://www.outbrain.com/advertisers/guidelines/
).  Outbrain may at any time for any or no reason reject or remove any ad.  Demand Partner shall not, directly or indirectly, provide an ad that: (i) is obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous, pornographic, violent, profane, indecent or unlawful; (ii) is factually inaccurate, misleading or deceptive; or (iii) facilitates or promotes any type of illegal activity, including without limitation pyramid schemes, gambling, the sale or use of illicit drugs, or discrimination or harassment of any individual or group.  Further, ads shall neither (a) redirect to a destination other than as originally submitted to the Service, and/or (b) be substantively different from the ad originally submitted to the Service.
3rd Party Targeting
. When utilizes third party segments for enhanced targeting of its campaign.  If Partner uses 3rd Party Targeting of its campaign(s), Partner shall pay for its use above mentioned including any applicable taxes. If Partner utilizes 3
rd
Party Targeting the Partner shall (i) disclose this to users via an appropriate notice and/or in its privacy policy (as applicable), and (ii) not use 3
rd
Party Targeting to target minors or other sensitive categories of data ((iii) disclose to it’s users that he  may place third party pixels or tags (“the “
Third Party Pixels
”) for the purpose of providing analytics related to 3rd Party Targeting functionality. Partner represents and warrants that (a) its use of the Third Party Pixels is in accordance with Data Protection Laws; and (b) it has provided appropriate notice to users regarding use of the Pixels, including an explanation (1) that third parties, including Outbrain, may use cookies or similar technologies to collect or receive information from Partner’s website(s), and may use that information to provide measurement services and target ads; and (2) as to how users opt-out of the collection of information for targeting purposes.
Beta Features
.  During the Term, Outbrain may offer Demand Partner the right to use certain experimental features that are made available to Demand Partner by Outbrain on a test basis (“
Beta Features
”).  All Beta Features are provided on an “as is” basis, without any representations, warranties, covenants or obligations of any kind.   Any use by Demand Partner of Beta Features is solely at Demand Partner’s own risk.  Outbrain may modify or remove any Beta Features at any time.
Reporting.
All Demand Partner-trafficked ads will be counted as impressions.  Outbrain’s final monthly reports of impressions will provide the conclusive basis for Outbrain's calculation of the Fees (defined below) owed by Demand Partner.  If there is a 5% discrepancy or more between Demand Partner's reporting and Outbrain's, then the parties agree to work in good faith to identify the correct amount to be paid to Outbrain.  If the discrepancy is less than 5%, Outbrain's numbers shall be conclusive. If Outbrain's reporting in a given day varies by more than 5% in comparison to Demand Partner's reporting, and Demand Partner notifies Outbrain of this in writing (email shall suffice), then the parties shall make all best efforts to solve the discrepancy as follows within 3 business days thereafter:(a) Outbrain and Demand Partner shall exchange reporting data in good faith in order to find the source of the discrepancy; (b) Outbrain shall stop sending bid requests and/or Demand Partner will stop bidding on that portion of supply where the Parties have agreed via email there is a discrepancy;(c) Based on the findings regarding the cause of such discrepancy it will be decided between the parties whether an amount should be waived. In case Demand Partner and Outbrain do not reach an agreement, Demand Partner may ultimately dispute the amount in question in accordance with this Section. For the avoidance of doubt, Demand Partner shall not allowed to withhold any non-disputed amounts.
Limitations.
Outbrain does not guarantee: (a) the placement, positioning or the timing of delivery of any ads, (b) impressions or clicks on any ads, or (c) conversions.   In no event shall Outbrain be liable for failure to provide any of the foregoing.
Prohibitions
.  Demand Partner will not (a) attempt to circumvent any Outbrain security measure, (b) share its Service user interface login or otherwise grant account access with any third party without the express permission of Outbrain, (c) reproduce, distribute, modify, prepare derivative works of, translate, reverse engineer, reverse compile or disassemble any Outbrain-provided tag, or any portion of the Service, (d) use or authorize the use of the Service for any purpose not permitted under this Agreement, (e) copy, sell, transfer, lease, lend, syndicate, or sub-syndicate the Service, or use the Service for co-branding, timesharing, arbitrage (e.g., reselling), service bureau or other unauthorized purposes, (f) utilize rotating ad tags or otherwise violate Outbrain’s Advertising Guidelines (g) import into the Service any personally identifiable information including by using Outbrain’s ad tags or pixels, or (h) distribute viruses or other malware (through the ads or any other mechanism).   Outbrain may immediately suspend Demand Partner’s access or terminate this Agreement upon any breach by Demand Partner of this
Section 1.8
.  Under no circumstances may Demand Partner use the Services for gathering competitive intelligence.  To the extent that Outbrain provides the name and/or section of a name of the website related to Partner Inventory, Demand Partner shall not use such information (i) as its primary bidding criteria (e.g., Demand Partner will bid on a user based on what Demand Partner knows about such user, and only use the website name as secondary information informing the bid price), and (ii) to build a "segment" of users of a particular website or group of websites such that the group associated with a particular website, section of the website or general interest areas of a website (e.g., Demand Partner may not create an “ESPN Audience” or “sport fans” segment based on any information obtained by using the Service).
2.         Compliance, Privacy and Data
2.1
Compliance
Demand Partner will, and will require DP Clients, to (i) follow the Notice and Choice Provisions of the NAI Principles found at
www.networkadvertising.org
, and (ii) publish and comply with a legally sufficient privacy policy that fulfills the requirements of the DAA Self-Governing Principles found at
aboutads.info
.  Demand Partner must place the AdChoice icon (or a similar icon) on each ad displayed on the Partner Inventory.  Such icon must link directly to the Demand Partner and/or DP Clients’ opt out functionality (or the NAI global opt out).  Demand Partner shall ensure that its collection, storage and use of all user data (including any tracking and analytics used), whether conducted through the Service or otherwise, is strictly in compliance with all applicable laws, including any local law requirements related to use of IP addresses, behavioral information and /or COPPA.
2.2
Data.
Any data provided by Outbrain to Demand Partner, or collected directly by Demand Partner through its use of the Service shall belong to Outbrain (“
Outbrain Data
”).  Demand Partner has a limited license to use the Outbrain Data only in compliance with this Agreement and for its internal use and reporting to DP Clients, provided, that each such client agrees in writing to Demand Partner that such reporting may be used for its own internal purposes.  For clarity, any collection of data by Demand Partner regarding a user's interaction with a particular website of the Partner Inventory shall not be disclosed, sold, or otherwise transferred to any third party for any purpose.
2.3
No PII.
In no event will Demand Partner (a) import any personally identifiable information into the Service, including by using Outbrain's pixels to gather such information, and (b) combine any Outbrain Data with any personally identifiable information.
2.4       Data Sharing Agreement. The provisions of the
OPA Data Sharing Agreement
shall be fully incorporated into, and form part of, this Agreement.
3.         Fees and Payment Terms
3.1       Demand Partner shall pay Outbrain fees (based on the number of ad impressions, as measured by Outbrain's tracking system and any applicable taxes (“Fees”) within thirty (30) days of receipt of Outbrain's invoice.  If Demand Partner chooses to pay its invoice via credit card, a three percent (3%) convenience fee shall be added to the Fees.
3.2       If payment is not made when due, Outbrain may charge interest at the rate of 2% per month (or the maximum allowed by law, whichever is lower) from the due date until the date of actual payment, whether before or after judgment.  Outbrain also reserves the right to suspend or terminate Demand Partner's use of the Service until Demand Partner has paid all amounts due and to charge Demand Partner for all costs of collection, including collection agency and reasonable legal fees and court costs. Demand Partner authorizes Outbrain to investigate Demand Partner's credit record.  If applicable, Demand Partner agrees to provide such further financial information and documentation as may be required from time to time by Outbrain as a condition for the continued extension of credit.  Demand Partner acknowledges and agrees that any account, credit card and related billing and payment information which Demand Partner provides to Outbrain may be shared by Outbrain with companies who work on Outbrain's behalf solely for the purpose of performing credit checks, effecting payment to Outbrain, collecting debts owed to Outbrain and/or servicing Demand Partner's account.
3.3       All payments due under this Agreement shall be made without setoff or deduction, including for or on account of any present or future tax, assessment, or other governmental charge (“
Taxes
”) imposed upon such payment by any state, country, political subdivision or taxing authority thereof or therein.  If Demand Partner shall at any time be required by law to withhold any Taxes from any payment to Outbrain, Demand Partner will pay as additional amounts to Outbrain such amounts as may be necessary so that every net payment to Outbrain after withholding for or on account of any Taxes will not be less than the amount required under this Agreement then due and payable.  Demand Partner shall notify Outbrain of any disputes or discrepancies in writing within 30 days of receipt of invoice, after such time the invoice shall be final, and all disputes or discrepancies waived.
4.         Term and Cancellation
Either party may terminate this Agreement at any time in the event of a breach by the other party of any material provision of this Agreement that remains uncured ten (10) days after the breaching party’s receipt of written notice of the breach.  Upon expiration or termination of this Agreement, all rights and obligations of the parties under this Agreement will be extinguished, except that
Sections
6
,
8
,
9
and
10
, together with any outstanding payment obligation, will survive and continue to bind the parties in accordance with their terms.
5.         Additional Representations and Warranties/Disclaimers
5.1       Each party represents and warrants to the other party that: (i) it has all necessary rights and authority to enter into the Agreement and grant the rights and licenses under the Agreement; and (ii) the execution or acceptance of the Agreement, and the performance of its respective obligations and duties pursuant to the Agreement, do not and will not violate any agreement to which such party is bound.
5.2       Demand Partner further represents and warrants that: (i) the ads it submits, uploads and/or runs through the Service do not violate any applicable laws, rules and regulations and will not contain any material which may be harmful, abusive, obscene, threatening or defamatory; (ii) it has all necessary rights to permit and grants Outbrain pursuant to this Agreement all such rights which are necessary for Outbrain to (as applicable) use, host, cache, route, store, copy, modify, distribute, reformat, reproduce, publish, display, transmit and distribute the ads; (iii) use of the ad in accordance with the Agreement will not infringe any intellectual property rights of any third party; and (iv) it will not use the Service in a manner that provides an unintended advantage or interferes with the integrity and/or overall performance of the Service.  Outbrain may immediately suspend any campaign or Demand Partner’s use of the Services if Demand Partner violates this Section 5.
5.3       If the ads have been provided to Demand Partner by a third party, Demand Partner represents and warrants that: (i) it is the authorized agent of the provider of the ad; (ii) it has the legal authority to enter into the Agreement and make all decisions and take all actions relating to the provider of the ad; (iii) it has entered into a written agreement granting the agent the authority to represent the provider of the ad in accordance with (i) and (ii) above (and shall submit such agreement to Outbrain upon request).   (iii) it shall comply with Applicable Laws and “Applicable Laws” means any applicable federal, national, state, or foreign laws or regulations or any industry self-regulatory rules or guidelines (including the Interactive Advertising Bureau Guidelines, Standards & Best Practices, the NAI Code of Conduct, the DAA Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising.
5.4       EXCEPT AS MAY BE EXPRESSLY SET FORTH IN THE AGREEMENT, OUTBRAIN MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS OR WARRANTIES, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, TITLE, NON-INFRINGEMENT, OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, OR ANY WARRANTIES ARISING FROM A COURSE OF DEALING, USAGE OR TRADE PRACTICE ABOUT ITS SERVICES AND THE PERFORMANCE OR SUCCESS OF ANY CAMPAIGNS MADE BY IT ON BEHALF OF DEMAND PARTNER, OR THAT THE SERVICE WILL OPERATE UNINTERRUPTED, SECURE OR ERROR FREE.
6.         Indemnification
6.1       Each party shall defend, indemnify and hold harmless the other party and its respective agents, affiliates, subsidiaries, directors, officers, employees, contractors, and Inventory Partners (as applicable) against any and all third party claims resulting from the breach of such party's duties, obligations and representations under the Agreement.
6.2       In connection with any such claim: (i) the indemnified party shall provide prompt written notice to the indemnifying party of any such claim (provided that the failure to provide such prompt notice shall not relieve the indemnifying party of its indemnification obligations in the Agreement, except to the extent it has been damaged thereby); (ii) the indemnifying party shall have sole control of the defense or settlement of the claim (provided that the indemnifying party may not enter into any settlement that may adversely affect the rights or obligations of the indemnified party without the indemnified party's prior written consent); (iii) at the indemnifying party's request and expense, the indemnified party cooperating in the investigation and defense of such claim; and (iv) the indemnified party shall have the right to participate in its defense with counsel of its own choosing at the indemnified party's expense.
7.         Limitation of Liability
EXCEPT WITH RESPECT TO CLAIMS ARISING FROM A PARTY'S INDEMNITY OBLIGATIONS, WILLFUL MISCONDUCT, BREACH OF SECTION 2, AND/OR NON-PAYMENT OF FEES OWED IN THE AGREEMENT, THE MAXIMUM AGGREGATE LIABILITY OF EITHER PARTY AND ITS DIRECTORS, OFFICERS, EMPLOYEES, VENDORS, NETWORK PARTNERS OR AGENTS FOR ANY ACTION REGARDLESS OF THE FORM OF THE ACTION, WHETHER IN TORT OR CONTRACT, ARISING UNDER OR RELATED IN ANY WAY TO THE AGREEMENT OR ITS IMPLEMENTATION SHALL BE LIMITED TO THE GREATER OF: (I) THE AMOUNT OF FEES PAYABLE BY DEMAND PARTNER UNDER THE AGREEMENT IN THE 12 MONTHS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO A CLAIM; AND (II) $500,000.  IN NO EVENT SHALL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE FOR CONSEQUENTIAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE OR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES OR OTHER DAMAGES OF ANY KIND, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION, LOST DATA, LOST REVENUES OR LOST PROFITS, ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED IN ANY WAY TO THE AGREEMENT OR ITS IMPLEMENTATION, EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES.  FURTHERMORE, DEMAND PARTNER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT OUTBRAIN IS NOT LIABLE FOR TRANSACTIONS EXECUTED WITHIN THE SERVICE AS A RESULT OF ERRORS MADE IN ENTERING INFORMATION INTO THE OUTBRAIN USER INTERFACE BY DEMAND PARTNER, INCLUDING INCORRECT PRICING, TARGETING OR BUDGETING INFORMATION. NOTWITHSTANDING ALL OF THE FOREGOING, NOTHING HEREIN SHALL LIMIT DEMAND PARTNER’S OBLIGATION TO PAY THE FEES.   OUTBRAIN IS NOT LIABLE FOR ANY OUTAGES OR DOWNTIME OF THE SERVICE.
8.         Intellectual Property Rights.
Each party acknowledges and agrees that each party has the exclusive right, title, and interest in and to all of their respective trademarks, trade names, service marks, logos, program and event names, identifications, and other proprietary rights and privileges (“
Intellectual Property
”).  This Agreement and its various provisions are not a license or assignment of any right, title, or interest in either party’s Intellectual Property by or to the other party.  Neither party may, in any manner, represent that it has any ownership or other interest in the other party’s Intellectual Property.  Neither party may do or cause to be done anything that impairs the other party’s exclusive license in its Intellectual Property.  Neither party may use, print, or duplicate the Intellectual Property of the other party unless prior written approval has been obtained from the other party.  Any permitted use by one party of the Intellectual Property of the other party is limited to the term of this Agreement.  Upon the termination of this Agreement, or upon request of either party, the other party must immediately cease all use of the applicable Intellectual Property and shall promptly return all materials to requesting party.  Neither party may assign or attempt to assign any rights with regard to the other party’s Intellectual Property that arise under this Agreement and any such attempted assignment is void.
9.         Confidentiality
9.1       Each party agrees that with respect to any Confidential Information (as defined below) that is disclosed by one party to the other in connection with the Agreement, the party receiving such Confidential Information shall not disclose such Confidential Information to any third party, or use it for any purpose, except in connection with its rights and obligations under the Agreement. "
Confidential Information
"
means all information concerning a party or any of its subsidiaries or affiliates that is not generally known to the public, which information is marked confidential or proprietary, or which under the circumstances ought reasonably to be treated as confidential or proprietary, and includes, without limitation, the terms of the Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information does not include information that: (i) is, as of the time of disclosure, or thereafter becomes, part of the public domain through a source other than the receiving party; (ii) was lawfully in the possession of the receiving party as of the time of disclosure; (iii) is independently developed by the receiving party without reference to the Confidential Information; or (iv) is subsequently obtained from a third party not subject to an obligation of confidentiality with respect to the information disclosed.
9.2       Confidential Information shall be kept in the strictest confidence and shall be protected by all reasonable and necessary security measures. Confidential Information shall not be released by the receiving party to anyone except an employee or agent, who has a need to know same, and who is bound by confidentiality obligations at least as restrictive as these contained herein. Neither party will use any portion of Confidential Information provided by the other party pursuant to the Agreement for any purpose other than as expressly set forth under the Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, either party may disclose Confidential Information strictly necessary to comply with the demands of any court order, law or governmental agency and Outbrain may share Confidential Information of Demand Partner with any holding company of Demand Partner or with any subsidiary company of Demand Partner’s holding company.
10.EXPORT CONTROLS
Partner will comply with all export laws and restrictions and regulations of the Department of Commerce, the United States Department of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control ("OFAC"), or other United States or foreign agency or authority, and shall not export, or allow the export or re-export of the Unified Auction Service in violation of any such restrictions, laws or regulations. Partner agrees to the foregoing and represent and warrants that it is not located in, under the control of, or a national or resident of any restricted country. Partner represents and warrants that none of it, or any individual, entity, or organisation holding any ownership interest or controlling interest in Partner, including any officer or director, is an individual, entity, organisation with whom any United States law, regulation, or executive order prohibits U.S. companies and individuals from dealing, including, names appearing on the Specially Designated Nationals List
11.Miscellaneous
The Agreement shall be interpreted and construed in accordance with and governed by the laws of the State of New York, without regard to its conflict of law provisions or the United Nations Conventions for the International Sale of Goods. Any action or proceeding arising from or relating to the Agreement must be brought in a federal court in the Southern District of New York or in state court in New York County, New York, and each party irrevocably submits to the jurisdiction and venue of any such court in any such action or proceeding. The parties agree that irreparable damage would occur in the event that any of the provisions of the Agreement is not performed in accordance with these specific terms. Accordingly, the parties agree that each shall be entitled to injunctive relief to prevent breaches of the Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions of the Agreement, in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or in equity. The parties are independent contractors, and nothing in the Agreement will be construed to create a partnership, joint venture, agency or other relationship between the parties. No failure or forbearance by a party to enforce any of its rights under the Agreement or insist upon performance of the other party’s obligations under the Agreement will be deemed a waiver of such rights or obligations to any extent, and no waiver by either party of any default or breach of the Agreement will constitute a waiver of any other or subsequent default or breach. Neither party will be liable for any failure to perform due to causes beyond the party's reasonable control. The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties concerning its subject matter and supersedes all prior or contemporaneous agreements or understandings, written or oral, concerning such subject matter. The Partner Enrollment Form may be amended, modified or superseded, only by a written instrument signed by both parties. The headings in the Agreement are for the convenience of reference only and have no legal effect. The Agreement may be executed and delivered via electronic transmission or another means of complete and accurate reproduction, and copies of the Agreement delivered via such means will be deemed originals for all purposes. The Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original, but all of which together will constitute one and the same instrument. If any provision of the Agreement is held to be unenforceable for any reason, such provision shall be reformed only to the extent necessary to make it enforceable, failing which, it shall be severed from the Agreement and the balance of the Agreement shall continue in full force and effect. Neither party may assign the Agreement or any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the other party’s prior written consent, except (i) due to operation of law, merger, reorganization, or as a result of an acquisition or change of control, and (ii) by Outbrain to its subsidiaries. Subject to the foregoing, the Agreement will be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties and their permitted successors and assigns.
Effective December 3rd 2024
Download
Table of Contents
The following terms (“
Terms
”) govern Outbrain’s participation an auction to purchase certain digital advertising space or placements made available on SSP’s proprietary exchange or marketplace as defined in
the Enrollment Form.
1.
SSP’s Services.
1.1
SSP’s Services
. SSP will provide the following services to Outbrain (collectively the “
Services
”): (a) SSP will customize and implement an online advertising exchange (the “
Exchange
”) that performs in accordance with the functional specifications, which Exchange shall allow Outbrain to purchase impression inventory delivered by the Exchange (“
Deliverables
”) in near real time by bidding on the impression inventory; (b) SSP will host the Exchange; (c) SSP will provide maintenance services for the Exchange; and (d) its Services and, as necessary SSP will provide customization and support services, including reasonable education and support, during normal business hours, to Outbrain.
1.2
License Grant
. Subject to the terms of this Agreement, SSP hereby grants Outbrain a non-exclusive, non-transferable right to access and use the Services. Outbrain agrees that it will not: (a) resell, license, lease, time-share, distribute or otherwise transfer to any third party its right to access and use the Services, (b) reverse engineer, decompile or dissemble the Services, (c) modify, copy or create derivative works of Services (or any part thereof), or (d) access or use Services for the purpose of building a competitive product or service or copying its features or user interface or authorize or permit a direct competitor to do so.
1.3
SSP’s Ownership
. SSP retains all right, title, and interest in and to the Services and Exchange, including all patent rights, copyrights, trademarks, trade secrets, know-how and any other proprietary rights recognized in any jurisdiction, including registrations, applications, renewals and extensions thereof. (the
“Intellectual Property Rights
), Except as expressly provided herein, nothing in this Agreement will be construed to confer any ownership interest, licence, sale, or other rights upon SSP or Outbrain (as applicable) by implication, estoppel or otherwise, as to any Intellectual Property Rights of the other party or any third party
1.4
Acceptance
. The Exchange shall conform to the OpenRTB Native 2.3 (or higher) standard and Functional Specifications (as defined on the Order Form). Within ten (10) business days from the time SSP delivers the Exchange to Outbrain, Outbrain will review, test (including in respect of functionality, performance, and usability) and either approve or reject the Exchange. Outbrain will provide the relevant reasons for any rejection, suggesting modifications as appropriate, on an iterative basis, and SSP will correct and re-deliver the Exchange until it is in a form acceptable to Outbrain. In the event that the Exchange does not meet Outbrain’s final reasonable approval at least one (1) day prior to the launch date, either party may (without incurring any liability) terminate this Agreement upon written notice to the other party.
2.
Outbrain’s Client’s Advertising Materials.
SSP acknowledges and agrees that it does not have any rights or title to any of the intellectual property rights contained in Outbrain’s clients’ advertising materials, except for the right to display the Outbrain’s clients’ advertisements on the websites in accordance with this Agreement and SSP agrees that it will not use the advertising materials for any other purpose. Further, SSP may not alter the advertising materials in any way.
3.
Payment.
3.1
Payment Terms
. Outbrain will pay SSP in accordance with this Agreement and as set forth on the Order Form. All payments are in US dollars. All payments under this Agreement will be in accordance with Outbrain’s measurements. Outbrain will pay SSP within sixty (60) business days of the end of each calendar month. If there is any disagreement with respect to any discrepancies related to the payment to SSP hereunder, the parties agree to work in good faith to resolve the dispute. Any dispute regarding a payment from Outbrain must be submitted to Outbrain in writing within thirty (30) days of postage or wire transfer date of such payment or it shall be deemed waived.
3.2
Payment Liability
. Unless otherwise set forth elsewhere, SSP agrees to hold Outbrain liable for payments solely to the extent proceeds have cleared from client to Outbrain for Fees incurred by bidding. For sums not cleared to Outbrain, SSP agrees to hold client solely liable. Outbrain agrees to make reasonable effort to collect and clear payment from client(s) on a timely basis. SSP hereby acknowledges and agrees that Outbrain shall have the right to set-off or withhold all amounts due by SSP to Outbrain or any of its Affiliates, from any amount payable by Outbrain or Affiliates to SSP.
3.3
Taxes
. For purposes of this Agreement, “Taxes” shall mean all federal, state, local, foreign and other net income, gross income, gross receipts, sales, purchase, use, ad valorem, value added, goods and services, harmonized sales, transfer, franchise, profits, withholding, payroll, excise, stamp, real or personal property, customs, duties or other taxes, fees, levies, assessments or charges of any kind whatsoever, including any related penalties and interest, imposed by any federal, territorial, state, local, or foreign government or any agency or political subdivision of any such government. Outbrain is solely responsible for the payment of all Taxes associated with its use of the Services and SSP is solely responsible for the payment of all Taxes associated with any payments made by Outbrain to SSP under the terms of this Agreement.
3.4
Fraudulent Activity
. Each party agrees that it will not, and will not authorize or encourage any third party to, directly or indirectly generate impressions, click-throughs, conversions, cloaked inventory, and/or other actions with respect to the Services or Exchange
through any automated, deceptive, fraudulent, or otherwise invalid means, including through repeated manual clicks, the use of “robots,” or other automated tools, or rendering or placing ads in a way to achieve excessive amount of accidental click-throughs (“
Fraudulent Activity
”) . If Outbrain suspects Fraudulent Activity, then Outbrain shall notify SSP via email that it suspects Fraudulent Activity and Outbrain, in its sole discretion, may withhold, setoff or charge back payment to SSP. In addition, SSP will promptly notify Outbrain of any actual or suspected Fraudulent Activity and cooperate with Outbrain in good faith to investigate, prevent and remedy any Fraudulent Activity.
4.
T
erm and Termination
.
4.1
Termination for breach.
Either Party may terminate this Agreement if the other party breaches this Agreement; provided that (a) the non-breaching Party provides the breaching Party written notice of such breach and (b) the breaching party fails to cure such breach within seven (7) days of such notice.
4.2
Effect of Termination.
Upon termination of the Term of this Agreement, Outbrain’s access to the Services shall cease and SSP shall not be under any further obligation to provide the Services under the terms of this Agreement. Outbrain shall pay SSP any undisputed fees owed to SSP within sixty (60) business days from the date of termination. Sections 1-3, 4.4 and 5-8 and 10.1 shall survive the termination of this Agreement. Within thirty (30) days of any termination or expiration of this Agreement, each party will return to the other party or destroy all Confidential Information of the other party.
5.
Data Protection
.
5.1 The parties are each a controller and/or a business in respect of end user data collected and processed via the Services and each party shall comply with all relevant provisions of data protection laws as it applies to matters under the Agreement and ensure that they process data fairly and lawfully in the provision and receipt of personal data. Each party remains individually responsible for compliance with relevant data protection laws and transparency obligations, provided however, that SSP shall have all contractual commitments in place with its publishers requiring them to comply with all data protection legislation in respect of the capturing of any consent to cookies required to be obtained from the relevant end user and any notices regarding the placing and use of third-party cookies upon which the Services relies.
5.2  Each party shall at all times satisfy the requirements for an appropriate legal basis for the processing of End User data.
5.3  Outbrain and SSP shall each maintain and display on their respective websites an easily accessible and discoverable privacy notice and/or policy that complies with all applicable laws, and with respect to SSP, that discloses (and as applicable, require its own partners to disclose) usage of third-party technology to collect, use and share data for the purpose of providing the Services. Outbrain's Privacy Policy is available at
http://www.outbrain.com/privacy
.
5.4  Requests from end users relating to the processing of personal data carried out by Outbrain can be exercised directly from Outbrain Interest Profile at
https://my.outbrain.com/recommendations-settings/home
.
5.5  The provisions of the SSP Data Sharing Agreement at
https://www.outbrain.com/legal#ssp-dsa
shall be fully incorporated into, and form part of, this Agreement.
6.
SSP’s Representations and Warranties
.
6.1  SSP represents and warrants that:
6.1.1  SSP is an entity duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its state of domicile (as listed on the Order Form).
6.1.2  SSP (i) has the full right and authority to enter and perform this Agreement; (ii) the execution, consent or acknowledgment of no other party is necessary in order to validate SSP’s entry into and performance of this Agreement; (iii) SSP’s entry into and performance of this Agreement does not violate any agreement binding on SSP; and (iv) this Agreement is a legal, valid, binding and enforceable obligation of SSP.
6.1.3  Nothing in the Services or Exchange infringes any intellectual property (copyright, author’s rights, trademark, etc.), personal right (right of privacy, right of publicity, defamation, etc.) or other proprietary right of any person nor do the Services or Exchange violate any local, state or federal law of the United States or any applicable international jurisdiction.
6.1.4  SSP will use commercially reasonable efforts to provide the Services according to the terms of this Agreement; and
6.1.5  SSP shall ensure that it and its publisher partners comply with the
Outbrain Publisher Guidelines
. SSP shall not place ads and it will not allow to place ads from Outbrain by injecting them into third party web pages or apps through browser extensions, injection proxies or other similar mechanisms.
6.1.6  SSP has all necessary rights and permissions to grant licenses in the Services to Outbrain.
6.1.7  SSP and SSP’s publisher partners comply and will continue to comply during the term of this agreement with all applicable laws, regulations and industry self-regulatory guidelines SSP represents and warrants that the SSP inventory does not and will not contain any Content that is: (i) illegal; (ii) infringes any Intellectual Property Right of any third party; (iii) is obscene, defamatory, libellous, slanderous material or material that violates any person’s right of publicity, privacy or personality; or (iv) knowingly contains a misrepresentation of fact or factual inaccuracy
6.1.8 Neither party to this Agreement has made any representations or warranties to the other except as expressly set forth in this Agreement.
7.
Limitation of Liability
. NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE FOR ANY SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THIS AGREEMENT OR ANY BREACH HEREOF (INCLUDING FOR LOSS OF DATA OR PROFITS, OR COST OF COVER), WHETHER OR NOT SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES, AND WHETHER UNDER A THEORY OF CONTRACT, TORT (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE) OR OTHERWISE, IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S AGGREGATE LIABILITY ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THIS AGREEMENT OR ANY BREACH HEREOF (WHETHER UNDER A THEORY OF CONTRACT, TORT (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE), WARRANTY OR OTHERWISE) , EXCEED THE FEES ACTUALLY RECEIVED BY SSP FOR THE APPLICABLE SERVICE UNDER THIS AGREEMENT OR RELATING TO ANY SUBJECT MATTER OF THIS AGREEMENT IN THE TWELVE (12) MONTHS PRIOR TO THE ACT THAT GAVE RISE TO THE LIABILITY, EVEN IF THE PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF ANY OF THE FOREGOING TYPES OF LOSSES OR DAMAGES.
8.
Indemnification
.
8.1  SSP hereby agrees to defend, indemnify and hold harmless Outbrain, its advertising clients, and their respective officers, directors, agents and employees from any and all liabilities, losses, expenses, damages, and costs (including, without limitation, reasonable attorneys’ fees) that may at any time be incurred by any of them by reason of claims, actions, suits or proceedings relating to or arising out of: (i) any breach (or, as to defence obligations only, alleged breach) by SSP of any term, condition, representation or warranty under this Agreement; (ii) the websites used by SSP in providing the Services and the Exchange; (iii) Outbrain’s use of the Services or Exchange; (iv) the infringement of the Exchange or the Services, or on the intellectual property right of a third party.
8.2 Outbrain hereby agrees to defend, indemnify and hold harmless SSP and its officers, directors from any liabilities damages, and costs (including, without limitation, reasonable attorneys’ fees) that may at any time be incurred by any of them by reason of any third-party suits or proceedings relating to or arising out of Outbrain’s gross negligence, wilful misconduct or fraudulent actions.
8.3  Any claim for indemnification hereunder shall be subject to the following provisions: (i) the indemnifying party shall be given prompt written notice of the claim by the indemnified party, provided that any delay in providing notice shall not relieve the indemnifying party of its indemnity obligations under this Agreement unless, and only to the extent, the indemnifying party was prejudiced by the delay; (ii) the indemnifying party shall have the right to control the defence and all negotiations relative to the settlement of any such claim, provided that it diligently undertakes such defence and that no settlement admitting liability on the part of the indemnified party or limiting the indemnified party’s rights hereunder may be made without the express written consent of the indemnified party; and (iii) the indemnified party shall reasonably cooperate with the indemnifying party and its counsel at the indemnifying party’s cost and expense.
9.
Maintenance and Upgrades
.
9.1
Updates, Upgrades.
SSP shall provide Outbrain, without any further charge to Outbrain, all updates (comprising general bug fixes and minor enhancements) and upgrades (comprising enhancements and major functionality changes) for the Services or Exchange reflecting improvements made to the underlying technology upon the implementation of such updates and upgrades to the Services or Exchange.
9.2
Maintenance
. SSP may occasionally be required to suspend the Services or Exchange to provide maintenance services. SSP shall provide Outbrain with no less than ten (10) business days advanced written notice of any such suspension.
10.
General Provisions
.
10.1
Confidentiality
. Both parties agree that they will hold in strictest confidence and will not use or disclose to any third party, any confidential information disclosed by the other party. For purposes of this Agreement, “confidential information” shall mean all non-public information that a party designates as being confidential, or which, under the circumstances of disclosure ought to be treated as confidential. “Confidential Information” includes, without limitation, the terms and conditions of this Agreement, information relating to released or unreleased Outbrain technology (software and hardware products), marketing or promotion materials related to Outbrain’s technology, products or services or customers or suppliers of Outbrain and SSP’s Services. “Confidential Information” shall not include information that was known to either party prior to the disclosure by the other party, information that becomes publicly available through no fault of any party or information that was independently developed by either party.
10.2
Notices
. All notices, requests, demands and other communication given or required to be given hereunder shall be by email and duly addressed to the parties as set forth on the Order Form. Delivery of notice by email shall be deemed made on the date of delivery. Any party may change its address or telecopy number for notice purposes by giving notice to the other party.
10.3
Severability
.
If any provision of this Agreement or its application to any party or circumstance is held invalid or unenforceable, then the remainder of this Agreement and the affected provision to the extent it is not held shall remain valid and enforceable and in full force and effect.
10.4
No Partnership
. This Agreement shall not be construed as creating a partnership or joint venture between Outbrain or SSP or between either of them and any third party or cause either of them to be responsible in any manner for the other’s or any third party’s debts or obligations, including to any employees.
10.5
No Waiver
. A waiver by either party of a default by the other party or of any right hereunder shall be effective only if it is in a writing signed by the waiving party and shall not be construed as a waiver of any other default or right, whether similar or dissimilar.
10.6
Transfer
. Neither party may sell, assign, or otherwise transfer, or attempt to sell, assign or otherwise transfer, all or any portion of its rights or obligations under or otherwise in connection with this Agreement without the prior written consent of the other; provided, however, the foregoing prohibition shall not apply to any sale of all or substantially all of one party’s assets or any merger or reorganisation to which consent of the other Party is not required.
10.7
Counterparts
.
This Agreement may be executed in counterparts, all of which shall constitute one instrument. Facsimile copies and electronic copies of this Agreement are acceptable as original copies.
10.8
Governing Law and Jurisdiction
. This Agreement will be governed by and construed under applicable federal law and the laws of the State of New York, excluding any conflict of law provisions. Outbrain and SSP irrevocably consent to the exclusive jurisdiction of any New York state or federal court sitting in the Southern District of New York, over any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement.
10.9
Binding Effect
. This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of Outbrain and SSP and their permitted successors and assigns.
10.10
Survival
. Rights and obligations under this Agreement, which by their nature should survive, will remain in effect after the termination or expiration of this Agreement.
10.11
Entire Agreement; Amendments
. This Agreement contains all of the agreements of the parties hereto with respect to the matters contained herein and all prior or contemporaneous agreements or understandings, oral or written, pertaining to any such matters are merged herein and shall not be effective for any purpose. No provision of this Agreement may be amended or added to except by an agreement in writing, which is signed by the parties hereto or their respective permitted successors-
Effective December 4th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
The following terms (“
Terms
”) govern Outbrain’s participation an auction to purchase certain digital advertising space or placements made available on SSP’s proprietary exchange or marketplace as defined in
the Enrollment Form.
1. SSP’s Services.
1.1
SSP’s Services
. SSP will provide the following services to Outbrain (collectively the “
Services
”): (a) SSP will customize and implement an online advertising exchange (the “
Exchange
”) that performs in accordance with the functional specifications, which Exchange shall allow Outbrain to purchase impression inventory delivered by the Exchange (“
Deliverables
”) in near real time by bidding on the impression inventory; (b) SSP will host the Exchange; (c) SSP will provide maintenance services for the Exchange; and (d) its Services and, as necessary SSP will provide customization and support services, including reasonable education and support, during normal business hours, to Outbrain.
1.2
License Grant
. Subject to the terms of this Agreement, SSP hereby grants Outbrain a non-exclusive, non-transferable right to access and use the Services. Outbrain agrees that it will not: (a) resell, license, lease, time-share, distribute or otherwise transfer to any third party its right to access and use the Services, (b) reverse engineer, decompile or dissemble the Services, (c) modify, copy or create derivative works of Services (or any part thereof), or (d) access or use Services for the purpose of building a competitive product or service or copying its features or user interface or authorize or permit a direct competitor to do so.
1.3
SSP’s Ownership
. SSP retains all right, title, and interest in and to the Services and Exchange, including all patent rights, copyrights, trademarks, trade secrets, know-how and any other proprietary rights recognized in any jurisdiction, including registrations, applications, renewals and extensions thereof. (the
“Intellectual Property Rights
), Except as expressly provided herein, nothing in this Agreement will be construed to confer any ownership interest, licence, sale, or other rights upon SSP or Outbrain (as applicable) by implication, estoppel or otherwise, as to any Intellectual Property Rights of the other party or any third party
1.4
Acceptance
. The Exchange shall conform to the OpenRTB Native 2.3 (or higher) standard and Functional Specifications (as defined on the Order Form). Within ten (10) business days from the time SSP delivers the Exchange to Outbrain, Outbrain will review, test (including in respect of functionality, performance, and usability) and either approve or reject the Exchange. Outbrain will provide the relevant reasons for any rejection, suggesting modifications as appropriate, on an iterative basis, and SSP will correct and re-deliver the Exchange until it is in a form acceptable to Outbrain. In the event that the Exchange does not meet Outbrain’s final reasonable approval at least one (1) day prior to the launch date, either party may (without incurring any liability) terminate this Agreement upon written notice to the other party.
2.
Outbrain’s Client’s Advertising Materials.
SSP acknowledges and agrees that it does not have any rights or title to any of the intellectual property rights contained in Outbrain’s clients’ advertising materials, except for the right to display the Outbrain’s clients’ advertisements on the websites in accordance with this Agreement and SSP agrees that it will not use the advertising materials for any other purpose. Further, SSP may not alter the advertising materials in any way.
3.
Payment.
3.1
Payment Terms
. Outbrain will pay SSP in accordance with this Agreement and as set forth on the Order Form. All payments are in US dollars. All payments under this Agreement will be in accordance with Outbrain’s measurements. Outbrain will pay SSP within sixty (60) business days of the end of each calendar month. If there is any disagreement with respect to any discrepancies related to the payment to SSP hereunder, the parties agree to work in good faith to resolve the dispute. Any dispute regarding a payment from Outbrain must be submitted to Outbrain in writing within thirty (30) days of postage or wire transfer date of such payment or it shall be deemed waived.
3.2
Payment Liability
. Unless otherwise set forth elsewhere, SSP agrees to hold Outbrain liable for payments solely to the extent proceeds have cleared from client to Outbrain for Fees incurred by bidding. For sums not cleared to Outbrain, SSP agrees to hold client solely liable. Outbrain agrees to make reasonable effort to collect and clear payment from client(s) on a timely basis. SSP hereby acknowledges and agrees that Outbrain shall have the right to set-off or withhold all amounts due by SSP to Outbrain or any of its Affiliates, from any amount payable by Outbrain or Affiliates to SSP.
3.3
Taxes
. For purposes of this Agreement, “Taxes” shall mean all federal, state, local, foreign and other net income, gross income, gross receipts, sales, purchase, use, ad valorem, value added, goods and services, harmonized sales, transfer, franchise, profits, withholding, payroll, excise, stamp, real or personal property, customs, duties or other taxes, fees, levies, assessments or charges of any kind whatsoever, including any related penalties and interest, imposed by any federal, territorial, state, local, or foreign government or any agency or political subdivision of any such government. Outbrain is solely responsible for the payment of all Taxes associated with its use of the Services and SSP is solely responsible for the payment of all Taxes associated with any payments made by Outbrain to SSP under the terms of this Agreement.
3.4
Fraudulent Activity
. Each party agrees that it will not, and will not authorize or encourage any third party to, directly or indirectly generate impressions, click-throughs, conversions, cloaked inventory, and/or other actions with respect to the Services or Exchange
through any automated, deceptive, fraudulent, or otherwise invalid means, including through repeated manual clicks, the use of “robots,” or other automated tools, or rendering or placing ads in a way to achieve excessive amount of accidental click-throughs (“
Fraudulent Activity
”) . If Outbrain suspects Fraudulent Activity, then Outbrain shall notify SSP via email that it suspects Fraudulent Activity and Outbrain, in its sole discretion, may withhold, setoff or charge back payment to SSP. In addition, SSP will promptly notify Outbrain of any actual or suspected Fraudulent Activity and cooperate with Outbrain in good faith to investigate, prevent and remedy any Fraudulent Activity.
4.
T
erm and Termination
.
4.1
Termination for breach.
Either Party may terminate this Agreement if the other party breaches this Agreement; provided that (a) the non-breaching Party provides the breaching Party written notice of such breach and (b) the breaching party fails to cure such breach within seven (7) days of such notice.
4.2
Effect of Termination.
Upon termination of the Term of this Agreement, Outbrain’s access to the Services shall cease and SSP shall not be under any further obligation to provide the Services under the terms of this Agreement. Outbrain shall pay SSP any undisputed fees owed to SSP within sixty (60) business days from the date of termination. Sections 1-3, 4.4 and 5-8 and 10.1 shall survive the termination of this Agreement. Within thirty (30) days of any termination or expiration of this Agreement, each party will return to the other party or destroy all Confidential Information of the other party.
5.
Data Protection
.
5.1  The parties are each a controller and/or a business in respect of end user data collected and processed via the Services and each party shall comply with all relevant provisions of data protection laws as it applies to matters under the Agreement and ensure that they process data fairly and lawfully in the provision and receipt of personal data. Each party remains individually responsible for compliance with relevant data protection laws and transparency obligations, provided however, that SSP shall have all contractual commitments in place with its publishers requiring them to comply with all data protection legislation in respect of the capturing of any consent to cookies required to be obtained from the relevant end user and any notices regarding the placing and use of third-party cookies upon which the Services relies.
5.2  Each party shall at all times satisfy the requirements for an appropriate legal basis for the processing of End User data.
5.3  Outbrain and SSP shall each maintain and display on their respective websites an easily accessible and discoverable privacy notice and/or policy that complies with all applicable laws, and with respect to SSP, that discloses (and as applicable, require its own partners to disclose) usage of third-party technology to collect, use and share data for the purpose of providing the Services. Outbrain's Privacy Policy is available at
http://www.outbrain.com/privacy
.
5.4  Requests from end users relating to the processing of personal data carried out by Outbrain can be exercised directly from Outbrain Interest Profile at
https://my.outbrain.com/recommendations-settings/home
.
5.5  The provisions of the SSP Data Sharing Agreement at
https://www.outbrain.com/legal#ssp-dsa
shall be fully incorporated into, and form part of, this Agreement.
6.
SSP’s Representations and Warranties
.
6.1  SSP represents and warrants that:
6.1.1  SSP is an entity duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its state of domicile (as listed on the Order Form).
6.1.2  SSP (i) has the full right and authority to enter and perform this Agreement; (ii) the execution, consent or acknowledgment of no other party is necessary in order to validate SSP’s entry into and performance of this Agreement; (iii) SSP’s entry into and performance of this Agreement does not violate any agreement binding on SSP; and (iv) this Agreement is a legal, valid, binding and enforceable obligation of SSP.
6.1.3  Nothing in the Services or Exchange infringes any intellectual property (copyright, author’s rights, trademark, etc.), personal right (right of privacy, right of publicity, defamation, etc.) or other proprietary right of any person nor do the Services or Exchange violate any local, state or federal law of the United States or any applicable international jurisdiction.
6.1.4  SSP will use commercially reasonable efforts to provide the Services according to the terms of this Agreement; and
6.1.5  SSP shall ensure that it and its publisher partners comply with the
Outbrain Publisher Guidelines
. SSP shall not place ads and it will not allow to place ads from Outbrain by injecting them into third party web pages or apps through browser extensions, injection proxies or other similar mechanisms.
6.1.6  SSP has all necessary rights and permissions to grant licenses in the Services to Outbrain.
6.1.7  SSP and SSP’s publisher partners comply and will continue to comply during the term of this agreement with all applicable laws, regulations and industry self-regulatory guidelines SSP represents and warrants that the SSP inventory does not and will not contain any Content that is: (i) illegal; (ii) infringes any Intellectual Property Right of any third party; (iii) is obscene, defamatory, libellous, slanderous material or material that violates any person’s right of publicity, privacy or personality; or (iv) knowingly contains a misrepresentation of fact or factual inaccuracy
6.1.8  Neither party to this Agreement has made any representations or warranties to the other except as expressly set forth in this Agreement.
7.
Limitation of Liability
. NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE FOR ANY SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THIS AGREEMENT OR ANY BREACH HEREOF (INCLUDING FOR LOSS OF DATA OR PROFITS, OR COST OF COVER), WHETHER OR NOT SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES, AND WHETHER UNDER A THEORY OF CONTRACT, TORT (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE) OR OTHERWISE, IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S AGGREGATE LIABILITY ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THIS AGREEMENT OR ANY BREACH HEREOF (WHETHER UNDER A THEORY OF CONTRACT, TORT (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE), WARRANTY OR OTHERWISE) , EXCEED THE FEES ACTUALLY RECEIVED BY SSP FOR THE APPLICABLE SERVICE UNDER THIS AGREEMENT OR RELATING TO ANY SUBJECT MATTER OF THIS AGREEMENT IN THE TWELVE (12) MONTHS PRIOR TO THE ACT THAT GAVE RISE TO THE LIABILITY, EVEN IF THE PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF ANY OF THE FOREGOING TYPES OF LOSSES OR DAMAGES.
8.
Indemnification
.
8.1 SSP hereby agrees to defend, indemnify and hold harmless Outbrain, its advertising clients, and their respective officers, directors, agents and employees from any and all liabilities, losses, expenses, damages, and costs (including, without limitation, reasonable attorneys’ fees) that may at any time be incurred by any of them by reason of claims, actions, suits or proceedings relating to or arising out of: (i) any breach (or, as to defence obligations only, alleged breach) by SSP of any term, condition, representation or warranty under this Agreement; (ii) the websites used by SSP in providing the Services and the Exchange; (iii) Outbrain’s use of the Services or Exchange; (iv) the infringement of the Exchange or the Services, or on the intellectual property right of a third party.
8.2  Outbrain hereby agrees to defend, indemnify and hold harmless SSP and its officers, directors from any liabilities damages, and costs (including, without limitation, reasonable attorneys’ fees) that may at any time be incurred by any of them by reason of any third-party suits or proceedings relating to or arising out of Outbrain’s gross negligence, wilful misconduct or fraudulent actions.
8.3  Any claim for indemnification hereunder shall be subject to the following provisions: (i) the indemnifying party shall be given prompt written notice of the claim by the indemnified party, provided that any delay in providing notice shall not relieve the indemnifying party of its indemnity obligations under this Agreement unless, and only to the extent, the indemnifying party was prejudiced by the delay; (ii) the indemnifying party shall have the right to control the defence and all negotiations relative to the settlement of any such claim, provided that it diligently undertakes such defence and that no settlement admitting liability on the part of the indemnified party or limiting the indemnified party’s rights hereunder may be made without the express written consent of the indemnified party; and (iii) the indemnified party shall reasonably cooperate with the indemnifying party and its counsel at the indemnifying party’s cost and expense.
9.
Maintenance and Upgrades
.
9.1
Updates, Upgrades.
SSP shall provide Outbrain, without any further charge to Outbrain, all updates (comprising general bug fixes and minor enhancements) and upgrades (comprising enhancements and major functionality changes) for the Services or Exchange reflecting improvements made to the underlying technology upon the implementation of such updates and upgrades to the Services or Exchange.
9.2
Maintenance
. SSP may occasionally be required to suspend the Services or Exchange to provide maintenance services. SSP shall provide Outbrain with no less than ten (10) business days advanced written notice of any such suspension.
10.
General Provisions
.
10.1
Confidentiality
. Both parties agree that they will hold in strictest confidence and will not use or disclose to any third party, any confidential information disclosed by the other party. For purposes of this Agreement, “confidential information” shall mean all non-public information that a party designates as being confidential, or which, under the circumstances of disclosure ought to be treated as confidential. “Confidential Information” includes, without limitation, the terms and conditions of this Agreement, information relating to released or unreleased Outbrain technology (software and hardware products), marketing or promotion materials related to Outbrain’s technology, products or services or customers or suppliers of Outbrain and SSP’s Services. “Confidential Information” shall not include information that was known to either party prior to the disclosure by the other party, information that becomes publicly available through no fault of any party or information that was independently developed by either party.
10.2
Notices
. All notices, requests, demands and other communication given or required to be given hereunder shall be by email and duly addressed to the parties as set forth on the Order Form. Delivery of notice by email shall be deemed made on the date of delivery. Any party may change its address or telecopy number for notice purposes by giving notice to the other party.
10.3
Severability
.
If any provision of this Agreement or its application to any party or circumstance is held invalid or unenforceable, then the remainder of this Agreement and the affected provision to the extent it is not held shall remain valid and enforceable and in full force and effect.
10.4
No Partnership
. This Agreement shall not be construed as creating a partnership or joint venture between Outbrain or SSP or between either of them and any third party or cause either of them to be responsible in any manner for the other’s or any third party’s debts or obligations, including to any employees.
10.5
No Waiver
. A waiver by either party of a default by the other party or of any right hereunder shall be effective only if it is in a writing signed by the waiving party and shall not be construed as a waiver of any other default or right, whether similar or dissimilar.
10.6
Transfer
. Neither party may sell, assign, or otherwise transfer, or attempt to sell, assign or otherwise transfer, all or any portion of its rights or obligations under or otherwise in connection with this Agreement without the prior written consent of the other; provided, however, the foregoing prohibition shall not apply to any sale of all or substantially all of one party’s assets or any merger or reorganisation to which consent of the other Party is not required.
10.7
Counterparts
.
This Agreement may be executed in counterparts, all of which shall constitute one instrument. Facsimile copies and electronic copies of this Agreement are acceptable as original copies.
10.8
Governing Law and Jurisdiction
. This Agreement will be governed by and construed under applicable laws of England and Wales, excluding any conflict of law provisions. Outbrain and SSP irrevocably consent to the exclusive jurisdiction of any England and Wales, over any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement.
10.9
Binding Effect
. This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of Outbrain and SSP and their permitted successors and assigns.
10.10
Survival
. Rights and obligations under this Agreement, which by their nature should survive, will remain in effect after the termination or expiration of this Agreement.
10.11
Entire Agreement; Amendments
. This Agreement contains all of the agreements of the parties hereto with respect to the matters contained herein and all prior or contemporaneous agreements or understandings, oral or written, pertaining to any such matters are merged herein and shall not be effective for any purpose. No provision of this Agreement may be amended or added to except by an agreement in writing, which is signed by the parties hereto or their respective permitted successors-
Effective January 18th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
The following terms (“
Terms
”) govern Partner’s participation an auction to purchase certain digital advertising space or placements made available on Outbrain’s proprietary exchange or marketplace as defined in a Enrollment Form.
1.	Service
1.1
Access to the Service.
Demand Partner will use the Services only for its own use or for an advertiser or direct agent with which Demand Partner has a direct relationship (“
DP Client
”).  During the Term, Outbrain grants Demand Partner a non-exclusive, non-transferable, limited license to access and use the Service as reasonably necessary for Demand Partner’s normal use of the Service on a self-serve basis, in particular, for the purposes of bidding on and purchasing Partner Inventory on an ‘auction’ basis. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Outbrain, in its sole discretion, shall determine what percentage of its Partner Inventory to permit DP to bid on and to allocate to the Service generally.  Outbrain owns all right, title, and interest in and to the Service.  Aside from the limited rights and licenses expressly granted hereunder, no other license is granted.
1.2
Ads
.  Demand Partner has the right and authorizes Outbrain to place its, or DP Client’s, ads on the Partner Inventory, and is solely responsible for determining the propriety and legality of the ads (which includes all elements of the ad, including the photograph and headline).  Ads must comply with Outbrain’s Advertising Guidelines (available at
https://www.outbrain.com/advertisers/guidelines/
).  Outbrain may at any time for any or no reason reject or remove any ad.  Demand Partner shall not, directly or indirectly, provide an ad that: (i) is obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous, pornographic, violent, profane, indecent or unlawful; (ii) is factually inaccurate, misleading or deceptive; or (iii) facilitates or promotes any type of illegal activity, including without limitation pyramid schemes, gambling, the sale or use of illicit drugs, or discrimination or harassment of any individual or group.  Further, ads shall neither (a) redirect to a destination other than as originally submitted to the Service, and/or (b) be substantively different from the ad originally submitted to the Service.
1.3
3rd Party Targeting
. When utilizes third party segments for enhanced targeting of its campaign.  If Partner uses 3rd Party Targeting of its campaign(s), Partner shall pay for its use above mentioned including any applicable taxes. If Partner utilizes 3
rd
Party Targeting the Partner shall (i) disclose this to users via an appropriate notice and/or in its privacy policy (as applicable), and (ii) not use 3
rd
Party Targeting to target minors or other sensitive categories of data ((iii) disclose to it’s users that he  may place third party pixels or tags (“the “
Third Party Pixels
”) for the purpose of providing analytics related to 3rd Party Targeting functionality. Partner represents and warrants that (a) its use of the Third Party Pixels is in accordance with Data Protection Laws; and (b) it has provided appropriate notice to users regarding use of the Pixels, including an explanation (1) that third parties, including Outbrain, may use cookies or similar technologies to collect or receive information from Partner’s website(s), and may use that information to provide measurement services and target ads; and (2) as to how users opt-out of the collection of information for targeting purposes.
1.4
Beta Features
.  During the Term, Outbrain may offer Demand Partner the right to use certain experimental features that are made available to Demand Partner by Outbrain on a test basis (“
Beta Features
”).  All Beta Features are provided on an “as is” basis, without any representations, warranties, covenants or obligations of any kind.  Any use by Demand Partner of Beta Features is solely at Demand Partner’s own risk.  Outbrain may modify or remove any Beta Features at any time.
1.5
Reporting.
All Demand Partner-trafficked ads will be counted as impressions.  Outbrain’s final monthly reports of impressions will provide the conclusive basis for Outbrain's calculation of the Fees (defined below) owed by Demand Partner.  If there is a 5% discrepancy or more between Demand Partner's reporting and Outbrain's, then the parties agree to work in good faith to identify the correct amount to be paid to Outbrain.  If the discrepancy is less than 5%, Outbrain's numbers shall be conclusive. If Outbrain's reporting in a given day varies by more than 5% in comparison to Demand Partner's reporting, and Demand Partner notifies Outbrain of this in writing (email shall suffice), then the parties shall make all best efforts to solve the discrepancy as follows within 3 business days thereafter:(a) Outbrain and Demand Partner shall exchange reporting data in good faith in order to find the source of the discrepancy; (b) Outbrain shall stop sending bid requests and/or Demand Partner will stop bidding on that portion of supply where the Parties have agreed via email there is a discrepancy;(c) Based on the findings regarding the cause of such discrepancy it will be decided between the parties whether an amount should be waived. In case Demand Partner and Outbrain do not reach an agreement, Demand Partner may ultimately dispute the amount in question in accordance with this Section. For the avoidance of doubt, Demand Partner shall not allowed to withhold any non-disputed amounts.
1.6
Limitations.
Outbrain does not guarantee: (a) the placement, positioning or the timing of delivery of any ads, (b) impressions or clicks on any ads, or (c) conversions.   In no event shall Outbrain be liable for failure to provide any of the foregoing.
1.7
Prohibitions
.  Demand Partner will not (a) attempt to circumvent any Outbrain security measure, (b) share its Service user interface login or otherwise grant account access with any third party without the express permission of Outbrain, (c) reproduce, distribute, modify, prepare derivative works of, translate, reverse engineer, reverse compile or disassemble any Outbrain-provided tag, or any portion of the Service, (d) use or authorize the use of the Service for any purpose not permitted under this Agreement, (e) copy, sell, transfer, lease, lend, syndicate, or sub-syndicate the Service, or use the Service for co-branding, timesharing, arbitrage (e.g., reselling), service bureau or other unauthorized purposes, (f) utilize rotating ad tags or otherwise violate Outbrain’s Advertising Guidelines (g) import into the Service any personally identifiable information including by using Outbrain’s ad tags or pixels, or (h) distribute viruses or other malware (through the ads or any other mechanism).  Outbrain may immediately suspend Demand Partner’s access or terminate this Agreement upon any breach by Demand Partner of this
Section 1.8
.  Under no circumstances may Demand Partner use the Services for gathering competitive intelligence.  To the extent that Outbrain provides the name and/or section of a name of the website related to Partner Inventory, Demand Partner shall not use such information (i) as its primary bidding criteria (e.g., Demand Partner will bid on a user based on what Demand Partner knows about such user, and only use the website name as secondary information informing the bid price), and (ii) to build a "segment" of users of a particular website or group of websites such that the group associated with a particular website, section of the website or general interest areas of a website (e.g., Demand Partner may not create an “ESPN Audience” or “sport fans” segment based on any information obtained by using the Service).
2.	Compliance, Privacy and Data
2.1
Compliance
Demand Partner will, and will require DP Clients, to (i) follow the Notice and Choice Provisions of the NAI Principles found at
www.networkadvertising.org
, and (ii) publish and comply with a legally sufficient privacy policy that fulfills the requirements of the DAA Self-Governing Principles found at
aboutads.info
.  Demand Partner must place the AdChoice icon (or a similar icon) on each ad displayed on the Partner Inventory.  Such icon must link directly to the Demand Partner and/or DP Clients’ opt out functionality (or the NAI global opt out).  Demand Partner shall ensure that its collection, storage and use of all user data (including any tracking and analytics used), whether conducted through the Service or otherwise, is strictly in compliance with all applicable laws, including any local law requirements related to use of IP addresses, behavioral information and /or COPPA.
2.2
Data.
Any data provided by Outbrain to Demand Partner, or collected directly by Demand Partner through its use of the Service shall belong to Outbrain (“
Outbrain Data
”).  Demand Partner has a limited license to use the Outbrain Data only in compliance with this Agreement and for its internal use and reporting to DP Clients, provided, that each such client agrees in writing to Demand Partner that such reporting may be used for its own internal purposes.  For clarity, any collection of data by Demand Partner regarding a user's interaction with a particular website of the Partner Inventory shall not be disclosed, sold, or otherwise transferred to any third party for any purpose.
2.3
No PII.
In no event will Demand Partner (a) import any personally identifiable information into the Service, including by using Outbrain's pixels to gather such information, and (b) combine any Outbrain Data with any personally identifiable information.
2.4
Data Sharing Agreement. The provisions of the
OPA Data Sharing Agreement
shall be fully incorporated into, and form part of, this Agreement.
3.	Fees and Payment Terms
3.1	Demand Partner shall pay Outbrain fees (based on the number of ad impressions, as measured by Outbrain's tracking system and any applicable taxes (“Fees”) within thirty (30) days of receipt of Outbrain's invoice.  If Demand Partner chooses to pay its invoice via credit card, a three percent (3%) convenience fee shall be added to the Fees.
3.2	If payment is not made when due, Outbrain may charge interest at the rate of 2% per month (or the maximum allowed by law, whichever is lower) from the due date until the date of actual payment, whether before or after judgment.  Outbrain also reserves the right to suspend or terminate Demand Partner's use of the Service until Demand Partner has paid all amounts due and to charge Demand Partner for all costs of collection, including collection agency and reasonable legal fees and court costs. Demand Partner authorizes Outbrain to investigate Demand Partner's credit record.  If applicable, Demand Partner agrees to provide such further financial information and documentation as may be required from time to time by Outbrain as a condition for the continued extension of credit.  Demand Partner acknowledges and agrees that any account, credit card and related billing and payment information which Demand Partner provides to Outbrain may be shared by Outbrain with companies who work on Outbrain's behalf solely for the purpose of performing credit checks, effecting payment to Outbrain, collecting debts owed to Outbrain and/or servicing Demand Partner's account.
3.3	All payments due under this Agreement shall be made without setoff or deduction, including for or on account of any present or future tax, assessment, or other governmental charge (“
Taxes
”) imposed upon such payment by any state, country, political subdivision or taxing authority thereof or therein.  If Demand Partner shall at any time be required by law to withhold any Taxes from any payment to Outbrain, Demand Partner will pay as additional amounts to Outbrain such amounts as may be necessary so that every net payment to Outbrain after withholding for or on account of any Taxes will not be less than the amount required under this Agreement then due and payable.  Demand Partner shall notify Outbrain of any disputes or discrepancies in writing within 30 days of receipt of invoice, after such time the invoice shall be final, and all disputes or discrepancies waived.
4.	Term and Cancellation
Either party may terminate this Agreement at any time in the event of a breach by the other party of any material provision of this Agreement that remains uncured ten (10) days after the breaching party’s receipt of written notice of the breach.  Upon expiration or termination of this Agreement, all rights and obligations of the parties under this Agreement will be extinguished, except that
Sections
6
,
8
,
9
and
10
, together with any outstanding payment obligation, will survive and continue to bind the parties in accordance with their terms.
5.	Additional Representations and Warranties/Disclaimers
5.1	Each party represents and warrants to the other party that: (i) it has all necessary rights and authority to enter into the Agreement and grant the rights and licenses under the Agreement; and (ii) the execution or acceptance of the Agreement, and the performance of its respective obligations and duties pursuant to the Agreement, do not and will not violate any agreement to which such party is bound.
5.2	Demand Partner further represents and warrants that: (i) the ads it submits, uploads and/or runs through the Service do not violate any applicable laws, rules and regulations and will not contain any material which may be harmful, abusive, obscene, threatening or defamatory; (ii) it has all necessary rights to permit and grants Outbrain pursuant to this Agreement all such rights which are necessary for Outbrain to (as applicable) use, host, cache, route, store, copy, modify, distribute, reformat, reproduce, publish, display, transmit and distribute the ads; (iii) use of the ad in accordance with the Agreement will not infringe any intellectual property rights of any third party; and (iv) it will not use the Service in a manner that provides an unintended advantage or interferes with the integrity and/or overall performance of the Service.  Outbrain may immediately suspend any campaign or Demand Partner’s use of the Services if Demand Partner violates this Section 5.
5.3	If the ads have been provided to Demand Partner by a third party, Demand Partner represents and warrants that: (i) it is the authorized agent of the provider of the ad; (ii) it has the legal authority to enter into the Agreement and make all decisions and take all actions relating to the provider of the ad; (iii) it has entered into a written agreement granting the agent the authority to represent the provider of the ad in accordance with (i) and (ii) above (and shall submit such agreement to Outbrain upon request).   (iii) it shall comply with Applicable Laws and “Applicable Laws” means any applicable federal, national, state, or foreign laws or regulations or any industry self-regulatory rules or guidelines (including the Interactive Advertising Bureau Guidelines, Standards & Best Practices, the NAI Code of Conduct, the DAA Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising.
5.4	EXCEPT AS MAY BE EXPRESSLY SET FORTH IN THE AGREEMENT, OUTBRAIN MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS OR WARRANTIES, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, TITLE, NON-INFRINGEMENT, OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, OR ANY WARRANTIES ARISING FROM A COURSE OF DEALING, USAGE OR TRADE PRACTICE ABOUT ITS SERVICES AND THE PERFORMANCE OR SUCCESS OF ANY CAMPAIGNS MADE BY IT ON BEHALF OF DEMAND PARTNER, OR THAT THE SERVICE WILL OPERATE UNINTERRUPTED, SECURE OR ERROR FREE.
6.	Indemnification
6.1	Each party shall defend, indemnify and hold harmless the other party and its respective agents, affiliates, subsidiaries, directors, officers, employees, contractors, and Inventory Partners (as applicable) against any and all third party claims resulting from the breach of such party's duties, obligations and representations under the Agreement.
6.2	In connection with any such claim: (i) the indemnified party shall provide prompt written notice to the indemnifying party of any such claim (provided that the failure to provide such prompt notice shall not relieve the indemnifying party of its indemnification obligations in the Agreement, except to the extent it has been damaged thereby); (ii) the indemnifying party shall have sole control of the defense or settlement of the claim (provided that the indemnifying party may not enter into any settlement that may adversely affect the rights or obligations of the indemnified party without the indemnified party's prior written consent); (iii) at the indemnifying party's request and expense, the indemnified party cooperating in the investigation and defense of such claim; and (iv) the indemnified party shall have the right to participate in its defense with counsel of its own choosing at the indemnified party's expense.
7.	Limitation of Liability
EXCEPT WITH RESPECT TO CLAIMS ARISING FROM A PARTY'S INDEMNITY OBLIGATIONS, WILLFUL MISCONDUCT, BREACH OF SECTION 2, AND/OR NON-PAYMENT OF FEES OWED IN THE AGREEMENT, THE MAXIMUM AGGREGATE LIABILITY OF EITHER PARTY AND ITS DIRECTORS, OFFICERS, EMPLOYEES, VENDORS, NETWORK PARTNERS OR AGENTS FOR ANY ACTION REGARDLESS OF THE FORM OF THE ACTION, WHETHER IN TORT OR CONTRACT, ARISING UNDER OR RELATED IN ANY WAY TO THE AGREEMENT OR ITS IMPLEMENTATION SHALL BE LIMITED TO THE GREATER OF: (I) THE AMOUNT OF FEES PAYABLE BY DEMAND PARTNER UNDER THE AGREEMENT IN THE 12 MONTHS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO A CLAIM; AND (II) $500,000.  IN NO EVENT SHALL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE FOR CONSEQUENTIAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE OR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES OR OTHER DAMAGES OF ANY KIND, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION, LOST DATA, LOST REVENUES OR LOST PROFITS, ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED IN ANY WAY TO THE AGREEMENT OR ITS IMPLEMENTATION, EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES.  FURTHERMORE, DEMAND PARTNER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT OUTBRAIN IS NOT LIABLE FOR TRANSACTIONS EXECUTED WITHIN THE SERVICE AS A RESULT OF ERRORS MADE IN ENTERING INFORMATION INTO THE OUTBRAIN USER INTERFACE BY DEMAND PARTNER, INCLUDING INCORRECT PRICING, TARGETING OR BUDGETING INFORMATION. NOTWITHSTANDING ALL OF THE FOREGOING, NOTHING HEREIN SHALL LIMIT DEMAND PARTNER’S OBLIGATION TO PAY THE FEES.  OUTBRAIN IS NOT LIABLE FOR ANY OUTAGES OR DOWNTIME OF THE SERVICE.
8. 	Intellectual Property Rights.
Each party acknowledges and agrees that each party has the exclusive right, title, and interest in and to all of their respective trademarks, trade names, service marks, logos, program and event names, identifications, and other proprietary rights and privileges (“
Intellectual Property
”).  This Agreement and its various provisions are not a license or assignment of any right, title, or interest in either party’s Intellectual Property by or to the other party.  Neither party may, in any manner, represent that it has any ownership or other interest in the other party’s Intellectual Property.  Neither party may do or cause to be done anything that impairs the other party’s exclusive license in its Intellectual Property.  Neither party may use, print, or duplicate the Intellectual Property of the other party unless prior written approval has been obtained from the other party.  Any permitted use by one party of the Intellectual Property of the other party is limited to the term of this Agreement.  Upon the termination of this Agreement, or upon request of either party, the other party must immediately cease all use of the applicable Intellectual Property and shall promptly return all materials to requesting party.  Neither party may assign or attempt to assign any rights with regard to the other party’s Intellectual Property that arise under this Agreement and any such attempted assignment is void.
9.	Confidentiality
9.1	Each party agrees that with respect to any Confidential Information (as defined below) that is disclosed by one party to the other in connection with the Agreement, the party receiving such Confidential Information shall not disclose such Confidential Information to any third party, or use it for any purpose, except in connection with its rights and obligations under the Agreement. "
Confidential Information
"
means all information concerning a party or any of its subsidiaries or affiliates that is not generally known to the public, which information is marked confidential or proprietary, or which under the circumstances ought reasonably to be treated as confidential or proprietary, and includes, without limitation, the terms of the Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information does not include information that: (i) is, as of the time of disclosure, or thereafter becomes, part of the public domain through a source other than the receiving party; (ii) was lawfully in the possession of the receiving party as of the time of disclosure; (iii) is independently developed by the receiving party without reference to the Confidential Information; or (iv) is subsequently obtained from a third party not subject to an obligation of confidentiality with respect to the information disclosed.
9.2	Confidential Information shall be kept in the strictest confidence and shall be protected by all reasonable and necessary security measures. Confidential Information shall not be released by the receiving party to anyone except an employee or agent, who has a need to know same, and who is bound by confidentiality obligations at least as restrictive as these contained herein. Neither party will use any portion of Confidential Information provided by the other party pursuant to the Agreement for any purpose other than as expressly set forth under the Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, either party may disclose Confidential Information strictly necessary to comply with the demands of any court order, law or governmental agency and Outbrain may share Confidential Information of Demand Partner with any holding company of Demand Partner or with any subsidiary company of Demand Partner’s holding company.
11. Miscellaneous
This Agreement will be governed by and construed under applicable laws of England and Wales, excluding any conflict of law provisions. Outbrain and Demand Partner irrevocably consent to the exclusive jurisdiction of any England and Wales, over any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement. The parties agree that irreparable damage would occur in the event that any of the provisions of the Agreement is not performed in accordance with these specific terms. Accordingly, the parties agree that each shall be entitled to injunctive relief to prevent breaches of the Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions of the Agreement, in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or in equity. The parties are independent contractors, and nothing in the Agreement will be construed to create a partnership, joint venture, agency or other relationship between the parties. No failure or forbearance by a party to enforce any of its rights under the Agreement or insist upon performance of the other party’s obligations under the Agreement will be deemed a waiver of such rights or obligations to any extent, and no waiver by either party of any default or breach of the Agreement will constitute a waiver of any other or subsequent default or breach. Neither party will be liable for any failure to perform due to causes beyond the party's reasonable control. The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties concerning its subject matter and supersedes all prior or contemporaneous agreements or understandings, written or oral, concerning such subject matter. The Partner Enrollment Form may be amended, modified or superseded, only by a written instrument signed by both parties. The headings in the Agreement are for the convenience of reference only and have no legal effect. The Agreement may be executed and delivered via electronic transmission or another means of complete and accurate reproduction, and copies of the Agreement delivered via such means will be deemed originals for all purposes. The Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original, but all of which together will constitute one and the same instrument. If any provision of the Agreement is held to be unenforceable for any reason, such provision shall be reformed only to the extent necessary to make it enforceable, failing which, it shall be severed from the Agreement and the balance of the Agreement shall continue in full force and effect. Neither party may assign the Agreement or any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the other party’s prior written consent, except (i) due to operation of law, merger, reorganization, or as a result of an acquisition or change of control, and (ii) by Outbrain to its subsidiaries. Subject to the foregoing, the Agreement will be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties and their permitted successors and assigns.
Effective December 6th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
TECHNOLOGY LICENSE AGREEMENT
This Technology License Agreement (the “
Terms
”) is entered into on the Effective Date by and between the Outbrain entity and Partner identified in the Order Form. Outbrain and Partner may collectively be referred to herein as the Parties and each individually as a Party. These Terms shall apply to any and all agreements between the parties and their Affiliates from time to time.
1.
DEFINITIONS
1.1. “
Content
” means graphical, textual, and/or auditory content (which may include text, data, information, photos, images, graphics, audio, video or other content).
1.2. "
Data
" means all data collected or generated by Outbrain through the Technology, including any reports or other data made available to Partner in connection with the Agreement.
1.3. “
End Users
” means the viewer of a web page, application or platform on which the Technology is implemented;
1.4.
“Partner Sites”
means the web properties, applications or platforms identified in the Order Form, together with any additional properties on which Partner elects to implement the Technology upon prior written approval from Outbrain (e-mail will suffice) and on which Partner has ownership and control.
1.5. "
Technology
" means the Javascript, API, SDK and/or associated protocols provided by Outbrain to Partner.
1.6. “
Updates
” means updates, modifications or improvements to the Technology from time to time in Outbrain’s sole discretion, including, but not limited to, adding Ads.txt lines and any other similar industry standards.
2.
TECHNOLOGY, PLACEMENT AND APPEARANCE.
2.1. Outbrain owns and operates the Technology (the “
Technology
”). Partner shall implement the Technology pursuant to Outbrain’s technical instructions, including any implementation guides made available by Outbrain, as revised from time to time. Outbrain, in its sole discretion, may determine which of Outbrain’s available Technology (e.g., JS, API, SDK or any other equivalent technology) shall be used in each Partner implementation.
2.2. Partner shall display the Technology throughout the Term in accordance with all self-regulatory codes and applicable laws and regulations, including with respect to disclosing the source or nature of the Technology.
2.3. to time. If Outbrain requests Partner to implement any such Updates, Partner shall make such Updates within thirty (30) days of receipt of same from Outbrain; provided, that if Outbrain requests Partner to implement any Updates that Partner can demonstrate would materially and adversely affect the performance of the Partner Sites, Outbrain may either address Partner’s concerns to its reasonable satisfaction or agree not to require Partner to implement such Updates.
2.4. Outbrain may test changes to the Technology and, based on the results of such testing, Outbrain may make optimizations to the Technology if such optimizations may result in increased click through rates and/or conversions on the Partner Sites (as calculated by Outbrain in its sole discretion). To the extent that Partner uses the API and thus controls any testing, Partner shall comply with such testing requests on at least a quarterly basis.
3.
FEES AND PAYMENT TERMS.
3.1. During the Term, the Partner will pay fees set out in the Order Form (collectively, the “
Fees
”) without withholding or set off.
3.2. If any fees or payments due to Outbrain pursuant to this Agreement are not paid by Partner by the due date thereof, Partner shall pay to Outbrain interest on such unpaid amounts from the due date until the date payment is received in full by Outbrain at a rate equal to three (3%) per month or, if lower, the maximum percentage permitted by applicable law. In addition, all collection expenses, including, without limitation, legal fees, incurred by Outbrain with regards to the collection of a delayed payment or as a result of a delayed payment shall be borne by the Partner.
3.3. Partner shall pay Outbrain within thirty (30) days from receipt of Outbrain’s invoice.
3.4.
Taxes
: Partner shall be responsible for the payment of all applicable tax impositions, fees, or other charges that arise in any jurisdiction (including, without limitation, export, sales, use, excise, and value-added taxes) under this technology license Agreement, except those taxes related to our income, property, franchise, or employees and excise. Suppose Outbrain is found to have a legal obligation to pay or collect taxes for which Partner is responsible under the technology license Agreement. In that case, the appropriate amount will be invoiced and paid by Partner unless Partner provides Outbrain with a valid exemption certificate authorized by the appropriate taxing authority.
4.
LICENSE TERMS.
4.1. Subject to Partner’s full compliance with all of the terms of the Agreement, Outbrain grants Partner a limited, non-exclusive, revocable, non-sublicensable, non- transferable license to use the Technology to on Partner Sites ((the “
License
”).
4.2. Outbrain grants Partner, during the Term, a limited, worldwide, non-exclusive, royalty-free license to use and display Outbrain’s trademarks, service marks and logos (collectively, “
Outbrain Marks
”), as incorporated into the Technology, strictly in accordance with Partner’s obligations and rights in the Agreement. All goodwill arising out of Partner’s use of any of the Outbrain Marks shall inure solely to the benefit of Outbrain. Outbrain shall have the right to refer to Partner and the Partner Sites in any general listing of advertisers or partners (including in marketing and sales materials) who have implemented the Technology. Notwithstanding the foregoing, each party will request prior written consent before issuing a press release regarding the Agreement or using the other party’s name on its website other than in accordance with the Agreement.
4.3. Outbrain retains all right, title and interest in and to the Outbrain Marks, Technology and Data (excluding any Content from the Partner Sites which shall be owned by Partner); and (b) Partner retains all right, title and interest in and to the Partner Sites including the look and feel, excluding the items described in subparagraph (a) above, (including without limitation all intellectual property rights in them).
4.4. The licenses granted under the Agreement are specifically set forth in the Agreement; there are no implied rights. All rights not expressly granted to Partner in the Agreement are reserved by Outbrain.
5.
PROHIBITED ACTIVITY.
5.1. Partner will not: (i) minimize, remove or otherwise inhibit the full and complete display of the Technology; (ii) engage in any automated, deceptive, fraudulent, invalid, incentivized, or other methods that are designed to generate clicks which are not the willing actions of End Users; (v) remove, deface, obscure, or alter any notices of intellectual property rights included in the Technology; (vi) access, reproduce or use the Technology in any manner or for any purpose other than as expressly permitted under the Agreement; (vii) modify, adapt, translate, prepare derivative works from, decompile, reverse engineer, disassemble or otherwise attempt to derive source code from the Technology, or attempt to create a substitute or similar service or product through use of or access to Technology or related proprietary information; (viii) attempt to interfere with or disrupt the Technology or attempt to gain access to any systems or networks that connect to it other than through the Technology as implemented pursuant to the Agreement; (ix) copy, cache, distribute, display, alter, or otherwise use or use the Technology for any purpose not authorized by Outbrain.
5.2. Partner will not deploy the Technology on any properties that display or contain adult, obscene, pornographic, defamatory, libelous, infringing, abusive, fake or deceptive or illegal Content, that promotes hate or discrimination, facilitates the sale of firearms or illegal drugs, or that participates or encourages participation in, illegal activities or is directed at children under of the age of 16. Outbrain reserves the right in its sole discretion to disable the Technology on any property at any time.
5.3. Except as expressly and unambiguously authorized under the Agreement, Partner will not copy, rent, lease, sell, transfer, assign, sublicense, disassemble, reverse engineer or decompile (except to the limited extent expressly authorized by applicable statutory law), modify or alter any part of the Technology or otherwise use the Technology on behalf of or for the benefit of any third party.
6.
REGISTRATION.
To the extent that Partner has access to the Outbrain dashboard, Outbrain may collect Partner’s (or individuals who act on behalf of Partner) personally identifiable information. Partner will be solely responsible for all changes to data made by it, or individuals acting on Partner’s behalf, through the Outbrain dashboard. Information displayed in the Outbrain dashboard is provided solely for the Partner’s convenience and are estimates only.
7.
SUSPENSION OF TECHNOLOGY; TERMINATION.
7.1. Outbrain may suspend or discontinue all or any aspect of the Technology, including its availability, at any time if required by exigent circumstances (such as a significant security breach, propagation of malware, other viruses to users, etc.) or other improper, unlawful, fraudulent or misleading circumstances.
7.2. Either party may terminate the Agreement at any time in the event of a material breach by the other party of any provision of the Agreement that remains uncured for fourteen (14) days after the breaching party’s receipt of written notice of the breach.
7.3. The Agreement is terminable on fourteen (14) days prior written notice unless otherwise stated on the Order Form. In addition, Outbrain may terminate the Agreement on prior written notice if the Technology is not implemented within thirty (30) days of Outbrain sending the Technology to Partner. Upon expiration or termination of the Agreement, all rights and obligations of the parties under the Agreement will be extinguished, except which by their very their nature should survive termination, and continue to bind the parties.
8.
LIMITED WARRANTIES; INDEMNITY.
8.1. Each party represents and warrants to the other that: (i) it has all right, power, and authority necessary to enter into the Agreement and perform its obligations under it; and (ii) it will comply with all applicable laws, regulations and orders in its performance of the Agreement.
8.2. Outbrain warrants that the Technology (as provided and made available by Outbrain and implemented by Partner in accordance with the Agreement does not and will not, to the best of Outbrain's knowledge, infringe any Intellectual Property Right of any third party.
8.3. Partner represents and warrants that the Partner Sites do not and will not contain any Content that is: (i) illegal; (ii) infringes any Intellectual Property Right of any third party; (iii) is obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous material or material that violates any person’s right of publicity, privacy or personality; or (iv) knowingly contains a misrepresentation of fact or factual inaccuracy.
8.4. Except as expressly provided in the Agreement, neither party makes any representations or warranties, express or implied in relation to the Agreement, the Partner Sites, the Technology or any other matters (including any implied terms relating to satisfactory quality or fitness for any purpose, any warranties of availability or uninterrupted or error free performance, any warranties arising out of any course of performance or dealing).
8.5. Each party (the “
Indemnifying Party
”) shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless the other party and its parent and affiliates, and each of its and their respective affiliates, directors, officers, shareholders, members, authorized representatives, employees and agents (collectively, the “Indemnified Party”) from and against any and all claims, losses, liabilities, damages, costs, settlements, regulatory findings and/or fines and other expenses (including reasonable legal fees) (collectively, “
Claims
”) that arise out of any third party claim occasioned by any breach or alleged breach of any of the Indemnifying Party’s representations and warranties under this Agreement. The Indemnified Party shall promptly notify the Indemnifying Party of any Claim in writing, provided, however, that any delay in providing such notice shall not relieve the Indemnifying Party of any of its obligations except to the extent that the Indemnifying Party is actually prejudiced by such delay. The Indemnified Party shall have the right to participate in the defense and settlement of the Claim with counsel of its own choosing and its own expense, subject to the Indemnifying Party’s control thereof
9.
CONFIDENTIALITY
. Each party (the “
Receiving Party
”) acknowledges that it will have access to certain information and materials, including the terms of the Agreement, concerning the business, technology, products and services of the other party (the “
Disclosing Party
”) that are, or reasonably should be considered given the circumstances of disclosure to be, confidential (“
Confidential Information
”). Confidential Information will not include: (a) information known to the Receiving Party prior to disclosure by the Disclosing Party; (b) information independently developed by the Receiving Party without reference to Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party; (c) information that is or becomes publicly known through no fault of the Receiving Party; or (d) information disclosed to the Receiving Party by a third party without breach of any obligation of confidence. Except as permitted hereunder, the Receiving Party (aa) will not use any Confidential Information for its own account or the account of any third party, and (bb) will not disclose any Confidential Information to any third party other than its directors, employees, contractors, advisors, investors or potential investors who have a need to know and who have agreed not to use, and to maintain the confidentiality of, the Confidential Information consistent with this Agreement. The Receiving Party will return or destroy the Confidential Information promptly upon the Disclosing Party’s written request. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Receiving Party may disclose Confidential Information to the extent required by applicable law or legal process, provided that the Receiving Party provides prompt written notice of any required disclosure to the Disclosing Party and provides reasonable cooperation (at the Disclosing Party’s expense) with any effort by the Disclosing Party to contest or limit the scope of such disclosure.
10.
LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
10.1. Neither Outbrain nor the Partner exclude or limit liability to the other for: (i) death or personal injury caused by its negligence or that of its employees or contractors; (ii) fraud or fraudulent misrepresentation; or (iii) any other liability which cannot lawfully be excluded or limited.
10.2. NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE FOR ANY SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE AGREEMENT OR ANY BREACH HEREOF (INCLUDING FOR LOSS OF DATA OR COST OF COVER), WHETHER OR NOT SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES, AND WHETHER UNDER A THEORY OF CONTRACT, TORT (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE) OR OTHERWISE.
10.3. EXCEPT FOR A PARTY’S INDEMNIFICATION, IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S AGGREGATE LIABILITY ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE AGREEMENT OR ANY BREACH HEREOF (WHETHER UNDER A THEORY OF CONTRACT, TORT (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE), WARRANTY OR OTHERWISE) EXCEED THE GREATER OF ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS ($100,000) OR THE AMOUNT OF FEES PAID OR PAYABLE TO OUTBRAIN IN THE 12-MONTH PERIOD IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO LIABILITY (OR, IN THE CASE OF A SERIES OF CONNECTED EVENTS, THE FIRST SUCH EVENT).
11.
EXPORT CONTROLS
. Partner will comply with all export laws and restrictions and regulations of the Department of Commerce, the United States Department of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control ("
OFAC
"), or other United States or foreign agency or authority, and shall not export, or allow the export or re-export of the Technology in violation of any such restrictions, laws or regulations. By downloading or using the Technology, Partner agrees to the foregoing and represent and warrants that it is not located in, under the control of, or a national or resident of any restricted country. Partner represents and warrants that none of it, or any individual, entity, or organization holding any ownership interest or controlling interest in Partner, including any officer or director, is an individual, entity, organization with whom any United States law, regulation, or executive order prohibits U.S. companies and individuals from dealing, including, names appearing on the Specially Designated Nationals List.
11.1.
MISCELLANEOUS
. The Agreement shall be interpreted and construed in accordance with and governed by the laws of the State of New York, without regard to its conflict of law provisions or the United Nations Conventions for the International Sale of Goods. Any action or proceeding arising from or relating to the Agreement must be brought in a federal court in the Southern District of New York or in state court in New York County, New York, and each party irrevocably submits to the jurisdiction and venue of any such court in any such action or proceeding. The parties agree that irreparable damage would occur in the event that any of the provisions of the Agreement is not performed in accordance with these specific terms. Accordingly, the parties agree that each shall be entitled to injunctive relief to prevent breaches of the Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions of the Agreement, in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or in equity. The parties are independent contractors, and nothing in the Agreement will be construed to create a partnership, joint venture, agency or other relationship between the parties. No failure or forbearance by a party to enforce any of its rights under the Agreement or insist upon performance of the other party’s obligations under the Agreement will be deemed a waiver of such rights or obligations to any extent, and no waiver by either party of any default or breach of the Agreement will constitute a waiver of any other or subsequent default or breach. Neither party will be liable for any failure to perform due to causes beyond the party's reasonable control. The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties concerning its subject matter and supersedes all prior or contemporaneous agreements or understandings, written or oral, concerning such subject matter. The Order Form may be amended, modified or superseded, only by a written instrument signed by both parties. The headings in the Agreement are for the convenience of reference only and have no legal effect. The Agreement may be executed and delivered via electronic transmission or another means of complete and accurate reproduction, and copies of the Agreement delivered via such means will be deemed originals for all purposes. The Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original, but all of which together will constitute one and the same instrument. If any provision of the Agreement is held to be unenforceable for any reason, such provision shall be reformed only to the extent necessary to make it enforceable, failing which, it shall be severed from the Agreement and the balance of the Agreement shall continue in full force and effect. To be effective, notices under this Agreement must be sent by email to the parties mentioned in Section1 of the Order Form and if to Outbrain, Attn: Legal Department or if delivered by email to
legal@outbrain.com
. Neither party may assign the Agreement or any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the other party’s prior written consent, except (i) due to operation of law, merger, reorganization, or as a result of an acquisition or change of control, and (ii) by Outbrain to its subsidiaries. Subject to the foregoing, the Agreement will be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties and their permitted successors and assigns.
Exhibit 1
Data Sharing Agreement
This Data Sharing Agreement (“
DSA
”) is entered into by the Outbrain entity (“
Outbrain
”) and the individual or company (the “
Partner
”) identified in the Order Form above and is governed by the terms of this Agreement (together, the “
Terms
”). From the Effective Date of the applicable Order Form, this DSA shall apply to any and all agreements between the parties and their Affiliates from time to time. Collectively, the Controller SCCs (as applicable), the DSA and the Terms (or information entered through the Outbrain dashboard) are referred to as the “
Agreement
”. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency between any of the terms of the Agreement the following order of precedence shall prevail: (i) the Controller SCCs (as applicable); (ii) this DSA; and (iii) the Terms.
1.
DEFINITIONS.
Any capitalized terms not defined in this DSA shall have the respective meanings given to them in the Terms.
1.1. “
Affiliate(s)
” means in respect of either party at any time, any person or legal entity controlled by or controlling or under the common control of that party. Any reference to the parties shall include reference to their Affiliates;
1.2.
“CCPA”
means the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 and all other California privacy laws, guidance or codes of practice issued by a relevant public authority applicable from time to time to Outbrain or Partner relating to the processing of Personal Information and the privacy of electronic communications, as amended or superseded by any federal, state or national law, regulation or regulatory guidance;
1.3. “
Controller SCCs
” means the standard data protection clauses “MODULE ONE: Transfer controller to controller” in accordance with article 46 2. (c) GDPR adopted by the European Commission on 4 June 2021 (Commission Implementing Decision (EU) 2021/914) (as amended or superseded), containing contractual obligations on the Data Exporter and the Data Importer, and rights for EEA Data Subjects whose Personal Data is transferred, as amended or superseded from time to time by the European Commission;
1.4. “
Data Protection Laws
” means all laws, guidance or codes of practice issued by a relevant public authority applicable from time to time to Outbrain or Partner relating to the processing of Personal Data and the privacy of electronic communications, including the CCPA and EU Data Protection Laws;
1.5. “
EEA
” means the European Economic Area;
1.6. “
End Users
” shall have the same meaning as given to this term under the Terms, and, for the purpose of this DSA, are Data Subjects or Consumers;
1.7. "
EU Data Protection Laws
" means all laws, guidance or codes of practice issued by a relevant Supervisory Authority (including, in the UK, the Information Commissioner’s Office (“ICO”)) applicable from time to time to Outbrain or Partner relating to the processing of Personal Data and the privacy of electronic communications in the EEA and the UK as amended or superseded, especially (i) the General Data Protection Regulation ((EU) 2016/679) (GDPR) and the UK Data Protection Act 2018; (ii) the Privacy and Electronic Communications Directive 2002/58/EC (as updated by Directive 2009/136/EC) (ePrivacy Directive) and the UK Privacy and Electronic Communications Regulations 2003 (SI 2003 No. 2426) (PECR) as updated;
1.8. “
Outbrain User Data
” means Personal Data of an End User which Outbrain collects directly on Partner Sites and/or indirectly via third-party partners who connect Outbrain with Partner Sites and may include, but not be limited to: bid request unique identifier, Outbrain unique identifier, IP address, user agent data, browser and device type (desktop/mobile, brand, model, operating system and system version), application version, application ID or package name), device advertising identifiers, pages, content visited and events, time of visit, broad location, device time zone;
1.9. “
UK Adequacy Decision
” means the Commission Implementing Decision of 28 June 2021 on the adequate protection of Personal Data by the United Kingdom in accordance with article 45 GDPR;
1.10. "
Controller
", “
Joint Controller
”, "
Processor
", “
Data Protection Impact Assessment
”, "
Data
Subject
", “
Personal Data Breach
”, "
Special Categories of Personal Data
" and “
Supervisory Authority
” shall have the meanings given in EU Data Protection Laws;
1.11. “
sale
”
(including the terms “sell,” “selling,” “sold,” and other variations thereof, including renting, disclosing, releasing, disseminating, making available, transferring, or otherwise communicating Personal Information for monetary or other valuable consideration), “
Consumer
”,
“Business
”, “
Security Incident
”
and
“
Service Provider
”
shall have the meanings given to those terms under the CCPA; and
1.12. “
Personal Data
” (and any variation thereof, including “Personal Information” under the CCPA) and “
process
”(including “processing”), shall have the meaning given under the applicable Data Protection Laws.
2.
PURPOSE OF PROCESSING
.
The parties collect and process Personal Data for the purposes of delivering the Technology to End Users.
Outbrain processes Outbrain User Data for the following purposes: (i) storing and/or accessing information on a device; (ii) selecting basic ads; (iii) creating a personalized ads profile; (iv) selecting personalized ads; (v) creating a personalized content profile; (vi) selecting personalized content; (vii) measuring ad performance; (viii) measuring content performance; (ix) applying market research to generate audience insights; (x) developing and improving products; (xi) ensuring security, preventing fraud and debugging; and (xii) technically delivering ads or content
3.
CCPA AND EU DATA PROTECTION LAWS SPECIFIC PROVISIONS.
3.1. Specific provisions applicable to CCPA are located in
Sections 4.2, 5.2 (iv)
and
6.4
.
3.2. Specific provision applicable to EU Data protection Laws are located in
Sections 4.3, 5.2 (ii), 6.4 and 11
.
4.
ROLE OF PARTIES.
4.1. Each party shall comply with all relevant provisions of Data Protection Laws as it applies to matters under the Agreement and ensure that they process Personal Data fairly and lawfully in accordance with Data Protection Laws as applicable in the provision and receipt of the Technology.
4.2. Insofar as the CCPA is applicable to the Technology, Outbrain and Partner will be considered independent Businesses under the CCPA for the collection, processing and selling of any Personal Information, and Outbrain shall not be considered a Service Provider on anyone’s behalf.
4.3. Insofar as EU Data Protection Laws are applicable to the Technology, the parties shall be deemed Joint Controllers under Article 26 GDPR solely with regards to the collection of Outbrain User Data through the implementation of the Technology on Partner Sites, and the parties shall be deemed independent Controllers for any further processing activity.
4.4. Each party shall remain solely and exclusively responsible for determining the means and purposes of processing for its respective processing activities.
5.
PARTNER’S OBLIGATIONS.
5.1. Partner is responsible for implementing the Technology on Partner Sites in accordance with Outbrain’s instructions, the Agreement and Data Protection Laws.
5.2. Partner shall:
5.2.1. disclose, via an appropriate privacy notice, Outbrain to End Users as a Business or Controller collecting Personal Data for the purposes of delivering the Technology;
5.2.2. collect End Users’ consent choices via a consent management platform using the IAB Transparency & Consent Framework v2.0 (the most recent version or successor thereto) and pass Outbrain valid “consent”/”no consent” strings. The Partner must not, at any time, send Outbrain “null” or “invalid” signals;
5.2.3. provide a user choice mechanism such as the opt out page(s) of the
Network Advertising Initiative
, the
Digital Advertising Alliance
or the
European Digital Advertising Alliance
, as applicable; and
5.2.4. insofar as the CCPA is applicable to the Technology, Partner shall collect End Users’ “Do Not Sell My Personal Information” choices via a consent management platform using the IAB CCPA Framework (the most recent version or successor thereto) and pass Outbrain valid “yes”/”no” strings.
5.3. Partner shall at all times satisfy the requirements for an appropriate legal basis for the processing of Personal Data. In any event, where an End User opted out or withdrew their consent to personalized advertising and/or the sharing their Personal Data with Outbrain through a mechanism alerting only the Partner (instead of Outbrain), such as device settings, Partner must not share such Personal Data with Outbrain.
6.
OUTBRAIN’S OBLIGATIONS.
6.1. Outbrain shall disclose, via an appropriate privacy notice, all information relating to processing activities where the Personal Data is collected directly from the End User or where such Personal Data is collected via third parties, as required under Data Protection Laws. This information is available on
Outbrain’s Privacy Policy
.
6.2. Outbrain shall at all times satisfy the requirements for an appropriate legal basis for the processing of Outbrain User Data.
6.3. Outbrain shall comply with requests from End Users to exercise their rights under relevant Data Protection Laws, without undue delay and within the required time limits. Requests relating to right to access, erasure, withdrawing consent, objecting to profiling, or ”Do Not Sell My Personal Information” can be exercised directly on
Outbrain Interest Profile
.
6.4. To the extent that Outbrain receives and interprets consent strings or “Do Not Sell My Personal Information” strings as per
Section 5.2
, Outbrain is doing so in order to abide by an End User’s choice and shall not be deemed to be a Processor or Service Provider on anyone's behalf.
7.
COOPERATION.
7.1. Each party shall develop, implement, and regularly review procedures to ensure they meet their respective obligations under Data Protection Laws.
7.2. Each party shall immediately inform the other party if any activity pursuant to the Agreement infringes any part of Data Protection Laws, and the parties shall review such activity accordingly. If during the term, Data Protection Laws change in a way that this DSA is no longer adequate for performing the processing activities necessary to the Terms, the parties agree to promptly negotiate in good faith to review this DSA in light of such changes.
7.3. In the event that either party receives any correspondence, enquiry or complaint from an End User, Supervisory Authority or any other third party related to the disclosure or processing of Personal Data pursuant to this DSA, or requests information from the other party when performing a Data Protection Impact Assessment, it shall promptly inform the other party giving full details of the same, and the other party shall provide such assistance as reasonably required (at each party’s sole cost and expense) and in good faith in order to respond in accordance with any requirements under Data Protection Laws.
8.
DATA SECURITY.
8.1. Each party shall implement and maintain such appropriate technical and organizational measures as required by Data Protection Laws to ensure that the Personal Data is processed in a secure manner, including (but not limited to) (i) the pseudonymization and encryption of Personal Data; (ii) ensuring the confidentiality, integrity, availability and resilience of the services provided under the Agreement, including the ability to restore availability of, and access to, Personal Data in a timely manner in the event of a physical or technical incident; (iii) a process for regularly testing, assessing and evaluating the effectiveness of technical and organizational measures for ensuring the security of the processing; and (iv) regularly carrying information security risk assessments that take account of risk of accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure of, or access to, Personal Data.
8.2. An overview of Outbrain’s appropriate technical and organizational security measures are described on
Outbrain’s Security page
.
8.3. Upon becoming aware of a suspected or confirmed Personal Data Breach or Security Incident involving Outbrain User Data collected pursuant to this DSA, each party shall notify the other party without any undue delay, and provide such assistance as reasonably required to allow the other party to comply with its respective obligations under Data Protection Laws.
9.
PERSONNEL.
Each party shall be responsible for ensuring that staff members are appropriately trained to handle and process the Personal Data in accordance with their internal technical and organizational security measures, where relevant, together with Data Protection Laws, and have entered into confidentiality agreements relating to the processing of Personal Data.
10.
PROCESSORS – SERVICE PROVIDERS.
Each party shall remain independently responsible for appointing its respective Processors and/or Service Providers in accordance with Data Protection Laws.
11.
INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS.
11.1. Insofar as Personal Data is collected from End Users located within the territory of the EEA or the UK by either party during the course of the Agreement, neither party shall process any Personal Data (nor permit any Personal Data to be processed) in a country outside of the EEA or the UK unless: (i) that country has been designated by the European Commission or the ICO (as applicable) as providing an adequate level of protection for Personal Data; or (ii) it has taken such measures as necessary to ensure the transfer is compliant with EU Data Protection Laws.
11.2. The parties agree that for the purposes of any transfer of Personal Data from Partner to Outbrain collected within the EEA to the UK, the requirements of the clause above shall be fully satisfied by the UK Adequacy Decision.
11.3. Outbrain shall be responsible for the onward transfer of Personal Data from the UK to any third party country outside of the EEA as required by (a) the UK Adequacy Decision and/or (b) EU Data Protection Laws, as applicable.
11.4. Within its Affiliates, Outbrain has entered into adequate intragroup data sharing agreements including supplementary measures complying with all requirements of EU Data Protection Laws, which consist of (i) encryption in transit; (ii) pseudonymization; and (iii) not having received any legally binding request from a public authority, including judicial authorities, under the laws of the country of destination and not being aware of any direct access by public authorities.
11.5. In the event that the UK Adequacy Decision as the lawful ground for international transfers from the EEA to third party countries is no longer applicable, the parties agree that the Controller SCCs shall be incorporated by reference into this DSA and shall govern any international transfer of Personal Data outside of the EEA. For the purpose of the Controller SCCs, the parties fully agree that:
11.5.1. Partner is the "Data Exporter" and Outbrain, the "Data Importer";
11.5.2. Clause 7 “Docking clause” is deleted;
11.5.3. The OPTION under Clause 11 “Redress” is deleted;
11.5.4. Clause 17 “Governing Law” is completed with “Republic of Ireland”
11.5.5. Clause 18 (b) “Choice of forum and jurisdiction” is completed with “Dublin, Republic of Ireland”;
11.5.6. Annex I to the Controller SCCs shall be deemed to have been completed with Annex I to this DSA; and
11.5.7. Annex II to the Controller SCCs shall be deemed to have been completed by
Outbrain’s Security page
.
12.
TERM AND TERMINATION.
This DSA shall commence on the Effective Date and shall continue as long as the Partner uses the Technology.
13.
DATA RETENTION.
Outbrain shall not retain any individual data point collected in relation to the Technology for longer than 13 months, unless it constitutes anonymous data.
14.
MISCELLANEOUS.
14.1. Neither party shall be in breach of this DSA nor liable for delay in performing, or failure to perform, any of its obligations under the Agreement if such delay or failure results from events, circumstances or causes beyond its reasonable control.
14.2. Failure or delay in exercising any right or remedy under this DSA shall not constitute a waiver of such (or any other) right or remedy under this DSA, the Agreement or Data Protection Laws.
14.3. Partner shall not assign or otherwise transfer its rights or its obligations under this Agreement, in whole or in part, without the prior written consent of Outbrain.
14.4. Except as expressly stated otherwise and to the extent applicable under Data Protection Laws, nothing in this DSA shall create or confer any rights or other benefits in favor of any person other than a party to this DSA.
14.5. The invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability of any term of this DSA shall not affect the remainder of the DSA.
14.6. This DSA shall be governed by the laws specified in the applicable Agreement.
ANNEX I
Description of Processing Activities
This Annex forms part of the DSA and describes the processing of Personal Data by Outbrain. When Section 11.5 of the DSA applies, Annex I to the Controller SCCs shall be deemed to have been completed with this Annex.
A. LIST OF PARTIES
Data Exporter:
Partner name, address and contact details as stated in the Order Form.
Activities relevant to the data transferred: Digital services or media delivered through a website or mobile application on which Partner has ownership and control.
Joint Controller (collection) and independent Controller (any other processing).
Data Importer:
Outbrain with address and contact details as stated in the Order Form.
Activities relevant to the data transferred: Digital advertising services.
Joint Controller (collection) and independent Controller (any other processing).
B. DESCRIPTION OF TRANSFER
Categories of Data Subjects whose Personal Data is transferred:
End Users (Data Subjects who visit or use Partner Sites or interact with Outbrain on the Partner Sites(s)).
Categories of Personal Data transferred:
Bid request unique identifier
Outbrain unique identifier
IP address
User Agent data, browser and device type (desktop/mobile, brand, model, operating system and system version), application version, application ID or package name)
Device advertising identifiers
Pages, content visited and events
Time of visit
Broad location
Device time zone
Sensitive data transferred:
No Special Categories of Personal Data are transferred.
Frequency of the transfer:
Real time,
continuous basis.
Nature of the processing:
Receiving data, including collection, accessing, retrieval, recording, and data entry;
Holding data, including storage, organization and structuring;
Using data, including analyzing, consultation, testing, automated decision making and profiling;
Updating data, including correcting, adaptation, alteration, alignment and combination;
Protecting data, including restricting, encrypting, and security testing;
Sharing data, including disclosure, dissemination, allowing access or otherwise making available;
Returning data to the Data Exporter or Data Subject;
Erasing data, including destruction and deletion.
Purpose(s) of the data transfer and further processing:
Digital advertising services, which include:
Storing and/or accessing information on a device;
Selecting basic ads;
Creating a personalized ads profile;
Selecting personalized ads;
Creating a personalized content profile;
Selecting personalized content;
Measuring ad performance;
Measuring content performance;
Applying market research to generate audience insights;
Developing and improving products;
Ensuring security, preventing fraud and debugging; and
Technically delivering ads or content.
Retention period:
An individual data point is retained for no longer than
13 months.
Recipients:
The subject matter, nature and duration can be found on the
Outbrain Trusted Partners page
.
C. COMPETENT SUPERVISORY AUTHORITY
In the UK: The Information Commissioner’s Office.
In the EEA: The Supervisory Authority of the Member State of the Partner’s Registered Address as stated in the Agreement, or, if not applicable, the Supervisory Authority of the Member State in which the Data Subjects whose Personal Data is transferred under this Agreement in relation to the Technology are located.
Effective December 6th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
TECHNOLOGY LICENSE AGREEMENT
This Technology License Agreement (the “
Terms
”) is entered into on the Effective Date by and between the Outbrain entity and Partner identified in the Order Form. Outbrain and Partner may collectively be referred to herein as the Parties and each individually as a Party. These Terms shall apply to any and all agreements between the parties and their Affiliates from time to time.
1.
DEFINITIONS
1.1. “
Content
” means graphical, textual, and/or auditory content (which may include text, data, information, photos, images, graphics, audio, video or other content).
1.2. "
Data
" means all data collected or generated by Outbrain through the Technology, including any reports or other data made available to Partner in connection with the Agreement.
1.3. “
End Users
” means the viewer of a web page, application or platform on which the Technology is implemented;
1.4.
“Partner Sites”
means the web properties, applications or platforms identified in the Order Form, together with any additional properties on which Partner elects to implement the Technology upon prior written approval from Outbrain (e-mail will suffice) and on which Partner has ownership and control.
1.5. "
Technology
" means the Javascript, API, SDK and/or associated protocols provided by Outbrain to Partner.
1.6. “
Updates
” means updates, modifications or improvements to the Technology from time to time in Outbrain’s sole discretion, including, but not limited to, adding Ads.txt lines and any other similar industry standards.
2.
TECHNOLOGY, PLACEMENT AND APPEARANCE.
2.1. Outbrain owns and operates the Technology (the “
Technology
”). Partner shall implement the Technology pursuant to Outbrain’s technical instructions, including any implementation guides made available by Outbrain, as revised from time to time. Outbrain, in its sole discretion, may determine which of Outbrain’s available Technology (e.g., JS, API, SDK or any other equivalent technology) shall be used in each Partner implementation.
2.2. Partner shall display the Technology throughout the Term in accordance with all self-regulatory codes and applicable laws and regulations, including with respect to disclosing the source or nature of the Technology.
2.3. to time. If Outbrain requests Partner to implement any such Updates, Partner shall make such Updates within thirty (30) days of receipt of same from Outbrain; provided, that if Outbrain requests Partner to implement any Updates that Partner can demonstrate would materially and adversely affect the performance of the Partner Sites, Outbrain may either address Partner’s concerns to its reasonable satisfaction or agree not to require Partner to implement such Updates.
2.4. Outbrain may test changes to the Technology and, based on the results of such testing, Outbrain may make optimizations to the Technology if such optimizations may result in increased click through rates and/or conversions on the Partner Sites (as calculated by Outbrain in its sole discretion). To the extent that Partner uses the API and thus controls any testing, Partner shall comply with such testing requests on at least a quarterly basis.
3.
FEES AND PAYMENT TERMS.
3.1. During the Term, the Partner will pay fees set out in the Order Form (collectively, the “
Fees
”) without withholding or set off.
3.2. If any fees or payments due to Outbrain pursuant to this Agreement are not paid by Partner by the due date thereof, Partner shall pay to Outbrain interest on such unpaid amounts from the due date until the date payment is received in full by Outbrain at a rate equal to three (3%) per month or, if lower, the maximum percentage permitted by applicable law. In addition, all collection expenses, including, without limitation, legal fees, incurred by Outbrain with regards to the collection of a delayed payment or as a result of a delayed payment shall be borne by the Partner.
3.3. Partner shall pay Outbrain within thirty (30) days from receipt of Outbrain’s invoice.
3.4.
Taxes
: Partner shall be responsible for the payment of all applicable tax impositions, fees, or other charges that arise in any jurisdiction (including, without limitation, export and value-added taxes) under this technology license Agreement, except those taxes related to our income, property, franchise, or employees and excise. If Outbrain is found to have a legal obligation to pay or collect taxes for which Partner is responsible under the technology license Agreement, the appropriate amount will be invoiced and paid by Partner unless Partner provides a valid VAT and/or other tax ID number.
4.
LICENSE TERMS.
4.1. Subject to Partner’s full compliance with all of the terms of the Agreement, Outbrain grants Partner a limited, non-exclusive, revocable, non-sublicensable, non- transferable license to use the Technology to on Partner Sites ((the “
License
”).
4.2. Outbrain grants Partner, during the Term, a limited, worldwide, non-exclusive, royalty-free license to use and display Outbrain’s trademarks, service marks and logos (collectively, “
Outbrain Marks
”), as incorporated into the Technology, strictly in accordance with Partner’s obligations and rights in the Agreement. All goodwill arising out of Partner’s use of any of the Outbrain Marks shall inure solely to the benefit of Outbrain. Outbrain shall have the right to refer to Partner and the Partner Sites in any general listing of advertisers or partners (including in marketing and sales materials) who have implemented the Technology. Notwithstanding the foregoing, each party will request prior written consent before issuing a press release regarding the Agreement or using the other party’s name on its website other than in accordance with the Agreement.
4.3. Outbrain retains all right, title and interest in and to the Outbrain Marks, Technology and Data (excluding any Content from the Partner Sites which shall be owned by Partner); and (b) Partner retains all right, title and interest in and to the Partner Sites including the look and feel, excluding the items described in subparagraph (a) above, (including without limitation all intellectual property rights in them).
4.4. The licenses granted under the Agreement are specifically set forth in the Agreement; there are no implied rights. All rights not expressly granted to Partner in the Agreement are reserved by Outbrain.
5.
PROHIBITED ACTIVITY.
5.1. Partner will not: (i) minimize, remove or otherwise inhibit the full and complete display of the Technology; (ii) engage in any automated, deceptive, fraudulent, invalid, incentivized, or other methods that are designed to generate clicks which are not the willing actions of End Users; (v) remove, deface, obscure, or alter any notices of intellectual property rights included in the Technology; (vi) access, reproduce or use the Technology in any manner or for any purpose other than as expressly permitted under the Agreement; (vii) modify, adapt, translate, prepare derivative works from, decompile, reverse engineer, disassemble or otherwise attempt to derive source code from the Technology, or attempt to create a substitute or similar service or product through use of or access to Technology or related proprietary information; (viii) attempt to interfere with or disrupt the Technology or attempt to gain access to any systems or networks that connect to it other than through the Technology as implemented pursuant to the Agreement; (ix) copy, cache, distribute, display, alter, or otherwise use or use the Technology for any purpose not authorized by Outbrain.
5.2. Partner will not deploy the Technology on any properties that display or contain adult, obscene, pornographic, defamatory, libelous, infringing, abusive, fake or deceptive or illegal Content, that promotes hate or discrimination, facilitates the sale of firearms or illegal drugs, or that participates or encourages participation in, illegal activities or is directed at children under of the age of 16. Outbrain reserves the right in its sole discretion to disable the Technology on any property at any time.
5.3. Except as expressly and unambiguously authorized under the Agreement, Partner will not copy, rent, lease, sell, transfer, assign, sublicense, disassemble, reverse engineer or decompile (except to the limited extent expressly authorized by applicable statutory law), modify or alter any part of the Technology or otherwise use the Technology on behalf of or for the benefit of any third party.
6.
REGISTRATION.
. To the extent that Partner has access to the Outbrain dashboard, Outbrain may collect Partner’s (or individuals who act on behalf of Partner) personally identifiable information. Partner will be solely responsible for all changes to data made by it, or individuals acting on Partner’s behalf, through the Outbrain dashboard. Information displayed in the Outbrain dashboard is provided solely for the Partner’s convenience and are estimates only.
7.
SUSPENSION OF TECHNOLOGY; TERMINATION.
7.1. Outbrain may suspend or discontinue all or any aspect of the Technology, including its availability, at any time if required by exigent circumstances (such as a significant security breach, propagation of malware, other viruses to users, etc.) or other improper, unlawful, fraudulent or misleading circumstances.
7.2. Either party may terminate the Agreement at any time in the event of a material breach by the other party of any provision of the Agreement that remains uncured for fourteen (14) days after the breaching party’s receipt of written notice of the breach.
7.3. The Agreement is terminable on fourteen (14) days prior written notice unless otherwise stated on the Order Form. In addition, Outbrain may terminate the Agreement on prior written notice if the Technology is not implemented within thirty (30) days of Outbrain sending the Technology to Partner. Upon expiration or termination of the Agreement, all rights and obligations of the parties under the Agreement will be extinguished, except which by their very their nature should survive termination, and continue to bind the parties.
8.
LIMITED WARRANTIES; INDEMNITY.
8.1. Each party represents and warrants to the other that: (i) it has all right, power, and authority necessary to enter into the Agreement and perform its obligations under it; and (ii) it will comply with all applicable laws, regulations and orders in its performance of the Agreement.
8.2. Outbrain warrants that the Technology (as provided and made available by Outbrain and implemented by Partner in accordance with the Agreement does not and will not, to the best of Outbrain's knowledge, infringe any Intellectual Property Right of any third party.
8.3. Partner represents and warrants that the Partner Sites do not and will not contain any Content that is: (i) illegal; (ii) infringes any Intellectual Property Right of any third party; (iii) is obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous material or material that violates any person’s right of publicity, privacy or personality; or (iv) knowingly contains a misrepresentation of fact or factual inaccuracy.
8.4. Except as expressly provided in the Agreement, neither party makes any representations or warranties, express or implied in relation to the Agreement, the Partner Sites, the Technology or any other matters (including any implied terms relating to satisfactory quality or fitness for any purpose, any warranties of availability or uninterrupted or error free performance, any warranties arising out of any course of performance or dealing).
8.5. Each party (the “
Indemnifying Party
”) shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless the other party and its parent and affiliates, and each of its and their respective affiliates, directors, officers, shareholders, members, authorized representatives, employees and agents (collectively, the “Indemnified Party”) from and against any and all claims, losses, liabilities, damages, costs, settlements, regulatory findings and/or fines and other expenses (including reasonable legal fees) (collectively, “
Claims
”) that arise out of any third party claim occasioned by any breach or alleged breach of any of the Indemnifying Party’s representations and warranties under this Agreement. The Indemnified Party shall promptly notify the Indemnifying Party of any Claim in writing, provided, however, that any delay in providing such notice shall not relieve the Indemnifying Party of any of its obligations except to the extent that the Indemnifying Party is actually prejudiced by such delay. The Indemnified Party shall have the right to participate in the defense and settlement of the Claim with counsel of its own choosing and its own expense, subject to the Indemnifying Party’s control thereof
9.
CONFIDENTIALITY
. Each party (the “
Receiving Party
”) acknowledges that it will have access to certain information and materials, including the terms of the Agreement, concerning the business, technology, products and services of the other party (the “
Disclosing Party
”) that are, or reasonably should be considered given the circumstances of disclosure to be, confidential (“
Confidential Information
”). Confidential Information will not include: (a) information known to the Receiving Party prior to disclosure by the Disclosing Party; (b) information independently developed by the Receiving Party without reference to Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party; (c) information that is or becomes publicly known through no fault of the Receiving Party; or (d) information disclosed to the Receiving Party by a third party without breach of any obligation of confidence. Except as permitted hereunder, the Receiving Party (aa) will not use any Confidential Information for its own account or the account of any third party, and (bb) will not disclose any Confidential Information to any third party other than its directors, employees, contractors, advisors, investors or potential investors who have a need to know and who have agreed not to use, and to maintain the confidentiality of, the Confidential Information consistent with this Agreement. The Receiving Party will return or destroy the Confidential Information promptly upon the Disclosing Party’s written request. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Receiving Party may disclose Confidential Information to the extent required by applicable law or legal process, provided that the Receiving Party provides prompt written notice of any required disclosure to the Disclosing Party and provides reasonable cooperation (at the Disclosing Party’s expense) with any effort by the Disclosing Party to contest or limit the scope of such disclosure.
10.
LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
10.1. Neither Outbrain nor the Partner exclude or limit liability to the other for: (i) death or personal injury caused by its negligence or that of its employees or contractors; (ii) fraud or fraudulent misrepresentation; or (iii) any other liability which cannot lawfully be excluded or limited.
10.2. NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE FOR ANY SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE AGREEMENT OR ANY BREACH HEREOF (INCLUDING FOR LOSS OF DATA OR COST OF COVER), WHETHER OR NOT SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES, AND WHETHER UNDER A THEORY OF CONTRACT, TORT (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE) OR OTHERWISE.
10.3. EXCEPT FOR A PARTY’S INDEMNIFICATION, IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S AGGREGATE LIABILITY ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE AGREEMENT OR ANY BREACH HEREOF (WHETHER UNDER A THEORY OF CONTRACT, TORT (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE), WARRANTY OR OTHERWISE) EXCEED THE GREATER OF ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS ($100,000) OR THE AMOUNT OF FEES PAID OR PAYABLE TO OUTBRAIN IN THE 12-MONTH PERIOD IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO LIABILITY (OR, IN THE CASE OF A SERIES OF CONNECTED EVENTS, THE FIRST SUCH EVENT).
11.
EXPORT CONTROLS
. Partner will comply with all export laws and restrictions and regulations of the Department of Commerce, the United States Department of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control ("
OFAC
"), or other United States or foreign agency or authority, and shall not export, or allow the export or re-export of the Technology in violation of any such restrictions, laws or regulations. By downloading or using the Technology, Partner agrees to the foregoing and represent and warrants that it is not located in, under the control of, or a national or resident of any restricted country. Partner represents and warrants that none of it, or any individual, entity, or organization holding any ownership interest or controlling interest in Partner, including any officer or director, is an individual, entity, organization with whom any United States law, regulation, or executive order prohibits U.S. companies and individuals from dealing, including, names appearing on the Specially Designated Nationals List.
11.1.
MISCELLANEOUS
.
The Agreement shall be interpreted and construed in accordance with and governed by the laws of England and Wales, without regard to its conflict of law provisions or the United Nations Conventions for the International Sale of Goods. Any action or proceeding arising from or relating to the Agreement must be submitted to the exclusive jurisdiction of English courts.
The parties agree that irreparable damage would occur in the event that any of the provisions of the Agreement is not performed in accordance with these specific terms. Accordingly, the parties agree that each shall be entitled to injunctive relief to prevent breaches of the Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions of the Agreement, in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or in equity. The parties are independent contractors, and nothing in the Agreement will be construed to create a partnership, joint venture, agency or other relationship between the parties. No failure or forbearance by a party to enforce any of its rights under the Agreement or insist upon performance of the other party’s obligations under the Agreement will be deemed a waiver of such rights or obligations to any extent, and no waiver by either party of any default or breach of the Agreement will constitute a waiver of any other or subsequent default or breach. Neither party will be liable for any failure to perform due to causes beyond the party's reasonable control. The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties concerning its subject matter and supersedes all prior or contemporaneous agreements or understandings, written or oral, concerning such subject matter. The Order Form may be amended, modified or superseded, only by a written instrument signed by both parties. The headings in the Agreement are for the convenience of reference only and have no legal effect. The Agreement may be executed and delivered via electronic transmission or another means of complete and accurate reproduction, and copies of the Agreement delivered via such means will be deemed originals for all purposes. The Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original, but all of which together will constitute one and the same instrument. If any provision of the Agreement is held to be unenforceable for any reason, such provision shall be reformed only to the extent necessary to make it enforceable, failing which, it shall be severed from the Agreement and the balance of the Agreement shall continue in full force and effect. To be effective, notices under this Agreement must be sent by email to the parties mentioned in Section1 of the Order Form and if to Outbrain, Attn: Legal Department or if delivered by email to
legal@outbrain.com
. Neither party may assign the Agreement or any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the other party’s prior written consent, except (i) due to operation of law, merger, reorganization, or as a result of an acquisition or change of control, and (ii) by Outbrain to its subsidiaries. Subject to the foregoing, the Agreement will be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties and their permitted successors and assigns.
Exhibit 1
Data Sharing Agreement
This Data Sharing Agreement (“
DSA
”) is entered into by the Outbrain entity (“
Outbrain
”) and the individual or company (the “
Partner
”) identified in the Order Form above and is governed by the terms of this Agreement (together, the “
Terms
”). From the Effective Date of the applicable Order Form, this DSA shall apply to any and all agreements between the parties and their Affiliates from time to time. Collectively, the Controller SCCs (as applicable), the DSA and the Terms (or information entered through the Outbrain dashboard) are referred to as the “
Agreement
”. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency between any of the terms of the Agreement the following order of precedence shall prevail: (i) the Controller SCCs (as applicable); (ii) this DSA; and (iii) the Terms.
1.
DEFINITIONS.
Any capitalized terms not defined in this DSA shall have the respective meanings given to them in the Terms.
1.1. “
Affiliate(s)
” means in respect of either party at any time, any person or legal entity controlled by or controlling or under the common control of that party. Any reference to the parties shall include reference to their Affiliates;
1.2.
“CCPA”
means the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 and all other California privacy laws, guidance or codes of practice issued by a relevant public authority applicable from time to time to Outbrain or Partner relating to the processing of Personal Information and the privacy of electronic communications, as amended or superseded by any federal, state or national law, regulation or regulatory guidance;
1.3. “
Controller SCCs
” means the standard data protection clauses “MODULE ONE: Transfer controller to controller” in accordance with article 46 2. (c) GDPR adopted by the European Commission on 4 June 2021 (Commission Implementing Decision (EU) 2021/914) (as amended or superseded), containing contractual obligations on the Data Exporter and the Data Importer, and rights for EEA Data Subjects whose Personal Data is transferred, as amended or superseded from time to time by the European Commission;
1.4. “
Data Protection Laws
” means all laws, guidance or codes of practice issued by a relevant public authority applicable from time to time to Outbrain or Partner relating to the processing of Personal Data and the privacy of electronic communications, including the CCPA and EU Data Protection Laws;
1.5. “
EEA
” means the European Economic Area;
1.6. “
End Users
” shall have the same meaning as given to this term under the Terms, and, for the purpose of this DSA, are Data Subjects or Consumers;
1.7. "
EU Data Protection Laws
" means all laws, guidance or codes of practice issued by a relevant Supervisory Authority (including, in the UK, the Information Commissioner’s Office (“ICO”)) applicable from time to time to Outbrain or Partner relating to the processing of Personal Data and the privacy of electronic communications in the EEA and the UK as amended or superseded, especially (i) the General Data Protection Regulation ((EU) 2016/679) (GDPR) and the UK Data Protection Act 2018; (ii) the Privacy and Electronic Communications Directive 2002/58/EC (as updated by Directive 2009/136/EC) (ePrivacy Directive) and the UK Privacy and Electronic Communications Regulations 2003 (SI 2003 No. 2426) (PECR) as updated;
1.8. “
Outbrain User Data
” means Personal Data of an End User which Outbrain collects directly on Partner Sites and/or indirectly via third-party partners who connect Outbrain with Partner Sites and may include, but not be limited to: bid request unique identifier, Outbrain unique identifier, IP address, user agent data, browser and device type (desktop/mobile, brand, model, operating system and system version), application version, application ID or package name), device advertising identifiers, pages, content visited and events, time of visit, broad location, device time zone;
1.9. “
UK Adequacy Decision
” means the Commission Implementing Decision of 28 June 2021 on the adequate protection of Personal Data by the United Kingdom in accordance with article 45 GDPR;
1.10. "
Controller
", “
Joint Controller
”, "
Processor
", “
Data Protection Impact Assessment
”, "
Data
Subject
", “
Personal Data Breach
”, "
Special Categories of Personal Data
" and “
Supervisory Authority
” shall have the meanings given in EU Data Protection Laws;
1.11. “
sale
”
(including the terms “sell,” “selling,” “sold,” and other variations thereof, including renting, disclosing, releasing, disseminating, making available, transferring, or otherwise communicating Personal Information for monetary or other valuable consideration), “
Consumer
”,
“Business
”, “
Security Incident
”
and
“
Service Provider
”
shall have the meanings given to those terms under the CCPA; and
1.12. “
Personal Data
” (and any variation thereof, including “Personal Information” under the CCPA) and “
process
”(including “processing”), shall have the meaning given under the applicable Data Protection Laws.
2.
PURPOSE OF PROCESSING
.
The parties collect and process Personal Data for the purposes of delivering the Technology to End Users.
Outbrain processes Outbrain User Data for the following purposes: (i) storing and/or accessing information on a device; (ii) selecting basic ads; (iii) creating a personalized ads profile; (iv) selecting personalized ads; (v) creating a personalized content profile; (vi) selecting personalized content; (vii) measuring ad performance; (viii) measuring content performance; (ix) applying market research to generate audience insights; (x) developing and improving products; (xi) ensuring security, preventing fraud and debugging; and (xii) technically delivering ads or content
3.
CCPA AND EU DATA PROTECTION LAWS SPECIFIC PROVISIONS.
3.1. Specific provisions applicable to CCPA are located in
Sections 4.2, 5.2 (iv)
and
6.4
.
3.2. Specific provision applicable to EU Data protection Laws are located in
Sections 4.3, 5.2 (ii), 6.4 and 11
.
4.
ROLE OF PARTIES.
4.1. Each party shall comply with all relevant provisions of Data Protection Laws as it applies to matters under the Agreement and ensure that they process Personal Data fairly and lawfully in accordance with Data Protection Laws as applicable in the provision and receipt of the Technology.
4.2. Insofar as the CCPA is applicable to the Technology, Outbrain and Partner will be considered independent Businesses under the CCPA for the collection, processing and selling of any Personal Information, and Outbrain shall not be considered a Service Provider on anyone’s behalf.
4.3. Insofar as EU Data Protection Laws are applicable to the Technology, the parties shall be deemed Joint Controllers under Article 26 GDPR solely with regards to the collection of Outbrain User Data through the implementation of the Technology on Partner Sites, and the parties shall be deemed independent Controllers for any further processing activity.
4.4. Each party shall remain solely and exclusively responsible for determining the means and purposes of processing for its respective processing activities.
5.
PARTNER’S OBLIGATIONS.
5.1. Partner is responsible for implementing the Technology on Partner Sites in accordance with Outbrain’s instructions, the Agreement and Data Protection Laws.
5.2. Partner shall:
5.2.1. disclose, via an appropriate privacy notice, Outbrain to End Users as a Business or Controller collecting Personal Data for the purposes of delivering the Technology;
5.2.2. collect End Users’ consent choices via a consent management platform using the IAB Transparency & Consent Framework v2.0 (the most recent version or successor thereto) and pass Outbrain valid “consent”/”no consent” strings. The Partner must not, at any time, send Outbrain “null” or “invalid” signals;
5.2.3. provide a user choice mechanism such as the opt out page(s) of the
Network Advertising Initiative
, the
Digital Advertising Alliance
or the
European Digital Advertising Alliance
, as applicable; and
5.2.4. insofar as the CCPA is applicable to the Technology, Partner shall collect End Users’ “Do Not Sell My Personal Information” choices via a consent management platform using the IAB CCPA Framework (the most recent version or successor thereto) and pass Outbrain valid “yes”/”no” strings.
5.3. Partner shall at all times satisfy the requirements for an appropriate legal basis for the processing of Personal Data. In any event, where an End User opted out or withdrew their consent to personalized advertising and/or the sharing their Personal Data with Outbrain through a mechanism alerting only the Partner (instead of Outbrain), such as device settings, Partner must not share such Personal Data with Outbrain.
6.
OUTBRAIN’S OBLIGATIONS.
6.1. Outbrain shall disclose, via an appropriate privacy notice, all information relating to processing activities where the Personal Data is collected directly from the End User or where such Personal Data is collected via third parties, as required under Data Protection Laws. This information is available on
Outbrain’s Privacy Policy
.
6.2. Outbrain shall at all times satisfy the requirements for an appropriate legal basis for the processing of Outbrain User Data.
6.3. Outbrain shall comply with requests from End Users to exercise their rights under relevant Data Protection Laws, without undue delay and within the required time limits. Requests relating to right to access, erasure, withdrawing consent, objecting to profiling, or ”Do Not Sell My Personal Information” can be exercised directly on
Outbrain Interest Profile
.
6.4. To the extent that Outbrain receives and interprets consent strings or “Do Not Sell My Personal Information” strings as per
Section 5.2
, Outbrain is doing so in order to abide by an End User’s choice and shall not be deemed to be a Processor or Service Provider on anyone's behalf.
7.
COOPERATION.
7.1. Each party shall develop, implement, and regularly review procedures to ensure they meet their respective obligations under Data Protection Laws.
7.2. Each party shall immediately inform the other party if any activity pursuant to the Agreement infringes any part of Data Protection Laws, and the parties shall review such activity accordingly. If during the term, Data Protection Laws change in a way that this DSA is no longer adequate for performing the processing activities necessary to the Terms, the parties agree to promptly negotiate in good faith to review this DSA in light of such changes.
7.3. In the event that either party receives any correspondence, enquiry or complaint from an End User, Supervisory Authority or any other third party related to the disclosure or processing of Personal Data pursuant to this DSA, or requests information from the other party when performing a Data Protection Impact Assessment, it shall promptly inform the other party giving full details of the same, and the other party shall provide such assistance as reasonably required (at each party’s sole cost and expense) and in good faith in order to respond in accordance with any requirements under Data Protection Laws.
8.
DATA SECURITY.
8.1. Each party shall implement and maintain such appropriate technical and organizational measures as required by Data Protection Laws to ensure that the Personal Data is processed in a secure manner, including (but not limited to) (i) the pseudonymization and encryption of Personal Data; (ii) ensuring the confidentiality, integrity, availability and resilience of the services provided under the Agreement, including the ability to restore availability of, and access to, Personal Data in a timely manner in the event of a physical or technical incident; (iii) a process for regularly testing, assessing and evaluating the effectiveness of technical and organizational measures for ensuring the security of the processing; and (iv) regularly carrying information security risk assessments that take account of risk of accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure of, or access to, Personal Data.
8.2. An overview of Outbrain’s appropriate technical and organizational security measures are described on
Outbrain’s Security page
.
8.3. Upon becoming aware of a suspected or confirmed Personal Data Breach or Security Incident involving Outbrain User Data collected pursuant to this DSA, each party shall notify the other party without any undue delay, and provide such assistance as reasonably required to allow the other party to comply with its respective obligations under Data Protection Laws.
9.
PERSONNEL.
Each party shall be responsible for ensuring that staff members are appropriately trained to handle and process the Personal Data in accordance with their internal technical and organizational security measures, where relevant, together with Data Protection Laws, and have entered into confidentiality agreements relating to the processing of Personal Data.
10.
PROCESSORS – SERVICE PROVIDERS.
Each party shall remain independently responsible for appointing its respective Processors and/or Service Providers in accordance with Data Protection Laws.
11.
INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS.
11.1. Insofar as Personal Data is collected from End Users located within the territory of the EEA or the UK by either party during the course of the Agreement, neither party shall process any Personal Data (nor permit any Personal Data to be processed) in a country outside of the EEA or the UK unless: (i) that country has been designated by the European Commission or the ICO (as applicable) as providing an adequate level of protection for Personal Data; or (ii) it has taken such measures as necessary to ensure the transfer is compliant with EU Data Protection Laws.
11.2. The parties agree that for the purposes of any transfer of Personal Data from Partner to Outbrain collected within the EEA to the UK, the requirements of the clause above shall be fully satisfied by the UK Adequacy Decision.
11.3. Outbrain shall be responsible for the onward transfer of Personal Data from the UK to any third party country outside of the EEA as required by (a) the UK Adequacy Decision and/or (b) EU Data Protection Laws, as applicable.
11.4. Within its Affiliates, Outbrain has entered into adequate intragroup data sharing agreements including supplementary measures complying with all requirements of EU Data Protection Laws, which consist of (i) encryption in transit; (ii) pseudonymization; and (iii) not having received any legally binding request from a public authority, including judicial authorities, under the laws of the country of destination and not being aware of any direct access by public authorities.
11.5. In the event that the UK Adequacy Decision as the lawful ground for international transfers from the EEA to third party countries is no longer applicable, the parties agree that the Controller SCCs shall be incorporated by reference into this DSA and shall govern any international transfer of Personal Data outside of the EEA. For the purpose of the Controller SCCs, the parties fully agree that:
11.5.1. Partner is the "Data Exporter" and Outbrain, the "Data Importer";
11.5.2. Clause 7 “Docking clause” is deleted;
11.5.3. The OPTION under Clause 11 “Redress” is deleted;
11.5.4. Clause 17 “Governing Law” is completed with “Republic of Ireland”
11.5.5. Clause 18 (b) “Choice of forum and jurisdiction” is completed with “Dublin, Republic of Ireland”;
11.5.6. Annex I to the Controller SCCs shall be deemed to have been completed with Annex I to this DSA; and
11.5.7. Annex II to the Controller SCCs shall be deemed to have been completed by
Outbrain’s Security page
.
12.
TERM AND TERMINATION.
This DSA shall commence on the Effective Date and shall continue as long as the Partner uses the Technology.
13.
DATA RETENTION.
Outbrain shall not retain any individual data point collected in relation to the Technology for longer than 13 months, unless it constitutes anonymous data.
14.
MISCELLANEOUS.
14.1. Neither party shall be in breach of this DSA nor liable for delay in performing, or failure to perform, any of its obligations under the Agreement if such delay or failure results from events, circumstances or causes beyond its reasonable control.
14.2. Failure or delay in exercising any right or remedy under this DSA shall not constitute a waiver of such (or any other) right or remedy under this DSA, the Agreement or Data Protection Laws.
14.3. Partner shall not assign or otherwise transfer its rights or its obligations under this Agreement, in whole or in part, without the prior written consent of Outbrain.
14.4. Except as expressly stated otherwise and to the extent applicable under Data Protection Laws, nothing in this DSA shall create or confer any rights or other benefits in favor of any person other than a party to this DSA.
14.5. The invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability of any term of this DSA shall not affect the remainder of the DSA.
14.6. This DSA shall be governed by the laws specified in the applicable Agreement.
ANNEX I
Description of Processing Activities
This Annex forms part of the DSA and describes the processing of Personal Data by Outbrain. When Section 11.5 of the DSA applies, Annex I to the Controller SCCs shall be deemed to have been completed with this Annex.
A. LIST OF PARTIES
Data Exporter:
Partner name, address and contact details as stated in the Order Form.
Activities relevant to the data transferred: Digital services or media delivered through a website or mobile application on which Partner has ownership and control.
Joint Controller (collection) and independent Controller (any other processing).
Data Importer:
Outbrain with address and contact details as stated in the Order Form.
Activities relevant to the data transferred: Digital advertising services.
Joint Controller (collection) and independent Controller (any other processing).
B. DESCRIPTION OF TRANSFER
Categories of Data Subjects whose Personal Data is transferred:
End Users (Data Subjects who visit or use Partner Sites or interact with Outbrain on the Partner Sites(s)).
Categories of Personal Data transferred:
Bid request unique identifier
Outbrain unique identifier
IP address
User Agent data, browser and device type (desktop/mobile, brand, model, operating system and system version), application version, application ID or package name)
Device advertising identifiers
Pages, content visited and events
Time of visit
Broad location
Device time zone
Sensitive data transferred:
No Special Categories of Personal Data are transferred.
Frequency of the transfer:
Real time,
continuous basis.
Nature of the processing:
Receiving data, including collection, accessing, retrieval, recording, and data entry;
Holding data, including storage, organization and structuring;
Using data, including analyzing, consultation, testing, automated decision making and profiling;
Updating data, including correcting, adaptation, alteration, alignment and combination;
Protecting data, including restricting, encrypting, and security testing;
Sharing data, including disclosure, dissemination, allowing access or otherwise making available;
Returning data to the Data Exporter or Data Subject;
Erasing data, including destruction and deletion.
Purpose(s) of the data transfer and further processing:
Digital advertising services, which include:
Storing and/or accessing information on a device;
Selecting basic ads;
Creating a personalized ads profile;
Selecting personalized ads;
Creating a personalized content profile;
Selecting personalized content;
Measuring ad performance;
Measuring content performance;
Applying market research to generate audience insights;
Developing and improving products;
Ensuring security, preventing fraud and debugging; and
Technically delivering ads or content.
Retention period:
An individual data point is retained for no longer than
13 months.
Recipients:
The subject matter, nature and duration can be found on the
Outbrain Trusted Partners page
.
C. COMPETENT SUPERVISORY AUTHORITY
In the UK: The Information Commissioner’s Office.
In the EEA: The Supervisory Authority of the Member State of the Partner’s Registered Address as stated in the Agreement, or, if not applicable, the Supervisory Authority of the Member State in which the Data Subjects whose Personal Data is transferred under this Agreement in relation to the Technology are located.
Effective May 19th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Last Updated:
17 February 2023
In accordance with Article 24(2)
Regulation (EU) 2022/2065 of the European Parliament and of the Council of 19 October 2022 on a Single Market for Digital Services and amending Directive 2000/31/EC (“Digital Services Act” or “DSA”)
,  online platforms are required to publish information on the average monthly active recipients of the service in the European Union (“EU”) every six months starting from 17 February 2023.
The number of monthly active recipients of the services provided by Outbrain (individuals who interact with ads served by Outbrain on publisher sites) in the European Union according to Article 24 (2) DSA, on average during the period from 1st August 2022 to 31st January 2023 was over 45 millions per month.
This figure is only accurate to a certain degree as it is subject to several technical restrictions:
Absence of unified user accounts and of cross-device tracking: Outbrain will have as many user profiles as an individual uses different devices and browsers.
Context-based advertising: Outbrain will only display context-based advertising to non-consented users and no data will be collected for delivering those recommendations.
Third-party and cross-site tracking cookies limitations: users may have multiple user profiles for each website they visit where Outbrain's technology is implemented, even if those users are browsing from the same browser and device.
We have performed our calculation to the best of our knowledge based on the current information available from relevant regulators. This figure may be subject to uncertainty related to the exact methodology to be retained by regulators, as well as technical constraints.
Outbrain will update this information on a regular basis in accordance with Article 24 (2) DSA.
This information is being provided solely for purposes of complying with Article 24(2) of DSA and should not be used for any other purposes.
Effective April 24th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Effective Date:
February 23, 2023
These terms were last revised as of the effective date set forth above. Outbrain reserves the right to change these terms from time to time.
Amplify Terms and Conditions
These Amplify Terms and Conditions (“
Terms
”) are entered into by Outbrain UK Limited (“
Outbrain
”) and the entity executing an Insertion Order or using the Outbrain dashboard (“
Customer
”). These Terms govern Customer’s use of the Outbrain service, and together with an Insertion Order (or the information entered through the Outbrain dashboard (“
Dashboard
”) comprise the "
Agreement
" between Outbrain and Customer. If there is any inconsistency between: (i) the terms of a signed Insertion Order or those entered through the Dashboard (either “
Campaign Details
”) and (ii) these Terms, the Campaign Details as applicable, shall prevail.
1. Services
1.1 Outbrain partners with a network of online properties (the “
Network
”) and displays a user interface containing links that navigate to websites (the “
Service
”). Outbrain uses its proprietary algorithms to determine what links appear within the Service on the Network.
1.2 Outbrain shall display links to graphical, textual, video and/or auditory content selected by Customer (the links and the content accessed from the link together are the “
Content
”) on the Network through the Service. Outbrain shall continue to distribute the Content on the Network until the earlier of: (i) the end date of Customer’s campaign; (ii) the reaching of Customer’s budget; or (iii) the disabling of a campaign (provided that Outbrain reserves the right to charge for additional Actions (as defined in 5.1) as the Content is removed from circulation – see
FAQs
for more details).
1.3 Outbrain does not guarantee: (i) the placement, positioning or the timing of delivery of any Content; (ii) clicks or impressions (including clicks from a particular audience segment); or (iii) conversions. If Fees (as defined in Section 5) do not reach Customer’s budget, Customer's sole remedies shall be to: (i) subject to Section 2 below, extend the end date of the applicable campaign; (ii) replace or add to the existing Content with other Content to complete the campaign; or (iii) to pay only for accrued Fees on the Content. In no event shall Outbrain be liable for failure to deliver traffic to Content.
1.4 Outbrain will make reports available to Customer regarding the campaign(s). The final monthly reports (which may differ from the daily reports) will provide the conclusive basis for Outbrain's calculation of the fees owed by Customer. Customer may submit its own Outbrain-compatible tracker. If there is a ten percent (10%) discrepancy or more between Customer's numbers (based on an Outbrain-compatible tracker) and Outbrain's numbers then the parties agree to work in good faith to identify the correct amount to be paid to Outbrain. If the discrepancy is less than ten percent (10%), Outbrain's numbers shall be conclusive.
2. Content
2.1 Customer has the right and authorises Outbrain to place the Content on the Network and is solely responsible for determining the propriety and legality of the Content. In addition, Content selected by Customer must comply with Outbrain's
Advertising Guidelines
, as may be updated from time to time by Outbrain. Outbrain may at any time (at its sole discretion) reject or remove Content. Customer acknowledges that Outbrain is not responsible for the Content and that the Content may change during the course of a campaign due to revisions by the Content's author, comments from readers, or otherwise. Customer's recourse in the event of such change shall be to direct Outbrain to remove such Content from its then-current campaign and/or select other Content. Customer further acknowledges that, if there is an objection to the Content (whether from the Content author or publisher, or otherwise) Outbrain will act in accordance with Section 2 of its
Term of Use
and may cease (at its sole discretion) including the Content in the Service.
2.2 Customer represents and warrants that: (i) if the Content was written by or under the direction of Customer or paid for by Customer, that fact shall be clearly disclosed on or near the Content; (ii) it is authorised to use and/or has approved all words of the Content’s headline (whether written by Customer or on Customer’s behalf); and (iii) Content headlines accurately reflect the tone and subject matter of the Content and, (iv) it is authorized to use and/or has approved any image(s) related to its campaign(s) with Outbrain.
2.3 Customer shall not, directly or indirectly, provide Content that: (i) is obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous, pornographic, violent, profane, indecent or unlawful; (ii) is factually inaccurate, misleading or deceptive; and/or (iii) facilitates or promotes any type of illegal activity, including without limitation pyramid schemes, gambling, the sale or use of illicit drugs, or discrimination or harassment of any individual or group. Further, each piece of Customer Content shall neither (a) redirect to a destination other than as originally submitted to the Service, and/or (b) be substantively different from the Content originally submitted to the Service.
2.4 Both parties shall implement anti-malware scanning processes of the Content. Upon notice, both parties shall take immediate action to remove any suspicious Content from the Network.
3. Term and Cancellation
The Campaign Details will set forth the start and end date of a particular campaign. However, the Agreement, or an individual campaign may be suspended or terminated: (i) by Customer for any reason upon two (2) business days' written notice to Outbrain or within twelve (12) hours through the Dashboard; or (ii) by Outbrain for any reason upon two (2) days’ written notice to Customer. During the notice period, all previously contracted campaigns shall continue to run pursuant to the Campaign Details and Customer shall be responsible for paying Outbrain for all Fees accrued up to and including the last day of such notice period. Outbrain also reserves the right to suspend or terminate all or part of Customer's use of the Service if Outbrain (at Outbrain’s discretion) reasonably believes Customer is in breach of the terms of this Agreement.
4. Campaign Details
If Customer utilizes Outbrain’s Dashboard, Customer will have access to certain online reports and control over its campaign(s). To the extent Customer registers and has access to the Dashboard, Outbrain may collect certain personal data of Customer. Outbrain collects and processes this personal data in order to respond to Customer questions or requests, provide Customer’s with access to certain services, verify Customer’s identity and communicate with Customers about the use of the Service. Customer is solely responsible for all changes requested or approved (either directly or via Outbrain’s API) including those made through the Dashboard using its login. Customer is solely responsible for protecting its login and password to the Dashboard. Customer can manage campaigns using the Dashboard by modifying the Campaign Details and/or Customer may have the option of working with an Outbrain account manager, as determined by Outbrain.
5. Fees and Payment Terms
5.1 “
Fees
” are based on deliverables sold via one of following methods: (i) cost-per-click (“
CPC
”); (ii) cost-per thousand impressions (“
CPM
”); (iii) cost-per-completed view (“
CPCv
”) where completed view means fifty percent (50%) of the video Ad/Content is in view continuously from beginning to the end of video; and/or (iv) cost-per thousand Viewable Impressions (“
vCPM
”);  or (v) other desired actions agreed between the parties from time to time (each, an “Action”). A viewable impression is counted as viewable if fifty percent (50%) of the video ad is in view continuously for 2 seconds. Customer shall pay Outbrain Fees for Customer Content delivered via the Network as measured by Outbrain's tracking system. Outbrain may charge any applicable national, state, or local sales or use taxes, value added taxes or country-specific fees that Outbrain is legally obligated to charge. If CPC is being used for campaign measurement, such CPC may not be less than Outbrain’s then-in-effect minimum CPC (which may vary by market). If Customer is utilizing Outbrain’s automatic bidding feature, Customer grants Outbrain the right to set and modify Customer’s CPC at Outbrain’s discretion to aid in achieving Customer’s targets for its campaign. Customer shall be solely responsible for any additional fees incurred for utilizing third party ad serving on its campaign(s). For the avoidance of doubt, Outbrain will not cover, credit or reimburse any third party fees, including, but not limited to, use of any third-party tracker(s) on Customer’s campaign(s). Customer may increase or decrease its budget through the Dashboard or through a signed amendment to an Insertion Order.
5.2 If Customer has signed an Insertion Order, Fees will generally be invoiced by Outbrain to Customer by the end of the following calendar month, unless otherwise set forth in an IO. Customer shall pay all invoices within thirty (30) days from receipt. Any portion of a charge not disputed in good faith must be paid in full. If Customer has provided the Campaign Details through the Dashboard or has signed an Insertion Order and has used a credit card for billing purposes, Outbrain shall charge the Outbrain fees (including processing fees) to Customer’s credit card at such intervals as Outbrain determines in its sole discretion. The decision as to whether to allow Customer to choose between invoice, credit card or prepayment (as applicable) rests solely with Outbrain. Outbrain shall review all billing inquiries, including refund requests on a case-by-case basis and reserves the right to approve or deny any request in its sole discretion. Outbrain, in its sole discretion, may require a prepayment of any campaign budget before distributing Customer’s Content, until such time as Customer has established a credit history with Outbrain.
5.3 If Customer disputes any amount on an invoice, Customer should provide written notice to Outbrain (email is sufficient) within thirty (30) days of receipt of invoice or any such dispute shall be deemed waived. Customer’s email must include the amount disputed and provide adequate information to support any such claim. Customer may not withhold payment for any undisputed amounts, and any portion of a charge not disputed in good faith within thirty (30) days from receipt of invoice must be paid in full.
5.4 If payment is not made when due and not properly disputed pursuant to Section 5.3, Outbrain may charge interest at the rate of two percent (2%) per annum above the prevailing base rate of Barclays Bank PLC from the due date until the date of actual payment, whether before or after judgment. Outbrain also reserves the right to suspend or terminate any or all of Customer's use of the Service until Customer has paid all amounts due. Outbrain reserves the right to charge Customer for all costs of collection, including collection agency and reasonable legal fees and court costs. Customer authorises Outbrain to investigate Customer's credit record. If applicable, Customer agrees to provide such further financial information and documentation as may be required from time to time by Outbrain as a condition for the continued extension of credit. Customer acknowledges and agrees that any account, credit card and related billing and payment information which Customer provides to Outbrain may be shared by Outbrain with companies who work on Outbrain's behalf solely for the purpose of performing credit checks, effecting payment to Outbrain, collecting debts owed to Outbrain and/or servicing Customer's account. Outbrain may, in its sole discretion, extend, revise or revoke credit at any time. In addition, Outbrain reserves the right to require immediate payment of any outstanding balance that exceeds Customer’s credit limit and / or past the payment terms defined in this Agreement.
6. Additional Features and Terms
6.1 Outbrain may also make additional Service features available to Customer from time to time and use of such features may be subject to Customer’s agreement to certain additional terms and conditions (“
Additional Terms
”) (e.g., via an online click-through agreement or via the Dashboard). Such features will be provided at Outbrain’s discretion to Customer and may include fees in addition to those described in Section 5.1. Customer’s acceptance of the Additional Terms will constitute a binding and enforceable agreement as between Outbrain and Customer. In the event of any inconsistency between these Terms, the Additional Terms, and the Campaign Details, the order of precedence is: (i) Additional Terms, (ii) Campaign Details, and (iii) these Terms. Customers who choose to utilize LiveRamp services (via the Outbrain dashboard or otherwise) for purposes of their Outbrain campaign(s) are subject to
LiveRamp Terms
.
6.2 Subject to Customer’s compliance with Section 8 below, Customer may place (i) Outbrain pixel(s) (the “
Outbrain Pixel
”) on Customer’s website or application pages and/or (ii) third party pixels or tags (“the “
Third Party Pixels
”) for the purpose of providing analytics related to Customer’s campaign, enhanced targeting functionality and/or creating segments (the Outbrain Pixel and Third Party Pixels together are the “
Pixels
”). Customer represents and warrants that: (a) its use of the Pixels are in accordance with Data Protection Laws; and (b) it has provided appropriate notice to users regarding use of the Pixels, including an explanation: (x) that third parties, including Outbrain, may use cookies or similar technologies to collect or receive information from Customer’s website(s), and may use that information to provide measurement services and target ads; and (y) as to how users opt-out of the collection of information for targeting purposes; and (z) it will not use the Pixels on websites or application pages which target minors and/or contain sensitive categories of data (e.g. physical or mental health conditions). Customer shall not use the Pixels unless and until it has complied with the provisions of this Section6.2. Further, if an end-user has opted out of behavioral advertising via Customer’s site(s) (or a mechanism such as settings within an advertiser application), Customer shall be fully responsible for not loading the Outbrain Pixel. Outbrain may update, change, or substitute the Outbrain Pixel functionality at any time in its reasonable discretion provided that it does not disrupt the functioning of Customer’s landing page and serves the same purpose.
6.3 If Customer utilizes third party segments for enhanced targeting of its campaign(s) (“
3rd Party Targeting
”), Customer shall pay for its use of 3rd Party Targeting (“
3rd Party Data Costs
”) including any applicable taxes. Customer’s invoice for each campaign shall include both the Fees, and the 3rd Party Data Costs (if applicable). Customer agrees that 3rd Party Data costs will be based on Outbrain’s reporting metrics. If Customer utilizes 3rd Party Targeting Customer shall: (i) disclose this to users via an appropriate notice and/or in its privacy policy (as applicable); (ii) represent and warrant that its use of 3rd Party Targeting shall, at all times, be compliant with Data Protection Laws and satisfy the requirements for an appropriate legal basis for processing. Customer shall not, at any time, use 3rd Party Targeting: (i) for discriminatory purposes; (ii) to target minors under the age of sixteen(16); (iii) based on Special Categories of Personal Data; (iv) based on Personal Data relating to alleged or confirmed criminal convictions or offenses; or (v) otherwise in violation of any applicable law in any country where the campaign is performed.
7. Confidentiality
7.1 Each party agrees that with respect to any Confidential Information (as defined below) that is disclosed by one party to the other in connection with the Agreement, the party receiving such Confidential Information shall not disclose such Confidential Information to any third party, or use it for any purpose, except in connection with its rights and obligations under the Agreement. "
Confidential Information
" means all information concerning a party or any of its subsidiaries or affiliates that is not generally known to the public, which information is marked confidential or proprietary, or which under the circumstances ought reasonably to be treated as confidential or proprietary, and includes, without limitation, the terms of the Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information does not include information that: (i) is, as of the time of disclosure, or thereafter becomes, part of the public domain through a source other than the receiving party; (ii) was lawfully in the possession of the receiving party as of the time of disclosure; (iii) is independently developed by the receiving party without reference to the Confidential Information; or (iv) is subsequently obtained from a third party not subject to an obligation of confidentiality with respect to the information disclosed.
7.2 Confidential Information shall be kept in the strictest confidence and shall be protected by all reasonable and necessary security measures. Confidential Information shall not be released by the receiving party to anyone except an employee or agent, who has a need to know the same, and who is bound by confidentiality obligations at least as restrictive as these contained herein. Neither party will use any portion of Confidential Information provided by the other party pursuant to the Agreement for any purpose other than as expressly set forth under the Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, either party may disclose Confidential Information strictly necessary to comply with the demands of any court order, law or governmental agency and Outbrain may share Confidential Information of Customer with any holding company of Customer or with any subsidiary company of Customer’s holding company.
7.3 If Customer is acting on behalf of a Content provider, Customer authorises Outbrain to grant such Content provider (or any subsequent third party appointed by the Content provider) access to and a right to use the Campaign Details.
8. Additional Representations and Warranties/Disclaimers
8.1 Each party represents and warrants to the other party that: (i) it has all necessary rights and authority to enter into the Agreement and grant the rights and licences under the Agreement; (ii) it shall comply with Applicable Laws, and (iii) the execution or acceptance of the Agreement (which includes the Campaign Details), and the performance of its respective obligations and duties pursuant to the Agreement, do not and will not violate any agreement to which such party is bound. “
Applicable Laws
” means any applicable federal, national, state or foreign laws or regulations or any industry self-regulatory rules or guidelines (including the Interactive Advertising Bureau Guidelines, Standards & Best Practices, the NAI Code of Conduct, the DAA Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising. Any Applicable Laws related to the privacy of personal data are referred to as “
Data Protection Laws
”.
8.2 Customer further represents and warrants that: (i) the Content does not violate any Applicable Laws, rules and regulations and will not contain any material which may be harmful, abusive, obscene, threatening or defamatory; (ii) it has all necessary rights to permit and grants Outbrain pursuant to the Agreement all such rights which are necessary for Outbrain to (as applicable) use, host, cache, route, store, copy, modify, distribute, reformat, reproduce, publish, display, transmit and distribute the Content; (iii) use of the Content in accordance with the Agreement will not infringe any intellectual property rights of any third party; (iv) it cannot and will not attempt to provide Content that is targeted to children under the age of sixteen (16); and (v) it will not use the Service in a manner that provides an unintended advantage or interferes with the integrity and/or overall performance of the Service; (vi) if using the Dashboard, Customer will adhere to any rules of such use as solely determined by Outbrain (e.g. not using source bidding to whitelist any particular Network source); (vii) it is not subject to nor owned or controlled by any person that is subject to sanctions or export control restrictions imposed pursuant to U.S. law or the laws of any other jurisdiction applicable to the performance of the agreement; (viii) it will not take any action that could result in economic sanctions or other trade control restrictions or penalties being imposed on Outbrain; and (ix) all business and payment information provided to Outbrain is true, correct, and accurate.
8.3 If Customer is an agency (or other third party acting on behalf of the provider of the Content), Customer represents and warrants that: (i) it is the authorised agent of the provider of the Content; (ii) it has the legal authority to enter into the Agreement and make all decisions and take all actions relating to the provider of the Content; (iii) it has entered into a written agreement granting the agent the authority to represent the provider of the Content in accordance with (i) and (ii) above (and shall submit such agreement to Outbrain on demand). Customer further agrees that it is not acting on behalf of a French company or a foreign company whose advertising content mainly targets French territory exclusively through the Dashboard. If Customer is acting on behalf of a French content provider whose advertising mainly targets the French territory, please contact info@outbrain.com for more information on how to purchase Outbrain Services.
8.4 No conditions, warranties or other terms apply to any Outbrain services supplied by Outbrain under this Agreement unless expressly set out in this Agreement. No implied conditions, warranties or other terms apply (including without limitation any implied terms as to satisfactory quality, fitness for purpose or conformance with description or any warranties arising from a course of dealing, usage or trade practice or regarding the performance or success of any campaigns made by it on behalf of Customer or that the Services will operate uninterrupted, secure or error free).
9. Data Protection
9.1 The parties acknowledge that some or all of data used or collected through the Service (or use of Outbrain Pixels) may qualify as, or include, personal data.
9.2 In addition to complying with all Applicable Laws (including Data Protection Laws) each party shall be individually responsible for including the provision of relevant notices and obtaining relevant consents as required by Data Protection Laws. To the extent necessary, the parties shall (i) collaborate with respect to requests from end-users; and (ii) each party shall implement appropriate technical and organizational measures which prevent accidental or unlawful destruction and loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure of, or access to personal data. The parties shall each maintain and display on their respective websites an easily accessible and discoverable privacy policy that: (i) discloses the use of any cookies (based on redirects or otherwise) through the Service; and (ii) and includes relevant details regarding each party’s security controls and international transfers.
9.3 The provisions of the
Data Sharing Agreement
shall be incorporated into, and form part of, this Agreement.
10. Indemnification
10.1 Each party shall defend, indemnify and hold harmless the other party and its respective agents, affiliates, subsidiaries, directors, officers, employees, contractors and Network partners (as applicable), against any and all third party claims resulting from the breach of such party's representations and warranties under this Agreement.
10.2 In connection with any such claim: (i) the indemnified party shall provide prompt written notice to the indemnifying party of any such claim (provided that the failure to provide such prompt notice shall not relieve the indemnifying party of its indemnification obligations in the Agreement, except to the extent it has been damaged thereby); (ii) the indemnifying party shall have sole control of the defense or settlement of the claim (provided that the indemnifying party may not enter into any settlement that may adversely affect the rights or obligations of the indemnified party without the indemnified party's prior written consent); (iii) at the indemnifying party's request and expense, the indemnified party cooperating in the investigation and defense of such claim; and (iv) the indemnified party shall have the right to participate in its defense with counsel of its own choosing at the indemnified party's expense.
11. Limitation of Liability
11.1 Nothing in the Agreement excludes or limits either party’s liability: (i) for death or personal injury resulting from the negligence of either party or their servants, agents or employees; (ii) for fraud or fraudulent misrepresentation; (iii) for anything which cannot be excluded or limited by law.
11.2 Except with respect to claims arising from the indemnity obligations or a breach of clause 6 (confidentiality) and/or non-payment of fees owed, the maximum aggregate liability of either party and its’ directors, officers, employees, Network partners, vendors or agents arising from any given event or series of connected events arising under or related in any way to this Agreement or its implementation shall be limited to the greater of: (i) £50,000; and (ii) 100% of the amount of fees paid or payable by Customer under Agreement in the 12 months immediately preceding the month in which the event (or first in a series of connected events) occurred.
11.3 In no event shall either party be liable for: (i) loss of revenues; (ii) loss of profits; (iii) loss of contracts; (iv) loss of business or anticipated savings; (v) loss of data; (vi) loss of goodwill or reputation; or (vii) for any consequential, special or indirect losses whether or not such losses were within the contemplation of the parties at the date of this Agreement, suffered or incurred by that party arising out of or in connection with the provisions of, or any matter under, this Agreement.
12. Miscellaneous
12.1 Neither Party may assign the Agreement, in whole or in part, by operation of law or otherwise, without the prior written consent of the other; provided, however that either party may assign its rights or delegate its duties under the Agreement, in whole or in part, without the other's consent, in connection with a merger, reorganisation or sale of all, or substantially all, of the assignor's assets, provided that the successor entity shall have sufficient resources to fully perform the Agreement and shall assume the obligation to fully perform the Agreement.
12.2 This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with English law and the parties hereby submit to the exclusive jurisdiction of the English courts in respect of any dispute or matter arising out of or connected with this Agreement. The prevailing party in any action arising out of or to enforce this Agreement shall be entitled to recover its reasonable legal fees and costs. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event of Customer’s default of its obligations in Section 5 above, Outbrain shall have the right, if it so chooses, to commence an action against Customer for such default in the appropriate court in the venue and jurisdiction in which Customer resides or maintains assets.
12.3 No press releases or general public announcements shall be made without the mutual written consent of Customer and Outbrain. Outbrain shall have the right to include Customer's name including, but not limited to, in Outbrain's client list and in other marketing materials. Customer shall not use Outbrain’s name, logo or trademark without Outbrain’s prior written consent.
12.4 All notices under the Agreement will be in writing via email, to the address of the receiving party set forth on the IO, or at such different address as may be designated by such party by written notice to the other party from time to time. Notice will be effective on receipt.
12.5 No failure of either party to enforce any of its rights under the Agreement will act as a waiver of such rights. If one or more provisions of the Agreement are held to be unenforceable under Applicable Laws, then such provision(s) shall be excluded from the Agreement, and the balance of the Agreement shall be enforceable in accordance with its terms.
12.6 Neither party shall be liable for any delay or failure to perform any of its obligations set forth in the Agreement due to causes beyond its reasonable control. Neither party shall be liable for any unavailability or inoperability of the Internet, technical malfunction, or computer error or corruption resulting in loss of data or other harm. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Customer shall not be relieved from any of its obligations as to Fees due hereunder.
12.7 Sections
7, 8, 9, 10, 11
and
12
, together with any outstanding undisputed payment obligation, shall survive the termination of the Agreement.
12.8 Customer and Outbrain shall each act as independent contractors. Nothing in the Agreement shall be deemed or create or construed as creating a joint venture or partnership between the parties.
12.9 The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof and may not be modified without the prior written consent of both parties. In no event shall any inconsistent or conflicting terms and conditions contained in any purchase order, insertion order, invoice or other document submitted by Customer concerning the subject matter hereof have any force or effect unless accepted or signed by Outbrain.
Effective April 24th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Effective Date:
February 23, 2023
These terms were last revised as of the effective date set forth above. Outbrain reserves the right to change these terms from time to time.
Amplify Terms and Conditions
These Amplify Terms and Conditions (“
Terms
”) are entered into by Outbrain UK Limited (“
Outbrain
”) and the entity executing an Insertion Order or using the Outbrain dashboard (“
Customer
”). These Terms govern Customer’s use of the Outbrain service, and together with an Insertion Order (or the information entered through the Outbrain dashboard (“
Dashboard
”) comprise the "
Agreement
" between Outbrain and Customer. If there is any inconsistency between: (i) the terms of a signed Insertion Order or those entered through the Dashboard (either “
Campaign Details
”) and (ii) these Terms, the Campaign Details as applicable, shall prevail.
1. Services
1.1 Outbrain partners with a network of online properties (the “
Network
”) and displays a user interface containing links that navigate to websites (the “
Service
”). Outbrain uses its proprietary algorithms to determine what links appear within the Service on the Network.
1.2 Outbrain shall display links to graphical, textual, video and/or auditory content selected by Customer (the links and the content accessed from the link together are the “
Content
”) on the Network through the Service. Outbrain shall continue to distribute the Content on the Network until the earlier of: (i) the end date of Customer’s campaign; (ii) the reaching of Customer’s budget; or (iii) the disabling of a campaign (provided that Outbrain reserves the right to charge for additional Actions (as defined in 5.1) as the Content is removed from circulation – see
FAQs
for more details).
1.3 Outbrain does not guarantee: (i) the placement, positioning or the timing of delivery of any Content; (ii) clicks or impressions (including clicks from a particular audience segment); or (iii) conversions. If Fees (as defined in Section 5) do not reach Customer’s budget, Customer's sole remedies shall be to: (i) subject to Section 2 below, extend the end date of the applicable campaign; (ii) replace or add to the existing Content with other Content to complete the campaign; or (iii) to pay only for accrued Fees on the Content. In no event shall Outbrain be liable for failure to deliver traffic to Content.
1.4 Outbrain will make reports available to Customer regarding the campaign(s). The final monthly reports (which may differ from the daily reports) will provide the conclusive basis for Outbrain's calculation of the fees owed by Customer. Customer may submit its own Outbrain-compatible tracker. If there is a ten percent (10%) discrepancy or more between Customer's numbers (based on an Outbrain-compatible tracker) and Outbrain's numbers then the parties agree to work in good faith to identify the correct amount to be paid to Outbrain. If the discrepancy is less than ten percent (10%), Outbrain's numbers shall be conclusive.
2. Content
2.1 Customer has the right and authorises Outbrain to place the Content on the Network and is solely responsible for determining the propriety and legality of the Content. In addition, Content selected by Customer must comply with Outbrain's
Advertising Guidelines
, as may be updated from time to time by Outbrain. Outbrain may at any time (at its sole discretion) reject or remove Content. Customer acknowledges that Outbrain is not responsible for the Content and that the Content may change during the course of a campaign due to revisions by the Content's author, comments from readers, or otherwise. Customer's recourse in the event of such change shall be to direct Outbrain to remove such Content from its then-current campaign and/or select other Content. Customer further acknowledges that, if there is an objection to the Content (whether from the Content author or publisher, or otherwise) Outbrain will act in accordance with Section 2 of its
Term of Use
and may cease (at its sole discretion) including the Content in the Service.
2.2 Customer represents and warrants that: (i) if the Content was written by or under the direction of Customer or paid for by Customer, that fact shall be clearly disclosed on or near the Content; (ii) it is authorised to use and/or has approved all words of the Content’s headline (whether written by Customer or on Customer’s behalf); and (iii) Content headlines accurately reflect the tone and subject matter of the Content and, (iv) it is authorized to use and/or has approved any image(s) related to its campaign(s) with Outbrain.
2.3 Customer shall not, directly or indirectly, provide Content that: (i) is obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous, pornographic, violent, profane, indecent or unlawful; (ii) is factually inaccurate, misleading or deceptive; and/or (iii) facilitates or promotes any type of illegal activity, including without limitation pyramid schemes, gambling, the sale or use of illicit drugs, or discrimination or harassment of any individual or group. Further, each piece of Customer Content shall neither (a) redirect to a destination other than as originally submitted to the Service, and/or (b) be substantively different from the Content originally submitted to the Service.
2.4 Both parties shall implement anti-malware scanning processes of the Content. Upon notice, both parties shall take immediate action to remove any suspicious Content from the Network.
3. Term and Cancellation
The Campaign Details will set forth the start and end date of a particular campaign. However, the Agreement, or an individual campaign may be suspended or terminated: (i) by Customer for any reason upon two (2) business days' written notice to Outbrain or within twelve (12) hours through the Dashboard; or (ii) by Outbrain for any reason upon two (2) days’ written notice to Customer. During the notice period, all previously contracted campaigns shall continue to run pursuant to the Campaign Details and Customer shall be responsible for paying Outbrain for all Fees accrued up to and including the last day of such notice period. Outbrain also reserves the right to suspend or terminate all or part of Customer's use of the Service if Outbrain (at Outbrain’s discretion) reasonably believes Customer is in breach of the terms of this Agreement.
4. Campaign Details
If Customer utilizes Outbrain’s Dashboard, Customer will have access to certain online reports and control over its campaign(s). To the extent Customer registers and has access to the Dashboard, Outbrain may collect certain personal data of Customer. Outbrain collects and processes this personal data in order to respond to Customer questions or requests, provide Customer’s with access to certain services, verify Customer’s identity and communicate with Customers about the use of the Service. Customer is solely responsible for all changes requested or approved (either directly or via Outbrain’s API) including those made through the Dashboard using its login. Customer is solely responsible for protecting its login and password to the Dashboard. Customer can manage campaigns using the Dashboard by modifying the Campaign Details and/or Customer may have the option of working with an Outbrain account manager, as determined by Outbrain.
5. Fees and Payment Terms
5.1 “
Fees
” are based on deliverables sold via one of following methods: (i) cost-per-click (“
CPC
”); (ii) cost-per thousand impressions (“
CPM
”); (iii) cost-per-completed view (“
CPCv
”) where completed view means fifty percent (50%) of the video Ad/Content is in view continuously from beginning to the end of video; and/or (iv) cost-per thousand Viewable Impressions (“
vCPM
”);  or (v) other desired actions agreed between the parties from time to time (each, an “Action”). A viewable impression is counted as viewable if fifty percent (50%) of the video ad is in view continuously for 2 seconds. Customer shall pay Outbrain Fees for Customer Content delivered via the Network as measured by Outbrain's tracking system. Outbrain may charge any applicable national, state, or local sales or use taxes, value added taxes or country-specific fees that Outbrain is legally obligated to charge. If CPC is being used for campaign measurement, such CPC may not be less than Outbrain’s then-in-effect minimum CPC (which may vary by market). If Customer is utilizing Outbrain’s automatic bidding feature, Customer grants Outbrain the right to set and modify Customer’s CPC at Outbrain’s discretion to aid in achieving Customer’s targets for its campaign. Customer shall be solely responsible for any additional fees incurred for utilizing third party ad serving on its campaign(s). For the avoidance of doubt, Outbrain will not cover, credit or reimburse any third party fees, including, but not limited to, use of any third-party tracker(s) on Customer’s campaign(s). Customer may increase or decrease its budget through the Dashboard or through a signed amendment to an Insertion Order.
5.2 If Customer has signed an Insertion Order, Fees will generally be invoiced by Outbrain to Customer by the end of the following calendar month, unless otherwise set forth in an IO. Customer shall pay all invoices within thirty (30) days from receipt. Any portion of a charge not disputed in good faith must be paid in full. If Customer has provided the Campaign Details through the Dashboard or has signed an Insertion Order and has used a credit card for billing purposes, Outbrain shall charge the Outbrain fees (including processing fees) to Customer’s credit card at such intervals as Outbrain determines in its sole discretion. The decision as to whether to allow Customer to choose between invoice, credit card or prepayment (as applicable) rests solely with Outbrain. Outbrain shall review all billing inquiries, including refund requests on a case-by-case basis and reserves the right to approve or deny any request in its sole discretion. Outbrain, in its sole discretion, may require a prepayment of any campaign budget before distributing Customer’s Content, until such time as Customer has established a credit history with Outbrain.
5.3 If Customer disputes any amount on an invoice, Customer should provide written notice to Outbrain (email is sufficient) within thirty (30) days of receipt of invoice or any such dispute shall be deemed waived. Customer’s email must include the amount disputed and provide adequate information to support any such claim. Customer may not withhold payment for any undisputed amounts, and any portion of a charge not disputed in good faith within thirty (30) days from receipt of invoice must be paid in full.
5.4 If payment is not made when due and not properly disputed pursuant to Section 5.3, Outbrain may charge interest at the rate of two percent (2%) per annum above the prevailing base rate of Barclays Bank PLC from the due date until the date of actual payment, whether before or after judgment. Outbrain also reserves the right to suspend or terminate any or all of Customer's use of the Service until Customer has paid all amounts due. Outbrain reserves the right to charge Customer for all costs of collection, including collection agency and reasonable legal fees and court costs. Customer authorises Outbrain to investigate Customer's credit record. If applicable, Customer agrees to provide such further financial information and documentation as may be required from time to time by Outbrain as a condition for the continued extension of credit. Customer acknowledges and agrees that any account, credit card and related billing and payment information which Customer provides to Outbrain may be shared by Outbrain with companies who work on Outbrain's behalf solely for the purpose of performing credit checks, effecting payment to Outbrain, collecting debts owed to Outbrain and/or servicing Customer's account. Outbrain may, in its sole discretion, extend, revise or revoke credit at any time. In addition, Outbrain reserves the right to require immediate payment of any outstanding balance that exceeds Customer’s credit limit and / or past the payment terms defined in this Agreement.
6. Additional Features and Terms
6.1 Outbrain may also make additional Service features available to Customer from time to time and use of such features may be subject to Customer’s agreement to certain additional terms and conditions (“
Additional Terms
”) (e.g., via an online click-through agreement or via the Dashboard). Such features will be provided at Outbrain’s discretion to Customer and may include fees in addition to those described in Section 5.1. Customer’s acceptance of the Additional Terms will constitute a binding and enforceable agreement as between Outbrain and Customer. In the event of any inconsistency between these Terms, the Additional Terms, and the Campaign Details, the order of precedence is: (i) Additional Terms, (ii) Campaign Details, and (iii) these Terms. Customers who choose to utilize LiveRamp services (via the Outbrain dashboard or otherwise) for purposes of their Outbrain campaign(s) are subject to
LiveRamp Terms
.
6.2 Subject to Customer’s compliance with Section 8 below, Customer may place (i) Outbrain pixel(s) (the “
Outbrain Pixel
”) on Customer’s website or application pages and/or (ii) third party pixels or tags (“the “
Third Party Pixels
”) for the purpose of providing analytics related to Customer’s campaign, enhanced targeting functionality and/or creating segments (the Outbrain Pixel and Third Party Pixels together are the “
Pixels
”). Customer represents and warrants that: (a) its use of the Pixels are in accordance with Data Protection Laws; and (b) it has provided appropriate notice to users regarding use of the Pixels, including an explanation: (x) that third parties, including Outbrain, may use cookies or similar technologies to collect or receive information from Customer’s website(s), and may use that information to provide measurement services and target ads; and (y) as to how users opt-out of the collection of information for targeting purposes; and (z) it will not use the Pixels on websites or application pages which target minors and/or contain sensitive categories of data (e.g. physical or mental health conditions). Customer shall not use the Pixels unless and until it has complied with the provisions of this Section6.2. Further, if an end-user has opted out of behavioral advertising via Customer’s site(s) (or a mechanism such as settings within an advertiser application), Customer shall be fully responsible for not loading the Outbrain Pixel. Outbrain may update, change, or substitute the Outbrain Pixel functionality at any time in its reasonable discretion provided that it does not disrupt the functioning of Customer’s landing page and serves the same purpose.
6.3 If Customer utilizes third party segments for enhanced targeting of its campaign(s) (“
3rd Party Targeting
”), Customer shall pay for its use of 3rd Party Targeting (“
3rd Party Data Costs
”) including any applicable taxes. Customer’s invoice for each campaign shall include both the Fees, and the 3rd Party Data Costs (if applicable). Customer agrees that 3rd Party Data costs will be based on Outbrain’s reporting metrics. If Customer utilizes 3rd Party Targeting Customer shall: (i) disclose this to users via an appropriate notice and/or in its privacy policy (as applicable); (ii) represent and warrant that its use of 3rd Party Targeting shall, at all times, be compliant with Data Protection Laws and satisfy the requirements for an appropriate legal basis for processing. Customer shall not, at any time, use 3rd Party Targeting: (i) for discriminatory purposes; (ii) to target minors under the age of sixteen(16); (iii) based on Special Categories of Personal Data; (iv) based on Personal Data relating to alleged or confirmed criminal convictions or offenses; or (v) otherwise in violation of any applicable law in any country where the campaign is performed.
7. Confidentiality
7.1 Each party agrees that with respect to any Confidential Information (as defined below) that is disclosed by one party to the other in connection with the Agreement, the party receiving such Confidential Information shall not disclose such Confidential Information to any third party, or use it for any purpose, except in connection with its rights and obligations under the Agreement. "
Confidential Information
" means all information concerning a party or any of its subsidiaries or affiliates that is not generally known to the public, which information is marked confidential or proprietary, or which under the circumstances ought reasonably to be treated as confidential or proprietary, and includes, without limitation, the terms of the Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information does not include information that: (i) is, as of the time of disclosure, or thereafter becomes, part of the public domain through a source other than the receiving party; (ii) was lawfully in the possession of the receiving party as of the time of disclosure; (iii) is independently developed by the receiving party without reference to the Confidential Information; or (iv) is subsequently obtained from a third party not subject to an obligation of confidentiality with respect to the information disclosed.
7.2 Confidential Information shall be kept in the strictest confidence and shall be protected by all reasonable and necessary security measures. Confidential Information shall not be released by the receiving party to anyone except an employee or agent, who has a need to know the same, and who is bound by confidentiality obligations at least as restrictive as these contained herein. Neither party will use any portion of Confidential Information provided by the other party pursuant to the Agreement for any purpose other than as expressly set forth under the Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, either party may disclose Confidential Information strictly necessary to comply with the demands of any court order, law or governmental agency and Outbrain may share Confidential Information of Customer with any holding company of Customer or with any subsidiary company of Customer’s holding company.
7.3 If Customer is acting on behalf of a Content provider, Customer authorises Outbrain to grant such Content provider (or any subsequent third party appointed by the Content provider) access to and a right to use the Campaign Details.
8. Additional Representations and Warranties/Disclaimers
8.1 Each party represents and warrants to the other party that: (i) it has all necessary rights and authority to enter into the Agreement and grant the rights and licences under the Agreement; (ii) it shall comply with Applicable Laws, and (iii) the execution or acceptance of the Agreement (which includes the Campaign Details), and the performance of its respective obligations and duties pursuant to the Agreement, do not and will not violate any agreement to which such party is bound. “
Applicable Laws
” means any applicable federal, national, state or foreign laws or regulations or any industry self-regulatory rules or guidelines (including the Interactive Advertising Bureau Guidelines, Standards & Best Practices, the NAI Code of Conduct, the DAA Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising. Any Applicable Laws related to the privacy of personal data are referred to as “
Data Protection Laws
”.
8.2 Customer further represents and warrants that: (i) the Content does not violate any Applicable Laws, rules and regulations and will not contain any material which may be harmful, abusive, obscene, threatening or defamatory; (ii) it has all necessary rights to permit and grants Outbrain pursuant to the Agreement all such rights which are necessary for Outbrain to (as applicable) use, host, cache, route, store, copy, modify, distribute, reformat, reproduce, publish, display, transmit and distribute the Content; (iii) use of the Content in accordance with the Agreement will not infringe any intellectual property rights of any third party; (iv) it cannot and will not attempt to provide Content that is targeted to children under the age of sixteen (16); and (v) it will not use the Service in a manner that provides an unintended advantage or interferes with the integrity and/or overall performance of the Service; (vi) if using the Dashboard, Customer will adhere to any rules of such use as solely determined by Outbrain (e.g. not using source bidding to whitelist any particular Network source); (vii) it is not subject to nor owned or controlled by any person that is subject to sanctions or export control restrictions imposed pursuant to U.S. law or the laws of any other jurisdiction applicable to the performance of the agreement; (viii) it will not take any action that could result in economic sanctions or other trade control restrictions or penalties being imposed on Outbrain; and (ix) all business and payment information provided to Outbrain is true, correct, and accurate.
8.3 If Customer is an agency (or other third party acting on behalf of the provider of the Content), Customer represents and warrants that: (i) it is the authorised agent of the provider of the Content; (ii) it has the legal authority to enter into the Agreement and make all decisions and take all actions relating to the provider of the Content; (iii) it has entered into a written agreement granting the agent the authority to represent the provider of the Content in accordance with (i) and (ii) above (and shall submit such agreement to Outbrain on demand). Customer further agrees that it is not acting on behalf of a French company or a foreign company whose advertising content mainly targets French territory exclusively through the Dashboard. If Customer is acting on behalf of a French content provider whose advertising mainly targets the French territory, please contact info@outbrain.com for more information on how to purchase Outbrain Services.
8.4 No conditions, warranties or other terms apply to any Outbrain services supplied by Outbrain under this Agreement unless expressly set out in this Agreement. No implied conditions, warranties or other terms apply (including without limitation any implied terms as to satisfactory quality, fitness for purpose or conformance with description or any warranties arising from a course of dealing, usage or trade practice or regarding the performance or success of any campaigns made by it on behalf of Customer or that the Services will operate uninterrupted, secure or error free).
9. Data Protection
9.1 The parties acknowledge that some or all of data used or collected through the Service (or use of Outbrain Pixels) may qualify as, or include, personal data.
9.2 In addition to complying with all Applicable Laws (including Data Protection Laws) each party shall be individually responsible for including the provision of relevant notices and obtaining relevant consents as required by Data Protection Laws. To the extent necessary, the parties shall (i) collaborate with respect to requests from end-users; and (ii) each party shall implement appropriate technical and organizational measures which prevent accidental or unlawful destruction and loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure of, or access to personal data. The parties shall each maintain and display on their respective websites an easily accessible and discoverable privacy policy that: (i) discloses the use of any cookies (based on redirects or otherwise) through the Service; and (ii) and includes relevant details regarding each party’s security controls and international transfers.
9.3 The provisions of the
Data Sharing Agreement
shall be incorporated into, and form part of, this Agreement.
10. Indemnification
10.1 Each party shall defend, indemnify and hold harmless the other party and its respective agents, affiliates, subsidiaries, directors, officers, employees, contractors and Network partners (as applicable), against any and all third party claims resulting from the breach of such party's representations and warranties under this Agreement.
10.2 In connection with any such claim: (i) the indemnified party shall provide prompt written notice to the indemnifying party of any such claim (provided that the failure to provide such prompt notice shall not relieve the indemnifying party of its indemnification obligations in the Agreement, except to the extent it has been damaged thereby); (ii) the indemnifying party shall have sole control of the defense or settlement of the claim (provided that the indemnifying party may not enter into any settlement that may adversely affect the rights or obligations of the indemnified party without the indemnified party's prior written consent); (iii) at the indemnifying party's request and expense, the indemnified party cooperating in the investigation and defense of such claim; and (iv) the indemnified party shall have the right to participate in its defense with counsel of its own choosing at the indemnified party's expense.
11. Limitation of Liability
11.1 Nothing in the Agreement excludes or limits either party’s liability: (i) for death or personal injury resulting from the negligence of either party or their servants, agents or employees; (ii) for fraud or fraudulent misrepresentation; (iii) for anything which cannot be excluded or limited by law.
11.2 Except with respect to claims arising from the indemnity obligations or a breach of clause 6 (confidentiality) and/or non-payment of fees owed, the maximum aggregate liability of either party and its’ directors, officers, employees, Network partners, vendors or agents arising from any given event or series of connected events arising under or related in any way to this Agreement or its implementation shall be limited to the greater of: (i) £50,000; and (ii) 100% of the amount of fees paid or payable by Customer under Agreement in the 12 months immediately preceding the month in which the event (or first in a series of connected events) occurred.
11.3 In no event shall either party be liable for: (i) loss of revenues; (ii) loss of profits; (iii) loss of contracts; (iv) loss of business or anticipated savings; (v) loss of data; (vi) loss of goodwill or reputation; or (vii) for any consequential, special or indirect losses whether or not such losses were within the contemplation of the parties at the date of this Agreement, suffered or incurred by that party arising out of or in connection with the provisions of, or any matter under, this Agreement.
12. Miscellaneous
12.1 Neither Party may assign the Agreement, in whole or in part, by operation of law or otherwise, without the prior written consent of the other; provided, however that either party may assign its rights or delegate its duties under the Agreement, in whole or in part, without the other's consent, in connection with a merger, reorganisation or sale of all, or substantially all, of the assignor's assets, provided that the successor entity shall have sufficient resources to fully perform the Agreement and shall assume the obligation to fully perform the Agreement.
12.2 This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with English law and the parties hereby submit to the exclusive jurisdiction of the English courts in respect of any dispute or matter arising out of or connected with this Agreement. The prevailing party in any action arising out of or to enforce this Agreement shall be entitled to recover its reasonable legal fees and costs. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event of Customer’s default of its obligations in Section 5 above, Outbrain shall have the right, if it so chooses, to commence an action against Customer for such default in the appropriate court in the venue and jurisdiction in which Customer resides or maintains assets.
12.3 No press releases or general public announcements shall be made without the mutual written consent of Customer and Outbrain. Outbrain shall have the right to include Customer's name including, but not limited to, in Outbrain's client list and in other marketing materials. Customer shall not use Outbrain’s name, logo or trademark without Outbrain’s prior written consent.
12.4 All notices under the Agreement will be in writing via email, to the address of the receiving party set forth on the IO, or at such different address as may be designated by such party by written notice to the other party from time to time. Notice will be effective on receipt.
12.5 No failure of either party to enforce any of its rights under the Agreement will act as a waiver of such rights. If one or more provisions of the Agreement are held to be unenforceable under Applicable Laws, then such provision(s) shall be excluded from the Agreement, and the balance of the Agreement shall be enforceable in accordance with its terms.
12.6 Neither party shall be liable for any delay or failure to perform any of its obligations set forth in the Agreement due to causes beyond its reasonable control. Neither party shall be liable for any unavailability or inoperability of the Internet, technical malfunction, or computer error or corruption resulting in loss of data or other harm. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Customer shall not be relieved from any of its obligations as to Fees due hereunder.
12.7 Sections
7, 8, 9, 10, 11
and
12
, together with any outstanding undisputed payment obligation, shall survive the termination of the Agreement.
12.8 Customer and Outbrain shall each act as independent contractors. Nothing in the Agreement shall be deemed or create or construed as creating a joint venture or partnership between the parties.
12.9 The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof and may not be modified without the prior written consent of both parties. In no event shall any inconsistent or conflicting terms and conditions contained in any purchase order, insertion order, invoice or other document submitted by Customer concerning the subject matter hereof have any force or effect unless accepted or signed by Outbrain.
Effective June 21st 2023
Download
Table of Contents
This Data Sharing Agreement (“
DSA
”) is entered into by the Outbrain entity (“
Outbrain
”) and the company (the “
DSP
”) identified in the Programmatic Access Enrollment Form (governed by the
Programmatic Access Terms
or
EU Programmatic Access Terms
, as applicable) between the parties from time to time (the “
Terms
”). From the Effective Date of the Terms, this DSA shall apply to any and all agreements between the parties and their Affiliates from time to time.
This DSA is incorporated into the Terms (as amended from time to time) and constitutes a legally binding agreement between the parties. Collectively, the Controller SCCs (as applicable), the DSA and the Terms are referred to as the “
Agreement
”. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency between any of the terms of the Agreement the following order of precedence shall prevail: (i) the Controller SCCs (as applicable); (ii) this DSA; and (iii) the Terms.
Any capitalized terms not defined in this DSA shall have the respective meanings given to them in the Terms.
1. DEFINITIONS.
1.1. “
Affiliate(s)
” means in respect of either party at any time, any person or legal entity controlled by or controlling or under the common control of that party. Any reference to the parties shall include reference to their Affiliates;
1.2. “
Bid Request Data
”
means
Personal Data of an End User provided by Outbrain to DSP during the Service;
1.3. “
Controller SCCs
” means the standard data protection clauses “MODULE ONE: Transfer controller to controller” in accordance with article 46 2. (c) GDPR adopted by the European Commission on 4 June 2021 (Commission Implementing Decision (EU) 2021/914) (as amended or superseded), containing contractual obligations on the Data Exporter and the Data Importer, and rights for EEA Data Subjects whose Personal Data is transferred, as amended or superseded from time to time by the European Commission;
1.4. “
Data Protection Laws
” means all laws, guidance or codes of practice issued by a relevant public authority applicable from time to time to Outbrain or DSP relating to the processing of Personal Data and the privacy of electronic communications, including U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws and EU Data Protection Laws, the Brazilian General Data Protection Law (LGPD), Federal Law no. 13,709/2018 and the Japanese Act on the Protection of Personal Information;
1.5. “
EEA
” means the European Economic Area;
1.6. “
End
User Data
” means Personal Data of an End User which DSP may collect directly on the Partner Inventory;
1.7. “
End Users
” are Data Subjects or Consumers who visit or use the Partner Inventory provided by Outbrain;
1.8. "
EU Data Protection Laws
" means all laws, guidance or codes of practice issued by a relevant Supervisory Authority (including, in the UK, the Information Commissioner’s Office (“ICO”)) applicable from time to time to Outbrain or DSP relating to the processing of Personal Data and the privacy of electronic communications in the EEA and the UK as amended or superseded, especially (i) the EU GDPR and the UK GDPR; (ii) the Privacy and Electronic Communications Directive 2002/58/EC (as updated by Directive 2009/136/EC) (ePrivacy Directive) and the UK Privacy and Electronic Communications Regulations 2003 (SI 2003 No. 2426) (PECR) as updated; (iii) the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection 1992;
1.9. “
EU GDPR
” means the General Data Protection Regulation (EU) 2016/679;
1.10. “
UK GDPR
” means the EU GDPR as amended and incorporated into UK law under the UK European Union Withdrawal Act 2018;
1.11. “
UK SCCs Addendum
” means the International Data Transfer Addendum to the EU Commission Standard Contractual Clauses version B1.0 in force 21 March 2022 adopted by the ICO under S119A(1) of the UK Data Protection Act 2018 (as amended or superseded);
1.12. “
U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws
” means the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020, the Colorado Privacy Act of 2021, the Connecticut Data Privacy Act of 2022, the Indiana Consumer Data Protection Act of 2023, the Iowa Consumer Data Protection Act of 2023, the Montana Consumer Data Privacy Act of 2023, the Tennessee Information Protection Act of 2023, the Utah Consumer Privacy Act of 2022, the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act  of 2021 and all other U.S. privacy laws, guidance or codes of practice issued by a relevant public authority applicable from time to time to Outbrain or DSP relating to the processing of Personal Information and the privacy of electronic communications, as amended or superseded by any federal, state or national law, regulation or regulatory guidance;
1.13. "
Controller
", “
Joint Controller
”, "
Processor
", “
Data Protection Impact Assessment
”, "
Data
Subject
", “
Personal Data Breach
”, "
Special Categories of Personal Data
" and “
Supervisory Authority
” shall have the meanings given in EU Data Protection Laws;
1.14. “
sale
”
(including the terms “sell,” “selling,” “sold,” and other variations thereof, including renting, disclosing, releasing, disseminating, making available, transferring, or otherwise communicating Personal Information for monetary or other valuable consideration), “
Consumer
”,
“Business
”, “
Third Party
”
and
“
Service Provider
”
shall have the meanings given to those terms under U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws, as applicable; and
1.15. “
Personal Data
” (and any variation thereof, including “Personal Information” under U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws) and “
process
” (including “processing”), shall have the meaning given under the applicable Data Protection Laws.
2. PURPOSE OF PROCESSING.
The parties collect and process Bid Request Data for the purposes of delivering DSP’s clients’ advertising materials to End Users. DSP shall not process or share with any third party Bid Request Data for any other purpose than allowed in the Terms and this DSA. Upon a valid legal basis, DSP may process End User Data for personalized advertising purposes.
3. U.S. CONSUMER PRIVACY LAWS AND EU DATA PROTECTION LAWS SPECIFIC PROVISIONS.
3.1. Specific provisions applicable to U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws are located in
Sections 4.2 and 5.3 (iii).
3.2. Specific provision applicable to EU Data protection Laws are located in
Sections 4.3, 5.3 (i), and 11
.
4. ROLE OF PARTIES.
4.1. Each party shall comply with all relevant provisions of Data Protection Laws as it applies to matters under the Agreement and ensure that they process Personal Data fairly and lawfully in accordance with Data Protection Laws as applicable in the provision and receipt of Personal Data.
4.2. Insofar as  U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws are applicable to the Service, Outbrain and DSP will be considered independent Businesses for the collection, processing and selling of any Personal Information, and no party shall be considered a Service Provider on anyone’s behalf, unless as strictly required under applicable U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws. In such case, the
IAB Multi-State Privacy Agreement
(the most recent version or successor thereto) shall be incorporated by reference into this DSA and shall govern the relationship between the parties with Partner as Business and Outbrain and DSP as Service Providers exclusively in respect of opted out traffic in the U.S., as applicable.
4.3. Insofar as EU Data Protection Laws are applicable to the Agreement, Outbrain and DSP will be considered independent Controllers under EU Data Protection Laws for the collection and any further processing of any Personal Data, and no party shall be considered a Processor on anyone’s behalf.
4.4. Each party shall remain solely and exclusively responsible for determining the means and purposes of processing for its respective processing activities.
5. DSP’S OBLIGATIONS.
5.1. DSP shall not, at any time, use the Service for: (i) for discriminatory purposes; (ii) to target minors under the age of sixteen(16); (iii) based on Special Categories of Personal Data; (iv) based on Personal Data relating to alleged or confirmed criminal convictions or offenses; or (v) otherwise in violation of any applicable law in any country where Outbrain provides the Partner Inventory.
5.2. DSP shall disclose, via an appropriate privacy notice, all information relating to processing activities where the Personal Data is collected directly from the End User or where such Personal Data is collected via third parties, as required under Data Protection Laws.
5.3. DSP represents and warrants that its use of the Service shall, at all times, be compliant with Data Protection Laws and satisfy the requirements for an appropriate legal basis for processing Bid Request Data and End User Data. In particular, DSP shall:
(i) Insofar as EU Data Protection Laws are applicable to the Agreement, comply with End Users' consent choices expressed via a consent management platform using the IAB Transparency & Consent Framework v2.2 (the most recent version or successor thereto) and only process End User Data upon valid consent strings. DSP must not, at any time, process Bid Request Data or End User Data based on "null" or "invalid" signals. DSP shall not use or rely on cookies or similar tracking technologies to deliver content if no valid IAB Transparency & Consent Framework v2.2 consent signal is available on the Partner Inventory;
(ii) provide a user choice mechanism such as the opt out page(s) of the
Network Advertising Initiative
, the
Digital Advertising Alliance
or the
European Digital Advertising Alliance
, as applicable; and
(iii) Insofar as U.S. Consumer Privacy Laws are applicable to the Agreement, comply with End Users' "Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information" or equivalent opt out choices provided via a consent management platform using the IAB Global Privacy Platform.
5.4. DSP shall comply with requests from End Users to exercise their rights under relevant Data Protection Laws, without undue delay and within the required time limits.
6. OUTBRAIN’S OBLIGATIONS.
6.1. Outbrain is solely responsible for implementing the Service and providing the Partner Inventory under the Agreement and Data Protection Laws.
6.2. Outbrain shall disclose, via an appropriate privacy notice, all information relating to processing activities where the Personal Data is collected directly from the End User or where such Personal Data is collected via or shared with third parties, as required under Data Protection Laws. This information is available on
Outbrain’s Privacy Policy
.
6.3. Outbrain shall at all times satisfy the requirements for an appropriate legal basis for the processing of Personal Data.
6.4. Outbrain shall enter into appropriate contractual arrangements with its publishers or third party partners, requiring all parties to comply with Data Protection Laws.
6.5. Outbrain shall comply with requests from End Users to exercise their rights under relevant Data Protection Laws, without undue delay and within the required time limits. Requests relating to right to access, erasure, withdrawing consent, objecting to profiling, or ”Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” can be exercised directly on
Outbrain Interest Profile
.
7. COOPERATION.
7.1. Each party shall develop, implement, and regularly review procedures to ensure they meet their respective obligations under Data Protection Laws.
7.2. Each party shall immediately inform the other party if any activity pursuant to the Agreement infringes any part of Data Protection Laws, and the parties shall review such activity accordingly. If during the term, Data Protection Laws change in a way that this DSA is no longer adequate for performing the processing activities necessary to the Terms, the parties agree to promptly negotiate in good faith to review this DSA in light of such changes.
7.3. In the event that either party receives any correspondence, enquiry or complaint from an End User, Supervisory Authority or any other third party related to the disclosure or processing of Personal Data pursuant to this DSA, or requests information from the other party when performing a Data Protection Impact Assessment, it shall promptly inform the other party giving full details of the same, and the other party shall provide such assistance as reasonably required (at each party’s sole cost and expense) and in good faith in order to respond in accordance with any requirements under Data Protection Laws.
8. DATA SECURITY.
8.1. Each party shall implement and maintain such appropriate technical and organizational measures as required by Data Protection Laws to ensure that the Personal Data is processed in a secure manner, including (but not limited to) (i) the pseudonymization and encryption of Personal Data; (ii) ensuring the confidentiality, integrity, availability and resilience of the services provided under the Agreement, including the ability to restore availability of, and access to, Personal Data in a timely manner in the event of a physical or technical incident; (iii) a process for regularly testing, assessing and evaluating the effectiveness of technical and organizational measures for ensuring the security of the processing; and (iv) regularly carrying information security risk assessments that take account of risk of accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure of, or access to, Personal Data.
8.2. An overview of Outbrain’s appropriate technical and organizational security measures are described on
Outbrain’s Security page
.
8.3. Upon becoming aware of a suspected or confirmed Personal Data Breach involving Outbrain User Data collected pursuant to this DSA, each party shall notify the other party without any undue delay, and provide such assistance as reasonably required to allow the other party to comply with its respective obligations under Data Protection Laws.
9. PERSONNEL.
Each party shall be responsible for ensuring that staff members are appropriately trained to handle and process the Personal Data in accordance with their internal technical and organizational security measures, where relevant, together with Data Protection Laws, and have entered into confidentiality agreements relating to the processing of Personal Data.
10. PROCESSORS – SERVICE PROVIDERS.
Each party shall remain independently responsible for appointing its respective Processors and/or Service Providers in accordance with Data Protection Laws.
11. INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS.
11.1. Insofar as Personal Data is collected from End Users located within the territory of the EEA or the UK by either party during the course of the Agreement, neither party shall process any Personal Data (nor permit any Personal Data to be processed) in a country outside of the EEA or the UK unless: (i) that country has been designated by the European Commission or the ICO (as applicable) as providing an adequate level of protection for Personal Data; or (ii) it has taken such measures as necessary to ensure the transfer is compliant with EU Data Protection Laws.
11.2. The parties agree that, to the extent that Section 11.1 is applicable, the Controller SCCs shall be incorporated by reference into this DSA and shall govern any international transfer of Personal Data outside of the EEA and the UK. For the purpose of the Controller SCCs, the parties fully agree that:
(i) Outbrain is the "Data Exporter" and DSP, the "Data Importer";
(ii) Clause 7 “Docking clause” is deleted;
(iii) The OPTION under Clause 11 “Redress” is deleted;
(iv) Clause 17 “Governing Law” is completed with “Republic of Ireland”
(v) Clause 18 (b) “Choice of forum and jurisdiction” is completed with “Dublin, Republic of Ireland”;
(vi) Annex I to the Controller SCCs shall be deemed to have been completed with Annex I to this DSA; and
(vii) Annex II to the Controller SCCs shall be deemed to have been completed Annex II to this DSA.
(viii) Insofar as the transfer is subject to UK GDPR, the UK SCCs Addendum are incorporated by reference into this DSA in addition to the above, and Section 19 of the UK SCCs Addendum is completed with “the Data Exporter”.
11.3. DSP warrants that it has implemented supplementary measures complying with all requirements of EU Data Protection Laws.
12. TERM AND TERMINATION.
This DSA shall commence on the Effective Date and shall continue as long as Outbrain provides the Partner Inventory to DSP.
13. DATA RETENTION.
DSP
shall not retain any individual data point collected in relation to the Agreement for longer than necessary, and in no event for longer than 13 months.
14. MISCELLANEOUS.
14.1. Neither party shall be in breach of this DSA nor liable for delay in performing, or failure to perform, any of its obligations under the Agreement if such delay or failure results from events, circumstances or causes beyond its reasonable control.
14.2. Failure or delay in exercising any right or remedy under this DSA shall not constitute a waiver of such (or any other) right or remedy under this DSA, the Agreement or Data Protection Laws.
14.3. DSP shall not assign or otherwise transfer its rights or its obligations under this Agreement, in whole or in part, without the prior written consent of Outbrain.
14.4. Except as expressly stated otherwise and to the extent applicable under Data Protection Laws, nothing in this DSA shall create or confer any rights or other benefits in favor of any person other than a party to this DSA.
14.5. The invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability of any term of this DSA shall not affect the remainder of the DSA.
14.6. This DSA shall be governed by the laws specified in the applicable Programmatic Access Enrollment Form.
ANNEX I
Description of Processing Activities
This Annex forms part of the DSA and describes the processing of Personal Data by Outbrain. When Section 11.1 of the DSA applies, Annex I to the Controller SCCs shall be deemed to have been completed with this Annex.
A. LIST OF PARTIES
Data Exporter:
Outbrain name, address and contact details as stated in the Programmatic Access Enrollment Form.
Activities relevant to the data transferred: Online advertising exchange allowing the purchase of a Partner Inventory.
Independent Controller.
Data Importer:
DSP with address and contact details as stated in the Programmatic Access Enrollment Form.
Activities relevant to the data transferred: Digital advertising services.
Independent Controller.
B. DESCRIPTION OF TRANSFER
Categories of Data Subjects whose Personal Data is transferred:
End Users (Data Subjects who visit or use the Partner Inventory or interact with DSP’s clients’ advertising materials served by DSP on Partner Inventory).
Categories of Personal Data transferred:
Bid request unique identifier
Outbrain or DSP unique identifier
IP address
User Agent data, browser and device type (desktop/mobile, brand, model, operating system and system version), application version, application ID or package name)
Device advertising identifiers
Pages, content visited and events
Time of visit
Broad location
Device time zone
Sensitive data transferred:
No Special Categories of Personal Data are transferred.
Frequency of the transfer:
Real time,
continuous basis.
Nature of the processing:
Receiving data, including collection, accessing, retrieval, recording, and data entry;
Holding data, including storage, organization and structuring;
Using data, including analyzing, consultation, testing, automated decision making and profiling;
Updating data, including correcting, adaptation, alteration, alignment and combination;
Protecting data, including restricting, encrypting, and security testing;
Sharing data, including disclosure, dissemination, allowing access or otherwise making available;
Returning data to the Data Exporter or Data Subject;
Erasing data, including destruction and deletion.
Purpose(s) of the data transfer and further processing:
Delivering DSP’s clients’ advertising materials to End Users, which may include personalized advertising upon a valid legal basis.
Retention period:
An individual data point shall not be retained for longer than
necessary, and in no event for longer than
13 months.
Recipients:
As list provided by the DSP in the Programmatic Access Enrollment Form.
C. COMPETENT SUPERVISORY AUTHORITY
In the UK: The Information Commissioner’s Office.
In the EEA: The Supervisory Authority of the Member State in which the Data Subjects whose Personal Data is transferred under this Agreement are located.
ANNEX II
Technical and Organizational Measures
As described by the DSP’s Technical and Organizational Measures provided with the Programmatic Access Enrollment Form.
Engage Master Services Agreement
Engage Code on Page Terms
Engage Header Bidding Terms
Engage Video Terms
Supply Side Platform Terms
Engage Data Sharing Agreement
SSP Data Sharing Agreement
Engage Terms
Effective December 17th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Standard Partner Distribution Terms
Effective 1 March 2024
The Engage Terms vary according to the country where your billing address is located. Please use your billing country below to view the applicable Engage Terms.
My billing address is located in:
United States of America
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua & Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bonaire
Bosnia & Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Ter
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Canary Islands
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Channel Islands
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos Island
Colombia
Comoros
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Ter
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Great Britain
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guyana
Haiti
Hawaii
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Korea South
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lesotho
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malaysia
Malawi
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Midway Islands
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Nambia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherland Antilles
Netherlands (Holland, Europe)
Nevis
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau Island
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Island
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Republic of Montenegro
Republic of Serbia
Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
St Barthelemy
St Eustatius
St Helena
St Kitts-Nevis
St Lucia
St Maarten
St Pierre & Miquelon
St Vincent & Grenadines
Saipan
Samoa
Samoa American
San Marino
Sao Tome & Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
South Africa
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Tahiti
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad & Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks & Caicos Is
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City State
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands (Brit)
Virgin Islands (USA)
Wake Island
Wallis & Futana Is
Yemen
Zaire
Zambia
The following Standard Partner Distribution Terms (“Terms”) govern the implementation and use of the products, services, and technology made available by Outbrain to the Partner identified in the Partner Enrollment Form.
1. CERTAIN DEFINITIONS.
1.1 “Ads.txt” means an authorised digital sellers text file. All references to Ads.txt include App-ads.txt.
1.2 "Advertiser Recs" means Recommendations (that are not Recirculation Recs) in the Outbrain network submitted by Outbrain’s advertisers.
1.3 “Application” means a self-contained software program designed to run on a mobile device including a phone or tablet.
1.4 "Content" means graphical, textual, and/or auditory content (which may include text, data, information, photos, images, graphics, audio, video or other content).
1.5 “Cards” means the formats available through the Technology where Recommendations appear.
1.6 "Data" means all data collected or generated by Outbrain through the Technology, including any reports or other data made available to Partner in connection with the Agreement.
1.7 "Destination Page" means any webpage or other online location (which may be located on a Partner Site(s) or another website or Application) that may be accessed by clicking on Recommendations.
1.8 "End Users" means individual human viewers of a web page, Application and/or platform of the Partner Sites on which the Technology is implemented.
1.9 “Intellectual Property Rights” includes any invention, discovery, concept, expression or work, whether or not patented or patentable, registered or not, including, without limitation, discoveries, compositions, know-how, procedures, technical information, processes, methods, formulas, algorithms, protocols, techniques, designs and drawings, trade dresses, any physical embodiment thereof, and any patents, copyrights, trademarks, industrial designs and utility models, (and applications or extensions therefore), domains and trade secrets or similar rights to aforementioned rights recognised in any jurisdiction now or in the future.
1.10 "Partner Sites" means the web properties, Applications or platforms identified in the Partner Enrollment Form, together with any additional properties on which Partner elects to implement the Technology upon prior written approval from Outbrain (e-mail will suffice).
1.11 "Recirculation Recs" means Recommendations (that are not Advertiser Recs) which link to Content on Partner Sites.
1.12 "Recommendations" means the display of Advertiser Recs and/or Recirculation Recs via Cards that Outbrain delivers to the viewer of a web page, Application or platform on which the Technology is implemented.
1.13 "Revenue" means net revenue generated from Advertiser Recs and charged by Outbrain for the display of such Advertiser Recs in the Outbrain network.
1.14 "Technology" means Outbrain’s Javascript, API, SDK and associated protocols that, when implemented on websites and Applications, displays the user interface managed by Outbrain’s proprietary optimization technology for serving, selecting and ordering Cards.
1.15 “Updates” means updates, modifications, or improvements to the Technology from time to time in Outbrain’s sole discretion, including, but not limited to, adding Ads.txt lines and any other similar industry standards.
1.16 "OB Generated Links” means an End User page view on a Partner Site generated from a referral link of OBNews.Outbrain.com (or successor link or an additional link(s) which may be provided by Outbrain from time to time).
2. TECHNOLOGY; PLACEMENT AND APPEARANCE.
2.1 Partner shall implement the Technology (including Outbrain’s provided Ads.txt) pursuant to Outbrain’s technical instructions and any implementation guides made available by Outbrain, as revised from time to time. Outbrain, in its sole discretion, may determine which of Outbrain’s available Technology (e.g., JS, API, SDK or any other equivalent) shall be used in each Partner implementation. Implementations of the Technology must appear directly below the main Content on each page of the Partner Sites on which the Technology is installed or as otherwise mutually agreed in writing (e-mail shall suffice). Implementation must include at least one (1) link to Advertiser Recs per page unless otherwise agreed in writing.
2.2 Partner shall display the Technology throughout the Term in accordance with all self-regulatory codes and applicable laws and regulations, including with respect to disclosing the source or nature of the Recommendations. Without limiting the foregoing obligation, Partner agrees to comply with Outbrain’s reasonable instructions regarding how the Technology is to be displayed, labelled or identified.
2.3 Outbrain may make Updates from time to time. If Outbrain requests Partner to implement any such Updates, Partner shall make such Updates within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt of notice from Outbrain. If Partner can demonstrate such Updates would materially and adversely affect the performance of the Partner Sites, Outbrain may either address Partner’s concerns to its reasonable satisfaction or agree not to require Partner to implement such Updates.
2.4 During the Term, Outbrain shall be Partner's sole and exclusive provider of direct and indirect content recommendations, where “content recommendations” are one or more paid or unpaid links comprised of a headline or phrase indicating that an End User will be driven to Content (regardless of whether the Destination Page displays content, advertorials or advertisements).
2.5 Outbrain may drive End Users to Partner Sites generating additional Partner Site page views via OB Generated Links or Recirculation Recs. If an End User clicks on an Advertiser Rec from an OB Generated Link, Partner shall not be compensated for any advertising revenue generated by such page views. Any display of Recirculation Recs will require Outbrain’s prior written approval (email will suffice), which may be conditioned on a minimum Advertiser Rec implementation or other fees.
2.6 Outbrain may test changes to the Technology, including to Card ordering, format and frequency. To the extent that Partner controls any testing, Partner shall comply with such testing requests on at least a quarterly basis.
3. REVENUE & PAYMENT.
3.1 During the Term, Partner will be paid as set forth on the Partner Enrollment Form. For the avoidance of doubt, Revenue is net of, inter alia, advertiser fees, third-party data services integrated into Outbrain’s platform, invalid clicks/impressions, and advertiser and agency discounts/rebates.
3.2 Partner must promptly provide Outbrain completed and accurate tax forms and all other similar materials Outbrain requires, which may include tax form W-8BEN, W-8BEN-E or W-9 if applicable (collectively all such forms and materials, “Tax Materials”). Notwithstanding anything set forth to the contrary in this Agreement, Outbrain may (a) withhold payments owed to Partner hereunder without penalty or late fee until Outbrain has received Partner’s Tax Materials, and (b) deduct any applicable taxes payable by Outbrain from payments owed to Partner hereunder as required by law. Once Outbrain has received the Tax Materials, Outbrain will use commercially reasonable efforts to pay any amounts not paid to Partner pursuant to the foregoing subsection (a) as soon as reasonably practicable.
3.3 To ensure proper payment, Partner is responsible for notifying Outbrain in writing of accurate contact and payment information. Partner is also responsible for any charges assessed by Partner’s bank or payment provider. If the amount owed to Partner is less than GBP200, then the amount owed will be accrued if and until the calendar month in which the balance of the payments due to Partner exceeds GBP200. Any dispute regarding a payment from Outbrain must be submitted to Outbrain in writing within thirty (30) calendar days of postage or wire transfer date of such payment or it shall be deemed waived. If Outbrain does not receive an invoice from Partner within six (6) months of the date of the Statement issued to Partner, such fees shall be considered waived.
3.4 In addition to Outbrain’s other rights and remedies, Outbrain may (i) withhold and offset any payments owed to Partner under the Agreement (including in case of a material breach) against any fees Partner owes Outbrain under the Agreement or any other agreement), and/or (ii) require Partner to refund Outbrain within thirty (30) calendar days of any invoice, any amounts Outbrain may have overpaid to Partner in prior periods. If an Outbrain advertiser or client whose Advertiser Recs were displayed on any Partner Sites defaults on payment to Outbrain, for any reason, Outbrain may withhold payment or charge back Partner’s account.
4.     PRIVACY.
The provisions of the
Engage Data Sharing Agreement
shall be fully incorporated into, and form part of, this Agreement.
5. LICENSE TERMS.
5.1 During the Term and subject to Partner’s compliance with all of the terms of the Agreement, Outbrain grants Partner a limited, non-exclusive, revocable, non-sublicensable, non- transferable licence to use the Technology to display the Advertiser Recs, and to the extent permitted by Section 2.5 Recirculation Recs, on Partner Sites in the form and format provided.
5.2 Outbrain grants Partner, during the Term, a limited, worldwide, non-exclusive, royalty-free licence to use and display Outbrain’s trademarks, service marks and logos (collectively, “Outbrain Marks”), as incorporated into the Technology, strictly in accordance with Partner’s obligations and rights in the Agreement. All goodwill arising out of Partner’s use of any of the Outbrain Marks shall inure solely to the benefit of Outbrain. Outbrain shall have the right to refer to Partner and the Partner Sites in any general listing of advertisers or partners (including in marketing and sales materials) who have implemented the Technology. Notwithstanding the foregoing, each party will request prior written consent before issuing a press release regarding the Agreement or using the other party’s name on its website other than in accordance with the Agreement.
5.3 As between the parties: (a) Outbrain retains all right, title and interest in and to the Outbrain Marks, Technology and Data (excluding any Content from the Partner Sites which shall be owned by Partner), the Outbrain site at
www.outbrain.com
and the Dashboard; and (b) Partner retains all right, title and interest in and to the Partner Sites including the look and feel excluding the items described in subparagraph (a) above.
5.4 The licences granted under the Agreement are specifically set forth in the Agreement; there are no implied rights. All rights not expressly granted to Partner in the Agreement are reserved by Outbrain.
6. PROHIBITED ACTIVITY.
6.1 Partner will not: (i) edit, modify, truncate, filter, or change the order of Recommendations; (ii) obscure, modify or redirect End Users away from a Destination Page, or intersperse any Content between the Recommendations and any Destination Page; (iii) minimise, remove or otherwise inhibit the full and complete display of the Technology; (iv) artificially inflate clicks or impressions on Recommendations, or encourage or require any person to click on Recommendations using incentives or other methods and/or engage in any automated, deceptive, fraudulent, invalid, incentivised, or other methods that are designed to generate clicks which are not the willing actions of End Users; (v) remove, deface, obscure, or alter any notices of Intellectual Property Rights included in the Technology; (vi) access, reproduce or use the Technology in any manner or for any purpose other than as expressly permitted under the Agreement; (vii) modify, adapt, translate, prepare derivative works from, decompile, reverse engineer, disassemble the Technology or otherwise attempt to derive source code from the Technology, or attempt to create a substitute or similar service or product through use of or access to Technology or related proprietary information or otherwise use the Technology on behalf of or for the benefit of any third party; (viii) attempt to interfere with or disrupt the Technology or attempt to gain access to any systems or networks that connect to it other than through the Technology as implemented pursuant to the Agreement; (ix) copy, cache, distribute, display, alter, or otherwise use any Recommendations (or authorise or assist any third party to do so) except as such Recommendations are provided through the Technology; or (x) use the Technology for any purpose not authorised by Outbrain, including for any purpose that is inconsistent with the implementation guidelines as provided to Partner.
6.2 Partner will not deploy the Technology on any properties that display or contain adult, obscene, pornographic, defamatory, libellous, infringing, abusive, fake or deceptive or illegal Content, that promotes hate or discrimination, facilitates the sale of firearms or illegal drugs, or that participates or encourages participation in, illegal activities or is directed at children under of the age of 16. Outbrain reserves the right in its sole discretion to disable the Technology on any property at any time.
7.     REGISTRATION.
Partner may register for the Outbrain dashboard (the “Dashboard”) to access online reports and control certain settings for the Technology. To the extent that Partner has access to the Dashboard, Outbrain may collect Partner’s (or individuals who act on behalf of Partner) personally identifiable information associated with such Dashboard access. For further information on how we may collect and use our business partner's personally identifiable information, please see our Business Partner Privacy Policy. Partner will be solely responsible for all changes to data made by it, or individuals acting on Partner’s behalf, through the Dashboard. Estimates of Revenue paid or payable Partner displayed in the Dashboard are provided solely for the Partner’s convenience. Outbrain does not guarantee that these estimated amounts displayed, if any, shall be precise or definitively due to be paid to Partner pursuant to the Agreement. Access to Outbrain dashboard shall be solely at the discretion of Outbrain and may be discontinued by Outbrain at any time.
8. SUSPENSION OF TECHNOLOGY; TERMINATION.
8.1 Outbrain may suspend or discontinue all or any aspect of the Technology, including its availability, at any time if required by exigent circumstances (such as a significant security breach, propagation of malware, other viruses to users, etc.) or other improper, unlawful, fraudulent or misleading circumstances.
8.2 Either party may terminate the Agreement at any time in the event of a material breach by the other party of any provision of the Agreement that remains uncured for fourteen (14) days after the breaching party’s receipt of written notice of the breach.
8.3 The Agreement is terminable on fourteen (14) days prior written notice unless otherwise stated on the Partner Enrollment Form. In addition, Outbrain may terminate the Agreement if the Technology is not implemented within thirty (30) days of Outbrain providing the Technology to Partner. Upon expiration or termination of the Agreement, all rights and obligations of the parties under the Agreement will be extinguished, except that Sections 9.6, 9.7, 10, 11 and 13 of the Terms will survive termination, as well as any other terms of this Agreement which, by their nature should survive termination, and continue to bind the parties.
9. LIMITED WARRANTIES; INDEMNITY.
9.1 Each party represents and warrants to the other that: (i) it has all right, power, and authority necessary to enter into the Agreement and perform its obligations under it; and (ii) it will comply with all applicable laws, regulations and orders in its performance of the Agreement.
9.2 Outbrain warrants that the Technology (as provided and made available by Outbrain and implemented by Partner in accordance with the Agreement) does not and will not, to the best of Outbrain's knowledge, infringe any Intellectual Property Right of any third party.
9.3 Partner represents and warrants that the Partner Sites: (i) owns or has the right to operate the Partner Site(s); (ii) will adhere to the
Outbrain Partner Guidelines
and/or to the Partner’s own guidelines which shall be substantially similar to Outbrains’; (iii) do not and will not contain any Content that is illegal or that infringes any Intellectual Property Rights of any third party; (iv) will not contain any obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous material or material that violates any person’s right of publicity, privacy or personality; and (v) do not and will not knowingly contain a misrepresentation of fact or factual inaccuracy.
9.4 Nothing in the Agreement shall be construed as a promise of any sort of minimum traffic volumes, clicks, impressions or usage or any other such commitments by Outbrain to Partner.
9.5 Except as expressly provided in the Agreement, neither party makes any representations or warranties, express or implied in relation to the Agreement, the Partner Sites, the Technology, any Content made available by Outbrain through the Technology or any other matters (including any implied terms relating to satisfactory quality or fitness for any purpose, any warranties of availability or uninterrupted or error free performance, any warranties arising out of any course of performance or dealing).
9.6 Outbrain makes no representations or warranties concerning any Content contained in or accessed via the Technology, including without limitation Advertiser Recs, and Outbrain will not be responsible or liable for the contents, accuracy, intellectual property infringement, legality or decency of Content provided through the Technology or for Partner’s reliance on any of the foregoing.
9.7 Each party (the “Indemnifying Party”) shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless the other party and its parent and affiliates, and each of its and their respective affiliates, directors, officers, shareholders, members, authorised representatives, employees and agents (collectively, the “Indemnified Party”) from and against any and all claims, losses, liabilities, damages, costs, settlements, regulatory findings and/or fines and other expenses (including reasonable legal fees) (collectively, “Claims”) that arise out of any third party claim occasioned by any breach of any of the Indemnifying Party’s representations and warranties in this Agreement. The Indemnified Party shall promptly notify the Indemnifying Party of any Claim in writing, provided, however, that any delay in providing such notice shall not relieve the Indemnifying Party of any of its obligations except to the extent that the Indemnifying Party is prejudiced by such delay. The Indemnified Party shall have the right to participate in the defence and settlement of the Claim with counsel of its own choosing and its own expense, subject to the Indemnifying Party’s control thereof.
10.  CONFIDENTIALITY. Each party (the “Receiving Party”) acknowledges that it will have access to certain information and materials, including the terms of the Agreement, concerning the business, technology, products and services of the other party (the “Disclosing Party”) that are, or reasonably should be considered given the circumstances of disclosure to be, confidential (“Confidential Information”). Confidential Information will not include: (a) information known to the Receiving Party prior to disclosure by the Disclosing Party; (b) information independently developed by the Receiving Party without reference to Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party; (c) information that is or becomes publicly known through no fault of the Receiving Party; or (d) information disclosed to the Receiving Party by a third party without breach of any obligation of confidence. Except as permitted hereunder, the Receiving Party (i) will not use any Confidential Information for its own benefit or the benefit of any third party, and (ii) will not disclose any Confidential Information to any third party other than its directors, employees, contractors, advisors, investors or potential investors who have a need to know and who have agreed not to use, and to maintain the confidentiality of, the Confidential Information consistent with this Section 10. The Receiving Party will return or destroy the Confidential Information promptly upon the Disclosing Party’s written request. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Receiving Party may disclose Confidential Information to the extent required by applicable law or legal process, provided that the Receiving Party provides prompt written notice of any required disclosure to the Disclosing Party and provides reasonable cooperation (at the Disclosing Party’s expense) with any effort by the Disclosing Party to contest or limit the scope of such disclosure.
11. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY.
11.1 Neither Outbrain nor the Partner exclude or limit liability to the other for: (i) death or personal injury caused by its negligence or that of its employees or contractors; (ii) fraud or fraudulent misrepresentation; or (iii) any other liability which cannot lawfully be excluded or limited.
11.2 Subject always to Section 11.1, neither party will be liable for: (a) any special, indirect, incidental or consequential loss or damage; (b) any loss of goodwill or reputation; (c) any loss of Data; (d) any loss of contracts, business or anticipated savings; or (e) any loss of profits arising out of or in connection with the Agreement or any breach hereof, whether or not such party has been advised of the possibility of such loss or damage, howsoever incurred and whether under a theory of contract, tort (including negligence) statutory duty or otherwise.
11.3 Subject always to Section 11.1 and except for liabilities arising out of a party’s violation, misappropriation or infringement of a party’s Intellectual Property Rights, in no event will either party’s aggregate liability arising out of or in connection with the Agreement or any breach (whether under a theory of contract, tort (including negligence), statutory duty, or otherwise) exceed the  greater of: (i) £100,000 GBP; and (ii) the amount of Revenue paid or payable to the Partner in the 12-month period immediately preceding the event giving rise to liability (or, in the case of a series of connected events, the first such event).
11.4 Each party acknowledges to each other that it accepts that the restrictions on the liability of each other party, as set out in the Agreement, are reasonable in all the circumstances.
12.  EXPORT CONTROLS.
Partner will comply with all export laws and restrictions and regulations of the Department of Commerce, the United States Department of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control ("OFAC"), or other United States or foreign agency or authority, and shall not export, or allow the export or re-export of the Technology in violation of any such restrictions, laws or regulations. By downloading or using the Technology, Partner agrees to the foregoing and represent and warrants that it is not located in, under the control of, or a national or resident of any restricted country. Partner represents and warrants that none of it, or any individual, entity, or organisation holding any ownership interest or controlling interest in Partner, including any officer or director, is an individual, entity, organisation with whom any United States law, regulation, or executive order prohibits U.S. companies and individuals from dealing, including, names appearing on the Specially Designated Nationals List.
13.         MISCELLANEOUS.
The Agreement shall be interpreted and construed in accordance with and governed by the laws of England and Wales, without regard to its conflict of law provisions or the United Nations Conventions for the International Sale of Goods. Any action or proceeding arising from or relating to the Agreement must be submitted to the exclusive jurisdiction of English courts. The parties agree that irreparable damage would occur if any of the provisions of the Agreement is not performed in accordance with these specific terms. Accordingly, the parties agree that each shall be entitled to injunctive relief to prevent breaches of the Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions of the Agreement, in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or in equity. The parties are independent contractors, and nothing in the Agreement will be construed to create a partnership, joint venture, agency or other relationship between the parties. No failure or forbearance by a party to enforce any of its rights under the Agreement or insist upon performance of the other party’s obligations under the Agreement will be deemed a waiver of such rights or obligations to any extent, and no waiver by either party of any default or breach of the Agreement will constitute a waiver of any other or subsequent default or breach. Neither party will be liable for any failure to perform due to causes beyond the party's reasonable control. The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties concerning its subject matter and supersedes all prior or contemporaneous agreements or understandings, written or verbal, concerning such subject matter. The parties to this Agreement do not intend that any term of this Agreement should be enforceable, by virtue of the Contracts (Rights of Third Parties) Act 1999 or otherwise, by any person who is not a Party to this Agreement. The Partner Enrollment Form may be amended, modified or superseded, only by a written instrument signed by both parties. The headings in the Agreement are for the convenience of reference only and have no legal effect. Any reference to days in the Agreement shall be deemed business days unless otherwise specified. The Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original, but all of which together will constitute one and the same instrument. If any provision of the Agreement is held to be unenforceable for any reason, such provision shall be reformed only to the extent necessary to make it enforceable, failing which, it shall be severed from the Agreement and the balance of the Agreement shall continue in full force and effect. Neither party may assign the Agreement or any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the other party’s prior written consent, except (i) due to operation of law, merger, reorganisation, or as a result of an acquisition or change of control, and (ii) by Outbrain to its subsidiaries. Subject to the foregoing, the Agreement will be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties and their permitted successors and assigns.
Effective August 6th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Page:
/
Please download the PDF to view this document.
Download
Effective August 6th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Page:
/
Please download the PDF to view this document.
Download
Effective August 12th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Page:
/
Please download the PDF to view this document.
Download
Effective August 6th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Page:
/
Please download the PDF to view this document.
Download
Effective August 6th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Page:
/
Please download the PDF to view this document.
Download
Effective August 6th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Page:
/
Please download the PDF to view this document.
Download
Engage Master Services Agreement
Engage Code on Page Terms
Engage Header Bidding Terms
Engage Video Terms
Supply Side Platform Terms
Engage Data Sharing Agreement
SSP Data Sharing Agreement
Engage Terms
Effective August 20th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
CODE ON PAGE TERMS
The Code on Page Terms (“
COP Terms
”) are incorporated by reference into the applicable SOW. To the extent of any conflict between the SOW and the COP Terms and the MSA Terms, the terms of the SOW, the COP Terms and then the MSA Terms shall prevail, in such order.
1.    DEFINITIONS.
1.1. “
Card(s)
” means the formats available through the Technology where Recommendations appear.
1.2. "
Destination Page
" means any webpage or other online location (which may be located on a Partner Site(s) or another website or application) that may be accessed by clicking on Recommendations.
1.3. “
Revenue
" means net revenue generated from Advertiser Recs and charged by Outbrain for the display of such Advertiser Recs in the Outbrain network.
2.    TECHNOLOGY; PLACEMENT AND APPEARANCE.
2.1. Partner shall implement the Technology (including Outbrain’s Ads.txt) pursuant to Outbrain’s technical instructions and any implementation guides made available by Outbrain, as revised from time to time. Implementations of the Technology must appear directly below the main Content on each page of the Partner Sites on which the Technology is installed or as otherwise mutually agreed in writing between the Parties (e-mail shall suffice). Implementation must include at least one (1) link to Advertiser Recs per page unless otherwise agreed in writing.
2.2. Outbrain may terminate the Agreement if the Technology is not implemented within thirty (30) days of Outbrain providing the Technology to Partner. The SOW is automatically terminated if the Technology is removed from Partner Site(s) for more than thirty (30) days without Outbrain’s prior written approval.
2.3. During the Term, Outbrain shall be Partner's sole and exclusive provider of direct and indirect content recommendations, where “content recommendations” are one or more paid or unpaid links comprised of a headline or phrase indicating that an End User will be driven to Content (regardless of whether the Destination Page displays content, advertorials or advertisements).
2.4. Outbrain may test changes to the Technology, including to Card ordering, format and frequency. To the extent that Partner controls any testing, Partner shall comply with such testing requests on at least a quarterly basis.
3.    REVENUE & PAYMENT.
During the Term, Partner will be paid the percentage of Revenue indicated on the SOW for the applicable placement(s). Outbrain shall make such payments within the number of days indicated on the SOW after the end of any calendar month during which Outbrain collects Revenue. For the avoidance of doubt, Revenue is net of, inter alia, advertiser fees, serving fees, third-party data services integrated into Outbrain’s platform, invalid clicks/impressions, and advertiser and agency discounts/rebates.
Engage Master Services Agreement
Engage Code on Page Terms
Engage Header Bidding Terms
Engage Video Terms
Supply Side Platform Terms
Engage Data Sharing Agreement
SSP Data Sharing Agreement
Engage Terms
Effective October 25th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
SUPPLY SIDE PLATFORM TERMS
The Supply Side Platform Terms (“
SSP Terms
”) govern Outbrain’s participation in an auction to purchase certain digital advertising space or placements on partner sites (the “
SSP Inventory
”) that are made available on a proprietary exchange or marketplace. The SSP Terms are incorporated by reference into the applicable SOW. To the extent of any conflict between the SOW, SSP Terms and the MSA Terms, the terms of the SOW, then the SSP Terms and then the MSA Terms shall apply, in that order.
1.    SSP SERVICES.
1.1.    From the SOW Effective Date for the duration of the SOW Term, Partner will provide the following services to Outbrain (collectively the “
SSP Services
”): (a) Partner will customize and implement an online advertising exchange (the “
Exchange
”) that performs in accordance with the Functional Specifications (as defined below), which Exchange shall allow Outbrain to purchase the SSP Inventory delivered by the Exchange (“Deliverables”) in near real-time by bidding on the impression inventory; and (b) Partner will host the Exchange, either directly or on Partner’s behalf.
1.2.    An auction shall be completed in connection with each bid request as follows: (i) the bid, as applicable, shall compete in near real time with other bids submitted to the Exchange through the Services for the deliverable that forms the subject of the bid request; (ii) In the event that such bid wins the auction, an advertisement shall be delivered (also in near real time) to the applicable website, all in accordance with the winning bid; and (iii) the winning bid will be determined on a reasonable basis that treats all bidder equally (the “
Functional Specifications
”).
1.3. Partner will provide maintenance services for the Exchange and as necessary will provide customization and support services, including reasonable education and support, during normal business hours, to Outbrain. Partner shall provide Outbrain, without any further charge, all updates (comprising general bug fixes and minor enhancements) and upgrades (comprising enhancements and major functionality changes) for the SSP Services or Exchange reflecting improvements made to the underlying technology upon the implementation of such updates and upgrades to the SSP Services or Exchange Maintenance. Partner may occasionally be required to suspend the SSP Services or Exchange to provide maintenance services. Partner shall provide Outbrain with no less than ten (10) business days advanced written notice of any such suspension.
2.    LICENSE GRANT.
Subject to the terms of this Agreement, Partner hereby grants Outbrain a non-exclusive, non-transferable right to access and use the SSP Services. Outbrain agrees that it will not, knowingly: (a) resell, license, lease, time-share, distribute or otherwise transfer to any third party its right to access and use the SSP Services, (b) reverse engineer, decompile or dissemble the SSP Services, (c) modify, copy or create derivative works of SSP Services (or any part thereof), or (d) access or use SSP Services for the purpose of building a competitive product or service or copying its features or user interface or authorize or permit a direct competitor to do so. Partner retains all right, title, and interest in and to the SSP Services and Exchange, including all patent rights, copyrights, trademarks, trade secrets, know-how and any other proprietary rights recognized in any jurisdiction, including registrations, applications, renewals and extensions thereof (the “
Intellectual Property Rights
”), Except as expressly provided herein, nothing in this Agreement will be construed to confer any ownership interest, license, sale, or other rights upon Partner or Outbrain (as applicable) by implication, estoppel or otherwise, as to any Intellectual Property Rights of the other party or any third party.
3.    ACCEPTANCE.
The Exchange shall conform to the OpenRTB Native Standard in effect from time to time and the Functional Specifications. Outbrain will review, test (including in respect of functionality, performance, and usability) and either approve or reject the Exchange. Outbrain will provide the relevant reasons for any rejection, suggesting modifications as appropriate, on an iterative basis, and Partner will correct and re-deliver the Exchange until it is in a form acceptable to Outbrain. In the event that the Exchange does not meet Outbrain’s final reasonable approval, Outbrain may terminate this Agreement upon written notice to Partner.
4.     CONTENT.
4.1.    Partner acknowledges and agrees that it does not have any rights or title to any of the intellectual property rights contained Content provided by Outbrain via the Exchange (“
Outbrain Advertiser Content
”), except for the right to display the Outbrain Advertiser Content on the websites in accordance with this Agreement and Partner agrees that it will not use the advertising materials for any other purpose. Further, Partner may not alter the advertising materials in any way.
4.2. Partner represents and warrants that (a) all Content displayed via the SSP Inventory will adhere to the
Outbrain Partner Guidelines
(as up dated from time to time) and/or to the Partner’s own guidelines which shall be substantially similar to Outbrains’; (b) the SSP Inventory does not and will not contain any Content that is: (i) illegal, (ii) infringes any Intellectual Property Right of any third party, (iii) is obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous material or material that violates any person’s right of publicity, privacy or personality, or (iv) knowingly contains a misrepresentation of fact or factual inaccuracy; (c) each site in the SSP inventory will not violate any applicable laws, regulations and self-regulatory guidelines; and (d) it will properly categorize the inventory type for the site ID of each site in the SSP Inventory in accordance with the
IAB guidelines
as updated from time
5.    REVENUE AND PAYMENT.
Outbrain will pay Partner in accordance with this Agreement and as set forth in the applicable SOW. All payments are in US dollars. Outbrain will pay Partner within sixty (60) business days of receipt of a valid invoice. If there is any disagreement with respect to any discrepancies related to the payment to Partner hereunder of ten percent (10%) or more, Partner shall notify Outbrain in writing and provide reasonable reporting upon request, following which the parties agree to work in good faith to resolve the dispute.
6.    PRIVACY.
The provisions of the
SSP Data Sharing Agreement
shall be fully incorporated into, and form part of, this Agreement. To the extent of conflict between this SSP Data Sharing Agreement and any other Data Sharing Agreement, the SSP Data Sharing Agreement shall prevail in respect of any services provided pursuant to these SSP Terms.
7.    REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES.
7.1.    Partner represents and warrants that: (a) nothing in the SSP Services or Exchange infringes any intellectual property (copyright, author’s rights, trademark, etc.), personal right (right of privacy, right of publicity, defamation, etc.) or other proprietary right of any person nor do the Services or Exchange violate any local, state or federal law of the United States or any applicable international jurisdiction; (b) Partner will use commercially reasonable efforts to provide the SSP Services according to the terms of this Agreement; (c) Partner shall not place ads and it will not allow to place ads from Outbrain by injecting them into third party web pages or apps through browser extensions, injection proxies or other similar mechanisms; and (d) Partner has all necessary rights and permissions to grant licenses in the SSP Services to Outbrain.
Engage Master Services Agreement
Engage Code on Page Terms
Engage Header Bidding Terms
Engage Video Terms
Supply Side Platform Terms
Engage Data Sharing Agreement
SSP Data Sharing Agreement
Engage Terms
Effective August 20th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
HEADER BIDDING TERMS
The Header Bidding Terms (“
HB Terms
”) are incorporated by reference into the applicable SOW. To the extent of any conflict between the SOW, the HB Terms and the Master Terms, the terms of the SOW, then the HB Terms and then the Master shall apply in such order.
1.     DEFINITIONS.
1.1. “
Advertiser(s)
” means advertisers, agencies or other third-party sources of advertising demand.
1.2. “
Bid
” means, with respect to a particular auction, the price of the bid entered in a Unified Auction Service by Outbrain (or Advertiser’s) (always calculated back to a CPM rate).
1.3. “
Bid Request
” means a request from Partner, facilitated by Outbrain, sent to Advertisers to Bid on Partner Inventory.
1.4. “
CPM
” means cost per thousand Impressions.
1.5. “
Impression
” means each unique time an Advertiser Rec is actually displayed on a Partner Site through the Unified Auction Services, as determined by Outbrain.
1.6. "
Partner Inventory
" means the Partner Site(s) stated in the applicable SOW, as may be made available to Outbrain by Partner through a Unified Auction Service.
1.7. “
U
nified Auction
” means any programmatic auction for Partner Inventory that occurs within any Unified Auction Service in which Outbrain participates.
1.8. “
Unified Auction Service
” means a service or integration, which may be operated by a third party, that facilitates a programmatic auction, wherein programmatic supply-side partners and other programmatic buyers’ bid for Partner Inventory on behalf of Advertisers.
2.    FUNCTIONAL SPECIFICATIONS.
2.1. From the SOW Effective Date, Partner will enable Outbrain to and Outbrain shall be entitled to Bid on the Partner Sites in accordance with the Functional Specifications (as defined below).
2.2. A Unified Auction shall be completed in connection with each Bid Request as follows: (i) the Bid, as applicable, shall compete in near real time with other Bids submitted to the Unified Auction through the Unified Auction Services for the deliverable that forms the subject of the Bid Request; and (ii) in the event that such bid wins the auction, an Advertising Rec shall be delivered to the applicable Partner Site, all in accordance with the winning Bid(the “
Functional Specifications
”).
2.3. Partner agrees that during the Term it will submit all the information about the placement type (Placement type ID) according to
OpenRTB Native Standards
in effect from time to time.
3.    FEES and PAYMENT.
3.1. During the Term, Partner will be paid per the terms of the applicable SOW. Partner shall not modify (e.g., increase or decrease) Outbrain’s (or Advertiser’s) Bid amount as part of any Unified Auction or provide advantages to other participating bidders which are not available to Outbrain including but not limited to providing higher floor prices to Outbrain. For example, if Outbrain bids $1.00 for an impression, then $1.00 is the exact bid amount that will be used in the Unified Auction.
3.2. Outbrain shall provide reporting to Partner within thirty (30) business days of the end of the calendar month in which activity within a Unified Auction Service concluded. Partner shall invoice Outbrain on a monthly basis based upon Outbrain’s reporting.
3.3. If the difference between Outbrain’s and Partner’s respective measurement exceeds ten percent (10%) over any applicable calendar month, Partner shall notify Outbrain in writing and provide reasonable reporting to Outbrain as proof of such discrepancy, following which the parties shall work in good faith to resolve such discrepancy.
3.4. This section shall not apply if the Google Open Bidding service is used.
Engage Master Services Agreement
Engage Code on Page Terms
Engage Header Bidding Terms
Engage Video Terms
Supply Side Platform Terms
Engage Data Sharing Agreement
SSP Data Sharing Agreement
Engage Terms
Effective August 20th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
VIDEO TERMS
The Video Terms (“Video Terms”) are incorporated by reference into the applicable SOW. To the extent of any conflict between the SOW and the Video Terms, the terms of the SOW shall prevail with respect to such integration.
1.    DEFINITIONS.
1.1.    “
CPM
” means the fixed price per every 1000 Viewable Video Impressions.
1.2.    “
Video Content
” means any video Content provided by (i) Outbrain, (ii) Outbrain’s Content provider partners, (iii) Outbrain Buyer Partners, or (iv) by Partner.
1.3.    “
OB Video Player
” means any type of integration of video player provided by Outbrain across the pages on Partner Site(s) for the dissemination of Video Content.
1.4.    “
Outbrain Buyer Partners
” means all third parties but not limited to advertisers, agencies, demand side partners, and ad networks that Outbrain brings together to purchase ad space and place Video Advertising on the Partner Sites.
1.5.    “
Video Advertising
” means any Content displayed through the Video Service where video is the main Content (e.g., Pre-Roll, Outstream, etc.)
1.6.    “
Video Impression
” means each unique time Video Content begins to play on the Partner Sites through the Video Services and which Video Content Outbrain decides to serve.
1.7.    “
Video Services
” means (i) any type of integration of video player provided by Outbrain across the pages on Partner Site(s); and / or (ii) the provision or facilitation of Video Advertising by Outbrain across the pages on Partner Site(s), including via Partner’s video player.
1.8.     “
Viewable
” means viewability in accordance with the IAB definition for video viewability, as amended from time to time and as calculated by Outbrain.
2.    VIDEO SERVICES.
The Video Services facilitate the placement of Video Content on the various spaces reserved for Video Advertising within the Partner Sites and the display of Video Advertising on the Partner’s Sites using standard display, rich media and video formats, including without limitation Video Content played before, during or after streaming video content ("In-Stream Formats"), and/or video content delivered into non-video content (“
Outstream Formats
”) using Outbrains’ proprietary formats or such other as Outbrain provides from time to time (“
Outbrain Outstream Formats
”).
3.    INVENTORY REQUIREMENTS.
3.1. Partner agrees that the Video Content provided by Outbrain will be placed on all pages and on all traffic of the Partner Site(s) throughout the applicable SOW Term, unless otherwise agreed in the applicable SOW.
3.2. Partner shall be solely responsible for the development, maintenance and operation of the Partner Site’s, and all Video Content created by Partner.
3.3. Partner shall not implement the Outbrain Video Player or any Video Content provided by Outbrain on any page that auto refreshes (i.e. a pageview is not human-initiated). Any Video Impressions on such pages shall be deemed fraudulent and ineligible for compensation by Outbrain.
3.4. Partner represents and warrants that it has executed the most recent version of its Multiple Customer Management (MCM) Form and that Partner has and shall during the Term, comply with Google’s Publisher Policy (as updated from time to time). Partner shall, on Outbrain's written request, provide Outbrain with the most recent version of its Multiple Customer Management (MCM) Form.
3.5. Outbrain may, or may require the Partner to, remove or suspend the Video Service on any Partner Site(s), due to, including but not limited to, Outbrain’s Advertiser’s performance and/or any brand safety issues. In addition, Outbrain may require, by providing written notice to (email shall suffice), that Partner move traffic from one Partner Site to another Partner Site subject to the Terms of this Agreement, based on the then applicable performance of the relevant sites. The Partner will comply with Outbrain’s request within three (3) days from the date of receiving the notice.
4.    GRANTING OF RIGHTS.
4.1. During the applicable SOW Term, Outbrain grants Partner the right to serve the OB Video Player on the Partner Site(s) and to display the Video Content to End Users, subject to the terms of the Agreement.
4.2. Partner acknowledges and agrees that it does not have any rights or title to any of the intellectual property rights contained in Video Content provided by Outbrain, except for the right to display such Video Content on the websites in accordance with this Agreement and Partner agrees that it will not use or alter Video Content provided by Outbrain for any other purpose.
Effective October 25th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
ENGAGE MASTER SERVICES AGREEMENT
The Engage Terms vary according to the country where your billing address is located. Please use your billing country below to view the applicable Engage Terms.
My billing address is located in:
United States of America
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua & Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bonaire
Bosnia & Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Ter
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Canary Islands
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Channel Islands
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos Island
Colombia
Comoros
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Ter
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Great Britain
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guyana
Haiti
Hawaii
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Korea South
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lesotho
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malaysia
Malawi
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Midway Islands
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Nambia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherland Antilles
Netherlands (Holland, Europe)
Nevis
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau Island
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Island
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Republic of Montenegro
Republic of Serbia
Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
St Barthelemy
St Eustatius
St Helena
St Kitts-Nevis
St Lucia
St Maarten
St Pierre & Miquelon
St Vincent & Grenadines
Saipan
Samoa
Samoa American
San Marino
Sao Tome & Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
South Africa
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Tahiti
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad & Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks & Caicos Is
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City State
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands (Brit)
Virgin Islands (USA)
Wake Island
Wallis & Futana Is
Yemen
Zaire
Zambia
1.    DEFINITIONS.
1.1.    “
Ads.txt
” means an authorized digital seller's text file. All references to Ads.txt include App-ads.txt.
1.2.    "
Advertiser Recs
" means Recommendations (that are not Recirculation Recs) in the Outbrain network submitted by Outbrains advertisers.
1.3.    "
Content
" means graphical, textual, and/or auditory content (which may include text, data, information, photos, images, graphics, audio, video or other content).
1.4.    "
Data
" means all data collected or generated pursuant to an SOW including any reports or other data made available to Partner from time to time in connection with the Agreement.
1.5.    "
End Users
" means individual human viewers of a web page, application and/or platform of the Partner Sites.
1.6.    “
Intellectual Property Rights
” includes any invention, discovery, concept, expression or work, whether or not patented or patentable, registered or not, including, without limitation, discoveries, compositions, know-how, procedures, technical information, processes, methods, formulas, algorithms, protocols, techniques, designs and drawings, trade dresses, any physical embodiment thereof, and any patents, copyrights, trademarks, industrial designs and utility models, (and applications or extensions therefore), domains and trade secrets or similar rights to aforementioned rights recognised in any jurisdiction now or in the future.
1.7.    “
OB Generated Links
” means an End User page view on a Partner Site generated from a referral link of OBNews.Outbrain.com (or successor link or an additional link(s) which may be provided by Outbrain from time to time).
1.8.    "
Partner Sites
" means the web properties, applications or platforms identified in the SOW, together with any additional properties on which Partner elects to implement the Technology upon prior written approval from Outbrain (e-mail will suffice).
1.9.    "
Recirculation Recs
" means Recommendations (that are not Advertiser Recs) which link to Content on Partner Sites.
1.10.    "
Recommendations
" means the display of Advertiser Recs and/or Recirculation Recs that Outbrain delivers to End Users of a web page, application or platform.
1.11.    "
Technolog
y
" means, Outbrain’s Javascript, API, SDK, the Outbrain Video Player (as applicable) and associated protocols provided by Outbrain to Partner.
1.12.    “
Updates
” means updates, modifications, or improvements to the Technology from time to time in Outbrain’s sole discretion, including, but not limited to, adding Ads.txt lines and any other similar industry standards.
2.    TECHNOLOGY; PLACEMENT AND APPEARANCE.
2.1. Partner shall, if required by an applicable SOW, implement the Technology (including Outbrain’s provided Ads.txt) pursuant to Outbrain’s technical instructions and any implementation guides made available by Outbrain, as revised from time to time. Outbrain, in its sole discretion, may determine which of Outbrain’s available Technology (e.g. JS, API, SDK, the Outbrain Video Player or any other equivalent) shall be used in each Partner implementation. Implementation which includes Recommendations must (a) appear directly below the main Content on each page of the Partner Sites; or (b) include at least one (1) link to Advertiser Recs per page unless otherwise agreed in writing.
2.2. Partner shall display the Technology throughout the Term in accordance with all self-regulatory codes and applicable laws and regulations, including with respect to disclosing the source or nature of the Recommendations. Without limiting the foregoing obligation, Partner agrees to comply with Outbrain’s reasonable instructions regarding how the Technology is to be displayed, labelled or identified.
2.3. Outbrain may make Updates from time to time. If Outbrain requests Partner to implement any such Updates, Partner shall make such Updates within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt of notice from Outbrain. If Partner can demonstrate such Updates would materially and adversely affect the performance of the Partner Sites, Outbrain may either address Partner’s concerns to it’s reasonable satisfaction or agree not to require Partner to implement such Updates.
2.4. Where applicable, Outbrain may drive End Users to Partner Sites generating additional Partner Site page views via OB Generated Links or Recirculation Recs. If an End User clicks on an Advertiser Rec from an OB Generated Link, Partner shall not be compensated for any advertising revenue generated by such page views. Any display of Recirculation Recs will require Outbrain’s prior written approval (email will suffice), which may be conditioned on a minimum Advertiser Rec implementation or other fees.
2.5.    Outbrain may test changes to the Technology from time to time. To the extent that Partner controls any testing, Partner shall comply with such testing requests on at least a quarterly basis.
3.    REVENUE & PAYMENT.
3.1. During the Term, Partner and/or Outbrain (as applicable) will be paid in accordance with the payment terms and fees indicated in the applicable SOW.
3.2.    Where payment is being made to Partner pursuant to an applicable SOW, Partner must promptly provide Outbrain completed and accurate tax forms and all other similar materials Outbrain requires, which may include tax form W-8BEN, W-8BEN-E or W-9 if applicable (collectively all such forms and materials, “
Tax Materials
”). Notwithstanding anything set forth to the contrary in this Agreement, Outbrain may (a) withhold payments owed to Partner hereunder without penalty or late fee until Outbrain has received Partner’s Tax Materials, and (b) deduct any applicable taxes payable by Outbrain from payments owed to Partner hereunder as required by law. Once Outbrain has received the Tax Materials, Outbrain will use commercially reasonable efforts to pay any amounts not paid to Partner pursuant to the foregoing subsection (a) as soon as reasonably practicable. If Outbrain does not receive an invoice from Partner within six (6) months of the date of the Statement issued to Partner, such fees shall be considered waived.
3.3. To ensure proper payment to Partner, Partner is responsible for notifying Outbrain in writing of accurate contact and payment information. Partner is also responsible for any charges assessed by Partner’s bank or payment provider. If the amount owed to Partner is less than GBP200, then the amount owed will be accrued if and until the calendar month in which the balance of the payments due to Partner exceeds GBP£200. All payments under this Agreement will be in accordance with Outbrain’s measurements. Any dispute regarding a payment from Outbrain must be submitted to Outbrain in writing within thirty (30) calendar days of postage or wire transfer date of such payment or it shall be deemed waived.
3.4.    In addition to Outbrain’s other rights and remedies, Outbrain may (i) withhold and offset any payments owed to Partner under the Agreement (including in case of a material breach) against any fees Partner owes Outbrain under the Agreement (or any other agreement), or if Partner is in breach of the terms of this Agreement, and/or (ii) require Partner to refund Outbrain within thirty (30) calendar days of any invoice, any amounts Outbrain may have overpaid to Partner in prior periods. If an Outbrain advertiser, client or partner defaults on payment to Outbrain, for any reason, Outbrain may withhold payment or charge back Partner’s account.
4.    PRIVACY.
The provisions of the
Engage Data Sharing Agreement
shall be fully incorporated into, and form part of, this Agreement.
5.    LICENSE TERMS.
5.1. During the Term and subject to Partner’s compliance with all of the terms of the Agreement, Outbrain grants Partner, during the Term, a limited, worldwide, non-exclusive, royalty-free licence to use and display Outbrain’s trademarks, service marks and logos (collectively, “
Outbrain Marks
”), as incorporated into the Technology, strictly in accordance with Partner’s obligations and rights in the Agreement. All goodwill arising out of Partner’s use of any of the Outbrain Marks shall inure solely to the benefit of Outbrain. Outbrain shall have the right to refer to Partner and the Partner Sites in any general listing of advertisers or partners (including in marketing and sales materials) who have implemented the Technology. Notwithstanding the foregoing, each party will request prior written consent before issuing a press release regarding the Agreement or using the other party’s name on its website other than in accordance with the Agreement.
5.2. As between the parties: (a) Outbrain retains all right, title and interest in and to the Outbrain Marks, Technology and Data (excluding any Content from the Partner Sites which shall be owned by Partner), the Outbrain site at
www.outbrain.com
and the Dashboard; and (b) Partner retains all right, title and interest in and to the Partner Sites including the look and feel excluding the items described in subsection (a) above. The licenses granted under the Agreement are specifically set forth in the Agreement; there are no implied rights. All rights not expressly granted to Partner in the Agreement are reserved by Outbrain.
5.3. PROHIBITED ACTIONS. Partner agrees that it will not, either by itself or by authorizing or encouraging others to do so, directly or indirectly: (a) use, post or promote any Recommendations in association with any material or content which is, or which may reasonably be considered illegal, unlawful or infringing under any applicable laws (including, without limitation, content which infringes a third party copyright (i.e. illegal streaming website) or in breach out
Outbrain’s Partner Guidelines
(as amended from time to time) (b) modify, change, edit, amend, truncate, alter, bypass or reorder any aspect of the Technology or Recommendations; (c) take any action that might impede Outbrain’s provision of the Technology or the Recommendations; (d) generate clicks on Recommendations, or generate page views, that Outbrain believes, in its sole discretion, is through any automated, deceptive, fraudulent or other means that is designed to generate clicks or page views that are not the willing actions of human end users who possess an independent, genuine desire to engage with the content that appears on the relevant page(s), including but not limited to, through (i) repeated manual clicks, use of robots or other automated tools or computer generated requests, (ii) participation in pay-per-click programs, (iii) redirection of search requests to pages that do not contain content reasonably relevant to the search query; (e) copy, crawl, index, cache or store any information derived by Outbrain, or contained in or concerning a Recommendation; (f) in any way minimize or obstruct the display of any Recommendations; or (g) commit fraudulent passing off, including but not limited to spoofing the unique identifier of the ad spot which could be a URL or an app name. Section (d) of the previous sentence shall be deemed to have been violated (x) if traffic is not converting above a certain threshold as determined by Outbrain in its sole discretion or if Partner’s Sites result in low post-click performance, or (y) by any page view that Outbrain determines, in its sole discretion, were the result of transfers or referrals of End Users to a Partner Site where the Technology or Recommendations was installed by a third party content distribution service provider and that resulted in a monthly click-through rate that was less than fifty percent (50%) of the click-through rate experienced by the remainder of the page views where the Technology or Recommendations are installed that occurred on the Partner Site(s) during the same month. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, Outbrain shall have the right to terminate this Agreement immediately and remove the Technology and Recommendations with no further obligations to Partner in the event of any violation of this
Section 5.3.
6.    SUSPENSION OF TECHNOLOGY; TERMINATION.
6.1. Outbrain may suspend or discontinue all or any aspect of the Technology, including its availability, at any time if required by exigent circumstances (such as a significant security breach, propagation of malware, other viruses to users, etc.) or other improper, unlawful, fraudulent misleading circumstances, or Partner’s breach of the terms of the Agreement.
6.2. Either party may terminate the Agreement at any time in the event of a material breach by the other party of any provision of the Agreement that remains uncured for fourteen (14) days after the breaching party’s receipt of written notice of the breach.
6.3.    Upon expiration or termination of the Agreement, all rights and obligations of the parties under the Agreement will be extinguished, except any terms of this Agreement which, by their nature, should survive termination, and continue to bind the parties.
7.    LIMITED WARRANTIES; INDEMNITY.
7.1. Each party represents and warrants to the other that: (i) it has all right, power, and authority necessary to enter into the Agreement and perform its obligations under it; and (ii) it will comply with all applicable laws, regulations and orders in its performance of the Agreement.
7.2. Outbrain warrants that the Technology (as provided and made available by Outbrain and implemented by Partner in accordance with the Agreement) does not and will not, to the best of Outbrain's knowledge, infringe any Intellectual Property Right of any third party.
7.3. Partner represents and warrants that (i) it owns or has the right to operate the Partner Site(s); (ii) it will adhere to the
Outbrain’s Partner Guidelines
(as up dated from time to time) and/or to the Partner’s own guidelines which shall be substantially similar to Outbrains’; (iii) the Partner Sites do not and will not contain any Content that is illegal or that infringes any Intellectual Property Rights of any third party; (iv) it has all rights and authority to any Partner Content provided to Outbrain; (v) the Partner Sites will not contain any obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous material or material that violates any person’s right of publicity, privacy or personality; and (vi) the Partner Sites do not and will not knowingly contain a misrepresentation of fact or factual inaccuracy.
7.4. Nothing in the Agreement shall be construed as a promise of any sort of minimum traffic volumes, clicks, impressions or usage or any other such commitments by Outbrain to Partner.
7.5. Except as expressly provided in the Agreement, neither party makes any representations or warranties, express or implied in relation to the Agreement, the Partner Sites, the Technology, any Content made available by Outbrain through the Technology or any other matters (including any implied terms relating to satisfactory quality or fitness for any purpose, any warranties of availability or uninterrupted or error free performance, any warranties arising out of any course of performance or dealing).
7.6. Outbrain makes no representations or warranties concerning any Content contained in or accessed via the Technology, including without limitation Advertiser Recs, and Outbrain will not be responsible or liable for the contents, accuracy, intellectual property infringement, legality or decency of Content provided through the Technology or for Partner’s reliance on any of the foregoing.
7.7.    Each party (the “
Indemnifying Party
”) shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless the other party and its parent and affiliates, and each of its and their respective affiliates, directors, officers, shareholders, members, authorised representatives, employees and agents (collectively, the “
Indemnified Party
”) from and against any and all claims, losses, liabilities, damages, costs, settlements, regulatory findings and/or fines and other expenses (including reasonable legal fees) (collectively, “
Claims
”) that arise out of any third party claim occasioned by any breach of any of the Indemnifying Party’s representations and warranties in this Agreement. The Indemnified Party shall promptly notify the Indemnifying Party of any Claim in writing, provided, however, that any delay in providing such notice shall not relieve the Indemnifying Party of any of its obligations except to the extent that the Indemnifying Party is prejudiced by such delay. The Indemnified Party shall have the right to participate in the defence with a counsel of its own choosing and Indemnified Party shall not settlement the Claim without the priori written consent of the Indemnifying Partner.
8.    CONFIDENTIALITY.
Each party (the “
Receiving Party
”) acknowledges that it will have access to certain information and materials, including the terms of the Agreement, concerning the business, technology, products and services of the other party (the “
Disclosing Party
”) that are, or reasonably should be considered given the circumstances of disclosure to be, confidential (“
Confidential Information
”). Confidential Information will not include: (a) information known to the Receiving Party prior to disclosure by the Disclosing Party; (b) information independently developed by the Receiving Party without reference to Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party; (c) information that is or becomes publicly known through no fault of the Receiving Party; or (d) information disclosed to the Receiving Party by a third party without breach of any obligation of confidence. Except as permitted hereunder, the Receiving Party (i) will not use any Confidential Information for its own benefit or the benefit of any third party, and (ii) will not disclose any Confidential Information to any third party other than its directors, employees, contractors, advisors, investors or potential investors who have a need to know and who have agreed not to use, and to maintain the confidentiality of, the Confidential Information consistent with this Section 8. The Receiving Party will return or destroy the Confidential Information promptly upon the Disclosing Party’s written request. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Receiving Party may disclose Confidential Information to the extent required by applicable law or legal process, provided that the Receiving Party provides prompt written notice of any required disclosure to the Disclosing Party and provides reasonable cooperation (at the Disclosing Party’s expense) with any effort by the Disclosing Party to contest or limit the scope of such disclosure.
9.    LIMITATION OF LIABILITY.
9.1. Neither Outbrain nor the Partner exclude or limit liability to the other for: (i) death or personal injury caused by its negligence or that of its employees or contractors; (ii) fraud or fraudulent misrepresentation; or (iii) any other liability which cannot lawfully be excluded or limited.
9.2. Subject always to Section 9.1, neither party will be liable for: (a) any special, indirect, incidental or consequential loss or damage; (b) any loss of goodwill or reputation; (c) any loss of Data; (d) any loss of contracts, business or anticipated savings; or (e) any loss of profits arising out of or in connection with the Agreement or any breach hereof, whether or not such party has been advised of the possibility of such loss or damage, howsoever incurred and whether under a theory of contract, tort (including negligence) statutory duty or otherwise.
9.3. Subject always to Section 9.1 and except for liabilities arising out of a party’s violation, misappropriation or infringement of a party’s Intellectual Property Rights, in no event will either party’s aggregate liability arising out of or in connection with the Agreement or any breach (whether under a theory of contract, tort (including negligence), statutory duty, or otherwise) exceed the greater of: (i) £100,000 GBP; and (ii) the amount of Revenue/Fees paid or payable pursuant SOW pursuant to which the claim arose, in the 12-month period immediately preceding the event giving rise to liability (or, in the case of a series of connected events, the first such event).
9.4.    Each party acknowledges to each other that it accepts that the restrictions on the liability of each other party, as set out in the Agreement, are reasonable in all the circumstances.
10.    EXPORT CONTROLS.
Partner will comply with all export laws and restrictions and regulations of the Department of Commerce, the United States Department of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control ("OFAC"), or other United States or foreign agency or authority, and shall not export, or allow the export or re-export of the Technology in violation of any such restrictions, laws or regulations. By downloading or using the Technology, Partner agrees to the foregoing and represent and warrants that it is not located in, under the control of, or a national or resident of any restricted country. Partner represents and warrants that none of it, or any individual, entity, or organisation holding any ownership interest or controlling interest in Partner, including any officer or director, is an individual, entity, organisation with whom any United States law, regulation, or executive order prohibits U.S. companies and individuals from dealing, including, names appearing on the Specially Designated Nationals List.
11.    MISCELLANEOUS.
The Agreement shall be interpreted and construed in accordance with and governed by the laws of England and Wales without regard to its conflict of law provisions or the United Nations Conventions for the International Sale of Goods. Any action or proceeding arising from or relating to the Agreement must be submitted to the exclusive jurisdiction of English courts. The parties agree that irreparable damage would occur if any of the provisions of the Agreement is not performed in accordance with these specific terms. Accordingly, the parties agree that each shall be entitled to injunctive relief to prevent breaches of the Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions of the Agreement, in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or in equity. The parties are independent contractors, and nothing in the Agreement will be construed to create a partnership, joint venture, agency or other relationship between the parties. No failure or forbearance by a party to enforce any of its rights under the Agreement or insist upon performance of the other party’s obligations under the Agreement will be deemed a waiver of such rights or obligations to any extent, and no waiver by either party of any default or breach of the Agreement will constitute a waiver of any other or subsequent default or breach. Neither party will be liable for any failure to perform due to causes beyond the party's reasonable control. The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties concerning its subject matter and supersedes all prior or contemporaneous agreements or understandings, written or verbal, concerning such subject matter. The parties to this Agreement do not intend that any term of this Agreement should be enforceable, by virtue of the Contracts (Rights of Third Parties) Act 1999 or otherwise, by any person who is not a Party to this Agreement. The Partner Enrollment Form may be amended, modified or superseded, only by a written instrument signed by both parties. The headings in the Agreement are for the convenience of reference only and have no legal effect. Any reference to days in the Agreement shall be deemed business days unless otherwise specified. The Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original, but all of which together will constitute one and the same instrument. If any provision of the Agreement is held to be unenforceable for any reason, such provision shall be reformed only to the extent necessary to make it enforceable, failing which, it shall be severed from the Agreement and the balance of the Agreement shall continue in full force and effect. Neither party may assign the Agreement or any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the other party’s prior written consent, except (i) due to operation of law, merger, reorganisation, or as a result of an acquisition or change of control, and (ii) by Outbrain to its subsidiaries. Subject to the foregoing, the Agreement will be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties and their permitted successors and assigns.
Engage Master Services Agreement
Engage Code on Page Terms
Engage Header Bidding Terms
Engage Video Terms
Supply Side Platform Terms
Engage Data Sharing Agreement
SSP Data Sharing Agreement
Engage Terms
Effective October 25th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
ENGAGE MASTER SERVICES AGREEMENT
The Engage Terms vary according to the country where your billing address is located. Please use your billing country below to view the applicable Engage Terms.
My billing address is located in:
United States of America
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua & Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bonaire
Bosnia & Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Ter
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Canary Islands
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Channel Islands
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos Island
Colombia
Comoros
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Ter
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Great Britain
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guyana
Haiti
Hawaii
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Korea South
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lesotho
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malaysia
Malawi
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Midway Islands
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Nambia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherland Antilles
Netherlands (Holland, Europe)
Nevis
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau Island
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Island
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Republic of Montenegro
Republic of Serbia
Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
St Barthelemy
St Eustatius
St Helena
St Kitts-Nevis
St Lucia
St Maarten
St Pierre & Miquelon
St Vincent & Grenadines
Saipan
Samoa
Samoa American
San Marino
Sao Tome & Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
South Africa
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Tahiti
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad & Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks & Caicos Is
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City State
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands (Brit)
Virgin Islands (USA)
Wake Island
Wallis & Futana Is
Yemen
Zaire
Zambia
1.    DEFINITIONS.
1.1.    “
Ads.txt
” means an authorized digital seller's text file. All references to Ads.txt include App-ads.txt.
1.2.    "
Advertiser Recs
" means Recommendations (that are not Recirculation Recs) in the Outbrain network submitted by Outbrains advertisers.
1.3.    "
Content
" means graphical, textual, and/or auditory content (which may include text, data, information, photos, images, graphics, audio, video or other content).
1.4.    "
Data"
means all data collected or generated pursuant to an SOW including any reports or other data made available to Partner from time to time in connection with the Agreement.
1.5.    "
End Users
" means individual human viewers of a web page, application and/or platform of the Partner Sites.
1.6.    “
Intellectual Property Rights
” includes any invention, discovery, concept, expression or work, whether or not patented or patentable, registered or not, including, without limitation, discoveries, compositions, know-how, procedures, technical information, processes, methods, formulas, algorithms, protocols, techniques, designs and drawings, trade dresses, any physical embodiment thereof, and any patents, copyrights, trademarks, industrial designs and utility models, (and applications or extensions therefore), domains and trade secrets or similar rights to aforementioned rights recognized in any jurisdiction now or in the future.
1.7.    “
OB Generated Links
” means an End User page view on a Partner Site generated from a referral link of OBNews.Outbrain.com (or successor link or an additional link(s) which may be provided by Outbrain from time to time).
1.8.    "
Partner Sites
" means the web properties, applications or platforms identified in the SOW, together with any additional properties on which Partner elects to implement the Technology upon prior written approval from Outbrain (e-mail will suffice).
1.9.    "
Recirculation Recs
" means Recommendations (that are not Advertiser Recs) which link to Content on Partner Sites.
1.10.    "
Recommendations
" means the display of Advertiser Recs and/or Recirculation Recs that Outbrain delivers to End Users of a web page, application or platform.
1.11.    "
Technology
" means, Outbrain’s Javascript, API, SDK, the Outbrain Video Player (as applicable) and associated protocols provided by Outbrain to Partner.
1.12.    “
Updates
” means updates, modifications, or improvements to the Technology from time to time in Outbrain’s sole discretion, including, but not limited to, adding Ads.txt lines and any other similar industry standards.
2.    TECHNOLOGY; PLACEMENT AND APPEARANCE.
2.1. Partner shall, if required by an applicable SOW, implement the Technology (including Outbrain’s provided Ads.txt) pursuant to Outbrain’s technical instructions and any implementation guides made available by Outbrain, as revised from time to time. Outbrain, in its sole discretion, may determine which of Outbrain’s available Technology (e.g. JS, API, SDK, the Outbrain Video Player or any other equivalent) shall be used in each Partner implementation. Implementation which includes Recommendations must: (a) appear directly below the main Content on each page of the Partner Sites; or (b) include at least one (1) link to Advertiser Recs per page unless otherwise agreed in writing.
2.2. Partner shall display the Technology throughout the Term in accordance with all self-regulatory codes and applicable laws and regulations, including with respect to disclosing the source or nature of the Recommendations. Without limiting the foregoing obligation, Partner agrees to comply with Outbrain’s reasonable instructions regarding how the Technology is to be displayed, labelled or identified.
2.3. Outbrain may make Updates from time to time. If Outbrain requests Partner to implement any such Updates, Partner shall make such Updates within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt of notice from Outbrain. If Partner can demonstrate such Updates would materially and adversely affect the performance of the Partner Sites, Outbrain may either address Partner’s concerns to its reasonable satisfaction or agree not to require Partner to implement such Updates.
2.4. Where applicable, Outbrain may drive End Users to Partner Sites generating additional Partner Site page views via OB Generated Links or Recirculation Recs. If an End User clicks on an Advertiser Rec from an OB Generated Link, Partner shall not be compensated for any advertising revenue generated by such page views. Any display of Recirculation Recs will require Outbrain’s prior written approval (email will suffice), which may be conditioned on a minimum Advertiser Rec implementation or other fees.
2.5.    Outbrain may test changes to the Technology from time to time. To the extent that Partner controls any testing, Partner shall comply with such testing requests on at least a quarterly basis.
3.    REVENUE & PAYMENT.
3.1. During the Term, Partner and/or Outbrain (as applicable) will be paid in accordance with the payment terms and fees indicated in the applicable SOW.
3.2.    Where payment is being made to Partner pursuant to an applicable SOW, Partner must promptly provide Outbrain completed and accurate tax forms and all other similar materials Outbrain requires, which may include tax form W-8BEN, W-8BEN-E or W-9 if applicable (collectively all such forms and materials, “
Tax Materials
”). Notwithstanding anything set forth to the contrary in this Agreement, Outbrain may (a) withhold payments owed to Partner hereunder without penalty or late fee until Outbrain has received Partner’s Tax Materials; and (b) deduct any applicable taxes payable by Outbrain from payments owed to Partner hereunder as required by law. Once Outbrain has received the Tax Materials, Outbrain will use commercially reasonable efforts to pay any amounts not paid to Partner pursuant to the foregoing subsection (a) as soon as reasonably practicable.
3.3. To ensure proper payment to Partner, Partner is responsible for notifying Outbrain in writing of accurate contact and payment information. Partner is also responsible for any charges assessed by Partner’s bank or payment provider. If the amount owed to Partner is less than US$50, then the amount owed will be accrued if and until the calendar month in which the balance of the payments due to Partner exceeds US$50. All payments under this Agreement will be in accordance with Outbrain’s measurements. Any dispute regarding a payment from Outbrain must be submitted to Outbrain in writing within thirty (30) calendar days of postage or wire transfer date of such payment or it shall be deemed waived.
3.4.    In addition to Outbrain’s other rights and remedies, Outbrain may (i) withhold and offset any payments owed to Partner under the Agreement (including in case of a material breach) against any fees Partner owes Outbrain under the Agreement or any other agreement) or if Partner is in breach of the terms of this Agreement, and/or (ii) require Partner to refund Outbrain within thirty (30) calendar days of any invoice, any amounts Outbrain may have overpaid to Partner in prior periods. If an Outbrain advertiser, client or partner defaults on payment to Outbrain, for any reason, Outbrain may withhold payment or charge back Partner’s account.
4.    PRIVACY.
The provisions of the
Engage Data Sharing Agreement
shall be fully incorporated into, and form part of, this Agreement.
5.    LICENSE TERMS.
5.1. During the Term and subject to Partner’s compliance with all of the terms of the Agreement, Outbrain grants Partner, during the Term, a limited, worldwide, non-exclusive, royalty-free licence to use and display Outbrain’s trademarks, service marks and logos (collectively, “Outbrain Marks”), as incorporated into the Technology, strictly in accordance with Partner’s obligations and rights in the Agreement. All goodwill arising out of Partner’s use of any of the Outbrain Marks shall inure solely to the benefit of Outbrain. Outbrain shall have the right to refer to Partner and the Partner Sites in any general listing of advertisers or partners (including in marketing and sales materials) who have implemented the Technology. Notwithstanding the foregoing, each party will request prior written consent before issuing a press release regarding the Agreement or using the other party’s name on its website other than in accordance with the Agreement.
5.2. As between the parties: (a) Outbrain retains all right, title and interest in and to the Outbrain Marks, Technology and Data (excluding any Content from the Partner Sites which shall be owned by Partner), the Outbrain site at
www.outbrain.com
and the Dashboard; and (b) Partner retains all right, title and interest in and to the Partner Sites including the look and feel excluding the items described in subsection (a) above. The licenses granted under the Agreement are specifically set forth in the Agreement; there are no implied rights. All rights not expressly granted to Partner in the Agreement are reserved by Outbrain.
5.3.    PROHIBITED ACTIONS. Partner agrees that it will not, either by itself or by authorizing or encouraging others to do so, directly or indirectly: (a) use, post or promote any Recommendations in association with any material or content which is, or which may reasonably be considered illegal, unlawful or infringing under any applicable laws (including, without limitation, content which infringes a third party copyright (i.e. illegal streaming website) or in breach out
Outbrain’s Partner Guidelines
(as amended from time to time) (b) modify, change, edit, amend, truncate, alter, bypass or reorder any aspect of the Technology or  Recommendations; (c) take any action that might impede Outbrain’s provision of the Technology or the Recommendations; (d) generate clicks on Recommendations, or generate page views, that Outbrain believes, in its sole discretion, is through any automated, deceptive, fraudulent or other means that is designed to generate clicks or page views that are not the willing actions of human end users who possess an independent, genuine desire to engage with the content that appears on the relevant page(s), including but not limited to, through (i) repeated manual clicks, use of robots or other automated tools or computer generated requests, (ii) participation in pay-per-click programs, (iii) redirection of search requests to pages that do not contain content reasonably relevant to the search query; (e) copy, crawl, index, cache or store any information derived by Outbrain, or contained in or concerning a Recommendation; (f) in any way minimize or obstruct the display of any Recommendations; or (g) commit fraudulent passing off, including but not limited to spoofing the unique identifier of the ad spot which could be a URL or an app name. Section (d) of the previous sentence shall be deemed to have been violated (x) if traffic is not converting above a certain threshold as determined by Outbrain in its sole discretion or if Partner’s Sites result in low post-click performance, or (y) by any page view that Outbrain determines, in its sole discretion, were the result of transfers or referrals of End Users to a Partner Site where the Technology or Recommendations was installed by a third party content distribution service provider and that resulted in a monthly click-through rate that was less than fifty percent (50%) of the click-through rate experienced by the remainder of the page views where the Technology or Recommendations are installed that occurred on the Partner Site(s) during the same month. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, Outbrain shall have the right to terminate this Agreement immediately and remove the Technology and Recommendations with no further obligations to Partner in the event of any violation of this
Section 5.3.
6.    SUSPENSION OF TECHNOLOGY; TERMINATION.
6.1. Outbrain may suspend or discontinue all or any aspect of the Technology, including its availability, at any time if required by exigent circumstances (such as a significant security breach, propagation of malware, other viruses to users, etc.) or other improper, unlawful, fraudulent misleading circumstances, or Partner’s breach of the terms of the Agreement.
6.2. Either party may terminate the Agreement at any time in the event of a material breach by the other party of any provision of the Agreement that remains uncured for fourteen (14) days after the breaching party’s receipt of written notice of the breach.
6.3.    Upon expiration or termination of the Agreement, all rights and obligations of the parties under the Agreement will be extinguished, except any terms of this Agreement which, by their nature, should survive termination, and continue to bind the parties.
7.    LIMITED WARRANTIES; INDEMNITY.
7.1. Each party represents and warrants to the other that: (i) it has all right, power, and authority necessary to enter into the Agreement and perform its obligations under it; and (ii) it will comply with all applicable laws, regulations and orders in its performance of the Agreement.
7.2. Outbrain warrants that the Technology (as provided and made available by Outbrain and implemented by Partner in accordance with the Agreement) does not and will not, to the best of Outbrain's knowledge, infringe any Intellectual Property Right of any third party.
7.3. Partner represents and warrants that (i) it owns or has the right to operate the Partner Site(s); (ii) it will adhere to the
Outbrain’s Partner Guidelines
(as up dated from time to time) and/or to the Partner’s own guidelines which shall be substantially similar to Outbrains’; (iii) the Partner Sites do not and will not contain any Content that is illegal or that infringes any Intellectual Property Rights of any third party; (iv) it has all rights and authority to any Partner Content provided to Outbrain; (v) the Partner Sites will not contain any obscene, defamatory, libelous, slanderous material or material that violates any person’s right of publicity, privacy or personality; and (vi) the Partner Sites do not and will not knowingly contain a misrepresentation of fact or factual inaccuracy.
7.4. Nothing in the Agreement shall be construed as a promise of any sort of minimum traffic volumes, clicks, impressions or usage or any other such commitments by Outbrain to Partner.
7.5. Except as expressly provided in the Agreement, neither party makes any representations or warranties, express or implied in relation to the Agreement, the Partner Sites, the Technology, any Content made available by Outbrain through the Technology or any other matters (including any implied terms relating to satisfactory quality or fitness for any purpose, any warranties of availability or uninterrupted or error free performance, any warranties arising out of any course of performance or dealing).
7.6. Outbrain makes no representations or warranties concerning any Content contained in or accessed via the Technology, including without limitation Advertiser Recs, and Outbrain will not be responsible or liable for the contents, accuracy, intellectual property infringement, legality or decency of Content provided through the Technology or for Partner’s reliance on any of the foregoing.
7.7. Each party (the “
Indemnifying Party
”) shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless the other party and its parent and affiliates, and each of its and their respective affiliates, directors, officers, shareholders, members, authorized representatives, employees and agents (collectively, the “
Indemnified Party
”) from and against any and all claims, losses, liabilities, damages, costs, settlements, regulatory findings and/or fines and other expenses (including reasonable legal fees) (collectively, “
Claims
”) that arise out of any third party claim occasioned by any breach of any of the Indemnifying Party’s representations and warranties in this Agreement. The Indemnified Party shall promptly notify the Indemnifying Party of any Claim in writing, provided, however, that any delay in providing such notice shall not relieve the Indemnifying Party of any of its obligations except to the extent that the Indemnifying Party is prejudiced by such delay. The Indemnified Party shall have the right to participate in the defense with a counsel of its own choosing and Indemnified Party shall not settlement the Claim without the priori written consent of the Indemnifying Partner.
8.    CONFIDENTIALITY.
Each party (the “
Receiving Party
”) acknowledges that it will have access to certain information and materials, including the terms of the Agreement, concerning the business, technology, products and services of the other party (the “
Disclosing Party
”) that are, or reasonably should be considered given the circumstances of disclosure to be, confidential (“
Confidential Information
”). Confidential Information will not include: (a) information known to the Receiving Party prior to disclosure by the Disclosing Party; (b) information independently developed by the Receiving Party without reference to Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party; (c) information that is or becomes publicly known through no fault of the Receiving Party; or (d) information disclosed to the Receiving Party by a third party without breach of any obligation of confidence. Except as permitted hereunder, the Receiving Party (i) will not use any Confidential Information for its own benefit or the benefit of any third party, and (ii) will not disclose any Confidential Information to any third party other than its directors, employees, contractors, advisors, investors or potential investors who have a need to know and who have agreed not to use, and to maintain the confidentiality of, the Confidential Information consistent with this Section 8. The Receiving Party will return or destroy the Confidential Information promptly upon the Disclosing Party’s written request. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Receiving Party may disclose Confidential Information to the extent required by applicable law or legal process, provided that the Receiving Party provides prompt written notice of any required disclosure to the Disclosing Party and provides reasonable cooperation (at the Disclosing Party’s expense) with any effort by the Disclosing Party to contest or limit the scope of such disclosure.
9.    LIMITATION OF LIABILITY.
9.1. Neither Outbrain nor the Partner exclude or limit liability to the other for: (i) death or personal injury caused by its negligence or that of its employees or contractors; (ii) fraud or fraudulent misrepresentation; or (iii) any other liability which cannot lawfully be excluded or limited.
9.2. SUBJECT ALWAYS TO
SECTION 10.1
, NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE FOR ANY SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE AGREEMENT OR ANY BREACH HEREOF (INCLUDING FOR LOSS OF DATA OR COST OF COVER), WHETHER OR NOT SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES, AND WHETHER UNDER A THEORY OF CONTRACT, TORT (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE) OR OTHERWISE.
9.3.    SUBJECT ALWAYS TO SECTION 10.1 AND EXCEPT FOR LIABILITIES ARISING OUT OF A PARTY’S VIOLATION, MISAPPROPRIATION OR INFRINGEMENT OF A PARTY’S INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS, IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S AGGREGATE LIABILITY ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE AGREEMENT OR ANY BREACH HEREOF (WHETHER UNDER A THEORY OF CONTRACT, TORT (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE), WARRANTY OR OTHERWISE) EXCEED THE GREATER OF ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS ($100,000) OR THE AMOUNT OF REVENUE PAID OR PAYABLE PERSUANT TO THE APPLICABLE AND IN-EFFECT SOW, IN THE 12-MONTH PERIOD IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO LIABILITY (OR, IN THE CASE OF A SERIES OF CONNECTED EVENTS, THE FIRST SUCH EVENT).
10.    EXPORT CONTROLS.
Partner will comply with all export laws and restrictions and regulations of the Department of Commerce, the United States Department of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control ("
OFAC
"), or other United States or foreign agency or authority, and shall not export, or allow the export or re-export of the Technology in violation of any such restrictions, laws or regulations. By downloading or using the Technology, Partner agrees to the foregoing and represent and warrants that it is not located in, under the control of, or a national or resident of any restricted country. Partner represents and warrants that none of it, or any individual, entity, or organization holding any ownership interest or controlling interest in Partner, including any officer or director, is an individual, entity, organization with whom any United States law, regulation, or executive order prohibits U.S. companies and individuals from dealing, including, names appearing on the Specially Designated Nationals List.
11.    MISCELLANEOUS.
The Agreement shall be interpreted and construed in accordance with and governed by the laws of the State of New York, without regard to its conflict of law provisions or the United Nations Conventions for the International Sale of Goods. Any action or proceeding arising from or relating to the Agreement must be brought in a federal court in the Southern District of New York or in state court in New York County, New York, and each party irrevocably submits to the jurisdiction and venue of any such court in any such action or proceeding. The parties agree that irreparable damage would occur if any of the provisions of the Agreement is not performed in accordance with these specific terms. Accordingly, the parties agree that each shall be entitled to injunctive relief to prevent breaches of the Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions of the Agreement, in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or in equity. The parties are independent contractors, and nothing in the Agreement will be construed to create a partnership, joint venture, agency or other relationship between the parties. No failure or forbearance by a party to enforce any of its rights under the Agreement or insist upon performance of the other party’s obligations under the Agreement will be deemed a waiver of such rights or obligations to any extent, and no waiver by either party of any default or breach of the Agreement will constitute a waiver of any other or subsequent default or breach. Neither party will be liable for any failure to perform due to causes beyond the party's reasonable control. The Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties concerning its subject matter and supersedes all prior or contemporaneous agreements or understandings, written or verbal, concerning such subject matter. The Partner Enrollment Form may be amended, modified or superseded, only by a written instrument signed by both parties. The headings in the Agreement are for the convenience of reference only and have no legal effect. Any reference to days in the Agreement shall be deemed business days unless otherwise specified. The Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which will be deemed an original, but all of which together will constitute one and the same instrument. If any provision of the Agreement is held to be unenforceable for any reason, such provision shall be reformed only to the extent necessary to make it enforceable, failing which, it shall be severed from the Agreement and the balance of the Agreement shall continue in full force and effect. Neither party may assign the Agreement or any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the other party’s prior written consent, except (i) due to operation of law, merger, reorganization, or as a result of an acquisition or change of control, and (ii) by Outbrain to its subsidiaries. Subject to the foregoing, the Agreement will be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties and their permitted successors and assigns.
Code on Page
MSA Terms
HB Terms
Video Terms
SSP Terms
Effective September 27th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Page:
/
Please download the PDF to view this document.
Download
Code on Page
MSA Terms
HB Terms
Video Terms
SSP Terms
Effective September 27th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Page:
/
Please download the PDF to view this document.
Download
Code on Page
MSA Terms
HB Terms
Video Terms
SSP Terms
Effective September 27th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Page:
/
Please download the PDF to view this document.
Download
Code on Page
MSA Terms
HB Terms
Video Terms
SSP Terms
Effective September 27th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Page:
/
Please download the PDF to view this document.
Download
Code on Page
MSA Terms
HB Terms
Video Terms
SSP Terms
Effective September 27th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Page:
/
Please download the PDF to view this document.
Download
Your preferences about cookies
This website uses cookies, some of which are strictly necessary for this website to operate correctly, some of which are designed to improve your experience or give us aggregated analytics about our visitors (functional and performance cookies) and some of which are for advertising, marketing and targeting purposes. You are able to make your choice below by accepting all cookies or disabling all cookies (except for strictly necessary cookies). To review your options, please click on “Cookies Settings''. For more information about how Outbrain processes your personal data and uses cookies, or to review your choices later, please refer to
Outbrain’s Privacy Policy.
Reject All
Accept Cookies
Cookies Settings
Sub-policy 16
https://www.taboola.com/privacy-policy#optout:
Please note: This website includes an accessibility system. Press Control-F11 to adjust the website to the visually impaired who are using a screen reader; Press Control-F10 to open an accessibility menu.
Popup heading
Close
Accessibility
Press enter for Accessibility for blind people
who use screen readers
Press enter for Keyboard Navigation
Press enter for Accessibility menu
Customers
Information We Collect from Customers (“Customer Information”)
Why We Use Customer Information
To Whom We Disclose Customer Information
Customer Choices
Users
Information We Collect from Users (“User Information”)
Why We Use User Information
To Whom We Disclose User Information
User Choices
Interest-Based Advertising
Opt Out
Data Retention
Children
Site Visitors
Information We Collect from Site Visitors
Why We Use Site Visitor Information
To Whom We Disclose Site Visitor Information
Third-Party Online Advertising
Site Visitor Choices
General Provisions Applicable to Customers, Users, and Site Visitors
Why We Use Your Information
Disclosing Your Information
Cookies and Other Tracking Mechanisms
Third-Party Links
Security
International Data Transfers
Regional Privacy Rights
Notice to Individuals within the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or United Kingdom ("UK")
Notice to Individuals in the State of California
Notice to Individuals in Applicable U.S. States
Notice to Individuals in Thailand
Notice to Individuals in Brazil
Notice to Individuals within the People’s Republic of China (“PRC”)
Data Broker Requirements
Contact Us
Changes to This Privacy Policy
Taboola’s Opt-Out Options
Personal Data in Europe and UK
TABOOLA PRIVACY POLICY
Last Update:
November 6th, 2024
For Taboola’s opt-out status options, please
click here
.
For Taboola’s region-specific notices, please visit the applicable notice for individuals in
Brazil
,
California
and
additional U.S. states
,
Europe
(including the United Kingdom),
China
, or
Thailand
.
Privacy Self-Regulation:
Taboola is dedicated to providing Internet users the highest level of transparency and control over the use of their data in online advertising. In support of this, we adhere to the:
Self-Regulatory Principles set forth by the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA), the Digital Advertising Alliance Canada (DAAC), and the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA);
Interactive Advertising Bureau’s (IAB) Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising (OBA) and the IAB Europe OBA Framework. Taboola participates in the IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework and complies with its Specifications and Policies as vendor number 42; and the
Network Advertising Initiative (NAI) Code of Conduct
for Web and Mobile. Taboola is a proud member of the NAI, an association dedicated to responsible data collection use in digital advertising.
Taboola also maintains an externally-facing
Trust Center
, which is available for your reference. To update your AdChoices Opt Out settings, select your region here:
US
,
Canada
, or
Europe
(including the United Kingdom); and to manage all NAI member sites’ settings, click
here
.
Privacy Policy:
Taboola, Inc., together with its
Affiliates
, (“
Taboola
”, “
we
”, “
us
”, or “
our
”), recognize the importance of your privacy. In this privacy policy (“Privacy Policy”) we describe how we collect, process, use, and disclose information that we obtain in the following contexts:
our website,
www.taboola.com
and any Taboola website, digital property, communication, or form displaying this Privacy Policy (collectively, the “
Sites
”);
our content-discovery platforms, feeds, widgets, analytics tools, pixels, integrations, push notifications, and other technical applications that we provide on third-party websites (collectively, the “
Content Discovery Platform
”); and
the Taboola News suite of content-discovery tools available on mobile devices and operating systems (including the Start line of products, collectively “
Taboola News
”) (together with the Content Discovery Platform, the “
Services
”).
When you visit the Sites, or use or interact with any of our Services, we will collect information from or about you or your device, which may include personal information or personal data as defined by applicable privacy laws (“
Personal
Information
” or “
Personal Data
“) (collectively, the “
Information
”), and this Information will be handled as described in this Privacy Policy.
We may use Information collected through the Sites and Services in various ways, depending on whether you are:
(i) a publisher, advertiser, or other content provider that has a contractual relationship, with Taboola (a “
Customer
“);
(ii) a visitor to our Customers’ websites and digital properties who interacts with our Services (a “
User
“); or
(iii) a visitor to the Taboola Sites (a “
Site Visitor
“), which may include Customers and prospective customers.
Therefore, this Privacy Policy outlines specific provisions for each of these categories in Sections 1 – 3, and outlines provisions that apply to all three categories in Section 4 below.
For more information about how we use cookies on the Sites and when providing our Services, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
.
Please note that our
Connexity
and
Skimlinks
business lines have separate privacy policies that apply to their services. Please visit their respective websites for information on their privacy practices.
1. Customers
1.1 Information We Collect from Customers (“Customer Information”)
We collect Customer Information directly from our Customers in the following ways:
Sites:
We will collect a Customer’s contact details when a Customer enters a contractual relationship with Taboola and we will collect a username and password when a Customer creates an account on any of our Sites.
When a Customer sends us an email asking a question, or signs up to receive our email newsletters, we will collect the Information that the Customer submits to us.
We will also collect other Information that Customers choose to provide to us, such as the contents of a message or form that a Customer submits through our Sites or via email.
We may also collect Information from prospective customers through publicly-available sources.
Services:
When a Customer signs up to use our Services or uses Taboola’s analytics dashboard “Taboola Ads,” we collect Information such as the Customer’s name, email address, telephone number, payment card information, billing information, and any other Information the Customer may choose to provide to us on the platform.
We may also work with third party vendors to process payments to or from our Customers on our behalf. These vendors currently include
Stripe
and
Payoneer
, but are subject to change at any time. We do not have access to the Information that you provide to these third parties, and we encourage you to visit their privacy policies to understand their practices.
1.2 Why We Use Customer Information
We use Customer Information for the following purposes:
Providing our Services
. We use Customer Information to provide our Sites and Services and for other customer service purposes in relation to Customer accounts.
Communicating with you about your Taboola Partnership
. We use Customer Information to communicate, via email or otherwise, about Customers’ accounts; to contact Customers about Taboola’s products or services that we think may interest you; to respond to Customer inquiries, requests, or complaints; and to provide Customers with product updates, news, best practices, and other helpful or interesting information that can enhance your use of Taboola’s Services, in accordance with their communications preferences. When we communicate in this way, our emails may deploy a cookie that tracks when the emails are opened to measure Customer engagement. For more information about cookies, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Marketing and advertising
. We use Customer Information to provide Customers with newsletters, special offers, and promotions, including via email; and for other marketing, advertising, and promotional purposes, including general updates about Taboola. These communications will be sent in accordance with our Customers’ communications preferences.
Fraud detection.
We may use your personal data for fraud detection purposes.
Analytics/measurement.
We may process your data for analytics and measurement purposes.
1.3 To Whom We Disclose Customer Information
We may disclose Customer Information as follows:
Taboola Affiliates
. We may disclose Customer Information to any of Taboola’s current or future affiliates (affiliates are companies controlling, controlled by, or under common control with us, including, for example, Taboola.com Ltd., Taboola Europe Limited, Taboola (Thailand) Limited, and Taboola Brasil Internet Ltda., referred to herein as “
Affiliates
”), parent companies, or subsidiaries to process for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy.
Taboola service providers
. We may disclose Customer Information to vendors, service providers, agents, contractors, or others who perform functions (e.g., maintenance, data analysis, customer relationship management, email marketing, surveys, credit card processing, data hosting, fraud detection) on our behalf.
Customers
. We may disclose Customer Information to other Customers where relevant to the Service we provide. For example, we may provide publishers with information about what advertisers may appear on their network or advertisers with information about which publisher websites their campaigns have appeared on.
1.4 Customer Choices
Customers may access, correct, delete, or update the Information that they have provided to us by either updating the Information in their account, by emailing their dedicated account manager, or by emailing us at
support@taboola.com
.
We may send periodic promotional or informational emails to Customers in accordance with their communications preferences. At any time, Customers may opt out of such communications by following the opt-out instructions contained in the email. Please note that it may take up to ten (10) business days for us to process opt-out requests. If you opt out of receiving marketing and advertising emails from Taboola, we will still send you emails about your account and any Services that you have requested or received from us.
2. Users
2.1 Information We Collect from Users (“User Information”)
We automatically collect User Information when Users interact with our Services that appear on our Customers’ websites and digital properties. Like most other web-based services, we collect this User Information through cookies and other technologies. Taboola collects only pseudonymized data, which means we do not know who you are because we do not know or process your name, email address, or other identifiable data. Instead, we only process digital identifiers such as cookie IDs, IP addresses, mobile advertising IDs on your device, Taboola network browsing history and associated preferences, and in some limited circumstances, your hashed email address.
User Information that we collect includes, but is not limited to the following:
Content Discovery Platform
: We collect Information about a User’s device and operating system, IP address, the web pages accessed by Users within our Customers’ websites, the link that led a User to a Customer’s website, the dates and times a User accesses a Customers’ website, event information (e.g., system crashes), Information about the interactions with advertisements and Customers’ Services (e.g., availability, visibility, and clicks), general location information (e.g., city and state), hashed email addresses (when made available by the User), and gender (when made available by the User). We ask our Customers to obtain consent on our behalf, where required by applicable data protection laws, for us to collect this User Information. We may also obtain Information about you from our
data partners
.
Taboola News
: We collect in-app User behaviors (e.g. online status, browsing activity, and clicks) and implicit non-precise device location inferred from search queries (when enabled by the User) and SIM cards or IP addresses. For more information about how we use cookies and other technologies, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
.
Taboola Push Notification
: We collect Information about Users’ time zone, location (country, region, city), language, mobile operating system (e.g. iOS or Android), browser, connection and internet service provider.
2.2 Why We Use User Information
We use User Information for the following purposes:
Providing and Improving our Service
. We may use User Information to provide and improve our Services to Users and our Customers.
Tailoring content
. We may use User Information to tailor the content and information that we may send or display to Users; to retarget content to Users through our Services and elsewhere; and to otherwise personalize your experiences while using our Services. For more information about how we tailor our content see information below about our
Interest Based Advertising
.
Tailoring content across multiple devices
. We may use User Information to improve a unique User’s experience across multiple browsers and devices (such as smartphones, tablets, or other viewing devices) by providing better targeted ad campaigns to that User. For instance, should we recognize a User on a web browser, we may want to provide that User similar or personalized content on mobile apps, as well. To do this, we identify unique Users across devices, or we may sync cookies and identifiers with our service providers or Customers that do this, to help our Customers enhance their own data and data segments, or to help them target the right audience.
Offering our Customers data segments that help target content and advertisements for topics, products, and services that may interest you.
A data segment is a grouping of users who share one or more attributes (e.g., travel enthusiasts). We offer a number of data segments, both proprietary and from our
data partners
, to our Customers so that they may better target Users who are more likely to be interested in their content and advertisements. Taboola does not knowingly create segments that are based upon what we consider to be sensitive information (for example, Personal Data revealing your racial or ethnic origin or your religious affiliations, or Personal Data concerning your sensitive health information, sex life or sexual orientation, or genetic or biometric data). In connection with our Services, our Customers may use these
standard health-related segments
about non-sensitive conditions such as an inferred interest in health and wellness or over the counter medications. In addition, Taboola offers our Customers
standard political-related segments
that may indicate general political sentiment, interest in specific political issues, and political party affiliation.
2.3 To Whom We Disclose User Information
We may disclose User Information as follows:
Taboola Affiliates
. We may disclose User Information to any current or future Affiliates, parent companies, or subsidiaries to process for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy.
Taboola service providers
. We may disclose User Information to vendors, service providers, agents, contractors, or others who perform functions (e.g., maintenance, data analysis, customer relationship management, email marketing, surveys, credit card processing, data hosting, or fraud detection) on our behalf.
Unaffiliated third parties
. We may disclose User Information to other unaffiliated third parties, specifically with (i) our
data partners
, so that we can connect you with relevant content by allowing our advertisers to target specific audience segments, and (ii) our
programmatic demand and supply partners
, so that we can serve you with tailored advertisements.
Customers
. We may disclose User Information to Customers where relevant to the Service we provide those Customers. For example, we may provide publishers with information about the viewing and click-through patterns of the content they publish and may provide advertisers with information about conversion rates for analytics purposes.
2.4 User Choices
You have the right to request that Taboola provide you with access to the Personal Data we hold about you, correct your Personal Data, delete your Personal Data, and cease or restrict processing of your Personal Data, and opt-out of the sale or sharing of your Personal Data. Please visit our Global Taboola Data Subject Access Request Portal available
here
. To opt out of the sale or sharing of your Personal Data, please click the U.S. State Consumer Rights Portal available
here
.
2.5 Interest-Based Advertising
Through our Services, including our Services on Customer websites, we may provide advertisements to you based on your recent browsing behavior across different Customer websites, browsers, or devices. For example, if on a first online visit, you browse on website A, then on a subsequent visit to website B, you may see content personalized based on your browsing history on website A. For example, if a user visits a clothing retail site, she might see clothing-related ads on another site she visits.
In order to target advertisements to you for products and services that may interest you, we may use cookies, JavaScript, web beacons (including clear GIFs), HTML5 local storage, and other technologies. For more information about how we use these technologies, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
.
We may also work with third parties such as ad networks, which are third parties that display advertisements based on your visits to websites that you have visited in the past. These advertisers will deliver you targeted advertisements for products and services that may interest you. Third-party ad networks, our advertiser Customers (and their content providers and agents), and/or traffic measurement services may also use cookies, JavaScript, web beacons (including clear GIFs), Flash LSOs, and other technologies to measure the effectiveness of their ads and to personalize advertising content to you. These
third-party cookies and other technologies
are governed by each third party’s specific privacy policy, not this one.
If you have questions about our collection and use of data for interest-based advertising purposes, please contact us at:
support@taboola.com
.
2.6 Opt Out
Taboola supports initiatives to offer our Users greater transparency and control over the uses of their Information. Therefore, we offer the following options for controlling the interest-based content and ads you receive.
If
you do not want to receive interest-based ads from Taboola, you can disable the display of such ads by clicking on the opt-out link below
. Please note that an opt out will not prevent you from seeing Taboola’s content recommendations. Rather, the opt out will prevent Taboola from using your Information to tailor these recommendations to your interests. You will continue to receive recommendations that are selected based on the particular website that you are viewing (i.e., contextually based ads).
You are currently:
Opted Out
Opt In
Not Opted Out
Opt Out
Not Opted Out
: Taboola will serve you personalized recommendations based on your history.
Opted Out
: You have opted out of tracking, Taboola will no longer serve you with personalized content recommendations based on your Internet use history.
Because our tracking mechanisms operate at the device and browser level, to fully opt-out across devices,
you will need to do so on each device and browser individually
. If your browsers are configured to reject cookies, your opt-out may not be effective, since we identify your choice to opt-out based on an opt-out cookie we deliver to you. In this case, you will need to confirm that your browser is configured properly in order for the opt-out to be effective. If you are using a Safari browser on iOS11 or macOS High Sierra, you must first adjust your Privacy and Security Settings to turn off both “Prevent Cross-Site Tracking” and “Block All Cookies”, and then return to this privacy policy or your preferred opt out platform to reset your opt out preferences.
Taboola may use non-cookie technologies in limited cases. Like cookies, these technologies allow Taboola to recommend ads that are tailored to your interests and to remember whether you have chosen to opt-out from our Services. Please note that some web browsers may not permit you to block the use of non-cookie technologies, but you can do so by simply clicking on the Opt Out feature above in this Section 2.6.
You can also opt-out of receiving targeted ads served by Taboola and other advertising companies
.
You may use the
NAI opt out tool
, which will allow you to opt out of receiving targeted ads from Taboola and from other NAI-approved member companies. The NAI also provides instructions to engage system-level mobile device opt outs in Android, iOS, and Windows Phone environments.
You may also visit one of the Digital Advertising Alliance affiliate websites to learn more about User choices and opting out of interest-based advertising displayed by the many member companies.
Users in the United States may visit the DAA consumer choice page at
www.aboutads.info/choices
Users in Canada may visit the DAAC consumer choice page at
www.youradchoices.ca/choices
Users in Europe (including the United Kingdom) may visit the EDAA consumer choice page at
www.youronlinechoices.eu
You can also opt out of the use of your email address for targeted ads through
Audience Matched Advertising
or AMA by Taboola and other advertising companies through the
NAI Audience Matched Advertising Opt Out (Beta)
.
Please note that an opt out from one or more companies listed on the DAA, DAAC, or EDAA consumer choice pages will not prevent you from seeing those companies’ advertisements. Rather, the opt out will prevent these companies from using your Information to display targeted content or ads to you. You may continue to receive advertisements that are selected based on the particular website that you are viewing (i.e., contextually based ads).
Also, if your browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit the DAA, DAAC or EDAA consumer choice pages, your opt out may not be effective because your browser will refuse opt-out cookies (that alert companies that you have exercised your opt-out preference).
2.7 Data Retention
We retain User Information, which is directly collected for purposes of serving ads, for at most thirteen (13) months from the User’s last interaction with our Services (often for a shorter period of time), after which time we de-identify the data by removing unique identifiers or aggregating the data.
We retain deidentified or aggregated data, which cannot identify an individual or device and is used for purposes of reporting and analysis, for as long as commercially necessary. We keep opt-out information for longer than this period so that we can continue to honor your opt-out requests.
2.8 Children
We do not knowingly collect any data or target any advertisements on websites directed to children under the age of eighteen (18). If you are the parent or guardian of a child under the age of eighteen (18) and have a concern regarding the Information we collect, please contact us at
dpo@taboola.com
.
3. Site Visitors
3.1 Information We Collect from Site Visitors
Taboola collects Site Visitor Information either directly from you or from third parties that collect this Information during your use of our Sites. We may combine all the Information that we collect from various sources.
Information we collect directly from you
. We may collect Site Visitor Information directly from you. For example, when you send us an email asking a question, or submit a form on our Sites to receive marketing materials or email newsletters, we will collect the Information that you submit to us. We may also collect any other Information that you choose to provide to us, such as the contents of a message that you submit through our Sites.
Information we collect from third parties
. We may collect Site Visitor Information about you from third parties that collect information on our behalf through your use of the Site, such as web analytics companies. Such information may include, without limitation, information about your operating system, IP address, settings and system configurations, device model, device ID and other unique device identifiers, mobile related information, the web pages you access within our Sites, the website that led you to our Sites, the website to which you go after leaving our Sites, the dates and times that you access our Sites, event information (e.g., system crashes) and web log data.
For more information about how we use cookies and other technologies, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
.
3.2 Why We Use Site Visitor Information
We use your Site Visitor Information for the following purposes:
Providing our Service
. We use Site Visitor Information to provide and manage our Sites and Services.
Tailoring content
. We use Site Visitor Information to tailor the content and information that we send or display to you on our Sites, and to otherwise personalize your experiences while using our Sites.
Communicating with you
. We use Site Visitor Information to communicate with you, including via email, about our Services; to respond to your inquiries via our website request forms; and to answer any questions or complaints you submit; to provide you with news, best practices or other information that we think may interest you.
Marketing and advertising
. We use Site Visitor Information to provide you with newsletters, special offers, and promotions, including via email; to contact you about products or services we think may interest you; and for other marketing, advertising, and promotional purposes. These communications will be sent in accordance with your communications preferences.
Analyzing use of our Sites
. We use Site Visitor Information to better understand how individuals access and use our Sites, both on an aggregated and individualized basis; to honor their requests and preferences; and for other research, analytical or statistical purposes.
3.3 To Whom We Disclose Site Visitor Information
We may disclose Site Visitor Information as follows:
Taboola Affiliates
. We may disclose Site Visitor Information to any current or future Affiliates, parent companies, or subsidiaries to process for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy.
Taboola service providers
. We may disclose Site Visitor Information to vendors, service providers, agents, contractors, or others who perform functions (e.g., maintenance, data analysis, customer relationship management, email marketing, surveys, credit card processing, data hosting, fraud detection) on our behalf.
3.4 Third-Party Online Advertising
To understand your interests and deliver advertisements that are tailored to your interests, we may work with service providers or third parties that use their own
cookies, web beacons, and other technologies
to collect Information about Site Visitors’ online activities, either on our Sites and/or other websites across the Internet  (“
Taboola Ad Partners
”). These Taboola Ad Partners include advertisers and ad networks that may collect Information about when you view or interact with one of their advertisements and may collect information regarding your activities on our Sites and your online activities over time and across different websites. Like most advertisers, Taboola works to place our advertisements where we think they will be most interesting and relevant to the recipient. One way we do this is by allowing ad networks to place their own cookies when an individual visits our Sites. This enables the ad network to recognize individuals who have previously visited the Taboola Sites. Then, if the ad network has purchased ad space on a third-party website, and recognizes that same individual visiting that third-party website, the ad network can deliver a Taboola advertisement, knowing that this individual has already expressed interest in Taboola by visiting the Taboola Sites. To learn more about third parties who collect Site Visitor Information, please review our
Cookie Policy
.
3.5 Site Visitor Choices
Site Visitors may opt out of the Taboola Ad Partners that collect information on the Sites to serve ads about Taboola. (Some U.S. Site Visitors may exercise their options directly with Taboola, as outlined below in Section 5.2.1 and Section 5.3.1). By visiting one of the Digital Advertising Alliance affiliate websites, you can learn more about User choices and opting out of interest-based advertising displayed by the many member companies.
Users in the United States may visit the DAA consumer choice page at
www.aboutads.info/choices
Users in Canada may visit the DAAC consumer choice page at
www.youradchoices.ca/choices
Users in Europe (including the United Kingdom) may visit the EDAA consumer choice page at
www.youronlinechoices.eu
Please note that an opt out from one or more companies listed on the DAA, DAAC, or EDAA consumer choice pages will not prevent you from seeing those companies’ advertisements. Rather, the opt out will prevent these companies from using your Information to display targeted content or ads to you. You may continue to receive advertisements that are selected based on the particular website that you are viewing (i.e., contextually based ads).
Also, if your browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit the DAA, DAAC or EDAA consumer choice pages, your opt out may not be effective because your browser will refuse opt-out cookies (that alert companies that you have exercised your opt-out preference).
For Site Visitors who have subscribed to receive emails from us, you can manage your subscription by clicking your unique link that appears at the bottom of each of these emails.
4. General Provisions Applicable to Customers, Users, and Site Visitors
4.1 Why We Use Your Information
We use the Information that we collect from Customers, Users, and Site Visitors for the purposes respectively set forth in Sections 1-3 above, as well as for the following purposes:
Analyzing use of our Services
. We use the Information that we collect to better understand how Customers, Users, and Site Visitors access and use our Site and Services, both on an aggregated and individualized basis; to respond to Customers’, Users’, and Site Visitors’ requests and preferences; and for other research, analytical, and statistical purposes.
Legal compliance
. We use the Information that we collect to comply with applicable legal obligations, including requests from law enforcement or other governmental entities.
Protecting our rights and interests
. We use the Information that we collect to protect our rights and interests and the rights and interests of our Customers, Users, Site Visitors, and the general public, as well as to enforce this Privacy Policy and our
Terms of Use
.
4.2 Disclosing Your Information
When we share your Information with third parties as specified above, we require such recipients to agree to only use the Information we share with them in accordance with this Privacy Policy and our contractual specifications and for no other purpose than those determined by us in line with this Privacy Policy.
In addition to the disclosures detailed above, we may also disclose Information for the following purposes:
Business transfers
.
We reserve the right to disclose and/or transfer Information to another entity if we are acquired by or merged with another company, if we sell or transfer a business unit or assets to another company, if we undergo a bankruptcy proceeding, or if we engage in any other similar business transfer.
Legal compliance
.
We may disclose Information in order to comply with the law, regulation, a judicial proceeding, subpoena, court order, or other legal process.
Protecting rights and interests
.
We may disclose Information where we believe it is necessary to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding illegal activities, suspected fraud, situations involving potential threats to the safety of any person, violations of our
Terms of Use
or this Privacy Policy, or as evidence in litigation in which we are involved.
Aggregate and de-identified Information
.
We may disclose to our Customers and other third parties aggregated or de-identified information about users for marketing, advertising, research, or other purposes.
4.3 Cookies and Other Tracking Mechanisms
For more information about how we use cookies and other tracking mechanisms on the Sites and when providing our Services, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
. You may disable certain tracking as discussed in our
Cookie Policy
(e.g., by disabling cookies).
4.4 Third-Party Links
Our Sites and Services may contain links to our
third-party partners’
websites. Any access to and use of such linked websites is not governed by this Privacy Policy but instead is governed by the privacy policies of those third-party websites. We are not responsible for the information security nor privacy practices of such third-party websites.
For example, our Sites include features from third-party social networking platforms, such as the Facebook “Like” button. These features may collect certain information, such as your IP address or the page you are visiting on our Sites, and may set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. Social media features and widgets are either hosted by a third party or directly on our Sites. Your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policy of the company providing such features. As another example, our Services link to Customer websites, which are also not governed by this Privacy Policy but by the applicable Customers’ privacy policy.
4.5 Security
We value the security of your Information, including, but not limited to, the Information collected via the Sites or Services. Taboola is ISO 27001 and ISO 27701 certified and we have taken appropriate technical and organisational measures to protect the Information we collect about you from loss, misuse, unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, destruction, and any other form of unauthorized processing. Please be aware, however, that no data security measures can guarantee 100% security.
4.6 International Data Transfers
We may transfer your Information outside the country in which it is collected, including to a country that may not offer the same level of protection for Information as the country in which you reside. Rest assured, however, that Taboola has arranged all contractual safeguards to ensure your Information is processed in a way that offers an adequate level of protection when it is shared between or among Taboola Affiliates, subsidiaries, and/or parent companies.
If you would like to learn more about EEA/UK Data Transfers, specifically, see Section 5.1.4 below. If you would like to learn more about Thailand Data Transfers, specifically, see Section 5.3.4 below.
5. Regional Privacy Rights
5.1 Notice to Individuals within the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or United Kingdom ("UK")
5.1.1 Data Controller and Representative
If you reside in the EEA or UK, Taboola.com Ltd. will be the controller of your Personal Data provided to, collected by or for, or processed by Taboola in connection with our Services. Taboola.com Ltd. can be contacted at
support@taboola.com
.
Our representative in the European Union is Lionheart Squared (Europe) Ltd., 2 Pembroke House, Upper Pembroke Street 28-32, Dublin, D02 EK84 Ireland.
Our representative in the UK is Taboola Europe Limited, Aldgate House, 2nd Floor, 33 Aldgate High Street, London EC3N 1DL, United Kingdom.
5.1.2 Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data
If you are a Customer, Site Visitor, or User from the EEA or UK, our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Data described above (also referred to in this Section 5.1 as “
EEA/UK Data
”) will depend on the Personal Data concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Data from you only (i) where we have your consent to do so, (ii) where we need the Personal Data to perform a contract with you, or (iii) where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Data from you or may otherwise need the Personal Data to protect your vital interests or those of another person.
If we ask you to provide Personal Data to comply with a legal requirement or to perform a contract with you, we will make this clear at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your Personal Data is mandatory or not (as well as of the possible consequences if you do not provide your Personal Data).
Similarly, if we collect and use your Personal Data in reliance on our legitimate interests (or those of any third party), we will make clear to you at the relevant time what those legitimate interests are.
If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your Personal Data, including if you would like to better understand how our legitimate interests to process your data are balanced against your data protection rights and freedoms, please contact us as specified in Section 6 below.
5.1.3 Your Rights to Your Information
You have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with access to the Personal Data we hold about you, (ii) correct your Personal Data, (iii) export your Personal Data, (iv) delete your Personal Data, and (v) cease or restrict processing of your Personal Data. Where we have obtained your consent, or our Customers have obtained it on our behalf, you have the right to withdraw it at any time. If you are a User and would like to understand what Personal Data and behavioral information Taboola holds about you, specifically, and how you can exercise any of your rights with respect to your Personal Data, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
. Customers may also submit a data subject access request by emailing us at
privacy@taboola.com
so that Taboola may either respond with the relevant information or, if applicable, direct this request to, and cooperate with, your employer to respond.
You have the right to lodge a complaint to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your Personal Data. To learn more, please contact your local data protection authority, via the contact methods available
here
. However, if you have any questions about our collection and use of your Personal Data, please first contact us at
privacy@taboola.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@taboola.com
.
5.1.4 EEA/UK Data Transfers
As part of Taboola’s global operations, our data flows among the EEA, the UK, Israel, the United States, Singapore and Hong Kong, and Taboola stores Customer, User, and Visitor information in our data centers located in Israel and the United States.
When Taboola transfers EEA/UK Data to Taboola.com Ltd. in Israel, it relies (as applicable) on (i) the European Commission’s decision, and (ii) UK adequacy regulations that Israel provides a level of data protection that is adequate for EEA/UK Data. These allow the free transfer of EEA/UK Data to Israel without the need for additional data transfer mechanisms.
Similarly, when Taboola transfers any personal data from the EEA to Taboola Europe Limited in the United Kingdom, it relies on the European Commission’s decision that the UK provides a level of data protection that is adequate for personal data from the EEA.
Beyond that, when Taboola transfers EEA/UK Data to other countries then, if those countries do not have a European Commission adequacy finding and are not the subject of UK adequacy regulations (as applicable), Taboola implements
Standard Contractual Clauses
approved by the European Commission and/or competent UK authorities (as applicable) to protect the transferred data. The Standard Contractual Clauses are contractual privacy and security commitments that are entered between companies that transfer personal data outside of the EEA.
In particular, non-EEA/UK Taboola Affiliates, like Taboola, Inc. in the United States, have accordingly adopted Standard Contractual Clauses to ensure the legality, privacy, and security of the data flows necessary to provide, maintain, and develop our services.
5.2 Notice to Individuals in the State of California
5.2.1 Your Rights to Your Personal Information
California residents have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with what Personal Information Taboola has collected about you, including the categories of Personal Information, the categories of sources from which the Personal Information is collected, the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, or sharing Personal Information, the categories of third parties to whom Taboola discloses Personal Information, and the specific pieces of Personal Information Taboola has collected about you, (ii) correct your Personal Information, (iii) delete your Personal Information, and (iv) opt you out of the sale or sharing of your Personal Information. You also have a right against discrimination for exercising any of these rights, which Taboola is committed to upholding and honoring at all times.
If you would like to opt out of Taboola’s disclosures, sharing, and sales of your Personal Information and cross-context behavioral advertising, you may do so as outlined in
Taboola’s U.S. State Consumer Rights Portal
. Please note that this feature is currently only available for U.S. state residents with active U.S. state comprehensive privacy laws in effect. If you would like to effectuate additional consumer rights, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
.
5.2.2 Summary of Consumer Requests
This is a
summary of the requests
that Taboola received and honored from California residents in the last calendar year.
5.2.3 Categories of Data that Taboola May Hold about You
During the 12-month period prior to the effective date of this notice, Taboola may have used or obtained your Personal Information with respect to our Services and Sites in accordance with the chart below.
Consumer/Data Subject Type
Statutory Category of Personal Information (PI)
Sources of PI
Purpose of Collection
Disclosure of PI
Customers
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Additional data subject to Cal. Civ. Code section 1798.80 (e.g., name, address, work phone, employment information through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Professional information (e.g., employment information
through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms
)
Please visit section 1.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 1.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 1.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
Users
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Inferences (e.g., profile created reflecting consumer’s preferences, characteristics, predispositions, behavior)
Please visit section 2.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 2.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 2.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
Site Visitors
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Additional data subject to Cal. Civ. Code section 1798.80 (e.g., name, address, work phone, employment information through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Professional information (e.g., employment information
through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms
)
Inferences (e.g., profile created reflecting consumer’s preferences, characteristics, predispositions, behavior)
Please visit section 3.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 3.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 3.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
5.2.4 How Taboola Shares Your Personal Information
We may disclose your Personal Information by allowing certain third parties (such as online advertising services, advertising networks, and social networks) to collect Personal Information via automated technologies on our websites for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes. Under California law, such disclosures may be considered a “sale” when the personal information is exchanged for non-monetary consideration, or “sharing” when the personal information is disclosed for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes. You have the right to opt out of these types of disclosures of your Personal Information in accordance with the opt out methods we have provided throughout this notice.
We may sell or share for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes (and may have sold or shared during the 12-month period prior to the Effective Date of this Statement) the following categories of personal information about you to online advertising services, advertising networks and social networks:
Commercial Information
Geolocation Data
Identifiers
Internet/Online Activity
Inferences
We do not have actual knowledge that we sell or share Personal Information of minors under 18 years old.
5.3 Notice to Individuals in Applicable U.S. States
5.3.1 Your Rights to Your Personal Information
Residents of U.S. states with active U.S. state comprehensive privacy laws in effect have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with information on/access to the Personal Information that we may hold about you, (ii) correct your Personal Information, (iii) delete your Personal Information, (iv) provide you a copy of your Personal Information, and (v) opt-out of targeted advertising or the sale of your Personal Information. Taboola does not profile in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects. You also have a right against discrimination for exercising any of these rights, which Taboola is committed to upholding and honoring at all times.
If you would like to opt out of Taboola’s disclosures, sharing, and sales of your Personal Information and targeted advertising, you may do so as outlined in
Taboola’s U.S. State Consumer Rights Portal
. Please note that this feature is currently only available for U.S. state residents with active U.S. state comprehensive privacy laws in effect. If you would like to effectuate additional consumer rights requests, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
.
5.3.2 Categories of Data that Taboola May Hold about You
Taboola may have used or obtained your Personal Information with respect to our Services and Sites in accordance with the chart below.
Consumer/Data Subject Type
Category of Personal Information (PI)
Sources of PI
Purpose of Collection
Sources
Customers
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Professional information (e.g., employment information through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms)
Please visit section 1.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 1.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 1.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
Users
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Inferences (e.g., profile created reflecting consumer’s preferences, characteristics, predispositions, behavior)
Please visit section 2.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 2.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 2.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
Site Visitors
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Professional information (e.g., employment information through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms)
Inferences (e.g., profile created reflecting consumer’s preferences, characteristics, predispositions, behavior)
Please visit section 3.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 3.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 3.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
We may disclose your Personal Information by allowing certain third parties (such as online advertising services, advertising networks, and social networks) to collect Personal Information via automated technologies on our websites for targeted advertising purposes. You have the right to opt out of these types of disclosures of your Personal Information.
We may sell or share for targeted advertising purposes, the following categories of personal information about you to online advertising services, advertising networks and social networks:
Commercial Information
Geolocation Data
Identifiers
Internet/Online Activity
Inferences
5.4 Notice to Individuals in Thailand
5.6.1 Data Controller
If you reside in Thailand, Taboola (Thailand) Limited will be the controller of your Personal Data provided to, collected by or for, or processed by Taboola in connection with our Services.
5.6.2 Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data
If you are a Customer, Site Visitor, or User from Thailand, our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Data described above (also referred to in this Section 5.3 as “Thailand Data”) will depend on the Personal Data concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Data from you only (i) where we have your consent to do so, (ii) where we need the Personal Data to perform a contract with you, or (iii) where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Data from you or may otherwise need the Personal Data to protect your vital interests or those of another person.
If we ask you to provide Personal Data to comply with a legal requirement or to perform a contract with you, we will make this clear at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your Personal Data is mandatory or not (as well as of the possible consequences if you do not provide your Personal Data).
Similarly, if we collect and use your Personal Data in reliance on our legitimate interests (or those of any third party), we will make clear to you at the relevant time what those legitimate interests are.
5.6.3 Your Rights to Your Information
You have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with access to the Personal Data we hold about you, (ii) export your Personal Data, (iii) delete your Personal Data, and (iv) cease or restrict processing of your Personal Data. If you are a User and would like to understand what Personal Data and behavioural information Taboola holds about you, specifically, and how you can exercise any of your rights with respect to your Personal Data, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
. Customers may also submit a data subject access request by emailing us at
dpo@taboola.com
so that Taboola may either respond with the relevant information or, if applicable, direct this request to, and cooperate with, your employer to respond.
If you have any questions about our collection and use of your Personal Data, please first contact us at
support@taboola.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@taboola.com
.
5.6.4 Thailand Data Transfers
Taboola transfers data outside of Thailand. Taboola has in place an Inter Group Data Transfer Agreement across its international entities, which is based on the EEA’s standard model clauses.
As part of Taboola’s global operations, our data flows among Thailand, the EEA, the United States, Israel, and Hong Kong. To ensure that Thailand Data is adequately protected when transferred outside of Thailand, the Personal Data Protection Act, B.E. 2562 mandates that such transfers take place using certain legal mechanisms.
When transferring Thailand data elsewhere, Taboola relies on Standard Contractual Clauses, set forth by the European Commission, that outline contractual privacy and security commitments between companies that transfer personal data (for example, from Taboola (Thailand) Limited to Taboola, Inc.). Taboola, Inc. and its Affiliates have accordingly adopted Standard Contractual Clauses to ensure the legality, privacy, and security of the data flows necessary to provide, maintain, and develop our services.
Note: Taboola currently stores Customer, User, and Visitor Information in our data centers located in the United States and Israel.
5.5 Notice to Individuals in Brazil
5.7.1 Data Controller
If you reside in the Federative Republic of Brazil (“Brazil”), Taboola Brasil Internet Ltda. will be the controller of your Personal Data provided to, collected by or for, or processed by Taboola in connection with our Services.
5.7.2 Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data
If you are a Customer, Site Visitor, or User from Brazil, under the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados federal law 13,709/2018 (the “LGPD”), our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Data described above (also referred to in this Section 5.4 as “Brazil Data”) will depend on the Personal Data concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Data from you only (i) where we have your consent to do so, (ii) where we need the Personal Data to perform a contract with you, or (iii) where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Data from you or may otherwise need the Personal Data to protect your vital interests or those of another person.
If we ask you to provide Personal Data to comply with a legal requirement or to perform a contract with you, we will make this clear at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your Personal Data is mandatory or not (as well as of the possible consequences if you do not provide your Personal Data).
Similarly, if we collect and use your Personal Data in reliance on our legitimate interests (or those of any third party), a notice will be provided to you in our disclosure statement.
If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your Personal Data, including if you would like to better understand how our legitimate interests to process your data are balanced against your data protection rights and freedoms, please contact us as specified in Section 6 below.
5.7.3 Your Rights to Your Personal Data
You have the right to request that Taboola (i) confirm whether we are processing your Personal Data, (ii) provide you with access to the Personal Data we hold about you, (iii) disclose the public and private entities with which we have shared use of your Personal Data, (iv) correct your Personal Data, (v) export your Personal Data, for your own use or use by another controller (vi) anonymize, block, or delete any unnecessary or excessive data, (vii) delete all your Personal Data, and (vii) cease or restrict processing of your Personal Data. If you are a User and would like to understand what Personal Data and behavioral information Taboola holds about you, specifically, and how you can exercise any of your rights with respect to your Personal Data, please visit Taboola’s
Data Subject Access Request Portal
. Customers may also submit a data subject access request by emailing us at
dpo@taboola.com
so that Taboola may either respond with the relevant information or, if applicable, direct this request to, and cooperate with, your employer to respond.
Brazilian data subjects can file a complaint in relation to the LGPD with Brazil’s National Data Protection Authority (the “ANPD”). In the meantime, if you have any questions about our collection and use of your Personal Data, please first contact us at
support@taboola.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer, Leonie Power, FieldFisher, at
dpo@taboola.com
.
5.7.4. Brazil Data Transfers
Taboola transfers data outside Brazil. As part of Taboola’s global operations, our data flows among Brazil, the EEA, the United States, Israel, and Hong Kong. To ensure that Brazil Data is adequately protected when transferred outside Brazil, the LGPD mandates that such transfers take place using
certain legal mechanisms
. Taboola has in place an Inter Group Data Transfer Agreement across its international entities, which is based on the EEA’s standard model clauses, and which may be updated upon further guidance from the future ANPD.
Note: Taboola currently stores Customer, User, and Visitor Information in our data centers located in the United States and Israel.
5.6 Notice to Individuals within the People’s Republic of China (“PRC”)
5.8.1 Processing Entity and Designated Office
If you reside in the PRC, Taboola Information Technology Shanghai Co. Ltd. will be the processing entity of your Personal Information provided to, collected by or for, or processed by Taboola in connection with our Services. Our designated office is located at Room 501i, Unit 501, 5F, No. 61 on East 3rd Middle Road, Chaoyang District, Beijing, China, and Taboola Information Technology Shanghai Co. Ltd. can be contacted at
support@taboola.com
.
5.8.2 Legal Basis for Processing Personal Information
If you are a Customer, Site Visitor, or User from the PRC, our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Information described above (also referred to in this Section 5.5 as “PRC Data”) will depend on the Personal Information concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Information from you only (i) where we have your consent to do so, (ii) where we need the Personal Information to perform a contract with you, or (iii) where the processing is reasonable to support news reporting or the public interest. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Information from you or may otherwise need the Personal Information to protect your vital interests or those of another person. If we ask you to provide Personal Information to comply with a legal requirement or to perform a contract with you, we will make this clear at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your Personal Information is mandatory or not (as well as of the possible consequences if you do not provide your Personal Information).
If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your Personal Information, please contact us as specified in Section 6 below.
5.8.3 Your Rights to Your Information
You have the right to know about and make decisions about the processing of your Personal Information — this includes the right to restrict or refuse the processing of your Personal Information. You also have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with access to consult or copy the Personal Information we hold about you, (ii) correct or supplement your Personal Information, (iii) transfer or export your Personal Information, (iv) delete your Personal Information, and (v) cease or restrict processing of your Personal Information. If you are a User and would like to understand what Personal Information and behavioural information Taboola holds about you, specifically, and how you can exercise any of your rights with respect to your Personal Information, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
. Customers may also submit a data subject access request by emailing us at
dpo@taboola.com
so that Taboola may either respond with the relevant information or, if applicable, direct this request to, and cooperate with, your employer to respond.
You have the right to complain to the relevant department performing duties of Personal Information protection. However, if you have any questions about our collection and use of your Personal Information, please first contact us at
support@taboola.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@taboola.com
.
5.8.4 PRC Data Transfers
To provide Taboola’s Services, Personal Information about individuals in the PRC is collected by a server in Hong Kong, and our data then flows between Hong Kong, Israel, the EEA, the UK, the United States, and Singapore. Taboola does not store any Personal Information in the PRC, and instead stores Customer, User, and Visitor information in our data centers located in Israel and the United States.
When Taboola transfers Personal Information about individuals in the PRC to Taboola.com Ltd. in Israel, it relies (as applicable) on standard contractual clauses as set forth by the European Commission. In particular, non-PRC Taboola Affiliates, like Taboola, Inc. in the United States, have accordingly adopted Standard Contractual Clauses to ensure the legality, privacy, and security of the data flows necessary to provide, maintain, and develop our services.
6. Data Broker Requirements
THE ENTITY MAINTAINING THIS WEBSITE IS A DATA BROKER UNDER TEXAS LAW. TO CONDUCT BUSINESS IN TEXAS, A DATA BROKER MUST REGISTER WITH THE TEXAS SECRETARY OF STATE (TEXAS SOS). INFORMATION ABOUT DATA BROKER REGISTRANTS IS AVAILABLE ON THE TEXAS SOS WEBSITE.
The entity maintaining this website is a data broker under Texas law. To conduct business in Texas, a data broker must register with the Texas Secretary of State (Texas SOS). Information about data broker registrants is available on the Texas SOS website.
7. Contact Us
If you have questions about the privacy aspects of our Sites or Services, please contact us at
support@taboola.com
. If you wish to receive this policy in an alternative format, please contact privacy@taboola.com.
The names and contact details of our Affiliates which may process your Personal Information in their capacity as data controllers, can be found here:
www.taboola.com/contact
.
Residents in Brazil, China, the European Economic Area (including the United Kingdom) and Thailand, if you wish to escalate your inquiry after contacting the support team, you are welcome to contact our Data Protection Officer, Leonie Power, FieldFisher at
dpo@taboola.com
.
8. Changes to This Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy is current as of the Effective Date set forth above.
We may change this Privacy Policy from time to time, so please be sure to check back periodically. We will post any changes to this Privacy Policy on our Sites.
If we make any changes to this Privacy Policy that materially affect our practices with regard to the Information we have previously collected from you, we will endeavor to provide you with notice in advance of such change by highlighting the change on our Sites. We will seek your prior consent to any material changes, if and where this is required by applicable data protection laws.
Sub-policy 17
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Sub-policy 19
https://privacy.microsoft.com/de-de/privacystatement:
This is the Trace Id: ace8cd1db6b3dd18099b6490653cafad
Microsoft-Datenschutzbestimmungen
Letzte Aktualisierung: März 2025
Neuigkeiten
Drucken
Alles erweitern
Alles reduzieren
Microsoft-Datenschutzbestimmungen
Von uns erfasste personenbezogene Daten
Wie wir personenbezogene Daten verwenden
Warum wir personenbezogene Daten teilen
Verwalten Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten
Cookies und ähnliche Technologien
Von Ihrer Organisation bereitgestellte Produkte – Hinweis für Endbenutzer
Microsoft-Konto
Erfassung der Daten von Kindern
Weitere wichtige Informationen zum Datenschutz
Sicherheit personenbezogener Daten
Wo wir personenbezogene Daten speichern und verarbeiten
Unser Umgang mit personenbezogenen Daten
Datenschutz in US-Bundesstaaten
Werbung
Spracherkennungstechnologien
Vorschau- oder kostenlose Veröffentlichungen
Änderungen an diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen
So erreichen Sie uns
Produktspezifische Details:
Künstliche Intelligenz und Microsoft Copilot-Funktionen
Produkte für Unternehmen und Entwickler
Onlinedienste für Unternehmen
Software für Unternehmen und Entwickler und Unternehmensanwendungen
Produktivitäts- und Kommunikationsprodukte
Microsoft 365, Office und andere Produktivitäts-Apps
Microsoft Family
Microsoft Launcher
Microsoft Teams
OneDrive
Outlook
Skype
Surface
Surface Duo
LinkedIn
Suchen und durchsuchen
Bing
Microsoft Edge
Microsoft Translator
SwiftKey
Windows
Aktivierung
Aktivitätsverlauf
Werbe-ID
Diagnose
Personalisierte Angebote
Feedback-Hub
Hilfe
Liveuntertitel
Ortungsdienste und Aufzeichnung
Sprachausgabe
Smartphone-Link – Link zu Windows
Geräteübergreifende Erfahrungen
Schutz- und Sicherheitsfunktionen
Sprache, Spracherkennung, Freihand und Tastatureingabe
Einstellungen für Synchronisierung und Sicherung
Update-Dienste
Webbrowser – Microsoft Edge Vorgängerversion und Internet Explorer
Windows KI-Features
Windows-Apps
Windows Hello
Windows Search
Unterhaltung und ähnliche Dienste
Xbox
Microsoft Store
Microsoft Start
Silverlight
Windows Mixed Reality
Cookies
Auf den meisten Websites von Microsoft werden Cookies verwendet, kleine, auf Ihrem Gerät platzierte Textdateien, die später von Webservern der Domain, in der sie platziert wurden, abgerufen werden können. Wir verwenden u. U. Cookies, um Ihre Präferenzen und Einstellungen zu speichern, bei der Anmeldung zu assistieren, personalisierte Werbung zu schalten und Websitevorgänge zu analysieren. Weitere Informationen finden Sie im Abschnitt
Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
EU-USA, UK-Erweiterung und Schweiz–USA-Datenschutzabkommen
Microsoft erfüllt die EU-USA, die UK-Erweiterung für die EU-USA und die Schweiz-USA.-Datenschutzabkommens. Weitere Informationen finden Sie im Abschnitt
Wo wir personenbezogene Daten speichern und verarbeiten
, und
besuchen Sie die Website des Datenschutzabkommen des US-Handelsministeriums’
.
Kontakt
Wenn Sie Fragen oder Beschwerden zum Thema Datenschutz oder eine Frage an den Datenschutzbeauftragten von Microsoft haben (Microsoft Chief Privacy Officer oder EU Data Protection Officer), wenden Sie sich bitte unter
Webformular
an uns. Weitere Informationen zu Kontakten mit Microsoft, einschließlich Microsoft Ireland Operations Limited, finden Sie im Abschnitt
So kontaktieren Sie uns
dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen.
Der Schutz Ihrer Daten ist uns sehr wichtig. In diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen wird erläutert, welche personenbezogenen Daten von Microsoft erfasst werden sowie wie und wofür das Unternehmen sie verwendet.
Microsoft bietet eine Vielzahl von Produkten an, inklusive Serverprodukte, die verwendet werden, um den Betrieb von Unternehmen weltweit zu unterstützen, Geräte, die Sie in Ihrem Haus verwenden, Software, die Schüler in der Schule verwenden, und Services, die Entwickler zum Erstellen und Hosten von zukünftiger Technologie nutzen. Verweise auf Microsoft-Produkte in dieser Bestimmung beziehen sich auf Microsoft-Dienste, Websites, Apps, Software, Server und Geräte von Microsoft.
Bitte lesen Sie in diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen die produktspezifischen Details, die zusätzliche relevante Informationen enthalten. Diese Datenschutzbestimmungen gelten für die Interaktionen von Microsoft mit Ihnen und für die im Folgenden aufgeführten Microsoft-Produkte sowie für andere Microsoft-Produkte, die diese Datenschutzbestimmungen enthalten.
Junge Menschen möchten vielleicht lieber, mit der Seite
"Datenschutz für junge Menschen"
beginnen. Auf dieser Seite werden Informationen hervorgehoben, die für junge Menschen hilfreich sein können.
Personen in den Vereinigten Staaten finden in unseren
Datenschutzhinweisen für US-Bundesstaaten
und in der
Datenschutzrichtlinie für Gesundheitsdaten von Verbrauchern
weitere Informationen über die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten und Ihre Rechte gemäß den geltenden Datenschutzgesetzen der US-Bundesstaaten.
Von uns erfasste personenbezogene Daten
Microsoft sammelt Daten über Sie, durch unsere Interaktionen mit Ihnen sowie über unsere Produkte. Einige dieser Daten stellen Sie direkt bereit, andere erhalten wir durch das Sammeln von Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten, Nutzung und Erfahrungen mit unseren Produkten. Die von uns erfassten Daten hängen vom Kontext Ihrer Interaktionen mit Microsoft und den von Ihnen getroffenen Entscheidungen ab, einschließlich Ihrer Datenschutzeinstellungen und der von Ihnen verwendeten Produkte und Funktionen. Wir erhalten auch Daten über Sie von verbundenen Unternehmen, Tochtergesellschaften und Dritten von Microsoft.
Wenn Sie eine Organisation, z. B. ein Unternehmen oder eine Schule, vertreten, die Unternehmens- und Entwicklerprodukte von Microsoft verwendet, lesen Sie bitte den Abschnitt
Unternehmens- und Entwicklerprodukte
dieser Datenschutzerklärung, um zu erfahren, wie wir Ihre Daten verarbeiten. Wenn Sie ein Endbenutzer eines Microsoft-Produkts oder eines von Ihrer Organisation bereitgestellten Microsoft-Kontos sind, finden Sie weitere Informationen in den Abschnitten
Produkte, die von Ihrer Organisation bereitgestellt werden
und
Microsoft-Konto
.
Bezüglich der verwendeten Technologie und der gemeinsam genutzten Daten haben Sie mehrere Optionen. Wenn Sie aufgefordert werden, personenbezogene Daten zur Verfügung zu stellen, können Sie dies jederzeit ablehnen. Viele unserer Produkte nutzen personenbezogene Daten, die Sie über einen Dienst bereitstellen. Wenn Sie sich dazu entscheiden, die notwendigen Daten, die für eine Bereitstellung eines Produkts oder einer Funktion erforderlich sind, nicht anzugeben, werden Sie das Produkt oder die Funktion nicht nutzen können. Wir müssen ebenfalls personenbezogene Daten gesetzlich sammeln, wenn wir einen Vertrag mit Ihnen unterzeichnen oder eingehen. Wenn Sie keine Daten angeben möchten, können wir mit Ihnen keinen Vertrag eingehen. Sollte sich dies auf ein vorhandenes Produkt beziehen, das Sie verwenden, müssen wir die Nutzung anhalten oder abbrechen. Wir werden Sie darüber benachrichtigen, wenn dies der Fall ist. Wenn die Bereitstellung der Daten optional ist, und Sie sich entscheiden, keine personenbezogenen Daten freizugeben, funktionieren Features wie die Personalisierung, die diese Daten verwenden, nicht für Sie.
Microsoft erfasst für verschiedene Zwecke Daten durch unsere Interaktionen mit Ihnen und durch unsere Produkte, wie unten beschrieben wird, um effektiv zu arbeiten und Ihnen die besten Erfahrungen mit unseren Produkten bieten zu können. Sie stellen einige dieser Daten direkt bereit, z. B. wenn Sie ein Microsoft-Konto erstellen, das Lizenzierungskonto Ihrer Organisation verwalten, eine Suchanfrage an Bing senden, sich für ein Microsoft-Ereignis registrieren, ein Dokument auf OneDrive hochladen, sich für Microsoft 365 anmelden oder uns für Support kontaktieren. Einige dieser Daten erhalten wird, indem wir Informationen über Ihre Interaktionen, Nutzung und Erfahrung mit unseren Produkten und Kommunikationen sammeln. Darüber hinaus erhalten wir Daten von verbundenen Unternehmen, Tochtergesellschaften und Dritten von Microsoft.
Die Verarbeitung von Daten basiert auf verschiedenen gesetzlichen Vorschriften und Berechtigungen (manchmal „Rechtsgrundlagen“ genannt), Ihrer Zustimmung, einer Abwägung legitimer Interessen, der Notwendigkeit, Verträge abzuschließen und auszuführen, und der Einhaltung rechtlicher Verpflichtungen für eine Vielzahl unten beschriebener Zwecke.
Wir erhalten ebenfalls Daten von Drittanbietern. Wir schützen die Daten von Drittanbietern gemäß den in den vorliegenden Bestimmungen beschriebenen Richtlinien und alle anderen Einschränkungen der Quellen, aus der die Daten stammen. Diese Drittanbieter-Quellen können sich mit der Zeit ändern und enthalten:
Daten-Broker, von denen wir demografische Daten erwerben, um die erhobenen Daten zu ergänzen.
Dienste, die benutzergenerierte Inhalte von ihren Diensten an Dritte weiterleiten, wie z. B. lokale Unternehmensrezensionen oder öffentliche Social-Media-Beiträge.
Kommunikationsdienste, einschließlich E-Mail-Anbieter und soziale Netzwerke, wenn Sie uns die Berechtigung zum Zugriff auf Ihre Daten auf diese Drittanbieterdienste oder Netzwerke bereitstellen.
Dienstanbieter, die uns dabei helfen, den Standort Ihres Geräts zu bestimmen.
Partner, mit denen wir Co-Branded-Services anbieten oder gemeinsame Marketingaktivitäten betreiben.
Entwickler, die Funktionen für Microsoft-Produkte oder mit deren Hilfe erstellen.
Drittanbieter, die Funktionen durch Microsoft-Produkten bereitstellen.
Öffentlich zugängliche Quellen, wie kommerzielle, akademische oder offene Datensätze aus dem öffentlichen Sektor und andere Datenquellen.
Wenn Sie eine Organisation, z. B. ein Unternehmen oder eine Schule, vertreten, die Enterprise- und Entwicklerprodukte von Microsoft verwendet, lesen Sie bitte den Abschnitt
Enterprise- und Entwicklerprodukte
dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen, um zu erfahren, wie wir Ihre Daten verarbeiten. Wenn Sie ein Endbenutzer eines Microsoft-Produkts oder ein von Ihrer Organisation bereitgestelltes Microsoft-Konto sind, finden Sie weitere Informationen in den Abschnitten
Produkten, die von Ihrer Organisation
bereitgestellt werden, und in den
Microsoft-Konto
.
Bezüglich der verwendeten Technologie und der gemeinsam genutzten Daten haben Sie mehrere Optionen. Wenn Sie aufgefordert werden, personenbezogene Daten zur Verfügung zu stellen, können Sie dies allerdings ablehnen. Viele unserer Produkte nutzen personenbezogene Daten, um den Dienst auszuführen und bereitzustellen. Wenn Sie sich dazu entscheiden, keine Daten anzubieten, die für eine Bereitstellung und Ausführung eines Produkts oder einer Funktion erforderlich sind, werden Sie möglicherweise nicht in der Lage sein, das Produkt oder die Funktion zu verwenden. Wir müssen ebenfalls personenbezogene Daten gesetzlich sammeln, wenn wir einen Vertrag mit Ihnen unterzeichnen oder eingehen. Wenn Sie keine Daten angeben möchten, können wir mit Ihnen keinen Vertrag eingehen. Sollte sich dies auf ein vorhandenes Produkt beziehen, das Sie verwenden, müssen wir die Nutzung anhalten oder abbrechen. Wir werden Sie darüber benachrichtigen, wenn dies der Fall ist. Wenn die Bereitstellung der Daten optional ist, und Sie sich entscheiden, keine personenbezogenen Daten freizugeben, funktionieren Features wie die Personalisierung, die die Daten verwenden, nicht für Sie.
Die erhobenen Daten sind vom Kontext Ihrer Interaktionen mit Microsoft abhängig, Ihren Präferenzen (einschließlich der Datenschutzeinstellungen), den Produkten und Features, die Sie verwenden, Ihrem Standort und den dort geltenden Gesetzen
.
Die von uns erhobenen Daten können folgendes umfassen:
Name und Kontaktdaten
. Ihren Vor- und Nachnamen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, Postanschrift, Telefonnummer und andere ähnliche Kontaktdaten.
Anmeldeinformationen
. Kennwörter, Kennworthinweise und ähnliche Sicherheitsinformationen, die zur Authentifizierung und für den Kontozugriff verwendet werden.
Demografische Daten
. Daten über Sie, z. B. Ihr Alter, Geschlecht, Land und Ihre bevorzugte Sprache.
Zahlungsdaten
. Daten, die für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Zahlung wichtig sind, wie beispielsweise Ihre Zahlungsmittelnummer (z. B. die Kreditkartennummer) und den mit dem Zahlungsmittel verbundenen Sicherheitscode.
Daten über Lizenzen und Abonnements
. Informationen über Ihre Abonnements, Lizenzen und andere Ansprüche.
Interaktionen
. Daten über die Verwendung von Microsoft-Produkten. In einigen Fällen wie z. B. bei Suchanfragen sind dies Daten, die Sie bereitstellen, um die Produkte verwenden zu können. In anderen Fällen wie z. B. bei Fehlerberichten sind dies Daten, die wir generieren. Weitere Beispiele für Interaktionsdaten umfassen:
Geräte- und Nutzungsdaten
. Daten über Ihr Gerät und die Produkte und Features, die Sie verwenden, einschließlich der Informationen über Ihre Hardware und Software, die Leistung unserer Produkte, sowie Ihre Einstellungen. Zum Beispiel:
Zahlungs- und Kontoverlauf
. Daten über die von Ihnen gekauften Artikel und die mit Ihrem Konto verbundenen Aktivitäten.
Browserverlauf
. Daten über die von Ihnen besuchten Webseiten.
Geräte-, Verbindungs- und Konfigurationsdaten
. Daten über Ihr Gerät, Ihre Gerätekonfiguration und Netzwerke in der Nähe. Zum Beispiel Daten über die auf Ihrem Gerät installierten Betriebssysteme und andere Software, einschließlich Produktschlüssel. Außerdem die IP-Adresse, Gerätekennungen (z. B. die IMEI-Nummer bei Telefonen), Regional- und Spracheinstellungen sowie Informationen über WLAN-Zugangspunkte in der Nähe Ihres Geräts.
Fehlerberichte und Leistungsdaten
. Daten über die Leistung der Produkte und etwaige Probleme, die bei Ihnen auftreten, einschließlich Fehlerberichte. Fehlerberichte (manchmal auch „Crash Dumps“ genannt) können Details über die Software oder Hardware enthalten, die mit dem Fehler in Verbindung steht, den Inhalt der Dateien, die beim Auftreten des Fehlers geöffnet wurden, und Daten über andere Software auf Ihrem Gerät.
Problembehandlung und Hilfedaten
. Daten, die Sie uns zur Verfügung stellen, wenn Sie Microsoft um Hilfe bitten, z. B. die von Ihnen verwendeten Produkte und andere Details, die uns bei der Unterstützung helfen. Zum Beispiel Kontakt- oder Authentifizierungsdaten, der Inhalt Ihrer Chats und anderer Kommunikation mit Microsoft, Daten über den Zustand Ihres Geräts und die Produkte, die Sie im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer Hilfeanfrage verwenden. Wenn Sie sich an uns wenden, z. B. für Kundensupport, können Telefongespräche oder Chat-Sitzungen mit unseren Beratern überwacht und aufgezeichnet werden.
Bot-Nutzungsdaten
. Interaktionen mit Bots und Fähigkeiten, die über Microsoft-Produkte verfügbar sind, einschließlich Bots und Fähigkeiten, die von Drittanbietern bereitgestellt werden.
Interessen und Favoriten
. Daten über Ihre Interessen und Favoriten wie z. B. die Mannschaften, denen Sie in einem Sportteam folgen, Ihre bevorzugte Programmiersprache, die Aktien, die Sie verfolgen oder die Lieblingsstädte, die Sie für das Wetter oder den Verkehr hinzufügen. Zusätzlich zu den Daten, die Sie ausdrücklich angeben, können Ihre Interessen und Favoriten auch aus anderen von uns erfassten Daten abgeleitet werden, z. B. aus Ihren Interaktionen auf Websites, auf denen unsere Technologie zur Anzeige oder Messung von Werbung eingesetzt wird.
Nutzungsdaten von Inhalten
. Informationen zu Media-Inhalten (z. B. TV, Video, Musik, Audio, Lehrbücher, Apps und Spiele), auf die Sie über unsere Produkte zugreifen.
Suchvorgänge und Befehle
. Suchvorgänge und Befehle beim Verwenden von Microsoft-Produkten mithilfe der Suchvorgänge- und Befehlsfunktion, wie z. B. Interaktionen mit einem Chatbot.
Sprachdaten
. Ihre Sprachdaten, manchmal auch „Sprachclips“ genannt, wie beispielsweise Suchabfragen, Befehle oder gesprochene Diktate, welche auch Hintergrundgeräusche beinhalten können.
Text-, Freihand- und Eingabedaten
. Text-, Eingabe- und Freihanddaten und verwandte Informationen. Wenn wir beispielsweise Freihanddaten sammeln, erfassen wir Informationen über die Platzierung des Freihandeingabeinstruments auf Ihrem Gerät.
Images
. Bilder und verwandte Informationen wie z. B. Bild-Metadaten. Zum Beispiel erfassen wir das Bild, das Sie bereitstellen, wenn Sie einen Bing-Dienst mit Bildaktivierung verwenden.
Kontakte und Beziehungen
. Daten über Ihre Kontakte und Beziehungen, wenn Sie ein Produkte verwenden, um Informationen auszutauschen, Kontakte zu verwalten oder um mit anderen Personen zu interagieren oder unsere Produktivität zu steigern.
Funktionen und Daten für das soziale Netzwerk
. Informationen über Ihre Beziehungen und die Interaktionen zwischen Ihnen und anderen Personen und Organisationen wie z. B. die Art der Kommunikation (z. B. Vorlieben, Abneigungen, Ereignisse usw.) mit diesen Personen und Organisationen.
Standortdaten
. Daten über die Geräteposition, die entweder genau oder ungenau sein können. Zum Beispiel erfassen wir Positionsdaten mithilfe des Global Navigation Satellite System (GNSS) (GPS) und Daten über Mobilfunkmasten und WLAN-Hotspots in Ihrer Nähe. Positionsdaten enthalten beispielsweise einen Standort, der von Ihrer IP-Adresse oder Daten auf Ihrem Kontoprofil abgeleitet wurde. Oder es handelt sich um Daten (wie z. B. eine Stadt oder einen Postleitzahlbereich), die mit geringerer Genauigkeit Aufschluss darüber geben, wo Sie sich aufhalten.
Andere Eingaben
. Andere Angaben werden bereitgestellt, wenn Sie unsere Produkte verwenden. Beispielsweise Daten wie die Schaltflächen, die Sie auf einem Xbox Wireless-Controller über das Xbox-Netzwerk drücken, Skelett-Trackingdaten, wenn sie Kinect verwenden, und andere Sensordaten, wie die Anzahl der Schritte, die Sie ausführen, wenn Sie Geräte mit entsprechenden Sensoren verwenden. Wenn Sie an einem In-Store-Event teilnehmen, werden die Daten erfasst, die Sie bereitstellen, wenn Sie sich für oder während des Events registrieren; wenn Sie an einer Gewinnaktion teilnehmen, werden die von Ihnen in das Teilnahmeformular eingegebenen Daten erfasst.
Inhalte
. Der Inhalt Ihrer Dateien und Kommunikationen, die Sie eingeben, hochladen, erhalten, erstellen und steuern. Wenn Sie beispielsweise eine Datei über Skype an einen anderen Skype-Benutzer übertragen, müssen wir den Inhalt dieser Datei für Sie und den anderen Benutzer sammeln. Wenn Sie eine E-Mail mithilfe von Outlook.com erhalten, müssen wir den Inhalt dieser E-Mail erheben, um Sie in Ihrem Posteingang auszuliefern, Ihnen diese anzuzeigen, Ihnen die Möglichkeit zu geben, darauf zu antworten, und sie solange zu speichern, bis Sie entscheiden, sie zu löschen. Zu anderen Inhalten, die wir erfassen, wenn wir Ihnen Produkte zur Verfügung stellen, gehören:
Kommunikation, einschließlich Audio, Video, Text (eingetippt, diktiert oder anderweitig), in einer Nachricht, einer E-Mail, einem Anruf, einer Besprechungsanfrage oder einem Chat.
Fotos, Bilder, Lieder, Filme, Software und andere Medien oder Dokumente, die Sie mit unserer Cloud speichern, abrufen oder anderweitig verarbeiten.
Videos oder Aufzeichnungen
. Aufnahmen von Ereignissen und Aktivitäten in Microsoft-Gebäuden, Einzelhandelsumgebungen und anderen Orten. An unseren Microsoft Store-Standorten, unseren anderen Einrichtungen oder bei Veranstaltungen von Microsoft können Ihr Bild und Ihre Stimme möglicherweise erfasst werden.
Feedback und Bewertungen
. Informationen und Inhalte von Meldungen, die Sie uns senden, wie beispielsweise Feedback, Umfragedaten und Produktbeurteilungen, die Sie schreiben.
Datenverkehrsdaten
. Daten, die durch Ihre Verwendung von Kommunikationsdiensten von Microsoft generiert werden. Datenverkehrsdaten geben an, mit wem Sie kommuniziert haben und wann Ihre Kommunikation stattgefunden hat. Wir werden Ihre Datenverkehrsdaten nur insoweit verarbeiten, wie es zur Bereitstellung, Wartung und Verbesserung unserer Kommunikationsdienste notwendig ist, und nur mit Ihrem Einverständnis.
Die nachfolgenden produktspezifischen Abschnitte beschreiben die Datenerfassungspraktiken, die für die Verwendung solcher Produkte gelten.
Zusammenfassung anzeigen
Weitere Infos
Zurück zum Anfang
Wie wir personenbezogene Daten verwenden
Microsoft verwendet die Daten, die wir erfassen, um Ihnen umfangreiche, interaktive Benutzererfahrungen zu ermöglichen. Insbesondere verwenden wir Daten für Folgendes:
Bereitstellung unserer Produkte, einschließlich Aktualisierung, Sicherung, Problembehandlung und Support. Dies umfasst auch das Freigeben von Daten, wenn erforderlich, um den Dienst bereitzustellen oder die Transaktionen auszuführen, die Sie angefordert haben.
Entwickeln und Verbessern von Produkten.
Personalisieren unserer Produkte und Bereitstellen von Empfehlungen.
Unterbreiten von Werbeangeboten an Sie. Dazu gehören der Versand von Werbekommunikation, gezielte Werbung und die Präsentation relevanter Angebote.
Wir verwenden die Daten ebenfalls für unser Unternehmen, inklusive der Analyse und Leistung, der Einhaltung unserer gesetzlichen Verpflichtung, für unsere Belegschaft sowie zur Entwicklung.
Wir kombinieren die erfassten Daten aus verschiedenen Kontexten (z. B. aus der Verwendung von zwei Microsoft-Produkten) oder von Drittanbietern, damit wir Ihnen eine nahtlose, konsistente und personalisierte Erfahrung bieten können, um fundierte Entscheidungen zu treffen oder diese zu anderen legitimen Zwecken zu verwenden.
Die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten für diese Zwecke umfasst sowohl automatisierte als auch manuelle (menschliche) Verarbeitungsmethoden. Unsere automatisierten Methoden stehen häufig im Zusammenhang mit unseren manuellen Methoden und werden von diesen unterstützt. Um beispielsweise unsere automatisierten Verarbeitungsmethoden (einschließlich künstlicher Intelligenz oder KI) aufzubauen, zu trainieren und deren Genauigkeit zu verbessern, überprüfen wir manuell einige der von den automatisierten Methoden erzeugten Ausgaben mit den zugrunde liegenden Daten.
Im Rahmen unserer Bemühungen, unsere Produkte zu verbessern und weiterzuentwickeln, können wir Ihre Daten zur Entwicklung und zum Training unserer KI-Modelle verwenden. Weitere Informationen finden Sie
hier
.
Microsoft verwendet die Daten, die wir erfassen, um umfangreiche, interaktive Benutzererfahrungen bereitzustellen. Insbesondere verwenden wir Daten für Folgendes:
Bereitstellung unserer Produkte, einschließlich Aktualisierung, Sicherung, Problembehandlung und Support. Dies umfasst auch das Freigeben von Daten, wenn erforderlich, um den Dienst bereitzustellen oder die Transaktionen auszuführen, die Sie angefordert haben.
Entwickeln und Verbessern von Produkten.
Personalisieren unserer Produkte und Bereitstellen von Empfehlungen.
Werbung an Sie senden, inklusive Werbeaktionen, zielgerichtete Werbung und das Anbieten relevanter Angebote.
Wir verwenden die Daten ebenfalls für unser Unternehmen, inklusive der Analyse und Leistung, der Einhaltung unserer gesetzlichen Verpflichtung, für unsere Belegschaft sowie zur Entwicklung.
Wir kombinieren daher die erfassten Daten aus verschiedenen Kontexten (z. B. von der Nutzung aus zwei Microsoft-Produkten). Beispielsweise verwendet Microsoft Store Informationen zu den Apps und Diensten, die Sie verwenden, um personalisierte App-Empfehlungen zu erstellen. Wir haben technologische und verfahrensrechtliche Garantien integriert, welche dafür konzipiert sind, bestimmte Datenkombinationen zu verhindern, wenn dies gesetzlich vorgeschrieben ist. Beispielsweise speichern wir Daten, die wir von Ihnen erfassen, wenn Sie nicht authentifiziert (nicht angemeldet) sind, getrennt von allen Kontoinformationen, die Sie direkt identifizieren, wie z. B. Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse oder Ihre Telefonnummer.
Die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten für diese Zwecke umfasst sowohl automatisierte als auch manuelle (menschliche) Verarbeitungsmethoden. Unsere automatisierten Methoden stehen häufig im Zusammenhang mit unseren manuellen Methoden und werden von diesen unterstützt. Um beispielsweise unsere automatisierten Verarbeitungsmethoden (einschließlich künstlicher Intelligenz oder KI) aufzubauen, zu trainieren und deren Genauigkeit zu verbessern, überprüfen wir manuell einige der von den automatisierten Methoden erzeugten Ausgaben mit den zugrunde liegenden Daten.
Im Rahmen unserer Bemühungen, unsere Produkte zu verbessern und weiterzuentwickeln, können wir Ihre Daten zur Entwicklung und zum Training unserer KI-Modelle verwenden. Weitere Informationen finden Sie
hier
.
Zwecke und Rechtsgrundlagen der Verarbeitung
Wenn wir personenbezogene Daten über Sie verarbeiten, tun wir dies mit Ihrer Einwilligung und/oder soweit dies erforderlich ist, um die von Ihnen verwendeten Produkte bereitzustellen, unser Geschäft zu betreiben, unsere vertraglichen und gesetzlichen Verpflichtungen zu erfüllen, die Sicherheit unserer Systeme und unserer Kunden zu schützen oder andere berechtigte Interessen von Microsoft oder Dritten zu erfüllen, wie in diesem Abschnitt und im Abschnitt
Gründe für die Weitergabe personenbezogener Daten
in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschrieben. Unsere Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten können unterschiedlich sein, je nachdem, wie und für welche Produkte und Dienstleistungen wir Ihre Daten verarbeiten.
Wenn wir personenbezogene Daten auf der Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen oder der von Dritten verarbeiten, wägen wir diese Interessen gegen Ihre Rechte und Freiheiten ab und verarbeiten Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nur dann, wenn die berechtigten Interessen, die wir an der Verarbeitung haben, Ihre Interessen nicht überwiegen.
Wenn wir personenbezogene Daten aus dem Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum übertragen, erfolgt dies auf der Grundlage einer Vielzahl von rechtlichen Mechanismen, wie im Abschnitt
"Wo wir personenbezogene Daten speichern und verarbeiten"
dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschrieben.
Weitere Informationen zur Verarbeitung:
Bereitstellen unserer Produkte
. Wir verwenden Daten, um unserer Produkte zu verbessern und Ihnen umfangreiche, interaktive Benutzererfahrungen zu bieten. Wenn Sie beispielsweise OneDrive verwenden, verarbeiten wir die auf OneDrive hochgeladenen Dokumente, damit Sie diese auf Wunsch und im Rahmen des Dienstes abrufen, löschen, bearbeiten, weiterleiten oder verarbeiten können. Wenn Sie eine Suchabfrage in der Bing-Suchmaschine eingeben, verwenden wir die Abfrage auch, um Ihnen Suchergebnisse anzuzeigen. Da Kommunikation ein Merkmal verschiedener Produkte, Programme und Aktivitäten ist, verwenden wir Daten, um Sie zu kontaktieren. Beispielsweise können wir Sie per Telefon oder E-Mail oder anderweitig darüber informieren, wann ein Abonnement endet, oder um die Lizenz Ihres Kontos zu diskutieren. Wir kommunizieren ebenfalls mit Ihnen, um unsere Produkte zu schützen, indem wie Sie beispielsweise darüber informieren, wenn Produkt-Updates verfügbar sind.
Produktverbesserung
. Wir verwenden Daten, um unsere Produkte durch das Hinzufügen neuer Features oder Fähigkeiten ständig zu verbessern. Wir verwenden beispielsweise Fehlerberichte, um die Sicherheitsfunktionen zu verbessern, Suchanfragen und Klicks in Bing, um die Relevanz der Suchergebnisse zu verbessern, Nutzungsdaten, die uns bei der Priorisierung neuer Funktionen helfen oder Sprachdaten, um die Spracherkennungsgenauigkeit zu entwickeln und verbessern.
Personalisierung
. Viele Produkte umfassen personalisierte Features, wie zum Beispiel Empfehlungen, die Ihre Produktivität und Ihren Genuss erhöhen. Diese Features verwenden automatisierte Prozesse zum Anpassen Ihrer Produkterfahrungen, basierend auf den Daten, die wir über Sie erfasst haben, wie z. B. Rückschlüsse, die wir über Sie und Ihre Verwendung des Produkts, der Aktivitäten, Interessen und Standorte vornehmen. Wenn Sie Filme in einem Browser auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät streamen, sehen Sie möglicherweise je nach Ihren Einstellungen eine Empfehlung für eine App aus dem Microsoft Store, die effizienter streamt. Wenn Sie ein Microsoft-Konto besitzen, können wir mit Ihrer Erlaubnis die Einstellungen auf mehreren Geräten synchronisieren. Viele unserer Produkte bieten Steuerelemente, um personalisierte Funktionen zu deaktivieren.
Produktaktivierung
. Wir verwenden Daten wie Geräte- und Anwendungstyp, Standort und eindeutige Geräte-, Anwendungs-, Netzwerk- und Abonnementkennungen, um Produkte wenn erforderlich zu aktivieren.
Produktentwicklung
. Wir verwenden Daten, um neue Produkte zu entwickeln. So verwenden wir beispielsweise Daten, oft de-identifiziert, um die Computer- und Produktivitätsanforderungen unserer Kunden besser zu verstehen und um KI-Modelle zu trainieren und zu optimieren, die die Entwicklung neuer Produkte beeinflussen können.
Kundendienst
. Wir verwenden Daten, um Produktprobleme zu beheben und zu diagnostizieren, Kundengeräte zu reparieren und andere Kunden- und Supportdienste bereitzustellen, einschließlich um uns bei der Bereitstellung, Verbesserung und Sicherung der Qualität unserer Produkte, Dienste und Schulungen zu unterstützen und um Sicherheitsvorfälle zu untersuchen. Die Anrufaufzeichnung kann auch dazu verwendet werden, sie basierend auf ihrer Stimme zu authentifizieren oder zu identifizieren, damit Microsoft Supportdienste bereitstellen und Sicherheitsvorfälle untersuchen können.
Helfen Sie bei der Sicherheit und Problembehandlung
. Wir verwenden Daten, um unsere Produkte zu schützen und Probleme zu behandeln. Dazu gehört die Verwendung von Daten zum Schutz der Sicherheit unserer Produkte und Kunden, zum Erkennen von Schadsoftware und böswilligen Aktivitäten, zur Problembehandlung bei Leistungs- und Kompatibilitätsproblemen, um Kunden dabei zu helfen, ihre Umgebung optimal zu gestalten und die Kunden über Updates unserer Produkte zu benachrichtigen. Dazu gehören u. a. automatisierte Systeme, um Sicherheitsprobleme zu erkennen.
Sicherheit
. Wir verwenden Daten, um die Sicherheit unserer Produkte und unserer Kunden zu schützen. Unsere Sicherheitsfunktionen und -produkte können die Funktion von Schadsoftware unterbrechen und Benutzer darüber benachrichtigen, falls Schadsoftware auf deren Geräten gefunden wurde. Beispielsweise scannen unsere Produkte wie Outlook.com oder OneDrive systematisch Inhalte auf automatisierte Weise, um mutmaßlichen Spam, Viren, missbräuchliche Handlungen oder URLs, die als Betrug gekennzeichnet wurden, sowie Phishing- oder Malware-Links zu identifizieren. Wir können die Versendung einer Mitteilung blockieren oder Inhalte entfernen, wenn ein Verstoß gegen unsere AGB vorliegt.
In Übereinstimmung mit der Verordnung (EU) 2021/1232 der Europäischen Union haben wir die durch diese Verordnung erlaubte Abweichung von Artikel 5 (1) und 6 (1) der EU-Richtlinie 2002/58/EG in Anspruch genommen. Wir verwenden Scantechnologien, um digitale Signaturen (so genannte „Hashes“) von bestimmten Bildern und Videoinhalten auf unseren Systemen zu erstellen. Diese Technologien vergleichen dann die von ihnen erzeugten Hashes mit Hashes von gemeldeten Bildern von sexueller Ausbeutung und sexuellem Missbrauch von Kindern (bekannt als „Hash-Set“) in einem Prozess, der „Hash-Matching“ genannt wird. Microsoft bezieht Hash-Sets von Organisationen, die sich im öffentlichen Interesse gegen den sexuellen Missbrauch von Kindern einsetzen. Dies kann zu einem Informationsaustausch mit dem National Center for Missing and Exploited Children (NCMEC) und den Strafverfolgungsbehörden führen.
Updates
. Wir verwenden die erfassten Daten, um Produktupdates und Sicherheitspatches zu entwickeln. Beispielsweise verwenden wir Informationen zu den Funktionen Ihres Geräts, z. B. über den verfügbaren Arbeitsspeicher, um Ihnen ein Software-Update oder Sicherheitspatch bereitzustellen. Updates und Patches sollen Ihre Erfahrung mit unseren Produkten optimieren, Ihnen beim Datenschutz und der Sicherheit Ihrer Daten helfen, neue Features anbieten und feststellen, ob Ihr Gerät solche Updates verarbeiten kann.
Werbemitteilungen
. Wir verwenden erfasste Daten, um Ihnen Werbeaktionen anzubieten. Sie können sich für E-Mail-Abonnements registrieren und wählen, ob Sie Werbemitteilungen von Microsoft per E-Mail, SMS, Briefpost oder Telefon erhalten möchten. Informationen zur Verwaltung Ihrer Kontaktdaten, E-Mail-Abonnements und Werbemitteilungen finden Sie im Abschnitt
Zugriff auf persönliche Daten und Steuerung
in dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Relevanten Angebote
. Microsoft verwendet Daten, um Ihnen relevante und wertvolle Informationen zu unseren Produkten bereitzustellen. Wir analysieren Daten aus einer Vielzahl von Quellen, um Informationen vorherzusagen, die interessant und für Sie relevant sind und um Ihnen solche Informationen auf verschiedene Art und Weise zu unterbreiten. Wir können z. B. Ihr Interesse an Spielen vorhersagen und Sie über neue Spiele informieren, die Sie interessieren könnten.
Werbung
. Microsoft verwendet keine Ihrer Inhalte aus E-Mails, Chats zwischen zwei Menschen, Videoanrufen oder Voicemails oder Ihren Dokumenten, Fotos oder anderen persönlichen Dateien, um damit Werbung für Sie zu erzeugen. Wir verwenden Daten, die wir durch unsere Interaktionen mit Ihnen, durch einige unserer Produkte, Dienste, Apps und Web-Objekte (Microsoft-Eigentum) sowie auf Web-Objekten von Drittanbietern gesammelt haben, für Werbung auf unserem Microsoft-Eigentum und auf Web-Eigentum von Drittanbietern. Und verwenden automatisierte Prozesse dazu, um der angezeigten Werbung mehr Relevanz zu verleihen. Weitere Informationen dazu, wie Ihre Daten für Werbung verwendet werden, finden Sie im Abschnitt
Werbung
dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Gewinnaktionen und Events
. Wir verwenden Ihre Daten zum Verwalten von Gewinnaktionen und Events, die in unseren physischen Microsoft Stores verfügbar sind. Wenn Sie beispielsweise an einer Gewinnaktion teilnehmen, verwenden wir Ihre Daten zum Auswählen eines Gewinners und um Ihnen den Preis bereitzustellen, falls Sie gewinnen sollten. Oder wenn Sie sich für einen Coding-Workshop oder ein Gaming-Event registrieren, fügen wir Ihren Namen zur Liste der erwarteten Teilnehmer hinzu.
Transaktionsprozesse
. Wir verwenden Daten, um Ihre Transaktionen mit uns durchzuführen. Beispielsweise verarbeiten wir Zahlungsinformationen, um Kunden Produktabonnements anzubieten und mithilfe der Kontaktinformationen aus dem Microsoft Store erworbene Waren bereitzustellen.
Berichterstattung und Geschäftsvorgänge
. Wir verwenden Daten, um unsere Vorgänge zu analysieren und Business Intelligence auszuführen. Dadurch können wir informierte Entscheidungen treffen und die Leistung unserer Geschäftstätigkeit erfassen.
Schutz von Recht und Eigentum
. Wir verwenden Daten, um Betrug zu erkennen und zu verhindern, Streitfälle zu schlichten, Vereinbarungen durchzusetzen und unser Eigentum zu schützen. Beispielsweise verwenden wir Daten, um die Gültigkeit von Softwarelizenzen zu bestätigen und so Softwarepiraterie zu verringern. Wir können mithilfe von automatisierten Prozessen Aktivitäten erkennen und verhindern, die unsere Rechte und die Rechte Dritter verletzen, wie z. B. Betrug.
Einhaltung gesetzlicher Vorschriften
. Wir verarbeiten Daten, um die geltenden Gesetze einzuhalten. Beispielsweise verwenden wir das Alter unserer Kunden, um uns dabei zu helfen, unsere Verpflichtungen zum Schutz der Privatsphäre von Kindern zu erfüllen. Wir verarbeiten auch Kontaktinformationen und Anmeldeinformationen, um Kunden dabei zu helfen, ihre Datenschutzrechte auszuüben.
Rechereche.
Mit geeigneten technischen und organisatorischen Maßnahmen zum Schutz der Rechte und Freiheiten des Einzelnen nutzen wir Daten zur Durchführung von Forschungsarbeiten, einschließlich erweiterter Funktionen für maschinelles Lernen und künstliche Intelligenz, zum Wohle des öffentlichen Interesses und für wissenschaftliche Zwecke.
Zusammenfassung anzeigen
Weitere Infos
Zurück zum Anfang
Warum wir personenbezogene Daten teilen
Wir teilen Ihre personenbezogenen Daten mit Ihrer Zustimmung oder um eine Transaktion abzuschließen oder ein Produkt anbieten zu können, das Sie angefordert oder autorisiert haben. Wir teilen Daten auch mit von Microsoft kontrollierten Tochtergesellschaften und mit Lieferanten, die für uns arbeiten. Wir teilen Daten, wenn dies gesetzlich vorgeschrieben ist oder um auf rechtliche Verfahren zu reagieren; um unsere Kunden zu schützen; um Leben zu schützen; um die Sicherheit unserer Produkte zu gewährleisten und um die Rechte und das Eigentum von Microsoft und seinen Kunden zu schützen.
Bitte beachten Sie, dass sich die „Freigabe“ gemäß der Definition in bestimmten Datenschutzgesetzen von US-amerikanischen Staaten auch auf die Bereitstellung personenbezogener Daten an Drittanbieter für personalisierte Werbezwecke bezieht. Weitere Informationen finden Sie unten im Abschnitt
Datenschutz in U.S.-Bundesstaaten
und unseren
Hinweisen auf die Datenschutzgesetze der U.S.-Bundesstaaten
.
Wir teilen Ihre personenbezogenen Daten mit Ihrer Zustimmung oder nach Bedarf, um eine Transaktion abzuschließen oder ein Produkt anbieten zu können, das Sie angefordert oder autorisiert haben. Zum Beispiel teilen wir Ihre Inhalte mit Drittanbietern, wenn Sie uns anweisen, dies so zu tun, wie zum Beispiel, wenn Sie eine E-Mail an einen Freund senden, Fotos und Dokumente auf OneDrive teilen oder Konten mit einem anderen Dienst verknüpfen. Wenn Sie ein Microsoft-Produkt, das von einer mit Ihnen verbundenen Organisation wie Ihrem Arbeitgeber oder Ihrer Schule bereitgestellt wird, oder eine von einer solchen Organisation bereitgestellte E-Mail-Adresse verwenden, um auf Microsoft-Produkte zuzugreifen, geben wir bestimmte Daten, z. B. Interaktions- und Diagnosedaten frei, damit Ihre Organisation die Produkte verwalten kann. Wenn Sie Zahlungsdaten liefern, um einen Kauf zu tätigen, werden wir die Zahlungsdaten mit Banken und anderen Unternehmen teilen, die den Zahlungsverkehr bearbeiten oder andere Finanzdienstleistungen anbieten sowie zur Betrugsprävention und für die Kreditrisikominderung. Wenn Sie eine Zahlungsmethode (z. B. eine Karte) auf Ihrem Konto speichern, das Sie und andere Microsoft-Konto-Inhaber zum Tätigen von Käufen bei Microsoft oder seinen verbundenen Unternehmen verwenden, können Ihre Kaufbelege außerdem an alle anderen Personen weitergegeben werden, die die gleiche Zahlungsmethode verwenden und Zugriff auf diese haben, um einen Kauf bei Microsoft zu tätigen, einschließlich der Zahlungsmethode des benannten Kontoinhabers. Wenn Sie Push-Benachrichtigungen für Microsoft-Produkte oder -Anwendungen auf einem Nicht-Windows-Gerät zulassen, verarbeitet das Betriebssystem dieses Geräts einige personenbezogene Daten, um Push-Benachrichtigungen bereitzustellen. Entsprechend kann Microsoft Daten an einen externen Drittanbieter-Benachrichtigungsanbieter senden, um Push-Benachrichtigungen zu übermitteln. Die Push-Benachrichtigungsdienste Ihres Geräts unterliegen ihren eigenen dienstspezifischen Nutzungsbedingungen und Datenschutzbestimmungen.
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten auch für digitale Werbezwecke weiter. Wenn Sie eine Website besuchen oder eine App  verwenden, die Ihnen Werbung zeigen möchte, kann das digitale Objekt Microsoft den Zugriff auf oder den Erhalt von Gerätedaten oder bestimmten anderen Daten ermöglichen, die im Abschnitt Personenbezogene Daten, die wir erfassen oben aufgeführt sind. Wir können diese Informationen dann an Drittanbieter-Werbeplattformen und Werbetreibende weitergeben, um die Bereitstellung und Messung von Anzeigen auf solchen digitalen Objekten zu erleichtern.  Weitere Informationen über die Verwendung Ihrer Daten für Werbezwecke finden Sie in den Abschnitten Werbung und Datenschutz in den US-Bundesstaaten weiter unten.
Darüber hinaus teilen wir personenbezogene Daten mit Microsoft-kontrollierten verbundenen Unternehmen und Tochtergesellschaften. Wir teilen auch personenbezogene Daten mit Lieferanten oder Agenten, die in unserem Namen für die hier beschriebenen Zwecke tätig sind. Zum Beispiel benötigen Unternehmen, die wir beauftragt haben, um den Kundendienst zu unterstützen oder um zu helfen, die Sicherung unserer Systeme und Dienstleistungen zu schützen, Zugang zu personenbezogenen Daten, um diese Funktionen bereitzustellen. In solchen Fällen müssen diese Unternehmen unsere Datenschutz- und Sicherheitsbestimmungen einhalten und dürfen die von uns erhaltenen, personenbezogenen Daten nicht für andere Zwecke verwenden. Des Weiteren kann Microsoft personenbezogene Daten im Rahmen seines unternehmerischen Handelns wie z. B. einer Fusion oder der Veräußerung von Vermögenswerten weitergeben.
Schließlich werden wir personenbezogene Daten, einschließlich Ihrer Inhalte (z. B. den Inhalt Ihrer E-Mails in Outlook.com oder Dateien in privaten Ordnern auf OneDrive) sichern, lesen, übertragen oder offenlegen, wenn wir davon überzeugt sind, dass dies aus folgenden Gründen notwendig ist:
Wir sind dazu nach geltendem Recht gezwungen oder müssen auf gültige rechtliche Anforderungen reagieren, z. B. von Strafverfolgungs- oder anderen Regierungsbehörden.
Die Sicherheit unserer Kunden, Organisationen und der Öffentlichkeit schützen – zum Beispiel, um Spam oder Betrugsversuche oder anderweitige Schäden zu verhindern oder um schädliches oder illegales Verhalten, einschließlich der Erstellung und Weitergabe schädlicher oder illegaler Inhalte, zu erkennen, zu verhindern und zu bekämpfen.
Wir müssen die Sicherheit unserer Produkte gewährleisten oder einen Angriff auf unsere Computersysteme oder Netzwerke verhindern oder stoppen.
Wir müssen die Rechte oder das Eigentum von Microsoft oder die Voraussetzungen zur Nutzung der Dienste schützen. Wenn wir jedoch Informationen erhalten, dass jemand unsere Dienstleistungen für den Handel mit gestohlenem geistigem oder physischem Eigentum von Microsoft benutzt, werden wir Privatinhalte eines Kunden nicht selbst inspizieren, sondern die Angelegenheit an die Strafverfolgungsbehörden weiterleiten.
Weitere Informationen über Daten, die wir als Reaktion auf Anfragen von Strafverfolgungsbehörden und anderen staatlichen Stellen offenlegen, finden Sie in unserem Bericht
Anfragen von Strafverfolgungsbehörden
.
Beachten Sie, dass einige unserer Produkte den Zugriff auf Produkte von Drittanbietern ermöglichen (z. B. über Links), deren Datenschutzpraktiken sich von denen von Microsoft unterscheiden. Wenn Sie personenbezogene Daten an eines dieser Produkte übermitteln, unterliegen Ihre Daten den zugehörigen Datenschutzrichtlinien.
Zusammenfassung anzeigen
Weitere Infos
Zurück zum Anfang
Verwalten Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten
Sie können auch darüber entscheiden, wie Microsoft Ihre Daten erfasst und nutzt. Sie können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, die Microsoft erworben hat, kontrollieren und die Datenschutzrechte ausüben, indem Sie sich an Microsoft wenden oder verschiedene Tools verwenden, die wir bereitstellen. In einigen Fällen sind Ihre Möglichkeiten zur Verwaltung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten eingeschränkt, je nachdem, ob dies gesetzlich vorgeschrieben oder zulässig ist. Wie Sie auf Ihre Daten zugreifen oder diese verwalten können, hängt auch davon ab, welche Produkte Sie verwenden. Sie haben beispielsweise folgende Möglichkeiten:
Steuern Sie die Verwendung Ihrer Daten für personalisierte Werbung von Microsoft, einschließlich Xandr, indem Sie unsere
Abmeldeseite
besuchen.
Sie können wählen, ob Sie Werbe-E-Mails, SMS-Nachrichten, Anrufe und Post von Microsoft erhalten möchten.
Sie können auf einige Ihrer Daten über das
Microsoft-Datenschutzdashboard
zugreifen und sie löschen.
Nicht alle von Microsoft verarbeiteten personenbezogenen Daten können über die oben genannten Tools abgerufen oder verwaltet werden. Wenn Sie auf von Microsoft verarbeitete personenbezogene Daten zugreifen möchten, die nicht über die oben genannten Tools oder direkt über die von Ihnen verwendeten Microsoft-Produkte verfügbar sind, können Sie sich jederzeit an Microsoft unter der Adresse im Abschnitt
Kontaktaufnahme
oder über unser
Webformular
wenden.
Wir stellen aggregierte Metriken zu Benutzeranforderungen zur Ausübung Ihrer Datenschutzrechte im
Microsoft-Datenschutzbericht
zur Verfügung.
Sie können auch darüber entscheiden, wie Microsoft Ihre Daten erfasst und nutzt. Sie können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, die Microsoft erworben hat, kontrollieren und die Datenschutzrechte ausüben, indem Sie sich an Microsoft wenden oder verschiedene Tools verwenden, die wir bereitstellen. In einigen Fällen sind Ihre Möglichkeiten zur Verwaltung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten eingeschränkt, je nachdem, ob dies gesetzlich vorgeschrieben oder zulässig ist. Wie Sie auf Ihre Daten zugreifen oder diese verwalten können, hängt auch davon ab, welche Produkte Sie verwenden. Sie haben beispielsweise folgende Möglichkeiten:
Kontrollieren Sie die Verwendung Ihrer Daten für personalisierte Werbung von Microsoft, indem Sie unsere
Kündigungsseite
besuchen.
Sie können wählen, ob Sie Werbe-E-Mails, SMS-Nachrichten, Anrufe und Post von Microsoft erhalten möchten.
Über das
Microsoft Datenschutz-Dashboard
können Sie auf einige Ihrer Daten zugreifen und sie löschen.
Nicht alle von Microsoft verarbeiteten personenbezogenen Daten können über die oben genannten Tools abgerufen oder verwaltet werden. Wenn Sie auf von Microsoft verarbeitete personenbezogene Daten zugreifen oder diese kontrollieren möchten, die nicht über die oben genannten Tools oder direkt über die von Ihnen verwendeten Microsoft-Produkte verfügbar sind, können Sie sich jederzeit an Microsoft unter der Adresse im Abschnitt
Kontaktaufnahme
oder über unser
Webformular
wenden.
Über den
Microsoft-Datenschutzbericht
stellen wir aggregierte Metriken über Nutzeranfragen zur Ausübung ihrer Datenschutzrechte zur Verfügung.
Sie können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten mit Tools verwalten, die Microsoft für Sie bereitstellt und die nachfolgend beschrieben werden, oder indem Sie sich an Microsoft wenden. Beispiel:
Wenn Microsoft Ihre Zustimmung zur Nutzung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten erhalten hat, können Sie diese Zustimmung jederzeit zurückziehen.
Sie können den Zugriff auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten anfordern, diese löschen und aktualisieren.
Wenn Sie Ihre Daten an anderer Stelle weiterleiten möchten, können Sie die Tools zu diesem Zweck von Microsoft verwenden oder wenn keine verfügbar sind, können Sie Microsoft kontaktieren, um Unterstützung zu erhalten.
Sie können der Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch Microsoft auch widersprechen oder die Verwendung einschränken. Beispielsweise können Sie unserer Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten für Folgendes jederzeit widersprechen:
Direkte Marketingzwecke.
Wenn wir eine Aufgabe im öffentlichen Interesse wahrnehmen oder unsere berechtigten Interessen oder die eines Dritten verfolgen.
Sind haben eventuell das Recht nach geltendem Recht, einschließlich der Datenschutz-Grundverordnung (General Data Protection Regulation, GDPR) der Europäischen Union. Wir bieten diese, unabhängig von Ihrem Standort, an. In einigen Fällen sind Ihre Möglichkeiten zur Verwaltung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten eingeschränkt, je nachdem, ob dies gesetzlich vorgeschrieben oder zulässig ist.
Wenn Ihre Organisation, z. B. Ihr Arbeitgeber, Ihre Schule oder Ihr Dienstanbieter Ihnen Zugriff auf Microsoft-Produkte ermöglicht und deren Verwendung steuert, wenden Sie sich an Ihre Organisation, um weitere Informationen darüber zu erhalten, wie Sie Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwalten können.
Sie können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, die Microsoft erworben hat, kontrollieren und darauf zugreifen, und die Datenschutzrechte auszuüben, indem Sie verschiedene Tools verwenden, die wir bereitstellen. Die nützlichsten Tools für Sie hängen von unserer Interaktionen mit Ihnen und Ihrer Verwendung unserer Produkte ab. Hier ist eine allgemeine Liste der Tools, die wir bereitstellen, damit Sie Ihre personenbezogenen Daten steuern. Bestimmte Produkte bieten weitere Steuerelemente.
Bing.
Wenn Sie bei Bing angemeldet sind, können Sie Ihren gespeicherten Such- und Chatverlauf in Ihrem
Datenschutz-Dashboard
einsehen und löschen. Wenn Sie nicht bei Bing angemeldet sind, können Sie den mit Ihrem Gerät verknüpften gespeicherten Suchverlauf in Ihren
Bing-Einstellungen
anzeigen und löschen.
Microsoft-Konto.
Wenn Sie auf die Profil- und Zahlungsinformationen in Ihrem Microsoft-Konto zugreifen, diese bearbeiten oder entfernen, Ihr Kennwort ändern, Sicherheitsinformationen hinzufügen oder Ihr Konto schließen möchten, können Sie dies auf der Website
Microsoft-Konto
tun.
Wenn Sie ein
Microsoft Developer Network
(MSDN)-Profil haben, können Sie auf Ihre Daten zugreifen und sie bearbeiten, indem Sie sich beim
MSDN-Forum
anmelden.
Microsoft-Datenschutzdashboard
. Sie können einige der Daten, die Microsoft verarbeitet, durch die Verwendung eines Microsoft-Kontos auf dem
Microsoft Datenschutz-Dashboard
kontrollieren. Dort können Sie beispielsweise Browser-, Such- und Positionsdaten, die mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto verknüpft sind, anzeigen und löschen.
Microsoft Store.
Sie können auf Ihr Microsoft Store-Profil und Ihre Kontoinformationen zugreifen, indem Sie
Microsoft Store
besuchen und
Konto ansehen
oder
Bestellverlauf auswählen.
Microsoft Teams für den persönlichen Gebrauch.
Sie können herausfinden, wie Sie Teams-Daten, die sich auf Ihr persönliches Microsoft-Konto beziehen, exportieren oder löschen können, indem Sie diese
Seite
besuchen.
OneDrive.
Sie können Ihre Dateien und Fotos in OneDrive ansehen, herunterladen und löschen, indem Sie sich bei Ihrem
OneDrive
anmelden.
Outlook.com.
Sie können Ihre E-Mails in
Outlook.com
herunterladen, indem Sie sich bei Ihrem Konto anmelden und zu Ihren
Datenschutz- und Daten
-Einstellungen navigieren.
Skype
. Wenn Sie auf einige Profil- und Zahlungsinformationen für Skype zugreifen, diese bearbeiten oder entfernen oder Ihr Kennwort ändern möchten,
melden Sie sich bei Ihrem Konto an
. Wenn Sie Ihr Skype-Chat-Protokoll und die in Skype freigegebenen Dateien exportieren möchten, können Sie
eine Kopie anfordern
.
Volumenlizenz-Service-Center (VLSC).
Wenn Sie ein Volumenlizenz-Kunde sind, können Sie Ihre Kontaktinformationen, Abonnement- und Lizenzierungsdaten an einem Ort kontrollieren, indem Sie die
Volumenlizenz-Service-Center-Website
besuchen.
Xbox
. Wenn Sie das Xbox-Netzwerk oder Xbox.com nutzen, können Sie Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, einschließlich Abrechnungs- und Kontoinformationen, Datenschutzeinstellungen und Präferenzen für die Online-Sicherheit und die gemeinsame Nutzung von Daten anzeigen oder bearbeiten, indem Sie auf
Meine Xbox
auf der Xbox-Konsole oder auf der Website Xbox.com zugreifen.
Nicht alle von Microsoft verarbeiteten personenbezogenen Daten können über die oben genannten Tools abgerufen oder verwaltet werden. Wenn Sie auf von Microsoft verarbeitete personenbezogene Daten zugreifen oder diese kontrollieren möchten, die nicht über die oben genannten Tools oder direkt über die von Ihnen verwendeten Microsoft-Produkte verfügbar sind, können Sie sich jederzeit an Microsoft unter der Adresse im Abschnitt
Kontaktaufnahme
oder über unser
Webformular
wenden. Wir werden wie vom geltenden Recht gefordert auf Anfragen reagieren, um Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zu steuern.
Ihre Kommunikationspräferenzen
Sie haben die Wahl, ob Sie Werbemitteilungen von Microsoft per E-Mail, SMS, Briefpost oder Telefon erhalten möchten. Wenn Sie eine Werbe-E-Mail oder SMS-Nachricht von uns erhalten und diese aber in Zukunft nicht mehr erhalten möchten, befolgen Sie einfach die Anweisungen in dieser Nachricht. Sie können auch Entscheidungen über den Erhalt von Werbe-E-Mails, Telefonanrufen und Post treffen, indem Sie sich mit Ihrem persönlichen Microsoft-Konto anmelden und Ihre
Kommunikationsberechtigungen
einsehen, wo Sie Kontaktinformationen aktualisieren, Microsoft-weite Kontaktpräferenzen verwalten, E-Mail-Abonnements abbestellen und auswählen können, ob Ihre Kontaktinformationen an Microsoft-Partner weitergegeben werden sollen. Wenn Sie kein persönliches Microsoft-Konto haben, können Sie Ihre Microsoft-E-Mail-Kontaktpräferenzen mit diesem
Webformular
verwalten. Diese Auswahlmöglichkeiten gelten nicht für obligatorische Dienstkommunikationen, die Teil gewisser Microsoft-Produkte, Programme und Aktivitäten sind, oder für Umfragen und andere informative Kommunikationsformen mit eigenen Kündigungsverfahren.
Ihre Werbeoptionen
Wenn Sie keine personalisierte Werbung von Microsoft, einschließlich Xandr, mehr erhalten möchten, besuchen Sie unsere
Kündigungsseite
. Nach der Ablehnung wird Ihre Auswahl in einem für Ihren Computer und den verwendeten Webbrowser spezifischen Cookie gespeichert. Dieses Opt-Out-Cookie hat eine Gültigkeit von fünf Jahren. Falls Sie Cookies auf Ihrem Computer löschen, muss die Ablehnung wiederholt werden.
Sie können Ihre Opt-Out-Wahl auch mit Ihrem persönlichen Microsoft-Konto verknüpfen. Diese gilt dann für jedes Gerät, auf dem Sie dieses Konto verwenden, und bleibt bestehen, bis Sie sich mit einem anderen persönlichen Microsoft-Konto an diesem Gerät anmelden. Wenn Sie Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät löschen, müssen Sie sich erneut anmelden, damit die Einstellungen angewendet werden. Sie können
unsere externen Werbepartner
im
Hinweis auf die Datenschutzgesetze der US-Bundesstaaten
anzeigen und sich auf unserer Abmelde-
Seite
von der Freigabe von Daten mit Drittanbietern abmelden.
Für von Microsoft kontrollierte Werbung, die in Apps unter Windows angezeigt wird, können Sie die mit Ihrem persönlichen Microsoft-Konto verknüpfte Ablehnung verwenden. Sie können auch die Werbe-ID in den Windows-Einstellungen deaktivieren, um interessenbezogene Werbung abzulehnen.
Da die für die interessenbezogene Werbung verwendeten Daten auch für andere Zwecke benötigt werden (einschließlich der Bereitstellung unserer Produkte, Analysen und der Betrugserkennung), wird durch ein Abmelden der interessenbezogenen Werbung das Erheben dieser Daten nicht beendet. Sie werden weiterhin Werbung erhalten, auch wenn sie möglicherweise weniger relevant für Sie ist.
Sie können den Erhalt interessensbasierter Werbung von Drittanbietern, mit denen wir eine Partnerschaft haben, ablehnen, indem Sie deren Websites aufrufen (siehe oben).
Browserbasierte Steuerungen
Wenn Sie einen Browser verwenden, können Sie Ihre personenbezogenen Daten durch die Verwendung bestimmter Features steuern. Zum Beispiel:
Cookie-Steuerelemente
. Sie können die von Cookies gespeicherten Daten kontrollieren und Ihre Zustimmung zu Cookies widerrufen, indem Sie die im Abschnitt
Cookies
dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen browserbasierten Cookie-Kontrollen verwenden.
Nachverfolgungsschutz
. Sie können die Daten mithilfe des Tracking-Schutzes im Internet Explorer und Microsoft Edge steuern, die Drittanbieter-Websites über Sie erhalten (Versionen 9 und höher). Dieses Feature blockiert Drittanbieterinhalte, einschließlich der Cookies von allen Websites, die in der Liste für den Tracking-Schutz aufgeführt sind, die Sie hinzufügen.
Browsersteuerung für "Do Not Track."
Einige Browser haben "Do Not Track" (DNT)-Funktionen eingebaut, die den von Ihnen besuchten Websites signalisieren können, dass Sie nicht verfolgt werden möchten. Da es noch keine gemeinsame Verständigung darüber gibt, wie das DNT-Signal interpretiert werden soll, reagieren Microsoft-Dienste momentan nicht auf Browser-DNT-Signale. Wir werden weiterhin mit der Onlinebranche zusammenarbeiten, um eine allgemeine Übereinkunft der DNT-Signale zu definieren. In der Zwischenzeit können Sie die Bandbreite anderer Werkzeuge benutzen, die wir zur Verfügung stellen, um die Datenerfassung und die Nutzung zu steuern, einschließlich der oben beschriebenen Möglichkeit, sich vom Erhalt interessenbezogener Werbung von Microsoft abzumelden.
Zusammenfassung anzeigen
Weitere Infos
Zurück zum Anfang
Cookies und ähnliche Technologien
Cookies sind kleine Textdateien, die auf Ihrem Gerät platziert werden und Daten sammeln, die später von einem Webserver der Domain gelesen werden können, der das Cookie platziert hat. Wir verwenden Cookies und ähnliche Technologien, um Ihre Präferenzen und Einstellungen zu speichern und einzuhalten. So können Sie sich anmelden, interessenbezogene Werbung zulassen, Betrug bekämpfen, die Leistung unserer Produkte analysieren und andere legitime Zwecke erfüllen. Microsoft-Apps verwenden für ähnliche Zwecke zusätzliche Bezeichner, z. B. die Werbe-ID in Windows, die im Abschnitt
Werbe-ID
dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschrieben ist.
Wir verwenden auch Webbeacons, um dabei zu helfen, Cookies zu liefern und Nutzungs- und Leistungsdaten zu erheben. Unsere Websites können Webbeacons, Cookies oder ähnliche Technologien von Microsoft-Tochtergesellschaften und -Partnern sowie Drittanbietern enthalten, z.B. Dienstanbietern, die in unserem Auftrag handeln.
Cookies von Drittanbietern können Folgendes umfassen: Social Media-Cookies, um Ihnen Werbung und Inhalte auf der Grundlage Ihrer Social Media-Profile und Aktivitäten auf unseren Websites zu zeigen; Analytics-Cookies, um besser zu verstehen, wie Sie und andere unsere Websites nutzen, damit wir sie verbessern können und damit Drittanbieter ihre eigenen Produkte und Dienstleistungen verbessern können; Werbe-Cookies, um Ihnen Werbung zu zeigen, die für Sie relevant ist; und erforderliche Cookies, um wesentliche Website-Funktionen durchzuführen. Bei Bedarf holen wir Ihre Zustimmung ein, bevor wir optionale Cookies platzieren oder verwenden, die nicht (i) unbedingt erforderlich sind, um die Website bereitzustellen; oder (ii) um eine Kommunikation zu erleichtern.
Weitere Informationen zur Verwendung von Cookies von Drittanbietern, Webbeacons und Analysediensten sowie zu anderen ähnlichen Technologien auf unseren Websites und Diensten finden Sie weiter unten im Abschnitt "Weitere Informationen". Für eine Liste der Drittanbieter, die Cookies auf unseren Websites bereitstellen (einschließlich der in unserem Auftrag agierenden Dienstanbietern), besuchen Sie bitte unseren
Drittanbieter-Cookies
-Inventar. Auf einigen unserer Websites ist eine Liste von Drittanbietern direkt auf der Website verfügbar. Die Drittanbieter auf diesen Websites sind möglicherweise nicht in der Liste unseres
Drittanbieter-Cookieinventars
enthalten.
Sie haben eine Vielzahl von Tools zum Steuern der Cookies, Webbeacons und ähnlicher Technologien, um die gesammelten Daten zu steuern. Sie können beispielsweise mithilfe der Steuerelemente in Ihrem Internetbrowser festlegen, in welchem Umfang die von Ihnen besuchten Websites Cookies verwenden dürfen, und Zustimmungen widerrufen, indem Sie Cookies löschen oder blockieren.
Cookies sind kleine Textdateien, die auf Ihrem Gerät platziert werden und Daten sammeln, die später von einem Webserver der Domain gelesen werden können, der das Cookie platziert hat. Die Daten bestehen oft aus einer Reihe von Zahlen und Buchstaben, die Ihren Computer eindeutig identifizieren. Es kann jedoch auch weitere Informationen enthalten. Manche Cookies werden von Drittanbietern platziert, die in unserem Auftrag arbeiten. Wir verwenden Cookies und ähnliche Technologien für das Speichern Ihrer Präferenzen und Einstellungen, was Ihre Anmeldung, das Bereitstellen personalisierter Werbung, das Bekämpfen von Betrug, und Analysen, wie unsere Produkte funktionieren sowie andere seriöse Zwecke, erfüllt. Microsoft-Apps verwenden für ähnliche Zwecke zusätzliche Bezeichner, z. B. die Werbe-ID in Windows, und viele unserer Websites und Anwendungen enthalten auch Webbeacons oder ähnliche Technologien, wie unten beschrieben.
Unsere Verwendung von Cookies und ähnlicher Technologien
Je nach Produkt und Kontext verwendet Microsoft Cookies und ähnliche Technologien für verschiedene Zwecke, darunter:
Speichern Ihrer Präferenzen und Einstellungen
. Wir verwenden Cookies zum Speichern Ihrer Präferenzen und Einstellungen auf Ihrem Gerät, und um Ihre Erfahrung zu verbessern. Wenn Sie beispielsweise, je nach Ihren Einstellungen, auf einer Microsoft-Seite Ihre Stadt oder Ihre PLZ eingeben, um lokale Nachrichten oder Wetterinformationen über eine Microsoft-Website zu erhalten, speichern wir diese Angaben möglicherweise in einem Cookie, um Ihnen beim erneuten Aufrufen dieser Seite die relevanten lokalen Informationen anzuzeigen. Das Speichern Ihre Einstellungen in Cookies, z. B. Ihre bevorzugte Sprache, verhindert, dass Sie Ihre Einstellungen wiederholt festlegen müssen. Sollten Sie sich von interessenbezogener Werbung abmelden, dann speichern wir mithilfe eines Cookies Ihre Abmeldungspräferenz auf Ihrem Gerät. Auf ähnliche weise speichern wir in Szenarien, in denen wir Ihr Einverständnis erhalten haben, Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät zu speichern, diese Auswahl in einem Cookie ab.
Anmeldung und Authentifizierung
. Wir verwenden Cookies, um Sie zu authentifizieren. Sobald Sie sich mit Ihrem persönlichen Microsoft-Konto bei einer Website anmelden, werden eine eindeutige ID-Nummer sowie die Uhrzeit Ihrer Anmeldung in einem verschlüsselten Cookie auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert. Dieses Cookie ermöglicht es Ihnen, verschiedene Seiten innerhalb der Website aufzurufen, ohne sich auf jeder Seite erneut anmelden zu müssen. Sie können ebenfalls Ihre Anmeldeinformationen speichern, damit Sie sich nicht jedes Mal anmelden müssen, wenn Sie zur Website zurückkehren.
Sicherheit
. Wir verwenden Cookies, um Informationen zu verarbeiten, die uns helfen, unsere Produkte zu sichern und Betrug oder Missbrauch aufzudecken.
Speicherung von Informationen, die Sie auf einer Website eingeben
. Wir verwenden Cookies, um Informationen zu speichern, die Sie freigegeben haben. Wenn Sie Informationen an Microsoft übermitteln, indem Sie beispielsweise auf Microsoft-Websites Produkte in einen Einkaufskorb übernehmen, speichern wir diese Informationen in einem Cookie, um den Einkauf zu ermöglichen.
Social Media
. Einige unserer Websites enthalten Cookies für soziale Netzwerke, einschließlich solcher Cookies, die es den im sozialen Netzwerk angemeldeten Benutzern ermöglichen, Inhalte über dieses Netzwerk zu teilen.
Feedback
. Microsoft verwendet Cookies, damit Sie Feedback auf einer Website bereitstellen können.
Interessenbezogene Werbung
. Microsoft setzt Cookies ein, um die Daten Ihrer Onlineaktivität zu erfassen und um Ihre Interessen zu identifizieren, sodass wir Ihnen solche Werbung anzeigen können, die für Sie relevant ist. Sie können den Erhalt von interessenbezogener Werbung von Microsoft ablehnen, wie im Abschnitt
Zugriff auf Ihre persönlichen Daten und Steuerung
in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschrieben.
Anzeigen von Werbung
. Microsoft verwendet Cookies, um zu erfassen, wie viele Besucher auf eine Anzeige geklickt haben und welche Werbungen Sie sich beispielsweise angesehen haben, damit nicht dieselbe Werbung wiederholt angezeigt wird.
Analyse
. Wir verwenden Cookies von Erst- oder Drittanbietern und andere Bezeichner, die Nutzungs- und Leistungsdaten erheben. Wir benutzen beispielsweise Cookies, um die Zahl der individuellen Besucher einer Webseite oder eines Dienstes zu ermitteln oder um andere Statistiken im Hinblick auf den Betrieb unserer Produkte zu erheben.
Leistung
. Microsoft verwendet Cookies, um die Funktionsweise unserer Produkte zu verstehen und zu verbessern. Beispielsweise verwenden wir Cookies zum Sammeln von Daten, die mit dem Lastenausgleich zusammenhängen. Dies hilft uns, unsere Websites am Laufen zu halten.
Bei Bedarf holen wir Ihre Zustimmung ein, bevor wir optionale Cookies platzieren oder verwenden, die nicht (i) unbedingt erforderlich sind, um die Website bereitzustellen; oder (ii) um eine Kommunikation zu erleichtern. Weitere Informationen finden Sie im Abschnitt „Kontrolle von Cookies“ weiter unten.
Einige der Cookies, die wir normalerweise benutzen, sind im Folgenden aufgeführt. Diese Liste ist nicht vollständig, sondern soll die Hauptgründe verdeutlichen, wieso wir üblicherweise Cookies einsetzen. Wenn Sie eine unserer Websites besuchen, werden einige oder alle der folgenden Cookies bereitgestellt:
MSCC
. Enthält die Benutzeroptionen für die meisten Microsoft-Eigenschaften.
MUID, MC1, MSFPC und MSPTC
. Identifizieren eindeutige Webbrowser, die Microsoft-Websites besuchen. Diese Cookies werden für Werbung, Seitenanalyse und andere betriebliche Zwecke benutzt.
ANON
. Enthält die ANID, die einen eindeutigen Bezeichner darstellt, welcher von Ihrem Microsoft-Konto abgeleitet wurde und für Werbung, Personalisierung und betriebliche Zwecke verwendet wird. Diese wird auch benutzt, um Ihre Auswahl für eine Abmeldung von interessenbezogener Werbung von Microsoft zu erhalten, nachdem Sie diese Abmeldung für Ihr Microsoft-Konto vorgenommen haben.
CC
. Enthält den Ländercode, der über Ihre IP-Adresse bestimmt wurde.
PPAuth, MSPAuth, MSNRPSAuth, KievRPSAuth, WLSSC, MSPProf
. Hilft dabei, Sie zu authentifizieren, wenn Sie sich mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto anmelden.
MC0
. Erkennt, ob Cookies im Browser aktiviert sind.
MS0
. Identifiziert eine bestimmte Sitzung.
NAP
. Enthält eine verschlüsselte Version folgender Daten: Land/Region, PLZ, Alter, Geschlecht, Sprache und Beruf (falls bekannt), basierend auf Ihrem Profil im Microsoft-Konto.
MH
. Erscheint auf Co-Branding-Websites, auf denen Microsoft eine Partnerschaft mit einem Werbepartner eingegangen ist. Dieses Cookie identifiziert den Anbieter, sodass die richtige Anzeige ausgewählt wird.
childinfo, kcdob, kcrelid, kcru, pcfm
. Enthält Informationen, die das Microsoft-Konto innerhalb der Seiten in Bezug auf Kinderkonten verwendet.
MR
. Dieses Cookie wird von Microsoft verwendet, um das MUID-Cookie zurückzusetzen oder zu aktualisieren.
x-ms-gateway-slice
. Identifiziert ein Gateway für den Lastenausgleich.
TOptOut
. Zeichnet Ihre Entscheidung auf, keine interessenbezogenen Anzeigen von Microsoft geliefert zu bekommen. Wo erforderlich, wird dieses Cookie standardmäßig platziert. Es wird entfernt, wenn Sie interessenbezogener Werbung zustimmen.
ApplicationGatewayAffinity
und
ApplicationGatewayAffinityCORS
. Diese Sitzungscookies werden für den Lastausgleich verwendet und um sicherzustellen, dass die Anfragen für eine Benutzersitzung vom selben Server bearbeitet werden.
Wir können auch die Cookies anderer Microsoft-Tochtergesellschaften, -Unternehmen und -Partner wie LinkedIn und Xandr verwenden.
Cookies von Drittanbietern
Zusätzlich zu den Cookies, die Microsoft beim Besuch unserer Websites festlegt, verwenden wir auch Cookies von Drittanbietern, um die Dienste auf unseren Websites zu verbessern. Einige Drittanbieter können Cookies auch festlegen, wenn Sie Microsoft-Websites besuchen. Zum Beispiel:
Beispielsweise platzieren Unternehmen, die wir für die Seitenanalyse beauftragt haben, Cookies, wenn Sie unsere Websites besuchen.
Unternehmen, die Inhalte wie z. B. Videos, Nachrichten oder Anzeigen bereitstellen, platzieren eigene Cookies auf Microsoft-Websites.
Diese Unternehmen verwenden die Daten, die sie gemäß ihren Datenschutzrichtlinien verarbeiten und die diesen Unternehmen erlauben, Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites, Apps oder Online-Dienste zu sammeln und zu kombinieren.
Je nach Kontext, Dienst oder Produkt sowie ihren Einstellungen und Berechtigungen können die folgenden Arten von Cookies von Drittanbietern verwendet werden:
Social Media-Cookies.
Wir und die Drittanbieter verwenden Social-Media-Cookies, um Ihnen Werbung und Inhalte auf der Grundlage Ihrer Social Media-Profile und den Aktivitäten auf unseren Websites anzuzeigen. Sie werden verwendet, um Ihre Aktivitäten auf unseren Websites mit Ihren Social Media-Profilen zu verknüpfen, damit die Werbung und Inhalte, die Sie auf unseren Websites und in sozialen Medien sehen, ihren Interessen besser entspricht.
Analyse-Cookies.
Wir gestatten Dritten die Verwendung von Analyse-Cookies, um zu verstehen, wie Sie unsere Websites nutzen, damit wir sie verbessern und die Dritten ihre Produkte entwickeln und verbessern können, die sie möglicherweise auf Websites verwenden, die nicht Microsoft gehören oder von Microsoft betrieben werden. Analysecookies werden z. B. verwendet, um Informationen zu den besuchten Seiten und zur Anzahl der Klicks zu sammeln, die Sie zum Ausführen einer Aufgabe benötigen. Diese Cookies können auch für Werbezwecke verwendet werden.
Werbe-Cookies.
Wir und Dritte verwenden Werbe-Cookies, um Ihnen neue Anzeigen zu zeigen, indem sie aufzeichnen, welche Anzeigen Sie bereits gesehen haben. Sie werden auch verwendet, um zu verfolgen, auf welche Anzeigen Sie klicken oder welche Käufe Sie tätigen, nachdem Sie zu auf eine Anzeige mit kostenpflichtigen Produkten geklickt haben, und um Ihnen Werbung anzuzeigen, die für Sie relevanter sind. Sie werden beispielsweise verwendet, um zu erkennen, wann Sie auf eine Anzeige klicken, und um Ihnen Werbung zu zeigen, die auf Ihren Interessen in den sozialen Medien und Ihrem Website-Besuchsverlauf basieren.
Erforderliche Cookies.
Wir verwenden erforderliche Cookies, um wesentliche Funktionen der Website auszuführen. Zum werden beispielsweise verwendet, um Sie anzumelden, Ihre Spracheinstellungen zu speichern, einen Einkaufswagen bereitzustellen, die Leistung zu verbessern, den Datenverkehr zwischen Webservern zu leiten, die Größe Ihres Bildschirms zu erkennen, die Ladezeiten der Seite zu bestimmen und die Besucherzahlen zu messen. Diese Cookies sind erforderlich, damit unsere Websites funktionieren.
Bei Bedarf holen wir Ihre Zustimmung ein, bevor wir optionale Cookies platzieren oder verwenden, die nicht (i) unbedingt erforderlich sind, um die Website bereitzustellen; oder (ii) um eine Kommunikation zu erleichtern.
Für eine Liste der Drittanbieter, die Cookies auf unseren Websites bereitstellen (einschließlich der in unserem Auftrag agierenden Dienstanbietern), besuchen Sie bitte unseren
Drittanbieter-Cookies
-Inventar. Der Drittanbieter-Cookiebestand enthält auch Links zu diesen Drittanbieterwebsites oder Datenschutzhinweisen. Weitere Informationen zu den Datenschutzpraktiken in Bezug auf Cookies, die auf unseren Websites festgelegt werden können, finden Sie auf den Websites von Drittanbietern oder in den Datenschutzhinweisen. Auf einigen unserer Websites ist eine Liste von Drittanbietern direkt auf der Website verfügbar. Die Drittanbieter auf diesen Websites sind möglicherweise nicht in der Liste unseres
Drittanbieter-Cookieinventars
enthalten.
Kontrollieren von Cookies
Die meisten Web-Browser akzeptieren Cookies automatisch, bieten jedoch Steuerungen, die es Ihnen erlauben, diese zu sperren oder zu löschen. In Microsoft Edge können Sie zum Beispiel Cookies blockieren oder löschen, indem Sie
Einstellungen
>
Datenschutz und Dienste
>
Browserdaten löschen
>
Cookies und andere Websitedaten
auswählen. Weitere Informationen zum Löschen von Cookies in Microsoft-Browsern finden Sie unter
Microsoft Edge
,
Vorgängerversion von Microsoft Edge
, oder
Internet Explorer
. Wenn Sie einen anderen Browser verwenden, richten Sie sich bitte nach den Anweisungen für diesen Browser.
Wie oben erwähnt, holen wir bei Bedarf Ihre Zustimmung ein, bevor wir optionale Cookies platzieren oder verwenden, die nicht (i) unbedingt erforderlich sind, um die Website bereitzustellen; oder (ii) um eine Kommunikation zu erleichtern. Wir separieren diese optionalen Cookies, z. B. für Werbezwecke und für soziale Medien, absichtlich. Sie können bestimmten Kategorien optionaler Cookies zustimmen und andere ablehnen. Sie können Ihre Auswahl auch anpassen, indem Sie in der Fußzeile der Website auf “Cookies verwalten” klicken oder die Einstellungen nutzen, die auf der Website bereitgestellt werden. Bestimmte Funktionen von Microsoft-Produkten basieren auf Cookies. Falls Sie sich dazu entscheiden, Cookies zu blockieren, sind Sie möglicherweise nicht in der Lage, sich anzumelden oder diese Funktionen zu verwenden, und Einstellungen, die auf Cookies basieren, gehen können. Wenn Sie Cookies löschen, werden alle Einstellungen, einschließlich Werbeeinstellungen, die von diesen Cookies gesteuert werden, gelöscht und müssen möglicherweise wiederhergestellt werden.
Zusätzliche Datenschutzsteuerelemente, die sich auf Cookies auswirken können, einschließlich des Tracking-Schutz-Features von Microsoft-Browsern, werden im Abschnitt
Zugriff auf Ihrer persönlichen Daten und Steuerung
dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen beschrieben.
Wofür wir Webbeacons und Analysedienste verwenden
Einige Microsoft-Webseiten enthalten elektronische Tags, sogenannte Webbeacons, mit denen wir Cookies auf unseren Websites bereitstellen, Nutzer zählen, die diese Websites besucht haben, und Co-Branded-Produkte liefern. Wir verwenden Webbeacons oder ähnliche Technologien in unseren elektronischen Kommunikationen oder in Newslettern, um zu ermitteln, ob die Nachrichten von Ihnen geöffnet werden und Sie darauf reagieren.
Neben der Platzierung von Webbeacons auf unseren eigenen Websites kooperieren wir manchmal mit anderen Unternehmen, indem wir unsere Webbeacons auf deren Websites oder in deren Werbung platzieren. Dies hilft uns beispielsweise, Statistiken darüber zu erstellen, wie oft das Klicken auf eine Anzeige auf einer Microsoft-Website zu einem Kauf oder einer anderen Aktion auf der Website des Inserenten führt. Zudem können wir Ihre Aktivitäten auf der Website eines Microsoft-Partners in Verbindung mit Ihrer Nutzung eines Microsoft-Produkts oder -Dienstes besser verstehen.
Schließlich enthalten Microsoft-Produkte häufig Webbeacons oder ähnliche Technologien von Drittanbietern für Analysen, die uns dabei helfen, zusammengefasste Statistiken über die Wirksamkeit unserer Werbekampagnen oder anderen Operationen zu kompilieren. Diese Technologien ermöglichen es den Analytics-Anbietern, ihre eigenen Cookies oder anderen Identifikatoren auf Ihrem Gerät festzulegen oder zu lesen, wodurch diese Informationen zu ihren Onlineaktivitäten in allen Anwendungen sowie auf allen Websites oder anderen Produkten sammeln können. Allerdings verbieten wir den Anbietern von Analysen, die Webbeacons auf unseren Seiten zu verwenden, um Informationen zu erheben oder darauf zuzugreifen, durch die Sie direkt identifiziert werden können (wie Name oder E-Mail-Adresse). Sie können die Datensammlung oder die Verwendung durch einige dieser Analyseanbieter deaktivieren, indem Sie eine der folgenden Websites besuchen:
Adjust
,
AppsFlyer
,
Clicktale
,
Flurry Analytics
,
Google Analytics
(erfordert die Installation eines Browser-Add-Ons),
Kissmetrics
,
Mixpanel
,
Nielsen
,
Acuity Ads
,
WebTrends
, oder
Optimizely
.
Weitere ähnliche Technologien
Zusätzlich zu den standardmäßigen Cookies und Webbeacons können unsere Produkte auch weitere, ähnliche Technologien benutzen, um Dateien auf Ihrem Computer zu speichern und zu lesen. Dies geschieht üblicherweise, um Ihre Präferenzen zu speichern oder die Geschwindigkeit und die Leistung zu verbessern, indem bestimmte Dateien lokal gespeichert werden. Wie auch bei Standard-Cookies können diese Technologien aber auch dafür benutzt werden, einen eindeutigen Bezeichner auf Ihrem Computer zu speichern, die dazu verwendet werden kann, Ihr Verhalten nachzuverfolgen. Zu diesen Technologien gehören lokale freigegebene Objekte (oder "Flash-Cookies") und Silverlight-Anwendungsspeicher.
Lokale freigegebene Objekte oder "Flash-Cookies"
Websites, die Adobe Flash-Technologien verwenden, können lokale freigegebene Objekte oder "Flash-Cookies" verwenden, um Daten auf Ihrem Computer zu speichern. Informationen zum Verwalten oder Blockieren von Flash-Cookies finden Sie auf der
Flash Player-Hilfeseite
.
Silverlight-Anwendungsspeicher
. Websites oder Anwendungen, die mit der Microsoft-Silverlight-Technologie arbeiten, sind auch in der Lage, Daten im Silverlight-Anwendungsspeicher abzulegen. Informationen zum Verwalten oder Blockieren eines solchen Speichers finden Sie im Abschnitt
Silverlight
dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Zusammenfassung anzeigen
Weitere Infos
Zurück zum Anfang
Von Ihrer Organisation bereitgestellte Produkte – Hinweis für Endbenutzer
Wenn Sie ein Microsoft-Produkt mit einem Konto verwenden, das von einer mit Ihnen verbundenen Organisation bereitgestellt wird, wie z. B. Ihr Arbeits- oder Schulkonto, gilt für diese Organisation Folgendes:
Sie kann Ihr Microsoft-Produkt und -Produktkonto steuern und verwalten, einschließlich der Datenschutzeinstellungen des Produkts oder Produktkontos.
Sie kann auf Ihre Daten zugreifen und diese verarbeiten, einschließlich der Interaktions- und Diagnosedaten sowie der Inhalte Ihrer Mitteilungen und Dateien, die Ihrem Microsoft-Produkt und -Produktkonto zugeordnet sind.
Wenn Sie den Zugriff auf Ihr Arbeits- oder Schulkonto verlieren (z. B. weil Sie den Arbeitgeber wechseln), verlieren Sie möglicherweise den Zugriff auf Produkte (und deren Inhalte), die Sie zwar für sich selbst erworben haben, bei denen Sie sich jedoch mit Ihrem Arbeits- oder Schulkonto angemeldet haben.
Viele Microsoft-Produkte sind für die Verwendung in Organisationen, z. B. Schulen und Unternehmen vorgesehen. Weitere Informationen finden Sie im Abschnitt
Produkte für Unternehmen und Entwickler
dieser Datenschutzerklärung. Wenn Ihre Organisation Ihnen Zugriff auf Microsoft-Produkte bietet, unterliegt die Verwendung der Microsoft-Produkte den Richtlinien Ihres Unternehmens, sofern vorhanden. Sie sollten Ihre Privatsphäre-Anfragen, inklusive aller Anfragen über Ihre Datenschutzrechte an den Administrator Ihrer Organisation stellen. Wenn Sie die sozialen Eigenschaften der Microsoft-Produkte verwenden, können andere Benutzer in Ihrem Netzwerk einige Ihrer Aktivitäten sehen. Um mehr über die sozialen Eigenschaften und andere Funktionen zu erfahren, überprüfen Sie bitte die Dokumentation oder den spezifischen Hilfeinhalt für dieses Microsoft-Produkt. Microsoft ist nicht für die Datenschutz- oder Sicherheitspraktiken seiner Kunden, die von denen dieser Richtlinien abweichen können, verantwortlich.
Wenn Sie ein von Ihrem Unternehmen bereitgestelltes Microsoft-Produkt verwenden, wird die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch Microsoft im Zusammenhang mit diesem Produkt durch einem Vertrag zwischen Microsoft und Ihrem Unternehmen geregelt. Microsoft verarbeitet Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, um das Produkt Ihrem Unternehmen und Ihnen zur Verfügung zu stellen, sowie in einigen Fällen für die legitimen Geschäftsabläufe von Microsoft im Zusammenhang mit der Bereitstellung des Produkts, wie im Abschnitt
Produkte für Unternehmen und Entwicklerprodukte
beschrieben. Wenn Sie Fragen zur Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch Microsoft im Zusammenhang mit der Bereitstellung von Produkten für Ihr Unternehmen haben, wenden Sie sich bitte, wie oben erwähnt, an Ihr Unternehmen. Wenn Sie Fragen zum Geschäftsablauf von Microsoft in Verbindung mit der Bereitstellung von Produkten für Ihre Organisation gemäß den Produktbedingungen haben, wenden Sie sich bitte wie im Abschnitt
So kontaktieren Sie uns
beschrieben an Microsoft. Weitere Informationen über unsere Geschäftsabläufe finden Sie im Abschnitt
Produkte für Unternehmen und Entwickler
.
Für Microsoft-Produkte, die von Ihrer K-12-Schule bereitgestellt werden, einschließlich Microsoft 365 Education, wird Microsoft:
neben den für autorisierte Bildungs- oder Schulzwecke erforderlichen Daten keine personenbezogenen Daten von Schülern/Studenten erfassen oder verwenden,
personenbezogene Daten von Schülern/Studenten weder verkaufen noch verleihen,
personenbezogene Daten von Schülern/Studenten weder zu Werbezwecken noch zu ähnlichen kommerziellen Zwecken wie Behavioral Targeting von Werbung für Schüler/Studenten verwenden oder freigegeben,
kein persönliches Profil eines Schülers/Studenten erstellen, es sei denn, dies dient der Unterstützung autorisierter Bildungs- oder Schulzwecke oder ist von den Eltern, Erziehungsberechtigten oder Schülern/Studenten im angemessenen Alter genehmigt, und
seine Anbieter, an die personenbezogene Daten von Schülern/Studenten ggf. zur Erbringung der Bildungsdienstleistung weitergegeben werden, dazu verpflichten, dieselben Verpflichtungen für personenbezogene Daten der Schüler/Studenten zu erfüllen.
Zurück zum Anfang
Microsoft-Konto
Mit einem Microsoft-Konto können Sie sich sowohl bei den Microsoft-Produkten als auch bei den von Microsoft ausgewählten Partnern anmelden. Personenbezogene Daten, die mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto verknüpft sind, enthalten Anmeldeinformationen, Name und Kontaktdaten, Zahlungsdaten, Geräte- und Nutzungsdaten, Ihre Kontakte, Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten und Ihre Interessen und Favoriten. Das Anmelden bei Ihrem Microsoft-Konto ermöglicht eine Personalisierung, bietet konsistente Erfahrungen für Produkte und Geräte und ermöglicht es Ihnen, Zugang zum Cloud-Datenspeicher zu erhalten und diesen zu verwenden, mithilfe der in Ihrem Microsoft-Konto gespeicherten Zahlungsmittel zu bezahlen und andere erweiterte Features und Einstellungen zu nutzen.
Es gibt drei Arten von Microsoft-Konten:
Wenn Sie Ihr eigenes Microsoft-Konto erstellen, beziehen wir uns auf dieses Konto als ein
persönliches Microsoft-Konto
.
Wenn Ihr Microsoft-Konto von Ihnen oder Ihrer Organisation (beispielsweise Ihrer Schule oder Ihrem Arbeitgeber) angelegt wird und mit der E-Mail-Adresse der Organisation verknüpft ist, beziehen wir uns auf dieses Konto als
Arbeits- oder Schulkonto
.
Wenn Ihr Microsoft-Konto von einem Dienstanbieter (beispielsweise dem Kabel- oder Internetdienstanbieter) angelegt wird und mit der E-Mail-Adresse des Dienstanbieters verknüpft ist, beziehen wir uns auf dieses Konto als
Drittanbieterkonto
.
Wenn Sie sich bei einem Drittanbieterdienst mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto anmelden, werden Sie mit diesem Drittanbieter die von diesem Dienst benötigten Kontodaten teilen.
Mit einem Microsoft-Konto können Sie sich sowohl bei den Microsoft-Produkten als auch bei den von Microsoft ausgewählten Partnern anmelden. Personenbezogene Daten, die mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto verknüpft sind, enthalten Anmeldeinformationen, Name und Kontaktdaten, Zahlungsdaten, Geräte- und Nutzungsdaten, Ihre Kontakte, Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten und Ihre Interessen und Favoriten. Das Anmelden bei Ihrem Microsoft-Konto ermöglicht eine Personalisierung, bietet konsistente Erfahrungen für Produkte und Geräte und ermöglicht es Ihnen, Zugang zum Cloud-Datenspeicher zu erhalten und diesen zu verwenden, mithilfe der in Ihrem Microsoft-Konto gespeicherten Zahlungsmittel zu bezahlen und andere erweiterte Features und Einstellungen zu nutzen. Es gibt drei Arten von Microsoft-Konten:
Wenn Sie Ihr eigenes Microsoft-Konto erstellen, das mit Ihrer persönlichen E-Mail-Adresse verknüpft ist, bezeichnen wir dieses Konto als
persönliches Microsoft-Konto
.
Wenn Sie oder Ihre Organisation (z. B. ein Arbeitgeber oder Ihre Schule) Ihr Microsoft-Konto erstellen, das mit Ihrer von dieser Organisation bereitgestellten E-Mail-Adresse verknüpft ist, bezeichnen wir dieses Konto als
Geschäfts-, Schul- oder Unikonto
.
Wenn Sie oder Ihr Dienstanbieter (z. B. ein Kabel- oder Internetdienstanbieter) Ihr Microsoft-Konto erstellen, das an Ihre E-Mail-Adresse mit der Domäne Ihres Dienstanbieters gebunden ist, bezeichnen wir dieses Konto als
Drittanbieterkonto
.
Persönliche Microsoft-Konten
. Die Daten in Zusammenhang mit Ihrem persönlichen Microsoft-Konto, und wie diese Daten verwendet werden, hängt davon ab, wie Sie das Konto verwenden.
Erstellen Ihres Microsoft-Kontos
. Sobald Sie ein persönliches Microsoft-Konto erstellen, werden Sie nach bestimmten, personenbezogenen Daten gefragt und wir werden Ihnen eine eindeutige ID-Nummer zuweisen, um Ihr Konto und die zugehörigen Informationen zu identifizieren. Während einige Produkte (z. B. solche für Zahlungsvorgänge) einen richtigen Namen erfordern, können Sie sich bei anderen Microsoft-Produkten anmelden und diese verwenden, ohne dass Sie Ihren richtigen Namen angeben müssen. Einige Daten, die Sie bereitstellen, wie beispielsweise Ihr Anzeigename, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und Telefonnummer, können dazu verwendet werden, anderen dabei zu helfen, Sie innerhalb der Microsoft-Produkte zu finden und sich mit Ihnen zu verbinden. Wenn Personen Ihren Anzeigenamen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse oder Telefonnummer kennen, können sie anhand dieser Daten auf Skype oder Microsoft Teams für die private Nutzung nach Ihnen suchen und Ihnen eine Einladung zur Kontaktaufnahme senden. Beachten Sie, dass, wenn Sie eine Arbeits- oder Schul-E-Mail-Adresse erstellen, um ein persönliches Microsoft-Konto zu erstellen, Ihr Arbeitgeber oder Ihre Schule auf Ihre Daten zugreifen kann. In einigen Fällen müssen Sie die E-Mail-Adresse in eine persönliche E-Mail-Adresse ändern, um weiterhin auf verbraucherorientierte Produkte (z. B. das Xbox-Netzwerk) zugreifen zu können.
Anmelden bei einem Microsoft-Konto
. Sobald Sie sich bei Ihrem Microsoft-Konto anmelden, erstellen wir eine Aufzeichnung dieses Anmeldevorgangs, der das Datum und die Uhrzeit, Informationen über das Produkt, bei dem Sie sich angemeldet haben, Ihren Anmeldenamen, die eindeutige Nummer, die Ihrem Konto zugewiesen wurde, den eindeutigen Bezeichner, der Ihrem Gerät zugewiesen wurde, Ihre IP-Adresse und Ihr Betriebssystem sowie die Browser-Version enthält.
Anmelden bei Microsoft-Produkten
. Das Anmelden bei Ihrem Konto ermöglicht eine verbesserte Personalisierung, bietet nahtlose und konsistente Erfahrungen für Produkte und Geräte und ermöglicht es Ihnen, Zugang zum Cloud-Datenspeicher zu erhalten und diesen zu verwenden, mithilfe der in Ihrem Microsoft-Konto gespeicherten Zahlungsmittel zu bezahlen und andere erweiterte Features und Einstellungen zu nutzen. Microsoft stellt beispielsweise bei Ihrer Anmeldung in Ihrem Konto gespeicherte Informationen für Microsoft-Produkte zur Verfügung, damit wichtige Dinge genau dort sind, wo Sie sie benötigen. Nachdem Sie sich bei Ihrem Konto angemeldet haben, bleiben Sie angemeldet, bis Sie sich abmelden. Wenn Sie Ihr Microsoft-Konto einem Windows-Gerät (Version 8 oder höher) hinzufügen, meldet Windows Sie automatisch bei Produkten an, die ein Microsoft-Konto verwenden, wenn Sie auf diese Produkte auf diesem Gerät zugreifen. Sobald Sie angemeldet sind, werden einige Produkte Ihren Namen oder Benutzernamen und Ihr Profilfoto als Teil Ihrer Nutzung der Microsoft-Produkte, einschließlich in Ihren Kommunikationen, sozialen Interaktionen und öffentlichen Beiträgen anzeigen (falls Sie diese Ihrem Profil hinzugefügt haben).
Erfahren Sie mehr über Ihr Microsoft-Konto, Ihre Daten und Ihre Auswahlmöglichkeiten
.
Anmelden bei Drittanbieterprodukten
. Wenn Sie sich bei einem Drittanbieterprodukt mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto anmelden, werden Sie Daten für den Drittanbieter gemäß den Datenschutzrichtlinien des Drittanbieters freigeben. Der Drittanbieter erhält außerdem die Versionsnummer, die Ihrem Konto zugeordnete wurde (eine neue Versionsnummer wird immer dann zugewiesen, wenn Sie Ihre Anmeldedaten ändern); und eine Mitteilung darüber, ob Ihr Konto deaktiviert wurde. Wenn Sie Ihre Profildaten freigeben, kann der Drittanbieter möglicherweise Ihren Anzeigenamen oder Benutzernamen und Ihr Profilfoto (falls Sie ein solches Ihrem Profil hinzugefügt haben) anzeigen, wenn Sie bei dem Drittanbieterprodukt angemeldet sind. Wenn Sie mithilfe Ihres Microsoft-Kontos Zahlungen an Drittanbieter durchführen möchten, gibt Microsoft die in Ihrem Microsoft-Konto gespeicherten Informationen an Drittanbieter oder deren Verkäufer (z. B. Kreditinstitute) weiter, damit Ihre Zahlung verarbeitet und Ihre Bestellung ausgeführt werden kann (z. B. den Namen, eine Kreditkartennummer, Rechnungs- und Lieferadressen und relevante Kontaktinformationen). Der Drittanbieter kann die von Ihnen bei der Anmeldung oder beim Kauf eingegebenen Daten gemäß seiner eigenen Praxis und Richtlinien nutzen.
Sie sollten die Datenschutzerklärung für jedes Produkt, bei dem Sie sich anmelden, und für jeden Händler, bei dem Sie einkaufen, sorgfältig prüfen, um festzustellen, wie die gesammelten Daten verwendet werden
.
Geschäfts-, Schul- oder Unikonten
. Die Daten für ein Geschäfts- oder Schulkonto und wie sie verwendet werden sollen, ist in der Regel ähnlich der Verwendung und der Sammlung der Daten von einem persönlichen Microsoft-Konto.
Wenn Ihr Arbeitgeber oder Ihre Schule Microsoft Entra ID für das für Sie bereitgestellte Konto verwendet, können Sie dieses Konto zur Anmeldung bei Microsoft-Produkten nutzen (z. B. Microsoft 365 und Office 365 oder Drittanbieterprodukte, die von Ihrer Organisation bereitgestellt werden). Falls von Ihrer Organisation gefordert, werden Sie gebeten, eine Telefonnummer oder eine alternative E-Mail-Adresse als zusätzliche Sicherheitsüberprüfung anzugeben. Wenn von Ihrer Organisation zugelassen, können Sie Ihr Arbeits- oder Schulkonto verwenden, um sich bei Microsoft oder Drittanbieterprodukten anzumelden, die Sie für sich selbst erwerben.
Wenn Sie sich bei bestimmten Microsoft-Produkten über ein Arbeits- oder Schulkonto anmelden, gilt Folgendes:
Der Besitzer der mit Ihrer E-Mail-Adresse verbundenen Domäne kann Ihr Konto sowie den Zugang zu Ihren Daten und die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten, einschließlich der Inhalte Ihrer Mitteilungen und Dateien, kontrollieren und administrieren. Dazu gehören Daten in Produkten, die von Ihrer Organisation bereitgestellt wurden und Produkte, die Sie selbst erworben haben.
Ihre Nutzung der Produkte unterliegt gegebenenfalls den Richtlinien Ihres Unternehmens. Sie sollten sowohl die Richtlinien Ihres Unternehmens als auch die Frage berücksichtigen, ob es in Ihrem Interesse ist, dass Ihre Organisation auf Ihre Daten zugreifen kann, bevor Sie sich bei Produkten, die Sie für sich selbst erwerben, mit Ihrem Arbeits- oder Schulkonto anmelden.
Wenn Sie den Zugriff auf Ihr Arbeits- oder Schulkonto verlieren (z. B. weil Sie den Arbeitgeber wechseln), verlieren Sie möglicherweise den Zugriff auf Produkte (und deren Inhalte), die Sie zwar für sich selbst erworben haben, bei denen Sie sich jedoch mit Ihrem Arbeits- oder Schulkonto angemeldet haben.
Microsoft ist für die Datenschutz- oder Sicherheitspraktiken Ihrer Organisationen, die sich von denen von Microsoft unterschieden können, nicht verantwortlich.
Falls Ihr Unternehmen die Verwaltung für die Nutzung von Microsoft-Produkten vornimmt, richten Sie bitte Ihre Privatsphäre-Anfragen und inklusive aller Anfragen über Ihre Datenschutzrechte an Ihren Administrator. Lesen Sie auch den Abschnitt
Hinweis für Endbenutzer
dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Wenn Sie nicht sicher sind, ob es sich bei Ihrem Konto um ein Arbeits- oder Schulkonto handelt, wenden Sie sich an Ihre Organisation.
Konten von Drittanbietern
. Die Daten für ein Drittanbieterkonto und wie sie verwendet werden sollen, ist in der Regel ähnlich der Verwendung und der Sammlung der Daten von einem persönlichen Microsoft-Konto. Ihr Dienstanbieter hat Einfluss auf Ihr Konto, einschließlich der Möglichkeit, auf Ihr Konto zuzugreifen oder es zu löschen.
Sie sollten die Ihnen von Drittanbieter zur Verfügung gestellten Bedingungen sorgfältig prüfen, um zu verstehen, was dies für Ihr Konto bedeuten kann.
Zusammenfassung anzeigen
Weitere Infos
Zurück zum Anfang
Erfassung der Daten von Kindern
Benutzer unter dem Alter von 13 Jahren oder dem im jeweiligen Rechtssystem per Gesetz bestimmten Alter werden von bestimmten Microsoft-Produkten und -Diensten entweder blockiert oder aufgefordert, Zustimmung oder Autorisierung von einem Elternteil oder Erziehungsberechtigten einzuholen, bevor sie es verwenden können, einschließlich bei der Erstellung eines Kontos für den Zugriff auf Microsoft-Dienste. Wir werden Kinder unter diesem Alter nicht wissentlich bitten, mehr Daten zur Verfügung zu stellen, als für das Produkt notwendig sind.
Wenn die Zustimmung oder das Einverständnis der Eltern erteilt wurde, wird das Konto ähnlich wie jedes andere Konto behandelt. Weitere Informationen zu persönlichen Konten sowie Schul- und Unikonten finden Sie im Abschnitt zum
Microsoft-Konto
der Datenschutzerklärung und unter
Microsoft Family Safety
im produktspezifischen Abschnitt. Das Kind kann auf Kommunikationsdienste zugreifen, z. B. Outlook und Skype, frei kommunizieren und Daten für andere Benutzer aller Altersklassen freigeben. Eltern oder Erziehungsberechtigte können die zuvor getroffenen Einwilligungsentscheidungen ändern oder widerrufen.
Weitere Informationen über die elterliche Zustimmung und Microsoft-Kinderkonten
. Als Organisator einer Microsoft Familiengruppe kann der Elternteil oder Erziehungsberechtigte die Informationen und Einstellungen seines Kindes auf seiner
Family Safety
-Seite verwalten und die Daten eines Kindes auf seinem
Datenschutzdashboard
anzeigen oder löschen. Konten, für deren Erstellung die Zustimmung der Eltern erforderlich ist, werden automatisch in die Familiengruppe der Person aufgenommen, die die Zustimmung zur Kontoerstellung erteilt hat. Für Kinderkonten, für deren Erstellung keine elterliche Zustimmung erforderlich ist (z. B. für Kinder, die älter als das gesetzlich vorgeschriebene Alter sind), kann der Elternteil oder Erziehungsberechtigte weiterhin eine Familiengruppe verwenden, muss jedoch das Kinderkonto hinzufügen ihre Familiengruppe, nachdem das Konto erstellt wurde. Wählen Sie unten „Weitere Informationen“ aus, um weitere Informationen zum Zugreifen auf und Löschen von Daten von Kindern sowie Informationen zu Kindern und Xbox-Profilen zu erhalten.
Benutzer unter dem Alter von 13 Jahren oder dem im jeweiligen Rechtssystem per Gesetz bestimmten Alter werden von bestimmten Microsoft-Produkten und -Diensten entweder blockiert oder aufgefordert, Zustimmung oder Autorisierung von einem Elternteil oder Erziehungsberechtigten einzuholen, bevor sie es verwenden können, einschließlich bei der Erstellung eines Kontos für den Zugriff auf Microsoft-Dienste. Wir werden Kinder unter diesem Alter nicht wissentlich bitten, mehr Daten zur Verfügung zu stellen, als für das Produkt notwendig sind.
Wenn die Zustimmung oder das Einverständnis der Eltern erteilt wurde, wird das Konto ähnlich wie jedes andere Konto behandelt. Das Kind kann auf Kommunikationsdienste wie Outlook und Skype zugreifen und frei kommunizieren und Daten mit anderen Benutzern aller Altersstufen teilen.
Erfahren Sie mehr über die elterliche Zustimmung und Microsoft-Kinderkonten
.
Eltern oder Erziehungsberechtigte können die zuvor getroffenen Zustimmungsentscheidungen ändern oder widerrufen. Als Organisator einer Microsoft Familiengruppe kann der Elternteil oder Erziehungsberechtigte die Informationen und Einstellungen seines Kindes auf seiner
Family Safety
-Seite verwalten und die Daten eines Kindes auf seinem
Datenschutzdashboard
anzeigen oder löschen. Konten, für deren Erstellung die Zustimmung der Eltern erforderlich ist, werden automatisch in die Familiengruppe der Person aufgenommen, die die Zustimmung zur Kontoerstellung erteilt hat. Für Kinderkonten, für deren Erstellung keine elterliche Zustimmung erforderlich ist (z. B. für Kinder, die älter als das gesetzlich vorgeschriebene Alter sind), können die Eltern oder Erziehungsberechtigten weiterhin eine Familiengruppe verwenden, müssen das Kinderkonto jedoch zu ihrer Gruppe hinzufügen Familiengruppe, nachdem das Konto erstellt wurde. Weitere Informationen zum Zugreifen auf und Löschen von untergeordneten Daten finden Sie unten.
Im Folgenden finden Sie zusätzliche Informationen über die Erfassung von Daten von Kindern, einschließlich weiterer Details im Zusammenhang mit Xbox.
Zugriff auf und Löschen von Kinderdaten
Bei Microsoft-Produkten und -Diensten, die die Zustimmung der Eltern erfordern, können Eltern bestimmte Daten ihres Kindes über das
Datenschutz-Dashboard
der Eltern einsehen und löschen: Browserverlauf, Suchverlauf, Standortaktivität, Medienaktivität, App- und Dienstaktivität sowie Produkt- und Dienstleistungsdaten. Um diese Daten zu löschen, kann sich ein Elternteil beim
Datenschutzdashboard
anmelden und die Aktivitäten seiner Kinder verwalten. Beachten Sie, dass die Fähigkeit eines Elternteils, auf persönliche Informationen eines Kindes in dessen Datenschutzdashboard zuzugreifen und/oder sie zu löschen, je nach den Gesetzen des Landes variiert, in dem Sie sich befinden.
Darüber hinaus kann sich ein Elternteil über das
Datenschutzsupport-Formular
an unser
Datenschutzsupportteam
wenden und nach der Authentifizierung anfordern, dass die Datentypen auf dem Datenschutzdashboard zusammen mit den folgenden Daten gelöscht werden: Software, Setup und Bestand; Gerätekonnektivität und -konfiguration; Feedback und Bewertungen; Fitness und Aktivität; Supportinhalte; Unterstützen von Interaktionen; und Umgebungssensor. Wir verarbeiten authentifizierte Löschanforderungen innerhalb von 30 Tagen nach Erhalt.
Bitte beachten Sie, dass Inhalte wie E-Mails, Kontakte und Chats über produktinterne Erfahrungen zugänglich sind. Weitere Informationen zu Daten, die Sie in Microsoft-Produkten steuern können, finden Sie in unseren
häufig gestellten Fragen zum Datenschutz
.
Wenn das Konto Ihres Kindes nicht Teil Ihrer Microsoft Family-Gruppe ist und Sie keinen Zugriff auf die Aktivitäten Ihres Kindes in Ihrem Datenschutzdashboard haben, müssen Sie über das
Datenschutzsupport-Formular
eine Anfrage im Zusammenhang mit den Daten Ihres Kindes übermitteln. Das Datenschutzteam fordert zur Kontoüberprüfung auf, bevor die Anforderung erfüllt wird.
Um alle persönlichen Informationen Ihres Kindes zu löschen, müssen Sie die Löschung des Kontos des Kindes über das
Formular zum Schließen Ihres Kontos
anfordern. Über diesen Link werden Sie aufgefordert, sich mit den Kontoanmeldeinformationen Ihres Kindes anzumelden. Überprüfen Sie, ob auf der Seite die richtigen Microsoft-Konto angezeigt werden, und befolgen Sie dann die Anweisungen, um die Löschung ihres Kinderkontos anzufordern.
Weitere Informationen zum Schließen eines Microsoft-Kontos
.
Nachdem Sie die Anforderung zum Schließen des Kontos Ihres Kindes übermittelt haben, warten wir 60 Tage, bevor wir das Konto endgültig löschen, falls Sie Ihre Meinung ändern oder auf ein Konto zugreifen müssen, bevor es endgültig geschlossen und gelöscht wird. In dieser Zeit ist das Konto zur Schließung und endgültigen Löschung markiert, aber immer noch vorhanden. Wenn Sie das Microsoft-Konto Ihres Kindes wieder öffnen möchten, melden Sie sich einfach innerhalb des Zeitraums von 60 Tagen erneut an. Wir brechen die Kontoschließung ab, und das Konto wird wiederhergestellt.
Was ist Xbox?
Xbox ist die Spiele- und Unterhaltungsabteilung von Microsoft. Xbox hostet ein Onlinenetzwerk, das aus Software besteht, und Onlineerfahrungen über mehrere Plattformen hinweg ermöglicht. Mit diesem Netzwerk kann Ihr Kind Spiele suchen und spielen, Inhalte anzeigen und sich mit Freunden auf Xbox und anderen Spiel- und sozialen Netzwerken verbinden.
Wenn sich Benutzer bei Xbox, in Apps, Spielen oder auf einer Xbox-Konsole anmelden, weisen wir ihrem Gerät einen eindeutigen Bezeichner zu. Wenn ihre Xbox-Konsole beispielsweise mit dem Internet verbunden ist, und sie melden sich bei der Konsole an, dann stellen wir fest, welche Konsole und welche Version des Betriebssystems der Konsole sie verwenden.
Xbox bietet weiterhin neue Anwendungen in Client-Apps, die mit Diensten wie Xbox-Netzwerk und Cloud-Spielen verbunden sind und von diesen unterstützt werden. Wenn Sie sich bei eine Xbox-Erfahrung anmelden, erfassen wir die erforderlichen Daten, damit diese Erfahrungen sicher, aktuell und erwartungsgemäß funktionieren.
Daten, die wir sammeln, wenn Sie ein Xbox-Profil erstellen
. Sie als Elternteil oder Erziehungsberechtigter müssen der Erfassung von personenbezogenen Daten eines Kindes unter 13 Jahren oder dem im jeweiligen Rechtssystem per Gesetz bestimmten Alter zustimmen. Mit Ihrer Zustimmung kann Ihr Kind ein Xbox-Profil haben und das Online-Xbox-Netzwerk nutzen. Während der Erstellung des Xbox-Profils für Kinder melden Sie sich mit Ihrem eigenen Microsoft-Konto an, um zu bestätigen, dass Sie ein erwachsener Organisator in Ihrer Microsoft Family-Gruppe sind. Wir erfassen eine alternative E-Mail-Adresse oder Telefonnummer, um die Kontosicherheit zu erhöhen. Wenn Ihr Kind Hilfe beim Zugriff auf sein Konto benötigt, kann es eine dieser Alternativen verwenden, um zu bestätigen, dass es das Microsoft-Konto besitzt.
Wir sammeln begrenzte Informationen zu Kindern, einschließlich Name, Geburtsdatum, E-Mail-Adresse und Region. Wenn Sie Ihr Kind für ein Xbox-Profil registrieren, erhält es ein Gamertag (einen öffentlichen Spitznamen) und einen eindeutigen Bezeichner. Wenn Sie ein Xbox-Profil für Ihr Kind erstellen, erklären Sie sich damit einverstanden, dass Microsoft Informationen gemäß den Datenschutz- und Kommunikationseinstellungen Ihres Kindes im Xbox-Online-Netzwerk erfasst, verwendet und weitergibt. Die Datenschutz- und Kommunikationseinstellungen Ihres Kindes sind standardmäßig auf die restriktivsten Einstellungen eingestellt.
Von uns erfasste Daten
. Wir erfassen Informationen über die Nutzung von Xbox-Diensten, -Spielen, -Apps und -Geräten durch Ihr Kind, einschließlich:
Wann sie sich bei Xbox an- und abmelden, den Kaufverlauf und die Inhalte, die sie erhalten.
Welche Spiele sie spielen und welche Apps sie verwenden, ihren Spielfortschritt, Erfolge, Spielzeit pro Spiel und andere Spielstatistiken.
Leistungsdaten über Xbox-Konsolen, Xbox Game Pass und andere Xbox-Apps, das Xbox-Netzwerk, verbundenes Zubehör und die Netzwerkverbindung, einschließlich aller Software- oder Hardware-Fehler.
Inhalte, die sie über das Xbox-Netzwerk hinzufügen, hochladen oder teilen, einschließlich SMS, Bilder und Videos, die sie in Spielen und Apps erfassen.
Soziale Aktivitäten, einschließlich Chatdaten und Interaktionen mit anderen Spielern und Verbindungen (von ihnen hinzugefügte Freunde und Personen, die ihnen folgen), die sie im Xbox-Netzwerk machen.
Wenn Ihr Kind eine Xbox-Konsole oder Xbox App auf einem anderen Gerät verwendet, das auf das Xbox-Netzwerk zugreifen kann, und dieses Gerät ein Speichervorrichtung (Festplatte oder Speichereinheit) enthält, werden Nutzungsdaten auf der Speichervorrichtung gespeichert und bei der nächsten Xbox-Anmeldung an Microsoft gesendet, auch wenn sie offline gespielt haben.
Xbox-Diagnosedaten
. Wenn Ihr Kind eine Xbox-Konsole verwendet, wird Xbox die erforderlichen Daten an Microsoft senden. Erforderliche Daten sind die Mindestdaten, die erforderlich sind, um Xbox zu schützen, auf dem neuesten Stand zu halten und dafür zu sorgen, dass sie ordnungsgemäß funktioniert.
Spielaufzeichnungen
. Jeder Spieler in einer Multiplayer-Spielsitzung kann Video (Spiel-Clips) aufzeichnen und Screenshots von ihrer Ansicht des Spiels erfassen. Die Spiele-Clips und Screenshots anderer Player können während dieser Sitzung den In-Game-Charakter und Gamertag Ihres Kindes erfassen. Wenn ein Spieler Spielclips und Screenshots auf einem PC aufnimmt, können die resultierenden Spielclips auch Audio-Chat aufzeichnen, wenn die Datenschutz- und Kommunikationseinstellungen Ihres Kindes im Xbox-Online-Netzwerk dies zulassen.
Untertitel
. Bei Xbox Echtzeit- („Party“) Chat können Spieler ein Sprache-zu-Text-Feature aktivieren, das es ihnen ermöglicht, diesen Chat als SMS anzuzeigen. Wenn ein Player dieses Feature aktiviert, verwendet Microsoft die resultierenden SMS-Daten, um Untertitel für Benutzer zu erstellen, die diese benötigen. Diese Daten können auch verwendet werden, um eine sichere Spielumgebung zu schaffen und die
Community-Standards für Xbox
durchzusetzen.
Datennutzung
. Microsoft verwendet die Daten, die wir sammeln, wenn Ihr Kind die Xbox verwendet, um Spieleprodukte und -erlebnisse zu verbessern – damit es mit der Zeit sicherer und unterhaltsamer wird. Unsere gesammelten Daten ermöglichen es uns auch, Ihrem Kind kuratierte Erfahrungen bereitzustellen. Dazu gehört, dass sie mit Spielen, Inhalten, Diensten und Empfehlungen verbunden werden.
Xbox-Daten, die von anderen angezeigt werden können
. Wenn Ihr Kind das Xbox-Netzwerk verwendet, sind seine Onlinepräsenz (die auf "offline angezeigen" oder "gesperrt" eingestellt werden kann), sein Gamertag, seine Spielstatistiken und seine Erfolge für andere Spieler im Netzwerk sichtbar. Je nachdem, wie Sie die Xbox-Sicherheitseinstellungen Ihres Kindes eingestellt haben, kann es beim Spielen oder Kommunizieren mit anderen im Xbox-Netzwerk Informationen weitergeben.
Sicherheit
. Um dazu beizutragen, das Xbox-Netzwerk zu einer sicheren Spielumgebung zu machen und die Community-Standards für Xbox durchzusetzen, können wir Sprache, Text, Bilder, Videos und spielinterne Inhalte (z. B. Spielclips, die Ihr Kind hochlädt, Unterhaltungen, die es führt, und Dinge, die es in Clubs und Spielen postet) sammeln und überprüfen.
Anti-Cheat und Betrugsverhütung
. Die Bereitstellung einer fairen Spielumgebung ist uns sehr wichtig. Wir verbieten Betrug, Hacking, Kontodiebstahl und jegliche andere nicht autorisierte oder betrügerische Aktivitäten, wenn Ihr Kind ein Xbox-Online-Spiel oder eine netzwerkverbundene App auf der Xbox Konsole, dem PC oder einem Mobilgerät verwendet. Zur Erkennung und Verhinderung von Betrug und Täuschung setzen wir u. U. diesem Zweck dienende Tools, Anwendungen und andere Technologien ein. Solche Technologien erstellen u. U. digitale Signaturen (als “Hashes” bezeichnet) aus bestimmten Informationen, die von seiner Xbox-Konsole, seinem PC oder Mobilgerät sowie dazu, wie es das jeweilige Gerät verwendet, gesammelt werden. Dies kann Informationen über den Browser, das Gerät, Aktivitäten, Spiel-IDs und das Betriebssystem umfassen.
Xbox-Daten, die mit Spiele- und Apps-Herausgeber geteilt werden
. Wenn Ihr Kind ein Xbox-Onlinespiel oder eine mit dem Netzwerk verbundene App auf der Xbox-Konsole, dem PC oder Mobilgerät verwenden, hat der Herausgeber dieses Spiels oder dieser Anwendung Zugriff auf Daten über seine Nutzung, um den Herausgeber bei der Bereitstellung, Unterstützung und Verbesserung seines Produkts zu unterstützen. Diesen Daten können umfassen: die Xbox-Benutzer-ID Ihre Kindes, Gamertag, eingeschränkte Kontoinformationen wie Land/Region und Altersgruppe, Daten über die Kommunikation Ihres Kindes im Spiel, alle Xbox Durchsetzungsaktivitäten, Spielsitzungen (z. B. im Spiel ausgeführte Spielzüge oder im Spiel verwendete Fahrzeugtypen), die Präsenz Ihres Kindes im Xbox-Netzwerk, die Zeit, die es mit dem Spiel oder der App verbringt, Ranglisten, Statistiken, Spielerprofile, Avatare oder Gamerpics, Freundeslisten, Aktivitätsfeeds für offizielle Clubs, denen es angehört, offizielle Clubmitgliedschaften und alle Inhalte, die es im Spiel oder in der App erstellt oder übermittelt.
Drittanbieter, die Spiele und Apps herausgeben und entwickeln, haben eine eigene und unabhängige Beziehung zu den Benutzern und die Erhebung und Verwendung personenbezogener Daten unterliegt den spezifischen Datenschutzrichtlinien dieser Dritten. Sie sollten deren Richtlinien sorgfältig überprüfen, um festzustellen, wie die Daten Ihres Kindes verwendet werden. Herausgeber können beispielsweise Spieldaten über ihre eigenen Dienste offenlegen oder anzeigen (z. B. in Bestenlisten). Sie finden ihre Richtlinien möglicherweise über Links von den Spiel- oder App-Detailseiten in unseren Stores.
Weitere Informationen finden Sie unter
Datenfreigabe für Spiele und Apps
.
Um die Freigabe von Spiel- oder App-Daten für einen Herausgeber zu beenden, entfernen Sie dessen Spiele oder App von allen Geräten, auf denen sie installiert wurden. Der Zugriff einiger Herausgeber auf die Daten Ihres Kindes kann unter
microsoft.com/consent
widerrufen werden.
Verwalten von Kindereinstellungen
. Als Organisator einer Microsoft Family-Gruppe können Sie die Informationen und Einstellungen eines Kindes auf der Seite
Family Safety
sowie die Datenschutzeinstellungen für das Xbox-Profil auf der Seite
Xbox-Datenschutz und Onlinesicherheit& verwalten
.
Sie können auch die App
Xbox-Jugendschutz
verwenden, um die Erfahrungen Ihres Kindes im Xbox-Netzwerk zu verwalten, einschließlich: Ausgaben für Microsoft und Xbox Stores, Anzeigen der Xbox-Aktivitäten Ihres Kindes und Festlegen von Altersfreigaben und der Bildschirmzeit. Xbox-spezifische Family Safety-Einstellungen gelten auf der Xbox-Konsole oder über Xbox auf dem PC oder Mobilgerät, können jedoch möglicherweise nicht auf anderen Plattformen angewendet werden.
Weitere Informationen zur Verwaltung von Xbox-Profilen finden Sie unter
Xbox-Onlinesicherheit und Datenschutzeinstellungen
.
Weitere Informationen zu Microsoft Family-Gruppen finden Sie unter
Vereinfachen Sie das Leben Ihrer Familie
.
Legacy
.
Xbox 360
. Diese Xbox-Konsole sammelt eingeschränkte erforderliche Diagnosedaten. Diese Daten tragen dazu bei, dass die Konsole Ihres Kindes wie erwartet funktioniert.
Kinect
. Der Kinect Sensor ist eine Kombination aus Kamera, Mikrofon und Infrarot-Sensor, die es ermöglicht, Bewegungen und Stimme zur Steuerung des Spielverlaufs zu nutzen. Zum Beispiel:
Wenn ihr wollt, könnt ihr die Kamera nutzen, um euch automatisch per Gesichtserkennung im Xbox-Netzwerk anzumelden. Diese Daten bleiben auf der Konsole, werden nicht an Dritte weitergegeben und können jederzeit gelöscht werden.
Beim Spielen bildet Kinect die Abstände zwischen den Gelenken am Körper Ihres Kindes ab, um eine Strichmännchen-Darstellung zu erstellen.
Mit dem Kinect-Mikrofon kann während des Spiels ein Voice-Chat zwischen den Spielern stattfinden. Das Mikrofon ermöglicht auch Sprachbefehle zur Steuerung der Konsole, des Spiels oder der App oder zur Eingabe von Suchbegriffen.
Kinect Sensor kann auch für die Audio- und Videokommunikation über Dienste wie Skype verwendet werden.
Weitere Informationen zu Kinect finden Sie unter
Xbox Kinect und Datenschutz
.
Zusammenfassung anzeigen
Weitere Infos
Zurück zum Anfang
Weitere wichtige Informationen zum Datenschutz
Im Folgenden finden Sie zusätzliche Datenschutzinformationen, z. B. wie wir Ihre Daten schützen, wo wir Ihre Daten verarbeiten und wie lange wir Ihre Daten beibehalten. Weitere Informationen zu Microsoft und unserem Engagement zum Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre finden Sie unter
Microsoft Privacy
.
Im Folgenden finden Sie zusätzliche Datenschutzinformationen, z. B. wie wir Ihre Daten schützen, wo wir Ihre Daten verarbeiten und wie lange wir Ihre Daten beibehalten. Weitere Informationen zu Microsoft und unserem Engagement zum Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre finden Sie unter
Microsoft Privacy
.
Sicherheit personenbezogener Daten
Microsoft sorgt für die Sicherheit Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten. Wir verwenden eine Reihe unterschiedlicher Sicherheitstechnologien und -verfahren, um Ihre personenbezogenen Daten vor unbefugtem Zugriff, Missbrauch oder unzulässiger Offenlegung zu schützen. Ihre personenbezogenen Daten werden von uns z. B. auf Computersystemen an kontrollierten Standorten und mit begrenztem Zugriff gespeichert. Wenn wir personenbezogene Daten (wie Kreditkartennummern oder Kennwörter) über das Internet übertragen, werden diese von uns durch Verschlüsselungstechniken geschützt. Microsoft beachtet die geltenden Datenschutzgesetze, einschließlich der Gesetze zur Meldung von Sicherheitsverletzungen.
Zurück zum Anfang
Wo wir personenbezogene Daten speichern und verarbeiten
Die von Microsoft gesammelten personenbezogenen Daten können in Ihrer Region, in den USA und in jeder anderen Gerichtsbarkeit gespeichert und verarbeitet werden, in dem Microsoft oder seine verbundenen Unternehmen, Tochtergesellschaften oder Dienstanbieter Einrichtungen unterhalten. Microsoft verwaltet große Rechenzentren in Australien, Österreich, Brasilien, Kanada, Finnland, Frankreich, Deutschland, Hong Kong, Indien, Irland, Japan, Korea, Luxemburg, Malaysia, den Niederlanden, Singapur, Südafrika, dem Vereinigten Königreich und den USA. In der Regel befindet sich der primäre Speicherort in der Region des Kunden oder in den Vereinigten Staaten, mit einer Datensicherung in einem Rechenzentrum in einer anderen Region. Der/die Speicherort(e) werden ausgewählt, um unsere Dienste effizient zu betreiben und bereitzustellen, die Leistung zu verbessern und Redundanzen zu schaffen, um die Daten im Falle eines Ausfalls oder eines anderen Problems zu schützen. Wir ergreifen Maßnahmen, um die Daten, die wir im Rahmen dieser Datenschutzerklärung erfassen, gemäß den Bestimmungen dieser Erklärung und den Anforderungen des geltenden Rechts zu verarbeiten.
Wir übertragen personenbezogene Daten aus dem Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum, dem Vereinigten Königreich und der Schweiz in andere Länder, von denen einige von der Europäischen Kommission noch nicht als Länder mit angemessenem Datenschutz festgelegt wurden. Deren Gesetze können beispielsweise nicht garantieren, dass Sie dieselben Rechte haben, oder es gibt möglicherweise keine Aufsichtsbehörde für den Datenschutz, die Ihre Beschwerden verarbeiten kann. Wenn wir solche Übermittlungen vornehmen, verwenden wir eine Reihe von rechtlichen Mechanismen, einschließlich Verträgen wie die Standardvertragsklauseln, die von der Europäischen Kommission im Rahmen des Durchführungsbeschlusses 2021/914 der Kommission veröffentlicht wurden, um Ihre Rechte zu schützen und zu ermöglichen, dass diese Schutzmaßnahmen mit Ihren Daten reisen. Weitere Informationen zu den Entscheidungen der Europäischen Kommission über die Angemessenheit des Schutzes personenbezogener Daten in den Ländern, in denen Microsoft personenbezogene Daten verarbeitet, finden Sie in diesem Artikel auf der
Website der Europäischen Kommission
.
Microsoft Corporation entspricht dem EU-USA-Datenschutzabkommen (EU-U.S. DPF), der UK-Erweiterung für die EU-US-DPF und der Schweiz-USA-Datenschutzabkommen (Schweiz–USA DPF), wie vom US-Handelsministerium festgelegt. Microsoft Corporation hat dem Handelsministerium der USA gegenüber zertifiziert, dass es die Grundsätze des EU-USA-Datenschutzabkommens (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) in Bezug auf die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten einhält, die von der Europäischen Union im Vertrauen auf die DPF zwischen der EU und den USA und des Vereinigten Königreichs (und von Gibraltar) im Vertrauen auf die UK-Erweiterung der EU-USA DPF empfangen wurden. Die Microsoft Corporation hat gegenüber dem US-Handelsministerium zertifiziert, dass sie sich an die Schweiz-USA hält. Datenschutzgrundsätze (Schweiz-USA, DPF-Grundsätze) in Bezug auf die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten, die aus der Schweiz im Vertrauen auf die Schweiz-USA erhalten werden DPF. Im Rahmen einer Weiterübermittlung ist die Microsoft Corporation für die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten verantwortlich, die sie im Rahmen des DPF erhält und anschließend an einen Dritten weitergibt, der in unserem Auftrag als Agent fungiert. Microsoft Corporation bleibt im Rahmen des DPF haftbar, wenn unser Vertreter solche personenbezogenen Daten in einer Weise verarbeitet, die nicht mit dem DPF vereinbar ist, es sei denn, Microsoft Corporation kann nachweisen, dass wir für das Ereignis, das den Schaden verursacht hat, nicht verantwortlich sind. Im Falle eines Konflikts zwischen den Bestimmungen in dieser Datenschutzerklärung und den DPF-Grundsätzen der EU und/oder der Schweiz und den USA DPF-Grundsätzen, gelten die Grundsätze. Weitere Informationen zum Data Privacy Framework(DPF)-Programm und zur Anzeige unserer Zertifizierung finden Sie auf der
Data Privacy Framework-Website des US-Handelsministeriums
. Die kontrollierten US-Tochtergesellschaften der Microsoft Corporation, die in unserem Selbstzertifizierungsantrag genannt sind, befolgen ebenfalls die DPF-Grundsätze. Weitere Informationen finden Sie in der Liste der durch die
Data Privacy Framework-Zertifizierung abgedeckten US-amerikanischen Microsoft-Einheiten
.
Wenn Sie eine Frage oder eine Beschwerde im Zusammenhang mit der Teilnahme von Microsoft an den DPF-Abkommen haben, wenden Sie sich bitte über unser
Webformular
an uns. Für alle Beschwerden im Zusammenhang mit dem DPF-Abkommen, die nicht direkt mit Microsoft gelöst werden können, haben wir uns entschlossen, mit der jeweiligen EU-Datenschutzbehörde oder einem von den europäischen Datenschutzbehörden für die Beilegung von Streitigkeiten mit EU-Bürgern eingerichteten Gremium zusammenzuarbeiten. Streitigkeiten mit Bürgern des Vereinigten Königreichs werden vom UK Information Commissioner beigelegt. Streitigkeiten mit Schweizer Bürgern werden in Zusammenarbeit mit dem Eidgenössischen Datenschutz- und Öffentlichkeitsbeauftragten (EDÖB) beigelegt. Bitte nehmen Sie Kontakt mit uns auf, wenn Sie möchten, dass wir Ihnen Kontakte für Datenschutzbehörden geben. Wie bereits in den DPF-Grundsätzen beschrieben, gibt es ein bindendes Schiedsverfahren für Beschwerden, die auf andere Art und Weise nicht zu lösen sind. Microsoft unterliegt den Untersuchungs- und Vollstreckungsbefugnissen der U.S. Federal Trade Commission (FTC).
Personen, deren personenbezogene Daten durch das japanische Gesetz zum Schutz personenbezogener Informationen geschützt sind, sollten im Artikel auf der
Website der japanischen Personal Information Protection Commission
(nur in Japanisch veröffentlicht) weitere Informationen zur Überprüfung bestimmter Länder des Schutzes personenbezogener Daten durch die Kommission erhalten. Für Einzelpersonen in Japan klicken Sie
hier
für weitere Informationen zur Verarbeitung von Informationen im Rahmen des Telekommunikationsgeschäftsakts (nur in Japanisch).
Zurück zum Anfang
Unser Umgang mit personenbezogenen Daten
Microsoft speichert personenbezogene Daten so lange wie es nötig ist, Produkte zu erbringen und Transaktionen zu vollenden, die Sie angefordert haben oder für andere legitime Zwecke, wie die Einhaltung unserer gesetzlichen Verpflichtung, Streitbeilegung und für die Durchsetzung unserer Verträge. Da diese Maßnahmen für andere Datentypen im Kontext unserer Interaktionen mit Ihnen oder der Verwendung anderer Produkte variieren, kann die tatsächliche Aufbewahrungsdauer erheblich variieren.
Andere Kriterien, die die Aufbewahrungsdauer ermitteln, lauten wie folgt:
Stellen Kunden die Daten bereit, erstellen oder verwalten sie in der Erwartung, dass wir sie so lange aufbewahren, bis sie sie ausdrücklich entfernen?
Beispiele hierfür sind ein Dokument, das Sie in OneDrive speichern, oder eine E-Mail-Nachricht, die Sie in Ihrem Outlook.com-Posteingang speichern. In diesem Fall werden die Daten von uns beibehalten, bis Sie diese selbst löschen, z. B. wenn Sie eine E-Mail aus Ihrem Posteingang in Outlook.com in den Ordner „Gelöschte Objekte” verschieben und diesen Ordner anschließend leeren (wenn der Ordner „Gelöschte Objekte” geleert wird, bleiben die gelöschten Elemente in unserem System für bis zu 30 Tage erhalten, bevor sie endgültig gelöscht werden). (Beachten Sie, dass es möglicherweise andere Gründe gibt, warum die Daten früher gelöscht werden sollen, z. B. wenn Sie das Limit für die Daten, die auf Ihrem Konto gespeichert werden können, überschreiten).
Gibt es ein automatisiertes Steuerelement, z. B. im Microsoft-Datenschutzdashboard, mit dem der Kunde jederzeit auf die personenbezogenen Daten zugreifen und diese löschen kann?
Falls nicht, wird in der Regel eine verkürzte Datenaufbewahrungszeit verwendet.
Sind die personenbezogenen Daten vertraulich?
Wenn ja, wird in der Regel eine verkürzte Aufbewahrungsdauer verwendet.
Hat Microsoft einen bestimmten Aufbewahrungszeitraum für einen bestimmten Datentyp eingeführt und angekündigt?
Bei Bing-Suchabfragen heben wir beispielsweise die Identifizierung gespeicherter Abfragen auf, indem wir die gesamte IP-Adresse nach 6 Monaten sowie Cookie-IDs und andere sitzungsübergreifende Bezeichner entfernen, die nach 18 Monaten zur Identifizierung eines bestimmten Kontos oder Geräts verwendet werden.
Hat der Benutzer seine Zustimmung für einen längeren Aufbewahrungszeitraum erteilt?
Wenn ja, werden wir Daten gemäß Ihrer Einwilligung aufbewahren.
Unterliegt Microsoft einer gesetzlichen, vertraglichen oder ähnlichen Verpflichtung zur Aufbewahrung oder Löschung der Daten?
Beispiele hierfür sind zwingende Datenaufbewahrungsgesetze in der jeweiligen Gerichtsbarkeit, behördliche Anordnungen zur Aufbewahrung von Daten, die für eine Untersuchung relevant sind, oder Daten, die für Rechtsstreitigkeiten aufbewahrt werden. Im umgekehrten Fall, wenn wir aus rechtswidrigen Gründen Inhalte entfernen müssen, werden wir dies tun.
Zurück zum Anfang
Datenschutz in US-Bundesstaaten
Wenn Sie in den USA wohnhaft sind, verarbeiten wir Ihre persönlichen Daten gemäß der in US-Bundesstaaten geltenden Datenschutzgesetze, einschließlich des Gesetzes über den Verbraucherdatenschutz des US-amerikanischen Bundesstaates Kalifornien (California Consumer Privacy Act, CCPA). Dieser Abschnitt unserer Datenschutzerklärung enthält die vom CCPA und den Datenschutzbestimmungen anderer US-Bundesstaaten geforderten Informationen und ergänzt unsere Datenschutzerklärung.
Beachten Sie, dass die Regeln zur Implementierung einiger dieser Gesetze noch nicht abgeschlossen wurden. Wir werden unsere Prozesse, Offenlegungen und diesen Hinweis aktualisieren, sobald diese Implementierungsregeln abgeschlossen sind und sofern dies andernfalls erforderlich ist.
Weitere Informationen zu den von uns gesammelten, verarbeiteten, freigegebenen und offengelegten Daten sowie zu Ihren Rechten gemäß den geltenden Datenschutzgesetzen der USA finden Sie auch in unseren
Hinweise zu Datenschutzgesetzen in US-Bundesstaaten
und unseren
Datenschutzbestimmungen für Integritätsdaten von Verbrauchern
.
Verkauf
. Wir verkaufen Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht. Wir bieten also keine Zustimmung zum Verkauf persönlicher Daten an.
Profilerstellung
.  Wir führen keine "Profilerstellung" durch, bei dem Ihre personenbezogenen Daten für eine automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung verwendet werden, die rechtliche oder ähnlich bedeutende Auswirkungen hat. Daher bieten wir für diese Art der Profilerstellung kein Opt-out an.
Freigabe
. Wir sind berechtigt, Ihre persönlichen Daten gemäß der Gesetze in Kalifornien und anderen US-Staaten zu personalisierten Werbezwecken „freizugeben“. Wie im Abschnitt
Werbung
erwähnt, schalten wir keine personalisierte Werbung für Kinder, deren Alter gemäß ihrem Geburtsdatum in ihrem Microsoft-Konto unter 18 Jahren liegt.
In der nachstehenden Aufzählung werden die Kategorien von Daten, die wir für personalisierte Werbezwecke weitergeben, die Empfänger der personenbezogenen Daten und unsere Verarbeitungszwecke beschrieben. Eine Beschreibung der Daten, die in den einzelnen Kategorien enthalten sind, finden Sie im Abschnitt
von uns gesammelte personenbezogene Daten
.
Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten
Name und Kontaktdaten
Empfänger: Dritte, die Online-Werbedienste für Microsoft erbringen oder die Werbetechnologien von Microsoft verwenden
Zwecke der Verarbeitung: Zur Bereitstellung personalisierter Werbung auf der Grundlage Ihrer Interessen
Demografische Daten
Empfänger: Dritte, die Online-Werbedienste für Microsoft  erbringen oder die Werbetechnologien von Microsoft verwenden
Zwecke der Verarbeitung: Zur Bereitstellung personalisierter Werbung auf der Grundlage Ihrer Interessen
Daten über Lizenzen und Abonnements
Empfänger: Dritte, die Online-Werbedienste für Microsoft  erbringen oder die Werbetechnologien von Microsoft verwenden
Zwecke der Verarbeitung: Zur Bereitstellung personalisierter Werbung auf der Grundlage Ihrer Interessen
Interaktionen
Empfänger: Dritte, die Online-Werbedienste für Microsoft  erbringen oder die Werbetechnologien von Microsoft verwenden
Zwecke der Verarbeitung: Zur Bereitstellung personalisierter Werbung auf der Grundlage Ihrer Interessen
Im Abschnitt
Werbung
finden Sie weitere Informationen zu unseren Werbepraktiken und in unserem
Hinweis zu Datenschutzgesetzen in US-Bundesstaaten
, um weitere Informationen zum „Teilen“ zu personalisierten Werbezwecken gemäß den geltenden US-Bundesstaaten zu erhalten.
Rechte.
Sie haben das Recht, (i) zu erfahren, welche personenbezogenen Daten wir erheben, verwenden, weitergeben, „teilen“ und verkaufen, (ii) Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zu löschen, (iii) Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zu korrigieren, (iv) die Verwendung und Weitergabe Ihrer vertraulichen Daten einzuschränken, (v) eine Kopie Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu erhalten und (vi) der „Weitergabe“ Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten an Dritte zu Zwecken personalisierter Werbung auf Websites Dritter zu widersprechen. Sie können diese Forderungen selbst oder über einen bevollmächtigten Vertreter stellen. Wenn Sie einen bevollmächtigten Vertreter einsetzen, stellen wir ihm
ausführliche Anleitungen
zur Verfügung, wie er Ihre Datenschutzrechte ausüben kann. Weitere Informationen über die Wahrnehmung dieser Rechte finden Sie in unserem
Hinweis zu den Datenschutzgesetzen der US-Bundesstaaten
.
Universelle Abmeldung.
Microsoft empfängt und reagiert auf das Global Privacy Control (GPC) Browser-Deaktivierungssignal. Microsoft deaktiviert die Freigabe Ihrer Daten an Dritte für personalisierte Werbung, wenn wir beim Besuch unserer Websites ein GPC-Signal von Ihnen erhalten.
Sie können zusätzliche Rechte in Bezug auf Ihre Gesundheitsdaten haben, die in den geltenden staatlichen Gesetzen zum Schutz der Gesundheit von Verbrauchern festgelegt sind. Bitte lesen Sie unsere
Datenschutzrichtlinie für Gesundheitsdaten von Verbrauchern
, um sich über die Rechte zu informieren, die Ihnen nach dem My Health My Data Act (MHMDA) des Bundesstaates Washington und anderen geltenden US-Gesetzen zum Integritätsdatenschutz für Verbraucher.
Wenn Sie ein Microsoft-Konto besitzen, müssen Sie Ihre Rechte über das
Microsoft-Datenschutzdashboard
, geltend machen, was erfordert, dass Sie sich bei Ihrem Microsoft-Konto anmelden. Wenn Sie nach der Nutzung des Dashboards zusätzliche Forderungen oder Fragen haben, können Sie sich über die Adresse im Abschnitt
Kontaktaufnahme
an Microsoft wenden, unser
Webformular
verwenden, oder uns über die gebührenfreie US-Nummer +1 (844) 931 2038 anrufen. Wenn Sie noch kein-Konto besitzen, können Sie Ihre Rechte ausüben, indem Sie sich wie oben beschrieben an uns wenden. Um Ihre personenbezogenen Daten noch besser zu schützen, bitten wir Sie möglicherweise um zusätzliche Informationen, wie z. B. Ihr Wohnsitzland, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und Ihre Telefonnummer, um Ihre Identität und Ihre Anfrage zu überprüfen, bevor wir die Anfrage bearbeiten.
Sie können angeben, dass Sie sich gegen die Freigabe Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten an Dritte für personalisierte Werbung auf Websites von Drittanbietern entscheiden, indem Sie unsere
Webseite zur Deaktivierung der Freigabe
besuchen. Sie können auch die personalisierte Werbung kontrollieren, die Sie auf Microsoft-Eigentum sehen, indem Sie unsere
Deaktivierungsseite
besuchen.
Wir verwenden oder veröffentlichen Ihre vertraulichen Daten nicht für andere Zwecke als die unten aufgeführten, ohne Ihre Zustimmung oder gemäß den geltenden Gesetzen zulässig oder erforderlich. Daher bieten wir keine Möglichkeit, die Verwendung vertraulicher Daten einzuschränken.
Wenn Sie bei Microsoft einen Antrag auf Kenntnisnahme, Löschung, Berichtigung oder Erhalt Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten gestellt haben und der Meinung sind, dass Ihr Antrag von Microsoft abgelehnt wurde, können Sie Ihr Recht auf Einspruch gegen die Ergebnisse Ihres Antrags wahrnehmen, indem Sie sich über unser Webformular an unser Datenschutz-Supportteam wenden. Wenn Ihre Beschwerde nicht erfolgreich ist und abhängig vom Bundesstaat, in dem Sie sich befinden, haben Sie möglicherweise das Recht, Ihr Anliegen vorzubringen oder eine Beschwerde bei Ihrem Staatsanwalt einzulegen.
Sie haben ein Recht darauf, bei der Ausübung Ihrer Datenschutzrechte nicht diskriminiert zu werden. Wir werden Sie nicht diskriminieren, wenn Sie Ihre Datenschutzrechte ausüben.
Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten
. In der nachstehenden Aufzählung beschreiben wir die Kategorien der von uns erfassten personenbezogenen Daten, deren Quellen, unsere Verarbeitungszwecke und die Kategorien der externen Empfänger, denen wir die personenbezogenen Daten bereitstellen. Eine Beschreibung der Daten, die in den einzelnen Kategorien enthalten sind, finden Sie im Abschnitt
von uns gesammelte personenbezogene Daten
. Lesen Sie bitte den Abschnitt
Unser Umgang mit personenbezogenen Daten
unserer Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Aufbewahrungskriterien für personenbezogene Daten.
Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten
Name und Kontaktdaten
Quellen für personenbezogene Daten: Interaktionen mit Benutzern und Partnern, mit denen wir Dienste mit Co-Branding anbieten
Zwecke der Verarbeitung (Erhebung und Weitergabe an Dritte): Bereitstellung unserer Produkte, Beantwortung von Kundenfragen, Hilfe, Sicherheit und Fehlerbehebung sowie Marketing
Empfänger: Dienstanbieter und benutzergesteuerte Einrichtungen
Anmeldeinformationen
Quellen für personenbezogene Daten: Interaktionen mit Benutzern und Organisationen, die Benutzer vertreten
Zwecke der Verarbeitung (Erhebung und Weitergabe an Dritte): Bereitstellung unserer Produkte, Authentifizierung und Kontozugang sowie Hilfe, Sicherheit und Fehlerbehebung
Empfänger: Dienstanbieter und benutzergesteuerte Einrichtungen
Demografische Daten
Quellen für personenbezogene Daten: Interaktionen mit Benutzern und Käufe bei Datenmaklern
Zwecke der Verarbeitung (Erhebung und Weitergabe an Dritte): Bereitstellung und Personalisierung unserer Produkte; Produktentwicklung; Hilfe, Sicherheit und Fehlerbehebung; und Marketing
Empfänger: Dienstanbieter und benutzergesteuerte Einrichtungen
Zahlungsdaten
Quellen für personenbezogene Daten: Interaktionen mit Benutzern und Finanzinstituten
Zwecke der Verarbeitung (Erhebung und Weitergabe an Dritte): Handel treiben, Transaktionen verarbeiten, Aufträge ausführen, Hilfe, Sicherheit und Fehlerbehebung leisten sowie Betrug erkennen und verhindern
Empfänger: Dienstanbieter und benutzergesteuerte Einrichtungen
Daten über Lizenzen und Abonnements
Quellen für personenbezogene Daten: Interaktionen mit Nutzern und Organisationen, die Nutzer vertreten, sowie mit Drittanbieter-Shops und Plattformen, auf denen unsere Produkte gekauft werden
Zwecke der Verarbeitung (Erhebung und Weitergabe an Dritte): Bereitstellung, Personalisierung und Aktivierung unserer Produkte; Kundensupport; Hilfe, Sicherheit und Fehlerbehebung; Marketing; und Buchhaltung
Empfänger: Dienstanbieter und benutzergesteuerte Einrichtungen
Interaktionen
Quellen für personenbezogene Daten: Interaktionen mit Benutzern, einschließlich der Daten, die Microsoft durch diese Interaktionen generiert
Zwecke der Verarbeitung (Erhebung und Weitergabe an Dritte): Bereitstellung und Personalisierung unserer Produkte, Produktverbesserung, Produktentwicklung, Marketing und Hilfe, Sicherheit und Fehlerbehebung
Empfänger: Dienstanbieter und benutzergesteuerte Einrichtungen
Inhalte
Quellen für personenbezogene Daten: Interaktionen mit Benutzern und Organisationen, die Benutzer vertreten
Zwecke der Verarbeitung (Erhebung und Weitergabe an Dritte): Bereitstellung unserer Produkte, Sicherheit und Hilfe, Sicherung und Fehlerbehebung
Empfänger: Dienstanbieter und benutzergesteuerte Einrichtungen
Videos oder Aufzeichnungen
Quellen für personenbezogene Daten: Interaktionen mit Benutzern und öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
Zwecke der Verarbeitung (Erhebung und Weitergabe an Dritte): Bereitstellung unserer Produkte; Produktverbesserung; Produktentwicklung; Marketing; Hilfe, Sicherheit und Fehlerbehebung; und Sicherheit
Empfänger: Dienstanbieter und benutzergesteuerte Einrichtungen
Feedback und Bewertungen
Quellen für personenbezogene Daten: Interaktionen mit Benutzern
Zwecke der Verarbeitung (Erhebung und Weitergabe an Dritte): Bereitstellung unserer Produkte, Produktverbesserung, Produktentwicklung, Kundensupport sowie Hilfe, Sicherheit und Fehlerbehebung
Empfänger: Dienstanbieter und benutzergesteuerte Einrichtungen
Die obige Aufzählung enthält nur die wichtigsten Quellen und Verarbeitungszwecke für jede Kategorie personenbezogener Daten. Wir erfassen zudem auch personenbezogene Daten aus den im Abschnitt
Von uns erfasste personenbezogene Daten
aufgeführten Quellen (wie z. B. Entwickler und deren Erfahrungen mit Microsoft-Produkten). Ebenso verarbeiten wir alle Kategorien personenbezogener Daten für die im Abschnitt
Verwendung personenbezogener Daten
beschriebenen Zwecke, z. B. die Erfüllung unserer rechtlichen Verpflichtungen, die Entwicklung unserer Mitarbeiter und die Durchführung von Recherchen.
Abhängig von Ihren
Datenschutzeinstellungen
, Ihrer Zustimmung, den von Ihnen verwendeten Produkten und den von Ihnen ausgewählten Optionen, können wir bestimmte personenbezogene Daten verfassen, verarbeiten oder offenlegen, die gemäß den geltenden Datenschutzgesetzen der USA als “vertrauliche Daten” qualifiziert sind. Vertrauliche Daten sind eine Untergruppe der personenbezogenen Daten. In der nachstehenden Aufzählung werden die Kategorien vertraulicher Daten, die wir erfassen, deren Quellen, unsere Verarbeitungszwecke und die Kategorien von externen Empfängern, an die wir die vertraulichen Daten weitergeben, beschrieben. Weitere Informationen über die von uns gesammelten vertraulichen Daten, finden Sie im Abschnitt
Von uns gesammelte personenbezogene Daten
.
Kategorien vertraulicher Daten
Kontoanmeldung, Finanzkonto, Debit- oder Kreditkartennummer und die Mittel für den Zugriff auf das Konto (Sicherheits- oder Zugriffscode, Kennwort, Anmeldeinformationen usw.)
Quellen für sensible Daten: Interaktionen mit Benutzern und Organisationen, die Benutzer vertreten
Zwecke der Verarbeitung (Erhebung und Weitergabe an Dritte): Das Produkt bereitstellen und die gewünschten finanziellen Transaktionen durchführen
Empfänger: Dienstleister und Anbieter von Zahlungsdiensten
Präzise Informationen zum geografischen Standort
Quellen für sensible Daten: Interaktionen der Benutzer mit den Produkten
Zwecke der Verarbeitung (Erhebung und Weitergabe an Dritte): Erbringung der gewünschten Dienstleistung; Produktverbesserung; einige Attribute können an Dritte weitergegeben werden, um die Dienstleistung zu erbringen
Empfänger: Benutzer und Dienstanbieter (weitere Informationen finden Sie im Abschnitt
Windows-Ortungsdienste und Aufzeichnung
unserer Datenschutzbestimmungen)
Ethnische Zugehörigkeit, religiöse oder philosophische Überzeugungen oder Mitgliedschaft in Gewerkschaften
Quellen für sensible Daten: Kommunikation mit den Benutzern
Zwecke der Verarbeitung (Erhebung und Weitergabe an Dritte): Durchführung von Forschungsstudien, um besser zu verstehen, wie unsere Produkte genutzt und wahrgenommen werden, und um die Produkterfahrung zu verbessern
Empfänger: Dienstleister
Gesundheitszustand, psychische Gesundheit, Sexualleben oder sexuelle Orientierung
Quellen für sensible Daten: Kommunikation mit den Benutzern
Zwecke der Verarbeitung (Erhebung und Weitergabe an Dritte): Durchführung von Forschungsstudien, um besser zu verstehen, wie unsere Produkte genutzt und wahrgenommen werden, und um das Produkterlebnis und die Zugänglichkeit zu verbessern
Empfänger: Dienstleister
Inhalt Ihrer Post, E-Mails oder Textnachrichten (wenn Microsoft nicht der beabsichtigte Empfänger der Kommunikation ist)
Quellen für sensible Daten: Interaktionen der Benutzer mit den Produkten
Zwecke der Verarbeitung (Erhebung und Weitergabe an Dritte): Bereitstellung unserer Produkte, Verbesserung der Produkterfahrung, Sicherheit und Hilfe, Sicherheit und Fehlerbehebung
Empfänger: Dienstleister
Personenbezogene Daten, die von einem bekannten Kind unter 13 Jahren erfasst wurden
Quellen für sensible Daten: Interaktionen mit Benutzern und Organisationen, die Benutzer vertreten
Zwecke der Verarbeitung (Erhebung und Weitergabe an Dritte): Bereitstellung unserer Produkte; Produktverbesserung; Produktentwicklung; Empfehlungen; Hilfe, Sicherheit und Fehlerbehebung; und Sicherheit
Empfänger: Dienstanbieter und benutzerorientierte Entitäten (in Übereinstimmung mit Ihren Microsoft Family Safety-
Einstellungen
)
Die obige Aufzählung enthält zwar die primären Quellen und Verarbeitungszwecke der erfassten personenbezogene Daten von Kindern unter 13 Jahren, wir erfassen aber auch personenbezogene Daten aus den Quellen, die im Abschnitt
Erfassung von Daten von Kindern
aufgeführt sind.
Wir verwenden oder legen Ihre vertraulichen Daten nicht für andere Zwecke als die folgenden offen:
Ausführen der Dienste oder Bereitstellen der Produkte, die Sie erwarten
Dazu beitragen, die Sicherheit und Integrität unserer Dienste, Systeme und Daten zu gewährleisten, böswillige, betrügerische oder unzulässige Handlungen zu bekämpfen und die körperliche Sicherheit von Einzelpersonen zu schützen, sofern die Verarbeitung angemessen notwendig und angemessen ist.
Für die kurzfristige vorübergehende Verwendung (einschließlich nicht personalisierter Werbung), solange die personenbezogenen Daten nicht an Dritte weitergegeben werden, nicht für die Profilerstellung oder dazu verwendet werden, die Erfahrung einer Person außerhalb der aktuellen Interaktion mit Microsoft zu ändern.
Ausführen von Diensten im Auftrag von Microsoft, z. B. Verwalten von Konten, Bereitstellen von Kundendienst, Verarbeitung oder Erfüllen von Bestellungen/Transaktionen, Überprüfen von Kundeninformationen, Verarbeiten von Zahlungen, Bereitstellen von Finanzen, Bereitstellen von Analysen, Bereitstellen von Speicherplatz und ähnlichen Diensten
Durchführen von Aktivitäten zur Überprüfung oder Aufrechterhaltung der Qualität oder Sicherheit eines Diensts oder Geräts, der bzw. das von Microsoft kontrolliert wird, oder zum Verbessern, Aktualisieren oder Verbessern eines Diensts oder Geräts
Erfassung oder Verarbeitung vertraulicher Daten, bei denen die Erfassung oder Verarbeitung nicht zum Ableiten von Merkmalen der Person dient
Alle anderen Aktivitäten in Übereinstimmung mit zukünftigen Bestimmungen, die im Rahmen der Datenschutzgesetze von US-Staaten erlassen werden
Deidentifizierte Daten
. In einigen Situationen verarbeitet Microsoft möglicherweise nicht identifizierte Daten. Daten befinden sich in diesem Zustand, wenn wir sie mit keiner Person, mit der sie verknüpft sein könnten, verbinden können, ohne zusätzliche Schritte auszuführen. In solchen Fällen und außer wenn dies nach geltendem Recht nicht zulässig ist, bewahren wir diese Informationen in einem nicht identifizierten Zustand auf und versuchen nicht, die Person, auf die sich diese Daten beziehen, erneut zu identifizieren.
Offenlegung personenbezogener Daten für geschäftliche oder kommerzielle Zwecke
. Wie im Abschnitt
Gründe für die Weitergabe personenbezogener Daten
dargelegt, geben wir personenbezogene Daten für verschiedene geschäftliche und kommerzielle Zwecke an Dritte weiter. Die wichtigsten geschäftlichen und kommerziellen Zwecke, für die wir personenbezogene Daten weitergeben, sind die in der obigen Tabelle aufgeführten Verarbeitungszwecke. Wir teilen jedoch alle Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten für geschäftliche und kommerzielle Zwecke aus Abschnitt
Gründe für die Weitergabe personenbezogener Daten
.
Parteien, die die Erfassung personenbezogener Daten kontrollieren
. In bestimmten Situationen könnten wir einem Drittanbieter erlauben, die Erfassung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu steuern. Beispielsweise könnten Anwendungen oder Erweiterungen von Drittanbietern, die unter Windows oder in Microsoft Edge ausgeführt werden, personenbezogene Daten nach ihren eigenen Methoden erfassen.
Microsoft gestattet Werbeunternehmen, Informationen über Ihre Interaktionen mit unseren Websites zu erfassen, um personalisierte Anzeigen im Auftrag von Microsoft auszuliefern.  Sie können
unsere externen Werbepartner
im
Hinweis auf die Datenschutzgesetze der US-Bundesstaaten
einsehen und sich auf unserer Abmelde-
Seite
vom Austausch von Daten mit Drittanbietern abmelden.
Zurück zum Anfang
Werbung
Werbung ermöglicht uns, einige unserer Produkte zu unterstützen und zu verbessern. Microsoft verwendet keine Ihrer Inhalte aus E-Mails, Chats zwischen zwei Menschen, Videoanrufen oder Voicemails oder Ihren Dokumenten, Fotos oder anderen persönlichen Dateien, um damit Werbung für Sie zu erzeugen. Wir verwenden andere Daten (s. unten) für Werbung auf Microsoft-Eigentum und auf Eigentum von Drittanbietern. Zum Beispiel:
Microsoft verwendet von uns gesammelte Daten, um einige der Anzeigen auszuwählen und anzubieten, die in den Microsoft-Webeigenschaften wie z. B.
Microsoft.com
, Microsoft Start und Bing angezeigt werden. Wir können diese Daten auch verwenden, um Anzeigen auf digitalen Objekten Dritter auszuwählen und bereitzustellen.
Wenn die Werbe-ID in Windows als Teil Ihrer Datenschutzeinstellungen aktiviert ist, können Dritte auf die Werbe-ID zugreifen und sie verwenden (ähnlich wie Websites auf eine in einem Cookie gespeicherte eindeutige Kennung zugreifen und sie verwenden können), um Werbung in solchen Anwendungen auszuwählen und bereitzustellen.
Wir teilen die Daten, die wir erfassen, mit internen und externen Partnern wie Xandr, Yahoo oder Facebook (siehe unten), damit die Werbeanzeigen in unseren oder deren Produkten für Sie möglichst relevant und nützlich sind.
Werbetreibende können unsere Webbeacons auf ihren Websites platzieren oder ähnliche Technologien verwenden, um Microsoft zu erlauben, auf deren Websites Informationen wie Aktivitäten, Einkäufe und Besuche zu erfassen. Wir nutzen diese Daten im Auftrag unserer Werbekunden, um deren Werbung bereitzustellen.
Die dargestellte Werbung kann auf Daten wie Ihren Interessen und Favoriten, Ihrem aktuellen Standort, Ihren Transaktionen, der Verwendung unserer Produkte, Suchkriterien oder auf Inhalten basieren, die Sie sich gerade ansehen. Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise Inhalte auf Microsoft Start zum Thema Auto anschauen, zeigen wir Autowerbungen an. Wenn Sie „Pizzerien in Seattle” auf Bing suchen, sehen Sie Werbungen in Ihren Suchergebnissen für Restaurants in Seattle.
Weitere Werbung basiert auf andere Informationen, die wir im Laufe der Zeit aus demografischen Daten, Positionsdaten, Suchabfragen, Interessen, Hobbys und Favoriten, Nutzungsdaten von unseren eigenen Produkten und Websites sowie die Informationen, die wir über Sie von den Websites und Apps unserer Partner über Sie erfahren haben. Diese Art von Werbung wird in diesen Bestimmungen als "personalisierte Werbung" klassifiziert. Wenn Sie zum Beispiel Spielinhalte auf
xbox.com
ansehen, sehen Sie möglicherweise Werbung für Spiele auf Microsoft Start. Um personalisierte Werbung zu bieten, speichern wir, sobald Ihr Browser mit unseren Websites interagiert, Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät, die von uns erfasste Informationen (beispielsweise Ihre IP-Adresse) enthalten. Wenn Sie den Empfang personalisierter Werbung ablehnen, werden die diesen Cookies zugeordneten Daten nicht verwendet.
Wir verwenden möglicherweise Informationen über Sie, um Ihnen bei der Verwendung von Microsoft-Diensten personalisierte Werbung zu bieten. Wenn Sie mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto angemeldet sind und zugestimmt haben, dass Microsoft Edge Ihre Online-Aktivitäten für personalisierte Werbung nutzen darf, werden Ihnen Anzeigen für Produkte und Dienste angezeigt, die auf Ihren Online-Aktivitäten während der Nutzung von Microsoft Edge basieren. Um Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen für Edge zu konfigurieren, wechseln Sie zu Microsoft Edge > Einstellungen > Datenschutz und Dienste. Um Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen und Anzeigeneinstellungen für Ihr Microsoft-Konto in Bezug auf Ihre Online-Aktivitäten in verschiedenen Browsern, einschließlich Microsoft Edge, oder beim Besuch von Websites oder Apps von Drittanbietern zu konfigurieren, rufen Sie Ihr Dashboard unter auf
privacy.microsoft.com
.
Weitere Details zu werbebezogenen Verwendungen von Daten umfassen:
Bewährte Methoden und Verpflichtungen der Werbebranche
. Microsoft ist Mitglied der
Network Advertising Initiative
(NAI) und hält sich an den NAI-Verhaltensregeln. Wir halten uns ebenfalls an die folgenden Selbstregulierungsprogramme:
In den USA:
Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA)
In Europa:
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA)
In Kanada:
Anzeigenoptionen: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)
/
Choix de Pub: l'Alliance de la publicité numérique du Canada (DAAC)
Gesundheitsbezogene Zielgruppenwerbung
. In den Vereinigten Staaten bieten wir personalisierte Werbung auf der Grundlage einer begrenzten Anzahl von einfachen, unempfindlichen und gesundheitsbezogenen Interessenkategorien an, einschließlich Allergien, Arthritis, Cholesterin, Erkältung und Grippe, Diabetes, Magen-Darm-Gesundheit, Kopfschmerzen/Migräne, gesunde Ernährung, gesundes Herz, Männergesundheit, Mundgesundheit, Osteoporose, die Gesundheit der Haut, Schlaf und Vision/Augenpflege. Wir personalisieren auch Anzeigen basierend auf benutzerdefinierten, nicht sensiblen gesundheitsbezogenen Interessenkategorien, wie von Werbetreibenden gewünscht.
Kinder und Werbung
. Wir versenden keine personalisierte Werbung an Kinder, deren Geburtsdatum in ihrem Microsoft-Konto diese als unter 18 Jahre alt identifiziert.
Datenaufbewahrung
. Die Daten aus personalisierter Werbung werden von uns nicht länger als 13 Monate aufbewahrt, es sei denn, dass wir Ihr Einverständnis bekommen, die Daten länger aufzubewahren.
Vertrauliche Daten
. Microsoft Advertising erfasst, verarbeitet oder legt keine personenbezogenen Daten offen, die gemäß den in US-Bundesstaaten geltenden Datenschutzgesetzen als “vertrauliche Daten” gelten, um personalisierte Werbung zu schalten.
Datenfreigabe
. In einigen Fällen teilen wir Berichte mit den Werbungtreibenden über solche Daten, die wir auf ihren Websites oder von ihrer Werbung erfasst haben.
Von anderen Werbefirmen gesammelte Daten
. Inserenten fügen manchmal ihre eigenen Webbeacons (oder die ihrer anderen Werbepartner) in ihren Anzeigen ein, die wir anzeigen, damit sie ihren eigenen Cookie setzen und lesen können. Zusätzlich werden Microsoft-Partner mittels
Xandr
, einem Microsoft-Unternehmen, und Drittanbieter-Anzeigenunternehmen dabei helfen, einige unserer Werbe-Dienste anzubieten und wir erlauben auch anderen Drittanbieter-Anzeigenunternehmen, Werbung auf unseren Seiten zu platzieren. Diese Drittanbieter können Cookies auf Ihrem Computer platzieren und Daten über Ihre Onlineaktivitäten auf Websites oder Onlinediensten sammeln. Dazu gehören momentan u. a. folgende Unternehmen:
Facebook
,
Media.ne
t
,
Outb
rain
,
Taboola
und
Yah
oo
. Wählen Sie einen der obigen Links aus, um weitere Informationen zu den Praktiken des jeweiligen Unternehmens zu erhalten, einschließlich der angebotenen Auswahlmöglichkeiten. Viele dieser Unternehmen sind auch Mitglieder der
NAI
oder
DAA
, die jeweils eine einfache Methode zur Ablehnung von Zielgruppenwerbung von Seiten der teilnehmenden Unternehmen anbieten.
Um den Empfang personalisierter Werbung von Microsoft zu deaktivieren, besuchen Sie unsere
Abmelde
-Seite. Nach der Ablehnung wird Ihre Auswahl in einem für Ihren Computer und den verwendeten Webbrowser spezifischen Cookie gespeichert. Dieses Opt-Out-Cookie hat eine Gültigkeit von fünf Jahren. Falls Sie Cookies auf Ihrem Computer löschen, muss die Ablehnung wiederholt werden.
Zurück zum Anfang
Spracherkennungstechnologien
Spracherkennungstechnologien sind in vielen Microsoft-Produkten und -Diensten integriert. Microsoft bietet sowohl gerätebasierte Spracherkennungsfunktionen an als auch cloudbasierte (Online-) Spracherkennungsfunktionen. Die Spracherkennungstechnologie von Microsoft transkribiert Sprachdaten zu Text. Mit Ihrem Einverständnis können Microsoft-Mitarbeiter und Lieferanten, die im Auftrag von Microsoft arbeiten, Ausschnitte Ihrer Sprachdaten oder Sprachclips überprüfen, um unsere Spracherkennungstechnologien aufzubauen und zu verbessern. Diese Verbesserungen ermöglichen es uns, bessere sprachgesteuerte Funktionen zu entwickeln, von denen Benutzer bei allen unseren Produkten und Diensten für Heimanwender und Unternehmen profitieren. Vor der Überprüfung von Sprachdaten durch Mitarbeiter oder Lieferanten schützen wir die Privatsphäre der Benutzer, indem wir Schritte unternehmen, um die Daten zu anonymisieren. Wir schließen Geheimhaltungsvereinbarungen mit relevanten Lieferanten und ihren Mitarbeitern ab und verlangen, dass Mitarbeiter wie Lieferanten hohe Datenschutzstandards einhalten.
Weitere Informationen über Microsoft und Ihre Sprachdaten
.
Zurück zum Anfang
Vorschau- oder kostenlose Veröffentlichungen
Microsoft bietet Vorschau-, Insider-, Beta- oder andere kostenlose Produkte und Features ("Vorschauen") an, damit Sie diese bewerten können und Microsoft Informationen über Ihre Nutzung des Produkts übermitteln können, einschließlich Feedback, Geräte- und Nutzungsdaten. Als Ergebnis können Vorschau-Optionen automatisch zusätzliche Daten sammeln, weniger Kontrollelemente bereitstellen und auch sonst andere Datenschutz- und Sicherheitsmaßnahmen verwenden als diejenigen, welche typischerweise bei unseren Produkten verwendet werden. Wenn Sie sich an Vorschauoptionen beteiligen, nehmen wir möglicherweise mit Ihnen Kontakt bezüglich Ihrer Rückmeldung oder Ihres Interesses an der Nutzung des besagten Produkts nach deren allgemeinen Veröffentlichung auf.
Zurück zum Anfang
Änderungen an diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen
Wir aktualisieren diese Datenschutzbestimmungen bei Bedarf, um sie transparenter zu machen oder als Reaktion auf:
Feedback von Kunden, Behörden, Branchen oder anderen Beteiligten.
Änderungen an unseren Produkten.
Änderungen an unseren Datenverarbeitungsaktivitäten oder Richtlinien.
Wenn Änderungen an diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen vorgenommen wurden, können Sie das anhand des geänderten Datums unter "letzte Aktualisierung" am Anfang der Datenschutzbestimmungen erkennen. Die Änderungen werden ebenfalls auf der Seite
Änderungsverlauf
beschrieben. Bei grundlegenden Änderungen oder bei Änderungen in Bezug auf die Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten, die nicht mit dem Zweck übereinstimmen, für den die Daten erhoben wurden, wird entweder vor der Implementierung dieser Änderungen an hervorgehobener Stelle ein Hinweis angezeigt oder Sie erhalten direkt eine Benachrichtigung. Sie sollten diese Datenschutzbestimmungen deshalb regelmäßig überprüfen, um zu erfahren, wie Microsoft Ihre personenbezogenen Daten schützt.
Zurück zum Anfang
So erreichen Sie uns
Wenn Sie Fragen oder Beschwerden zum Thema Datenschutz oder eine Frage an den Datenschutzbeauftragten von Microsoft haben (Leitender Microsoft Datenschutzbeauftragter oder Datenschutzbeauftragter Ihrer Region), verwenden Sie unser
Webformular
, um uns zu kontaktieren. Wir antworten auf Fragen oder Bedenken wie gesetzlich vorgeschrieben und innerhalb eines Zeitraums von höchstens 30 Tagen. Sie können eine Warnung oder eine Beschwerde bei einer Datenschutzbehörde oder einer anderen offiziellen zuständigen Behörde einreichen.
Wenn Microsoft ein Datenverantwortlicher ist, gilt (sofern nicht anders angegeben), dass Microsoft Corporation der Datenverantwortliche für die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten ist, die wir über die Produkte erfassen, für die diese Erklärung gilt. Im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum, im Vereinigten Königreich und in der Schweiz ist Microsoft Ireland Operations Limited dieser Datenverantwortliche. Unsere Adressen sind:
Microsoft Privacy, Microsoft Corporation, One Microsoft Way, Redmond, Washington 98052, USA. Telefon: +1 (425) 882 8080.
Microsoft Ireland Operations Limited, Attn: Datenschutzbeauftragter, One Microsoft Place, South County Business Park, Leopardstown, Dublin 18, Irland. Telefon +353 1 706 3117.
Die Microsoft-Niederlassung in Ihrem Land oder Ihrer Region finden Sie in der Liste der
Microsoft-Niederlassungen auf der ganzen Welt
.
Der Vertreter von Microsoft Ireland Operations Limited im Sinne von Art. 14 des Schweizerischen Bundesgesetzes über den Datenschutz ist Microsoft Schweiz GmbH, The Circle 02, 8058 Zürich-Flughafen, Schweiz.
Wenn Sie Ihre Rechte gemäß den in US-Bundesstaaten geltenden Datenschutzgesetzen wahrnehmen möchten, können Sie sich unter der oben genannten US-Adresse an Microsoft wenden, unser
Webformular
verwenden, oder uns über unsere gebührenfreie USA-Nummer +1 (844) 931 2038 anrufen.
Wenn Sie in einer der Provinzen Kanadas wohnhaft sind, können Sie sich an den Microsoft Data Protection Officer für Kanada wenden bei Microsoft Canada Head Office, 4400-81 Bay St, Toronto, ON, M5J 0E7, +1 (416) 349 2506, oder unser
Webformular
verwenden.
Nach französischem Recht können Sie uns hier zudem spezifische Anweisungen über die Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten nach Ihrem Tod senden, indem Sie unser
Webformular
verwenden.
Rufen Sie bei Technik- oder Supportfragen
Microsoft-Support
auf, um mehr über die Microsoft-Supportangebote zu erfahren. Rufen Sie
Microsoft-Kontosupport
auf, wenn Sie eine Frage zum Kennwort eines persönlichen Microsoft-Kontos haben.
Wir bieten verschiedene Möglichkeiten, wie Sie Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, die Microsoft erworben hat, kontrollieren und auf diese zugreifen können, und Ihre Datenschutzrechte ausüben können. Wenden Sie sich hierzu an Microsoft über unser
Webformular
oder die oben genannten Informationen, oder verwenden Sie die verschiedenen Tools, die wir bereitstellen. Weitere Informationen finden Sie im Abschnitt
Zugriff auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten und Steuerung
.
Zusammenfassung anzeigen
Weitere Infos
Zurück zum Anfang
Künstliche Intelligenz und Microsoft Copilot-Funktionen
Microsoft nutzt die Leistungsfähigkeit von künstlicher Intelligenz (KI) in vielen unserer Produkte und Dienste, einschließlich der Integration von generativen KI-Features wie Microsoft Copilot-Funktionen. Die Bereitstellung und Nutzung von KI durch Microsoft unterliegt den
KI-Grundsätzen
und dem
Standard für verantwortungsvolle KI
von Microsoft. Die Erhebung und Nutzung personenbezogener Daten durch Microsoft bei der Entwicklung und Bereitstellung von KI-Funktionen steht im Einklang mit den in dieser Datenschutzerklärung dargelegten Verpflichtungen. Produktspezifische Details enthalten zusätzliche relevante Informationen. Weitere Informationen dazu, wie Microsoft KI verwendet, finden Sie
hier
.
Microsoft Copilot-Funktionen.
Microsoft Copilot
ist der alltägliche KI-Begleiter von Microsoft und wurde entwickelt, um Ihnen dabei zu helfen, mehr zu erreichen – durch eine einzige Erfahrung, die geräteübergreifend ist und den relevanten Kontext im Web, auf Ihrem PC und in verschiedenen Apps versteht, um Ihnen die richtigen Fähigkeiten zur richtigen Zeit zur Verfügung zu stellen. Mithilfe von Copilot können Benutzer unter anderem mit dem Entwurf eines neuen Word-Dokuments beginnen, beim Zugriff auf Copilot in M365-Apps eine PowerPoint-Präsentation erstellen, schnell Antworten auf komplexe Suchabfragen online finden, relevante Dokumente oder andere persönliche Inhalte finden oder sich zum Erstellen neuer Lieder, Geschichten, Bilder oder anderer Inhalte inspirieren lassen. Copilot ist eine Familie von Diensten, und die Sammlung und Verwendung von Daten durch Microsoft kann sich je nach Dienst und beabsichtigter Funktionalität in einem bestimmten Szenario unterscheiden.
Die Copilot
Website
und App (verfügbar für iOS und Android) ist das Herzstück der Copilot-Erfahrung für Verbraucher. Innerhalb dieser Kernerfahrung können Benutzer das Web durchsuchen, Texte, Bilder, Lieder oder andere Ausgaben erstellen oder sonstige Funktionen wie Plug-Ins nutzen. Auf der Website und in der App geben Benutzer „Eingabeaufforderungen“ ein, die Copilot Anweisungen geben (z. B. „Geben Sie mir Empfehlungen für ein Restaurant, das Gruppen von 10 Personen in meiner Nähe beherbergt“). Um eine relevante Antwort bereitzustellen, verwendet Copilot diese Eingabeaufforderung zusammen mit dem Standort, der Sprache und ähnlichen Einstellungen des Benutzers, um eine hilfreiche Antwort zu formulieren. In einigen Märkten können authentifizierte Benutzer Copilot Zugriff auf den vorherigen Aufforderungsverlauf gewähren, um das Produkt besser zu personalisieren. Das Copilot-Produkt des Verbrauchers verwendet die gesammelten Daten, um die Copilot-Dienste bereitzustellen und zu verbessern, einschließlich relevanter Werbung. Benutzer, die bei ihrem Konto angemeldet sind, können ihren Aufforderungsverlauf im Produkt und auf dem Microsoft-Datenschutzdashboard verwalten und ihren Standort, ihre Sprache und andere Einstellungen im Produkt anpassen.
Copilot wird auch als Assistent in anderen Microsoft-Verbraucherprodukten wie Bing und Microsoft Edge angezeigt. In diesen Situationen sind Datenverarbeitungsaktivitäten in der Regel auf die primären Verwendungszwecke dieser Produkte abgestimmt. Beispielsweise steht Copilot bei der Nutzung und Erfassung personenbezogener Daten durch Bing im Einklang mit dem Kernangebot der Websuche von Bing, wie im Abschnitt für das Suchen und Durchsuchen dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschrieben. Weitere Informationen über Copilot in Bing finden Sie unter
Copilot in Bing: Unser Ansatz für verantwortungsvolle KI
. In Microsoft Edge erscheint Copilot in der Seitenleiste und kann dem Benutzer dabei helfen, Aufgaben im Zusammenhang mit den von ihm besuchten Webseiten zu erledigen (z. B. „Diese Seite zusammenfassen“). Diese Daten werden in Übereinstimmung mit dem Microsoft Edge-Abschnitt dieser Datenschutzerklärung verwendet.
Copilot Pro
ist ein weiteres Copilot-Angebot für Verbraucher und bietet Abonnenten vorrangigen Zugriff auf die neuesten Modelle, verbesserte Möglichkeiten zur Bilderstellung und Zugriff auf Copilot in Microsoft Word, PowerPoint, OneNote, Excel und Outlook. Die Hauptwebsite und -app von Copilot Pro verfügt über ähnliche Datenerfassung, -nutzung und -steuerelemente wie die oben beschriebene Copilot-App für Verbraucher. Ähnliche Copilot-Funktionen sind auch in Microsoft 365 Family- und Microsoft 365 Personal-Abonnements enthalten. Wenn Copilot in Microsoft 365-Produkte integriert ist, entspricht die Datenerfassung durch Copilot der Art und Weise, wie die Datenerfassung und -nutzung im Abschnitt „Produktivität und Kommunikation“ dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschrieben wird.
Es gibt auch Copilot-Angebote für Unternehmensbenutzer. Bei Aktivierung durch ein berechtigtes Unternehmen wird Benutzern, die mit ihrer Entra-ID angemeldet sind und auf Copilot-Verbraucherdienste zugreifen möchten, Copilot mit kommerziellem Datenschutz angeboten, wodurch die Datenerfassung und -nutzung im Einklang mit den Erwartungen von Unternehmensbenutzern minimiert wird. Weitere Informationen zu Copilot mit kommerziellem Datenschutz finden Sie
hier
.
Microsoft 365 Copilot, verfügbar für Microsoft 365-Enterprise-Angebote, bietet Datenschutz auf Unternehmensniveau sowie Zugriff auf das Unternehmensdiagramm, Copilot innerhalb von Microsoft 365 und Teams und zusätzliche Anpassungsfeatures. Die Datenerfassung und -verwendung in Microsoft 365 Copilot entspricht den im Abschnitt „Enterprise- und Developerprodukte“ dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen Methoden.
Zurück zum Anfang
Produkte für Unternehmen und Entwickler
Produkte für Unternehmen und Entwickler sind Microsoft-Produkte und ähnliche Software, die in erster Linie Organisationen und Entwicklern angeboten werden und für diese konzipiert sind. Diese Supportoptionen umfassen:
Cloud-Dienste, die in den Produktbedingungen als Online-Dienste bezeichnet werden, wie Microsoft 365 und Office 365, Microsoft Azure, Microsoft Dynamics365 und Microsoft Intune, für die eine Organisation (unser Kunde) mit Microsoft einen Vertrag über die Dienste abschließt ("Enterprise Online Services").
Andere Unternehmens- und Entwicklertools und cloudbasierte Dienste, z. B. Azure PlayFab-Dienste (weitere Informationen finden Sie in den
Azure PlayFab-Nutzungsbedingungen
).
Server-, Entwickler- und Hybrid-Cloud-Plattformprodukte wie Windows Server, SQL Server, Visual Studio und System Center, Azure Stack sowie Open Source-Software wie Bot Framework-Lösungen („Software für Unternehmen und Entwickler”).
Anwendungen und Hardware für die Speicherinfrastruktur, z. B. StorSimple („Unternehmensanwendungen”).
Professionelle Dienstleistungen, auf die in den Produktbedingungen Bezug genommen wird und die mit den Enterprise Online Services verfügbar sind, wie z. B. Onboarding-Services, Datenmigrationsservices, Data-Science-Services oder Services zur Ergänzung bestehender Funktionen der Enterprise Online Services.
Im Falle eines Konflikts zwischen diesen Microsoft-Datenschutzbestimmungen und den Bedingungen einer bzw. mehrerer Vereinbarung(en) zwischen einem Kunden und Microsoft für Produkte für Unternehmen und Entwickler, sind die Bedingungen dieser Vereinbarung(en) ausschlaggebend.
In der Produktdokumentation erhalten Sie ebenfalls Informationen über die Funktionen und Einstellungen unserer Produkte für Unternehmen und Entwickler, einschließlich der Optionen, die Auswirkungen auf Ihre Privatsphäre oder den Datenschutz unserer Endbenutzer haben.
Wenn einer der nachstehenden Begriffe in dieser Datenschutzerklärung oder den
Produktbedingungen
nicht definiert ist, gelten für ihn die nachstehenden Definitionen.
Allgemein
. Wenn ein Kunde Unternehmens- und Entwicklerprodukte ausprobiert, erwirbt, verwendet oder abonniert oder Support oder professionelle Dienste für diese Produkte in Anspruch nimmt, erhält Microsoft Daten von Ihnen und sammelt und generiert Daten, um den Dienst bereitzustellen (einschließlich der Verbesserung, Sicherung und Aktualisierung des Dienstes), unsere Geschäftsabläufe durchzuführen und mit dem Kunden zu kommunizieren. Zum Beispiel:
Wenn ein Kunde mit einem Microsoft-Vertriebsmitarbeiter zusammenarbeitet, erfassen wir den Namen des Kunden und die Kontaktdaten zusammen mit Informationen über das Unternehmen des Kunden, das diesen Auftrag unterstützt.
Wenn ein Kunde mit einem Supportmitarbeiter von Microsoft interagiert, erfassen wir diese Geräte- und Nutzungsdaten oder Fehlerberichte, um Probleme zu diagnostizieren und zu beheben.
Wenn ein Kunde für die Produkte zahlt, erfassen wir die Kontaktinformationen und Zahlungsdaten.
Wenn Microsoft Mitteilungen an einen Kunden sendet, verwenden wir die Daten zur Personalisierung des Inhalts der Mitteilung.
Wenn ein Kunde sich für professionelle Dienstleistungen von Microsoft interessiert, erfassen wir den Namen und die Kontaktdaten der vom Kunden benannten Kontaktstelle und verwenden die vom Kunden zur Verfügung gestellten Informationen, um die vom Kunden angeforderten Dienstleistungen auszuführen.
Mit den Produkten für Unternehmen und Entwickler können Sie andere Produkte und Onlinedienste mit unterschiedlichen Datenschutzpraktiken von Microsoft oder von Drittanbietern erwerben, abonnieren oder verwenden. Diese anderen Produkte und Onlinedienste unterliegen ihren jeweiligen Datenschutzbestimmungen und Richtlinien.
Produkte für Unternehmen und Entwickler sind Microsoft-Produkte und ähnliche Software, die in erster Linie Organisationen und Entwicklern angeboten werden und für diese konzipiert sind. Diese Supportoptionen umfassen:
Cloud-Dienste, die in den Produktbedingungen als Online-Dienste bezeichnet werden, wie Microsoft 365 und Office 365, Microsoft Azure, Microsoft Dynamics365 und Microsoft Intune, für die eine Organisation (unser Kunde) mit Microsoft einen Vertrag über die Dienste abschließt ("Enterprise Online Services").
Andere Unternehmens- und Entwicklertools und cloudbasierte Dienste, z. B. Azure PlayFab-Dienste (weitere Informationen finden Sie in den
Azure PlayFab-Nutzungsbedingungen
).
Server-, Entwickler- und Hybrid-Cloud-Plattformprodukte wie Windows Server, SQL Server, Visual Studio und System Center, Azure Stack sowie Open Source-Software wie Bot Framework-Lösungen („Software für Unternehmen und Entwickler”).
Anwendungen und Hardware für die Speicherinfrastruktur, z. B. StorSimple („Unternehmensanwendungen”).
Professionelle Dienstleistungen, auf die in den Produktbedingungen Bezug genommen wird und die mit den Enterprise Online Services verfügbar sind, wie z. B. Onboarding-Services, Datenmigrationsservices, Data-Science-Services oder Services zur Ergänzung bestehender Funktionen der Enterprise Online Services.
Im Falle eines Konflikts zwischen diesen Microsoft-Datenschutzbestimmungen und den Bedingungen einer bzw. mehrerer Vereinbarung(en) zwischen einem Kunden und Microsoft für Produkte für Unternehmen und Entwickler, sind die Bedingungen dieser Vereinbarung(en) ausschlaggebend.
In der Produktdokumentation erhalten Sie ebenfalls Informationen über die Funktionen und Einstellungen unserer Produkte für Unternehmen und Entwickler, einschließlich der Optionen, die Auswirkungen auf Ihre Privatsphäre oder den Datenschutz unserer Endbenutzer haben.
Wenn einer der nachstehenden Begriffe in dieser Datenschutzerklärung oder den
Produktbedingungen
nicht definiert ist, gelten für ihn die nachstehenden Definitionen.
Allgemein
. Wenn ein Kunde Unternehmens- und Entwicklerprodukte ausprobiert, erwirbt, verwendet oder abonniert oder Support oder professionelle Dienste für diese Produkte in Anspruch nimmt, erhält Microsoft Daten von Ihnen und sammelt und generiert Daten, um den Dienst bereitzustellen (einschließlich der Verbesserung, Sicherung und Aktualisierung des Dienstes), unsere Geschäftsabläufe durchzuführen und mit dem Kunden zu kommunizieren. Zum Beispiel:
Wenn ein Kunde mit einem Microsoft-Vertriebsmitarbeiter zusammenarbeitet, erfassen wir den Namen des Kunden und die Kontaktdaten zusammen mit Informationen über das Unternehmen des Kunden, das diesen Auftrag unterstützt.
Wenn ein Kunde mit einem Supportmitarbeiter von Microsoft interagiert, erfassen wir diese Geräte- und Nutzungsdaten oder Fehlerberichte, um Probleme zu diagnostizieren und zu beheben.
Wenn ein Kunde für die Produkte zahlt, erfassen wir die Kontaktinformationen und Zahlungsdaten.
Wenn Microsoft Mitteilungen an einen Kunden sendet, verwenden wir die Daten zur Personalisierung des Inhalts der Mitteilung.
Wenn ein Kunde sich für professionelle Dienstleistungen von Microsoft interessiert, erfassen wir den Namen und die Kontaktdaten der vom Kunden benannten Kontaktstelle und verwenden die vom Kunden zur Verfügung gestellten Informationen, um die vom Kunden angeforderten Dienstleistungen auszuführen.
Mit den Produkten für Unternehmen und Entwickler können Sie andere Produkte und Onlinedienste mit unterschiedlichen Datenschutzpraktiken von Microsoft oder von Drittanbietern erwerben, abonnieren oder verwenden. Diese anderen Produkte und Onlinedienste unterliegen ihren jeweiligen Datenschutzbestimmungen und Richtlinien.
Onlinedienste für Unternehmen
Um die Enterprise-Onlinedienste bereitzustellen, verwendet Microsoft Daten, die Sie zur Verfügung stellen (einschließlich Kundendaten, personenbezogene Daten, Verwaltungsdaten, Zahlungsdaten und Supportdaten) sowie Daten, die Microsoft erfasst oder im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer Nutzung der Enterprise-Onlinedienste generiert. Wir verarbeiten Daten wie in den
Produktbedingungen
,
Nachtrag zum Datenschutz für Microsoft-Produkte (Products and Services DPA)
und im
Microsoft Trust Center
beschrieben.
Personenbezogene Daten
. Der Kunde ist der Controller personenbezogener Daten, und Microsoft ist der Verarbeiter dieser Daten, es sei denn, (a) der Kunde handelt als Verarbeiter personenbezogener Daten, wobei in diesem Fall Microsoft ein Unterverarbeiter ist, oder (b) es ist in der
Standard-DPA für Produkte und Dienstleistungen (https://aka.ms/dpa) anders angegeben
. Darüber hinaus hat Microsoft gemäß der
Standard-DPA für Produkte und Dienste
die zusätzlichen Zuständigkeiten eines Datenverantwortlichen im Rahmen der DSGVO übernommen, wenn personenbezogene Daten im Zusammenhang mit seinem Geschäftsbetriebsvorfall verarbeitet werden, um seine Dienste für kommerzielle Kunden von Microsoft bereitzustellen, z. B. Abrechnung und Kontoverwaltung, Kompensation, interne Berichterstellung und Geschäftsmodellierung sowie Finanzberichte. Wir verwenden personenbezogene Daten in der am wenigsten identifizierbaren Form, um die für diese Geschäftsvorgänge erforderliche Verarbeitung zu unterstützen. Wir verlassen uns auf statistische Daten und fassen pseudonymisierte personenbezogene Daten zusammen, bevor wir sie für unsere Geschäftsabläufe verwenden, so dass keine Möglichkeit besteht, bestimmte Personen zu identifizieren.
Administratordaten
. Administratordaten sind die Informationen, die Microsoft während der Registrierung, dem Kauf oder der Verwaltung von Unternehmens-Onlinediensten zur Verfügung gestellt werden. Wir verwenden Administratordaten, um Onlinedienste für Unternehmen, komplette Transaktionen sowie die Wartung des Kontos anzubieten, und um einen Betrug zu erkennen und zu verhindern und für die Einhaltung unserer gesetzlichen Verpflichtung. Administratordaten enthalten den Namen, die Adresse, Telefonnummer und E-Mail-Adresse, die von Ihnen zur Verfügung gestellt werden sowie aggregierte Nutzungsdaten Ihres Kontos, wie beispielsweise die von Ihnen ausgewählten Steuerelemente. Administratordaten können auch Kontaktinformationen Ihrer Kollegen und Freunde enthalten, falls Sie damit einverstanden sind, diese Microsoft für den begrenzten Zweck der Zusendung einer Einladung für die Enterprise-Onlinedienste zu liefern. Wir werden diese Personen möglicherweise mit Informationen über Sie kontaktieren, wie beispielsweise Ihrem Namen und Ihrem Profilfoto.
Bei Bedarf werden wir Administratordaten verwenden, um Sie zu kontaktieren, und um Informationen über ihr Konto, Ihre Abonnements, Abrechnungen und Aktualisierungen der Onlinedienste für Unternehmen bereitzustellen, einschließlich Informationen über neue Funktionen, Sicherheit oder technische Probleme. Wir werden Sie möglicherweise auch bezüglich Anfragen von Dritten kontaktieren, die wir aus Ihrer Verwendung der Onlinedienste für Unternehmen erhalten, wie im Vertrag festgelegt. Sie können sich von diesen werbungsfreien Kommunikationen nicht abmelden. Wir können Sie auch bezüglich Informationen und Angeboten über andere Produkte und – Dienstleistungen kontaktieren oder Ihre Kontaktinformationen mit Microsoft-Partnern teilen. Wenn solche Partner bestimmte Dienste oder Lösungen für Ihre Bedürfnisse haben oder die Nutzung der Onlinedienste für Unternehmen optimieren, kann Microsoft beschränkte, zusammengefasste Informationen zum Konto Ihres Unternehmens an den Partner weitergeben. Microsoft teilt keine vertraulichen Daten oder Kontaktinformationen mit autorisierten Partnern, wenn wir nicht über eine ausreichende Berechtigung verfügen. In Ihrem Kontoprofil können Sie Ihre Kontakteinstellungen verwalten oder Ihre Informationen aktualisieren.
Zahlungsdaten
. Wir verwenden Zahlungsdaten, um Transaktionen abzuschließen oder um Betrug zu erkennen und zu verhindern.
Supportdaten
. Kunden stellen Microsoft Daten zur Verfügung oder ermächtigen Microsoft, Daten im Zusammenhang mit dem Erhalt von technischem Support für die Enterprise-Onlinedienste zu erfassen. Wir verarbeiten Supportdaten, um technischen Support bereitzustellen und wie in der
DPA für Produkte und Dienste
beschrieben.
Lokale Software- und Diagnosedaten
. Einige Onlinedienste erfordern möglicherweise die Installation lokaler Software (z. B. Agenten, Geräteverwaltungsanwendungen) oder können durch diese erweitert werden. Die lokale Software kann Diagnosedaten (wie in der
Produkt- und Dienst-DPA
definiert) über die Verwendung und Leistung dieser Software sammeln. Diese Daten können an Microsoft übermittelt und für die im
DPA für Produkte und Dienste
beschriebenen Zwecke verwendet werden.
Bing-Suche-Dienstdaten
. Bing-Suchdienste, wie in den Produktbedingungen definiert, verwenden Daten wie Suchanfragen, wie im Abschnitt
Bing
dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschrieben.
Zurück zum Anfang
Software für Unternehmen und Entwickler und Unternehmensanwendungen
Software für Unternehmen und Entwickler und Unternehmensanwendungen sammeln Daten, um einen effektiven Betrieb zu garantieren und Ihnen die besten Erfahrungen zu bieten. Die Daten, die wir erheben, hängen zwar von den von Ihnen verwendeten Funktionen sowie der Konfiguration und den Einstellungen ab, sie sind allerdings in der Regel auf Geräte- und Nutzungsdaten beschränkt. Kunden haben die Wahl zu bestimmen, welche Daten sie bereitstellen möchten. Hier einige Beispiele für die von uns erhobenen Daten:
Während der Installation oder beim Ausführen eines Upgrades für eine Entwickler- oder Unternehmenssoftware erfassen wir möglicherweise Geräte- und Nutzungsdaten, um zu erfahren, ob Probleme aufgetreten sind.
Wenn Sie Unternehmenssoftware oder Unternehmensanwendungen verwenden, erfassen wir möglicherweise Geräte- und Nutzungsdaten zur Verbesserung der Sicherheitsfunktionen Ihrer Betriebsumgebung.
Bei einem Absturz der Software oder Unternehmensanwendungen können Sie Microsoft einen Fehlerbericht senden, damit wir das Problem diagnostizieren und Kundensupport anbieten können.
Microsoft verwendet die von der Software für Unternehmen und Entwickler sowie von Unternehmensanwendungen erfassten Daten, um unsere Produkte zu verbessern, Kundensupport zum Aktivieren des Produkts anzubieten, mit Ihnen zu kommunizieren und für unsere Geschäftstätigkeit.
Microsoft SQL Server ist ein relationales Datenbankmanagementsystem und umfasst Produkte, die separat installiert werden können (z. B. SQL Server Management Studio). Ausführliche Informationen dazu, welche Daten wir sammeln, wie wir sie verwenden und wie Sie Ihre Datenschutzoptionen verwalten, finden Sie auf der
SQL Server-Datenschutzseite
. Wenn Sie in einer Organisation arbeiten, kann Ihr Administrator in Microsoft SQL Server über Gruppenrichtlinien bestimmte Einstellungen für Telemetrie festlegen.
HoloLens
. HoloLens-Headsets sind eigenständige Windows-Computer mit WLAN-Verbindung, die für Anwendungen und Lösungen ein Mixed Reality-Erlebnis ermöglichen. Microsoft sammelt Diagnosedaten, um Probleme zu lösen und um Windows auf HoloLens aktuell, sicher und funktionstüchtig zu halten. Diagnosedaten helfen uns auch bei der Verbesserung von HoloLens und verwandten Microsoft-Produkten und -Diensten, je nachdem, welche Diagnosedateneinstellungen Sie für Ihr Gerät ausgewählt haben.
Weitere Informationen über Windows-Diagnosedaten
.
HoloLens verarbeitet und sammelt auch Daten im Zusammenhang mit der HoloLens-Erfahrung und dem HoloLens-Gerät, zu dem Kameras, Mikrofone und Infrarotsensoren gehören, welche die Navigation durch Bewegungen und Stimme ermöglichen.
Wenn Sie es wünschen, können Kameras verwendet werden, um Sie automatisch mit Ihrer Irisblende anzumelden. Zu diesem Zweck nimmt HoloLens ein Bild Ihrer Iris auf und misst die Abstände zwischen den Schlüsselpunkten, um einen numerischen Wert zu erstellen und zu speichern, der nur Sie repräsentiert. Diese Daten verbleiben auf der Microsoft HoloLens und werden an niemanden weitergegeben. Sie können diese Daten jederzeit von Ihrer HoloLens löschen lassen.
HoloLens erkennt auch Handgesten für Systeminteraktionen (z. B. Menünavigation, Schwenken/Zoomen und Scrollen). Diese Daten werden auf Ihrem HoloLens-Gerät verarbeitet und nicht gespeichert.
HoloLens leitet auf der Grundlage Ihrer Umgebung Tracking-Punkte ab, die ermöglichen, Oberflächen im Raum zu kennen und digitale Objekte darauf zu platzieren. Mit diesen Umgebungsdaten sind keine Bilder verbunden, und sie werden lokal auf dem HoloLens-Gerät gespeichert. Sie können diese Daten jederzeit von Ihrer Microsoft HoloLens löschen lassen.
Die Mikrofone des Headsets ermöglichen Sprachbefehle zur Navigation, Steuerung von Apps oder zur Eingabe von Suchbegriffen.
Weitere Informationen über Sprachdatenerfassung
.
Zusammenfassung anzeigen
Weitere Infos
Zurück zum Anfang
Produktivitäts- und Kommunikationsprodukte
Produktivitäts- und Kommunikationsprodukte sind Anwendungen, Software und Dienste, die Sie zum Erstellen, Speichern und Freigeben von Dokumenten verwenden und um mit anderen zu kommunizieren.
Produktivitäts- und Kommunikationsprodukte sind Anwendungen, Software und Dienste, die Sie zum Erstellen, Speichern und Freigeben von Dokumenten verwenden und um mit anderen zu kommunizieren.
Microsoft 365, Office und andere Produktivitäts-Apps
Microsoft 365 (frühere Versionen wurden als Office 365 bezeichnet) ist eine Sammlung von Produktivitäts-Abonnementdiensten und Anwendungen wie Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook, and OneNote. Office ist die einmalig zu erwerbende Version dieser Anwendungen, die auf PC oder Mac verfügbar ist und Access und Publisher beinhaltet. Sowohl Microsoft 365 als auch Office umfassen Client-Softwareanwendungen und verbundene Onlinedienste (oder Web-Apps im Falle von Microsoft 365 für das Web) für mehrere Plattformen mit zahlreichen ineinandergreifenden Anwendungen. Weitere Informationen zu Outlook finden Sie im Abschnitt
Outlook
dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Die verschiedenen cloudbasierten Microsoft 365-Dienste bieten Ihnen die Möglichkeit, Ihre Dateiinhalte für Designs und Empfehlungen zu verwenden, gemeinsam mit anderen Benutzern an Dokumenten zu arbeiten und die Funktionen anderer Microsoft-Produkte, wie z. B. Bing, oder verbundene Produkte von Drittanbietern zu nutzen. Wenn Sie in einem Unternehmen arbeiten, kann Ihr Administrator diese verbundenen Dienste aktivieren oder deaktivieren. Sie können auf die Datenschutzkontrollen in Ihren Microsoft 365- und Office-Apps zugreifen. Weitere Informationen finden Sie unter
Konto-Datenschutzeinstellungen
.
Office-Roamingdienst
. Der Office-Roamingdienst hilft Ihnen dabei, Ihre Einstellungen, einschließlich jener für den Datenschutz, auf all Ihren Microsoft 365-Geräten oder in Office-Apps auf dem neuesten Stand zu halten. Wenn Sie sich bei Ihren Apps entweder mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto oder einem Konto Ihrer Organisation anmelden, synchronisiert der Dienst einige Ihrer benutzerdefinierten Einstellungen mit Microsoft-Servern. Beispielsweise synchronisiert der Dienst eine Liste der zuletzt verwendeten Dokumente oder die letzte Stelle, die in einem Dokument angezeigt wurde. Wenn Sie sich auf einem anderen Gerät mit demselben Konto anmelden, lädt der Office-Roamingdienst Ihre Einstellungen von den Microsoft-Servern herunter und wendet diese bei dem zusätzlichen Gerät an. Wenn Sie sich von Ihren Apps abmelden, entfernt der Dienst Ihre Einstellungen von Ihrem Gerät. Alle durch Sie an Ihren benutzerdefinierten Einstellungen vorgenommenen Änderungen werden an Microsoft-Server gesendet.
Updates von Microsoft
. Microsoft verwendet Dienste wie Klick-und-Los, Microsoft AutoUpdate (für Mac) oder Microsoft Update (für einige Versionen von Office), um Ihnen Sicherheitsupdates und weitere wichtige Updates zur Verfügung zu stellen.
Diese Dienste können die Verfügbarkeit von Onlineupdates für Microsoft 365- oder Office-Apps auf Ihrem Gerät automatisch erkennen und diese automatisch herunterladen und installieren.
Diagnosedaten
. Diagnosedaten dienen dazu, (i) Ihre Microsoft 365- oder Office-Anwendungen zu schützen und auf dem neuesten Stand zu halten, (ii) Probleme zu erkennen, zu diagnostizieren und zu beheben und (iii) Produktverbesserungen vorzunehmen. Diese Daten enthalten weder Namen oder E-Mail-Adressen von Benutzern, Inhalte der Dateien der Benutzer noch Informationen zu Apps, die nicht mit Microsoft 365 oder Office im Zusammenhang stehen. Die Benutzer können zwischen zwei verschiedenen Ebenen der Diagnosedatensammlung wählen: „Erforderlich“ und „Optional“.
Erforderlich
. Die Daten, die mindestens erforderlich sind, um Anwendungen zu schützen, auf dem neuesten Stand zu halten und dafür zu sorgen, dass sie ordnungsgemäß auf dem Gerät, auf dem sie installiert sind, funktionieren.
Optional
. Zusätzliche Daten, die uns dabei helfen, Produktverbesserungen vorzunehmen. Sie umfassen erweiterte Informationen zur Erkennung, Diagnose und Behebung von Problemen.
Weitere Informationen finden Sie unter
Diagnosedaten
.
Verbundene Umgebungen
. Microsoft 365 bietet immer wieder neue Erfahrungen in Client-Anwendungen an, die mit cloudbasierten Diensten verbunden sind, und von diesen Diensten unterstützt werden. Eine Untergruppe dieser verbundenen Anwendungen ist auch in Office verfügbar. Wenn Sie sich für die Verwendung verbundener Anwendungen entscheiden, werden die erforderlichen Dienstdaten gesammelt, damit diese verbundenen Erfahrungen zuverlässig, aktuell und sicher bleiben und wie erwartet funktionieren. Nachstehend finden Sie weitere Informationen zu den erforderlichen Dienstdaten.
Beispiele für verbundene Anwendungen sind die Zusammenarbeit an einem Dokument, das auf OneDrive gespeichert ist, oder die Übersetzung eines Word-Dokuments in eine andere Sprache. Es gibt zwei Arten von verbundenen Anwendungen:
Erfahrungen, die Ihre Inhalte analysieren
. Anwendungen, die Ihre Dateiinhalte verwenden, um Ihnen z. B. Designempfehlungen, Bearbeitungstipps oder Dateneinblicke bereitzustellen. Beispiele: PowerPoint-Designer oder -Editor in Word.
Umgebungen, die Onlineinhalte herunterladen
. Anwendungen, mit denen Sie Online-Inhalte suchen und herunterladen können, z. B. Vorlagen, Bilder, 3D-Modelle, Videos und Referenzmaterial, um Ihre Dokumente zu optimieren. Beispiele: Vorlagen oder PowerPoint QuickStarter.
Sie können auf die Datenschutzkontrollen in Ihren Microsoft 365- und Office-Client-Apps zugreifen. Über diese Datenschutzeinstellungen können Sie Ihre verbundenen Anwendungen konfigurieren. Sie könnten z. B. verbundene Anwendungen so einstellen, dass Online-Inhalte heruntergeladen, jedoch keine Inhalte analysiert werden können. Durch das Deaktivieren verbundener Anwendungen werden auch alle zusätzlichen Erfahrungen deaktiviert, z. B. die gemeinsame Dokumenterstellung und die Online-Speicherung von Dateien. Auch wenn Sie diese Datenschutzeinstellung verwenden, um verbundene Anwendungen zu deaktivieren, stehen bestimmte Funktionen weiterhin zur Verfügung, z. B. die Synchronisierung Ihres Outlook-Postfachs und einige erforderliche Dienste (siehe unten). Diese Steuerelemente sind nicht verfügbar, wenn Sie Microsoft 365 für das Web verwenden, da Sie in diesem Fall bereits mit der Cloud verbunden sind. Weitere Informationen zum Zugriff auf diese Steuerelemente finden Sie unter
Kontodatenschutzeinstellungen.
Wenn Sie bestimmte Arten von verbundenen Anwendungen deaktivieren, wird entweder das Menüband oder der Menübefehl für diese verbundenen Anwendungen abgeblendet oder Sie erhalten eine Fehlermeldung, wenn Sie versuchen, diese verbundenen Anwendungen zu nutzen.
Essential Dienste
. Es gibt eine Reihe von Diensten, die für das Funktionieren von Microsoft 365 und Office unerlässlich sind. Diese können nicht deaktiviert werden. Beispielsweise ist der Lizenzierungsdienst, der bestätigt, dass Sie für die Nutzung von Microsoft 365 ordnungsgemäß lizenziert sind, ein erforderlicher Dienst. Erforderliche Dienstdaten zu diesen Diensten werden erfasst und an Microsoft gesendet, unabhängig von etwaigen anderen Einstellungen, die Sie konfiguriert haben. Weitere Informationen finden Sie unter
wesentliche Dienste
.
Erforderliche Dienstdaten für verbundene Umgebungen
. Wenn Sie eine verbundene Anwendung nutzen, werden Daten an Microsoft gesendet und dort verarbeitet, um Ihnen diese verbundene Anwendung verfügbar zu machen. Diese Daten sind von entscheidender Bedeutung, da sie uns in die Lage versetzen, diese Cloud-basierten verbundenen Anwendungen zu liefern. Wir nennen diese Daten „erforderliche Dienstdaten“.
Zu den erforderlichen Dienstdaten können Informationen zum Betrieb der verbundenen Umgebung gehören, die für die Gewährleistung der Sicherheit, Aktualität und erwarteten Leistung des zugrunde liegenden Dienstes erforderlich sind. Wenn Sie sich für eine verbundene Anwendung entscheiden, die Ihren Inhalt analysiert, z. B. Übersetzen in Word, wird der von Ihnen eingegebene und zum Übersetzen ausgewählte Text ebenfalls weiter gesendet und verarbeitet, um Ihnen die verbundene Anwendung zu bieten. Ihr Text und die Übersetzung werden von unserem Dienst nicht gespeichert. Zu den erforderlichen Dienstdaten können auch Informationen gehören, die von einer verbundenen Anwendung zur Erfüllung ihrer Aufgabe benötigt werden, beispielsweise Konfigurationsinformationen über eine Microsoft 365- oder Office-App.
Weitere Informationen finden Sie unter
Erforderliche Dienstdaten
.
Copilot in Microsoft 365 und Copilot Pro
. Die Copilot-Funktionen, die in ausgewählten Ländern als separater Abonnementdienst in Microsoft 365 Apps als Teil eines Microsoft 365 Personal-, Microsoft 365 Family- oder Copilot Pro-Abonnements verfügbar sind, bieten KI-gestützte Produktivitätsfunktionen durch Konversationserlebnisse in Echtzeit, indem sie die Verarbeitung großer Sprachmodelle (Large Language Model, LLM) auf die Inhalte anwenden, die Sie in Microsoft 365 Apps wie Word, Excel, OneNote, Outlook und PowerPoint bereitstellen möchten. Copilot in Microsoft 365 und Copilot Pro stehen nicht zur Verwendung in Office-Desktoplizenzen zur Verfügung. Bei Verwendung mit verfügbaren Microsoft 365 Apps verwendet Copilot den Inhalt Ihrer Dateien nur, wenn Sie ihn auffordern, eine bestimmte Aktion für diesen bestimmten Inhalt auszuführen – beispielsweise, wenn Sie Copilot bitten, Ihnen beim Umschreiben eines Absatzes in einem Word-Dokument zu helfen, oder wenn Sie Copilot bitten, aus Ihren Notizen in OneNote eine Aufgabenliste zu erstellen. Ähnlich wie bei verbundenen Erlebnissen werden während Ihrer Nutzung von Copilot erforderliche Dienstdaten erfasst, darunter betriebsbezogene Informationen, die erforderlich sind, um die Sicherheit und Aktualität des zugrunde liegenden Dienstes sowie die erwartete Leistung zu gewährleisten.
Weitere Informationen unter
Copilot Pro: 
              Weitere Informationen finden Sie unterMicrosoft 365 Apps und Ihre Privatsphäre
und
Häufig gestellte Fragen zu Copilot in Microsoft 365 Family- und Personal-Abonnements
.
Weitere Produktivitäts-Apps
. Microsoft bietet mehrere Produktivitäts-Apps, unabhängig von Microsoft 365 und Office an, darunter Whiteboard (ein frei gestaltbarer digitaler Zeichenbereich mit Toucheingabe, Schrift und Stift), To Do (eine Cloud-basierte Aufgabenverwaltungs-App) und Kurznotizen (eine Desktop-Notizen-App).
Die Apps nutzen verschiedene Cloud-basierte Dienste, um Ihnen Funktionen aus anderen Microsoft-Produkten zur Verfügung zu stellen, wie z. B. die Bereitstellung von Bildern aus Bing in Whiteboard, die Empfehlung von Aufgabenvorschlägen für „Mein Tag“ in Aufgaben und die Nutzung der Integration von Kurznotizen in Outlook.
Verwenden von Gerätefunktionen
. Einige Microsoft 365-Anwendungen nutzen Ihre Gerätefunktionen mit bestimmten Features. In PowerPoint kann das Präsentationsaufzeichnungsfeature auf das Mikrofon und die Kamera Ihres Geräts zugreifen, um Präsentationen mit Audio und Video aufzuzeichnen. Der Zugriff auf das Mikrofon Ihres Geräts erfolgt auch über das Audiofeature und bei Verwendung des Sprechercoachs. Während Sie sprechen, gibt Ihnen der Sprechercoach auf dem Bildschirm Hinweise zu Tempo, inklusiver Sprache, Verwendung von Kraftausdrücken und Füllwörtern sowie dazu, ob Sie den Folientext lesen. Beim Erstellen einer PowerPoint-Präsentation können Sie auch das „Screenshot“- und „Bildschirmausschnitt“-Feature verwenden, um Bildschirminhalte zu erfassen. Einige Microsoft 365-Anwendungen, PowerPoint, Word und OneNote, bieten „Diktieren“, eine verbundene Oberfläche, mit der Sie mithilfe der Spracherkennung Inhalte mit Ihrem Mikrofon erstellen können. In Word und OneNote wandelt die verbundene Transkriptionsoberfläche Sprache, die direkt in der App mit dem Mikrofon oder einer Sprachaufnahme aufgezeichnet wurde, in eine Texttranskription um, wobei jeder Sprecher separat aufgeführt wird. OneNote kann Fotos einfügen oder Videos mit ihrer Kamera aufzeichnen. Alle Microsoft 365-Apps verfügen zusammen mit To Do und Whiteboard über Freigabefunktionen, die auf Ihre Kontakte zugreifen, damit Sie Ihre Dokumente für andere Personen in Ihrer Kontaktliste freigeben können. Anwendungen greifen erst dann auf Ihre Gerätefunktionen zu, wenn Sie mit der Verwendung des Features beginnen.
Sie können ihre Mikrofon- und Kamerazugriffseinstellungen im Menü „Windows-Datenschutzeinstellungen“ verwalten. Wechseln Sie zu
Start > Einstellungen > Datenschutz oder Datenschutz & Sicherheit
. Weitere Informationen zum Steuern Ihrer Datenschutzeinstellungen in Apps finden Sie unter
Windows-Datenschutzeinstellungen, die von Apps verwendet werden
.
Zurück zum Anfang
Microsoft Family
Dieser Abschnitt bezieht sich auf das M365-Produkt von Microsoft Family Safety, mit dem eine Familiengruppe sich über die Microsoft Family Safety-App auf ihren Windows-, Xbox- oder mobilen Geräten verbinden kann. Lesen Sie die Informationen unter
Microsoft Family Safety
sorgfältig durch, wenn Sie eine Familiengruppe erstellen oder einer Familiengruppe beitreten möchten.
Microsoft Family Safety kann Eltern und Erziehungsberechtigten dabei helfen, mithilfe digitaler Inhaltsfilterung, Bildschirmzeitlimits, Kontrolle der Ausgaben für Microsoft und Xbox Stores, Altersfreigaben für Apps und Spiele sowie Standortfreigabe eine sicherere Umgebung für ihre Familiengruppe zu schaffen. Informationen dazu, wie Microsoft Daten von Kindern sammelt und verwendet, finden Sie in der Datenschutzerklärung im Abschnitt
Erfassung der Daten von Kindern
. Wenn Sie Microsoft Family Safety in Windows verwenden, finden Sie weitere Informationen in der Datenschutzerklärung im Abschnitt
Schutz- und Sicherheitsfunktionen von Windows
.
Um Family Safety-Steuerelemente für ein Kinderkonto zu aktivieren, muss das Kinderkonto Teil einer Familiengruppe sein. Konten, für deren Erstellung die Zustimmung der Eltern erforderlich ist, werden automatisch in die Familiengruppe der Person aufgenommen, die der Erstellung des Kinderkontos zugestimmt hat. Für Konten, für die keine elterliche Zustimmung erstellt werden muss, muss der Elternteil oder Erziehungsberechtigte das Konto seiner Familiengruppe hinzufügen, um Family Safety- Steuerelemente verwenden zu können.
Wenn Sie die Berichterstellung über Aktivitäten der Familie für ein Kind aktiviert haben, sammelt Microsoft Details dazu, wie das Kind das Gerät verwendet (Suchen, Web-, App- und Spieleaktivitäten) und den Eltern Berichte über die Onlineaktivitäten des Kinds bereitstellen. Die Tätigkeitsberichte werden routinemäßig von den Microsoft-Servern gelöscht.
Bei bestimmten Family Safety-Features wie Standortfreigabe, Fahrsicherheit, Freigabelaufwerke, Orte und Standortwarnungen werden Ihre Standortinformationen verwendet, sofern aktiviert. Wenn Sie die Standortfreigabe aktiviert haben, lädt Ihr Gerät beispielsweise Standortdaten in die Cloud hoch und gibt sie für andere Personen in Ihrer Familiengruppe frei. Microsoft Speichert im Rahmen des Features „Standortfreigabe“ nur Ihren jeweils letzten bekannten Standort (jeder neue Standort ersetzt den vorherigen). Wenn Sie Fahrsicherheit aktivieren, wird Ihr Standort verwendet, um Ihre Fahrgewohnheiten zu erfassen, z. B. ob Sie innerhalb der Geschwindigkeitsbegrenzungen fahren, ob Sie Ihr Smartphone während des Fahrens verwenden und ob Sie plötzlich beschleunigen oder bremsen. Diese Berichte werden in die Cloud hochgeladen, und Sie können Ihre Laufwerksberichte für Ihre Familiengruppe freigeben. Sie können diese Standortfeatures jederzeit in den Family Safety-Einstellungen deaktivieren. Sie können die Standortdaten Ihres Geräts im Microsoft-Datenschutzdashboard verwalten. Erfahren Sie mehr über
Family Safety und Ihre Standortdaten
.
Zurück zum Anfang
Microsoft Launcher
Der Microsoft Launcher ist eine Android-App, die ein hochgradig anpassbares App-Launch-Erlebnis auf Android-Geräten bietet.
Mit Microsoft Launcher können Sie sich mit Ihrem persönlichen Microsoft-Konto oder Ihrem Arbeitskonto anmelden oder den Launcher ohne ein Konto verwenden. Einige Funktionen können jedoch eingeschränkt sein, wenn Sie bestimmte Berechtigungen nicht gewähren.
Um Microsoft Launcher verwenden zu können, muss die Anwendung auf Ihrem Android-Gerät installiert sein, und es sind optionale Berechtigungen erforderlich, um die folgenden Funktionen zu aktivieren:
Microsoft Copilot
. Wenn Sie mit Ihrem persönlichen Microsoft-Konto angemeldet sind, können Sie Copilot-Funktionen wie Chat, Websuche, Sprachsuche und Bildsuche nahtlos nutzen. Bestimmte Copilot-Funktionen erfordern den Zugriff auf die Funktionen Ihres Geräts, z. B. Ihre Gerätekamera, Ihr Mikrofon, Ihre Fotos und Videos. Weitere Informationen finden Sie in unserem Abschnitt Künstliche Intelligenz und Copilot-Funktionen.
Hier
erfahren Sie mehr über die Copilot-Nutzungsbedingungen.
Übersichtsfeed
. Glance unterstützt Sie bei der Organisation Ihrer täglichen Aktivitäten, z. B. Outlook-Kalender, Aufgabenliste, Haftnotizen und aktuelle Dokumente in Ihren M365-Anwendungen. Nach der Anmeldung mit Ihrem persönlichen Microsoft-Konto oder Ihrem Arbeitskonto werden die Daten mit allen Geräten synchronisiert, die mit demselben Konto angemeldet sind, um Ihnen personalisierte Erlebnisse zu bieten. Außerdem können Sie die letzten Aktivitäten überprüfen, wie z. B. die letzten Fotos und die App-Nutzung, für die die Berechtigung zum Zugriff auf Gerätefotos, Dateien und App-Nutzungsdaten erforderlich ist.
Nachrichten-Feed
. Wenn Sie sich mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto anmelden, können Sie einen personalisierten News-Feed und Werbung im Launcher News-Feed genießen, der auf allen Ihren Geräten synchronisiert wird. Sie können auch lokale kuratierte Nachrichten erhalten, wenn Sie Microsoft Launcher die Erlaubnis erteilen, auf Ihre Standortinformationen zuzugreifen. Sie können Ihre Werbeeinstellungen über das Microsoft-Datenschutz-Dashboard verwalten, um Ihre Erfahrungen anzupassen.
Wetterbenachrichtigungen
. Microsoft Launcher ermöglicht es Ihnen, die neuesten und wichtigsten Wetteränderungen auf Ihrem Startbildschirm mit MSN Wetter zu empfangen. Sie können aktuelle lokale Wetterinformationen erhalten, wenn Sie Launcher den Zugriff auf Ihren Standort erlauben oder Ihre Postleitzahl angeben.
Sichern und Wiederherstellen
: Mit der Sicherungs- und Wiederherstellungsfunktion von Microsoft Launcher können Sie mühelos zwischen verschiedenen Telefonen wechseln oder verschiedene Startbildschirme ausprobieren. Backups können lokal auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert oder in Ihrem OneDrive-Konto, das mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto verknüpft ist, abgelegt werden, um den Zugriff zu erleichtern.
Microsoft Launcher unterstützt die Arbeitsprofil-Funktionen von Android, so dass Sie auf Ihrem Gerät eine klare Grenze zwischen personenbezogenen und beruflichen Daten ziehen können. Das bedeutet, dass Sie sicher auf Arbeitsressourcen zugreifen können, ohne sie mit Ihren persönlichen Anwendungen und Daten zu vermischen.
Hier
erfahren Sie mehr über Microsoft Launcher und seine unterstützten Features.
Zurück zum Anfang
Microsoft Teams
Dieser Abschnitt bezieht sich auf das Verbraucherangebot von Teams; wenn Sie Teams mit einem Uni-, Schul- oder Geschäftskonto verwenden, lesen Sie das
Unternehmens- und Entwicklerprodukte
dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen.
Teams ist ein zentraler Hub für Zusammenarbeit und Kommunikation. Mit Teams können Sie Ihr ganzes Leben lang organisiert und in Verbindung bleiben. Teams ermöglicht es Ihnen, Personen mit Sprach- oder Videoanruf anzurufen. Teams ermöglicht es Ihnen, Personen, Dateien, Fotos, Gespräche, Aufgaben und Kalender an einem bequemen und sicheren Ort zu finden. Teams ermöglicht es Ihnen, vertrauliche Informationen wie Passwörter, Belohnungsnummern oder Anmeldeinformationen zu speichern und sie mit anderen innerhalb von Teams zu teilen. Mit Ihrer Zustimmung können Sie Ihren Standort mit Freunden und Familie teilen.
Im Rahmen der Bereitstellung dieser Features sammelt Microsoft Daten über die Nutzung der Features sowie Informationen über Ihre Kommunikation, einschließlich der Uhrzeit und des Datums der Kommunikation und der Benutzer, die Teil der Kommunikation sind. Microsoft kann diese Informationen für Enterprise-Kunden freigeben, wenn Sie über Besprechungen und Chats mit Endbenutzern interagieren, die ihr Schul- oder Geschäftskonto verwenden. Wenn Sie beispielsweise an einem Teams-Chat mit einem Benutzer teilnehmen, der Teams verwendet, das mit dem zugehörigen Schulkonto verknüpft ist, kann Microsoft Ihre Informationen im Rahmen der Bereitstellung des Teams-Diensts mit der Schule dieses Benutzers teilen.
Kompatibilität mit Skype
. Als Teams-Benutzer können Sie sich auch mit Ihrem Teams-Konto bei Skype anmelden. Wenn Sie sich mit Ihren Teams-Anmeldeinformationen bei Skype anmelden, können Sie über Skype mit anderen Skype- und Teams-Benutzern chatten und sie anrufen und über Skype auf Ihren Teams-Chatverlauf zugreifen. Skype-Benutzer können Sie in Teams kontaktieren und Ihren Teams-Anwesenheitsstatus anzeigen. Weitere Informationen zu Skype finden Sie im
Abschnitt Skype
dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen.
Suchen nach Teams- und Skype-Kontakten
. Ihr Teams-Profil enthält Informationen, die Sie beim Einrichten eines Microsoft-Kontos bereitgestellt haben. Damit andere Personen Sie in Teams (oder Produkten, die für den persönlichen Gebrauch mit Teams interagieren, einschließlich Teams für Unternehmen und Skype) finden können, wird Ihr Teams-Profil in die öffentlichen Suchverzeichnisse von Teams und Skype aufgenommen und kann in Skype und Teams angezeigt werden. Abhängig von Ihren Einstellungen können Skype- und Teams-Benutzer Sie anhand Ihres Namens, Ihrer E-Mail-Adresse und/oder Telefonnummer finden. Ihr Profil enthält Ihren Benutzernamen, Avatar sowie alle anderen Daten, die Sie Ihrem Profil hinzufügen oder Dritten anzeigen. Ihr Teams-Profil ist möglicherweise für Enterprise-Kunden und deren Endbenutzer sichtbar, wenn Sie mit einem Endbenutzer einer Organisation in Chats und Besprechungen interagieren.
Teams-Kontakte
. Mit Ihrer Zustimmung synchronisiert Teams Ihre Geräte-, Outlook- und Skype-Kontakte in regelmäßigen Abständen und sucht nach anderen Teams-Benutzern, die mit Kontakten in Ihren Geräte-, Outlook- oder Skype-Adressbüchern übereinstimmen. Sie haben jederzeit die Kontrolle über Ihre Kontakte und können die Synchronisierung jederzeit beenden. Wenn Sie die Synchronisierung Ihrer Geräte-, Outlook- oder Skype-Kontakte beenden oder auf Ihrem Gerät inaktiv sind, werden alle Kontakte, die während des Synchronisierungsprozesses nicht abgeglichen wurden, aus Teams gelöscht. Wenn Sie einen Ihrer Geräte-, Outlook- oder Skype-Kontakte zur Teilnahme an einer Unterhaltung einladen möchten, können Sie Benutzer direkt zu einer 1:1-Unterhaltung einladen, oder Microsoft kann eine Einladung in Ihrem Namen per SMS oder E-Mail zu Gruppenunterhaltungen senden. Sie können Benutzer blockieren, wenn Sie ihre Mitteilungen nicht erhalten möchten; zusätzlich können Sie Microsoft ein Problem melden.
Hinweis für Nichtbenutzerkontakte.
Wenn Ihre Informationen in den Geräte-, Outlook- oder Skype-Adressbüchern eines Teams-Benutzers angezeigt werden, der seine Geräte-, Outlook- oder Skype-Kontakte mit seinen Teams-Kontakten synchronisiert, kann Microsoft Ihre Daten verarbeiten, um zu bestimmen, ob Sie ein aktueller Teams-Benutzer sind und Teams-Benutzern erlauben, Sie zum Dienst einzuladen, einschließlich per SMS und E-Mail. Solange der Teams-Benutzer weiterhin auf seinem Gerät in Teams aktiv ist und die Kontaktsynchronisierung mit dem entsprechenden Gerät oder Dienst aktiviert, werden Ihre Informationen auf unseren Servern gespeichert und wir verarbeiten Ihre Informationen regelmäßig im Rahmen der Kontaktsynchronisierung des Teams-Benutzers, um zu überprüfen, ob Sie Teams anschließend beigetreten sind.
Erfahren Sie mehr darüber, wie wir Ihre Informationen in Verbindung mit dem Kontaktsynchronisierungsfeature verarbeiten, das Teams-Benutzern angeboten wird
.
Wenn Sie sich für die Teilnahme an Teams entscheiden, werden Sie allen Teams- oder Skype-Benutzern mit Ihren Informationen in deren Geräte-, Outlook- oder Skype-Adressbüchern als vorgeschlagener neuer Teams-Kontakt angezeigt. Als Teams-Benutzer können Sie andere Team- und Skype-Benutzer blockieren, wenn Sie deren Mitteilungen nicht erhalten möchten. Darüber hinaus können Sie Bedenken an Microsoft melden.
Kontakte von Drittanbietern.
Sie können auch Kontakte von Drittanbietern synchronisieren. Falls Sie sich dazu entscheiden, Ihre Drittanbieterkontakte nicht länger mit Teams zu synchronisieren, werden alle Drittanbieterkontakte aus Teams gelöscht. Falls Sie Ihre Zustimmung dazu gegeben haben, diese Drittanbieterkontakte in anderen Apps und Diensten von Microsoft zu verwenden, werden diese Kontakte weiterhin in diesen Apps und Diensten zur Verfügung stehen.
Sie können Drittanbieterkontakte aus allen Microsoft Apps und -Diensten entfernen, indem Sie Drittanbieterkonten aus Teams entfernen. Bitte beachten Sie, dass das Entfernen eines Drittanbieterkontos aus Teams Ihre Nutzererfahrung in anderen Apps und Diensten von Microsoft beeinträchtigen kann, die ebenfalls auf dieses Drittanbieterkonto zugreifen.
Teams-Kalender.
Sie können ihren Teams-Kalender auch mit Kalendern von Drittanbietern synchronisieren. Sie können die Synchronisierung Ihres Teams-Kalenders jederzeit aufheben, indem Sie ein Drittanbieterkonto aus Teams entfernen. Falls Sie der Verwendung von Drittanbieter-Daten in anderen Apps und Diensten von Microsoft zugestimmt haben, beachten Sie bitte, dass das Entfernen dieser Kontodaten von Drittanbietern aus Teams Ihre Nutzererfahrung in anderen Apps und Diensten von Microsoft beeinträchtigen kann.
Standortübermittlung
. Sie können Ihren statischen oder Live-Standort für Einzelpersonen oder Gruppen innerhalb von Teams freigeben. Sie haben die Kontrolle und können die Freigabe jederzeit beenden. Die Freigabe von Standorten für Kinder ist mit elterlicher Zustimmung und in Gruppen erlaubt, in denen ein Erwachsener aus der Gruppe „Microsoft Family“ anwesend ist.
Push-Benachrichtigungen
. Teams verwenden den Benachrichtigungsdienst auf Ihrem Gerät, um Sie über eingehende Anrufe, Chats und andere Benachrichtigungen zu informieren. Diese Dienste werden bei vielen Geräten durch andere Unternehmen zur Verfügung gestellt. Teams muss mit dem Benachrichtigungsdienst kommunizieren, damit dieser Sie z. B. darüber informieren kann, wer anruft oder um Ihnen die ersten Worte eines neuen Chats zur Verfügung zu stellen. Das Unternehmen, das den Benachrichtigungsdienst auf Ihrem Gerät bereitstellt, verwendet diese Informationen gemäß seinen eigenen Bestimmungen und Datenschutzrichtlinien. Microsoft übernimmt keine Verantwortung für die Daten, die vom Unternehmen erfasst werden, das den Benachrichtigungsdienst bereitstellt.
Wenn Sie die Benachrichtigungsdienste für eingehende Teams-Anrufe und -Nachrichten nicht verwenden möchten, deaktivieren Sie sie in den Einstellungen auf Ihrem Gerät.
Chats und Besprechungen mit Endbenutzern von Enterprise-Kunden
. Viele Microsoft-Produkte sind für die Verwendung in Organisationen, z. B. Schulen und Unternehmen vorgesehen. Lesen Sie den Abschnitt
Unternehmens- und Entwicklerprodukte
dieser Datenschutzerklärung, wenn Sie Teams mit einem Geschäfts-, Schul- oder Unikonto verwenden. Wenn Sie an Teams-Besprechungen oder -Chats mit Endbenutzern von Organisationen teilnehmen, unterliegen die Daten, die Sie mit den Endbenutzern teilen, ggf. den Richtlinien ihrer Organisation. Sie sollten Ihre Datenschutzanfragen im Zusammenhang mit Ihren Daten, die über Chats und Besprechungen mit den Endbenutzern einer Organisation geteilt werden, einschließlich aller Anfragen zur Wahrnehmung Ihrer Datenschutzrechte, an den Administrator der Organisation weiterleiten. Microsoft ist nicht für die Datenschutz- oder Sicherheitspraktiken seiner Kunden, die von denen dieser Richtlinien abweichen können, verantwortlich.
Zurück zum Anfang
OneDrive
Microsoft OneDrive ermöglicht es Ihnen, auf jedem Gerät zu Speichern und auf Ihre Dateien zuzugreifen. Sie können Dateien auch mit anderen teilen und gemeinsam bearbeiten. Bei einigen Versionen der Microsoft OneDrive-Anwendung können Sie sowohl auf Ihr persönliches OneDrive zugreifen, indem Sie sich bei Ihrem persönlichen Microsoft-Konto anmelden, als auch auf Ihr OneDrive for Business, indem Sie sich mit Ihrem Arbeits- oder Schulkonto von Microsoft im Rahmen der Microsoft 365- oder Office 365-Nutzung Ihres Unternehmens anmelden.
Wenn Sie OneDrive verwenden, erfassen wir Daten über Ihre Nutzung des Dienstes sowie über den von Ihnen gespeicherten Inhalt, um den Dienst bereitzustellen, zu verbessern und zu schützen. Beispiele umfassen sowohl die Indizierung Ihrer OneDrive-Dokumente, so dass Sie diese später durchsuchen können als auch die Verwendung von Ortsinformationen, um Ihnen die Suche nach Fotos auf Basis der Orte, wo das Foto aufgenommen wurde, zu erleichtern. Wir erheben zudem Geräteinformationen, damit wir personalisierte Erfahrungen liefern können, wie beispielsweise die Synchronisation der Inhalte auf den Geräten und das Durchsuchen benutzerdefinierter Einstellungen.
Sobald Sie Inhalte in Microsoft OneDrive speichern, werden die Inhalte die Freigabeberechtigungen des Ordners übernehmen, in den Sie den Inhalt speichern. Wenn Sie beispielsweise Inhalte im öffentlichen Ordner speichern, ist der Inhalt öffentlich und für jeden im Internet verfügbar, der den Ordner finden kann. Wenn Sie Inhalte in einem privaten Ordner speichern, bleibt der Inhalt privat.
Wenn Sie Inhalte auf einem sozialen Netzwerk wie Facebook von einem Gerät teilen, das mit Ihrem Microsoft OneDrive-Konto synchronisiert wurde, dann werden Ihre Inhalte entweder auf dieses soziale Netzwerk hochgeladen oder es wird ein Link zu diesem Inhalt auf diesem sozialen Netzwerk eingesetzt. Auf diese Weise wird der Inhalt auf dem sozialen Netzwerk für alle Personen zugänglich. Um den Inhalt zu löschen, müssen Sie ihn aus dem sozialen Netzwerk (wenn er anstelle eines Links darauf hochgeladen wurde) und von OneDrive löschen.
Wenn Sie Ihre Microsoft OneDrive-Inhalte mit Ihren Freunden über einen Link freigeben, wird eine E-Mail mit diesem Link an diese Freunde gesendet. Der Link enthält einen Autorisierungscode, der jedem, der diesen Link erhält, einen Zugriff auf Ihre Inhalte ermöglicht. Wenn einer Ihrer Freunde diesen Link an weitere Personen sendet, dann werden auch diese in der Lage sein, auf Ihre Inhalte zuzugreifen, auch wenn Sie diesen Inhalt mit ihnen nicht teilen wollten. Um Berechtigungen für Ihre Inhalte auf Microsoft OneDrive zu widerrufen, melden Sie sich bei Ihrem Konto an, und wählen Sie dann die Inhalte, deren Berechtigungsstufen sie verwalten möchten. Der Widerruf von Berechtigungen für einen Link deaktiviert in effizienter Weise diesen Link. Niemand wird danach in der Lage sein, diesen Link zu verwenden, um auf die Inhalte zuzugreifen, es sei denn, Sie entscheiden sich dazu, diesen Link erneut zu teilen.
Mit Microsoft OneDrive for Business verwaltete Dateien werden von solchen Dateien getrennt gespeichert, die in Ihrem persönlichen Microsoft OneDrive gespeichert sind. OneDrive for Business erfasst und überträgt Daten für die Authentifizierung, z. B. Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und Ihr Kennwort, die an Microsoft und/oder an den Anbieter Ihres Microsoft 365- oder Office 365-Dienstes übertragen werden.
Zurück zum Anfang
Outlook
Outlook-Produkte sind dafür entwickelt, Ihre Produktivität durch eine bessere Kommunikation zu optimieren und umfassen Outlook.com, Outlook-Anwendungen und andere damit verbundene Dienste.
Outlook.com
. Outlook.com ist der primäre E-Mail-Dienst von Microsoft für Verbraucher und umfasst E-Mail-Konten mit Adressen, die auf outlook.com, live.com, hotmail.com und msn.com enden. Outlook.com bietet Funktionen, mit denen Sie sich mit Ihren Freunden über soziale Netzwerke verbinden können. Sie müssen ein Microsoft-Konto erstellen, bevor Sie Outlook.com verwenden können.
Wenn Sie eine E-Mail oder ein Element aus einem Postfach in Outlook.com löschen, wird das Element in der Regel in den Ordner „Gelöschte Objekte” verschoben, wo es für ca. 7 Tage verbleibt, es sei denn, dass Sie es zurück in Ihren Posteingang verschieben, Sie den betreffenden Ordner leeren oder der Dienst den Ordner automatisch leert, je nachdem, was zuerst eintritt. Sobald der Ordner „Gelöschte Objekte“ geleert wurde, verbleiben die gelöschten Objekte bis zu 30 Tage lang in unserem System und werden danach endgültig gelöscht, es sei denn, wir müssen die Daten aus rechtlichen Gründen länger behalten.
Outlook-Anwendungen
. Outlook-Client-Apps sind Software, die Sie auf Ihrem Gerät installieren und mit denen Sie E-Mail, Kalendereinträge, Dateien, Kontakte und andere E-Mail-Daten sowie Ihren Dateispeicher und andere Dienste, wie Exchange Online, Outlook.com oder Server, wie Microsoft Exchange, verwalten. Sie können mehrere Konten von verschiedenen Anbietern, einschließlich Drittanbietern, mit Outlook-Anwendungen,
einschließlich der neuen Outlook für Windows-App, verwenden
.
Um ein Konto hinzuzufügen, müssen Sie Outlook die Berechtigung für den Zugriff auf Daten aus E-Mail oder Dateispeicherdiensten erteilen.
Wenn Sie Outlook ein Konto hinzufügen, werden Ihre E-Mail-Nachrichten, Kalendereinträge, Dateien, Kontakte, Einstellungen und andere Daten des Kontos mit Ihrem Gerät synchronisiert. Bei Verwendung der mobilen Outlook-Anwendungen werden diese Daten ebenfalls mit Microsoft-Servern synchronisiert, um zusätzliche Funktionen zu aktivieren. Dazu gehören schnellere Suchergebnisse, personalisiertes Filtern weniger wichtiger E-Mails und die Möglichkeit, E-Mail-Anlagen von verknüpften Dateispeicheranbietern ohne Verlassen der Outlook-App hinzuzufügen. Bei der Verwendung der Desktop-Outlook-App können Sie auswählen, ob Ihre Daten mit unseren Servern synchronisiert werden sollen. Sie können jederzeit ein Konto entfernen oder die Daten ändern, die von Ihrem Konto synchronisiert werden.
Wenn Sie ein Unternehmenskonto (z. B. das Ihres Arbeitgebers oder Ihrer Schule) hinzufügen, kann der Besitzer der Organisationsdomäne Richtlinien und Regelungen implementieren (z. B. eine mehrstufige Authentifizierung oder die Möglichkeit, Daten aus der Ferne zu löschen), die sich auf die Nutzung von Outlook auswirken können.
Verwenden von Gerätefunktionen
. Für Outlook-Clients, die dies unterstützen, kann der Benutzer mithilfe des Features „Diktieren“ den Inhalt einer E-Mail diktieren und senden. Das Diktierfeature kann so konfiguriert werden, dass das Mikrofon des Geräts oder ein anderes Mikrofon verwendet wird, das ein Benutzer an sein Gerät anschließen kann, z. B. ein mikrofonfähiges Paar Kopfhörer. Outlook kann auch Informationen zum Standort Ihres Geräts verwenden, um Ihnen Wetterinformationen für Ihren aktuellen Standort zur Verfügung zu stellen und die Möglichkeit, nach Orten in der Nähe zu suchen.
Weitere Informationen über die von Outlook erfassten und verwalteten Daten finden Sie im Abschnitt
Microsoft 365
dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Zurück zum Anfang
Skype
Mit Skype können Sie Sprach-, Video-, SMS- und Sofortnachrichten senden und empfangen. Dieser Abschnitt gilt für die Verbraucherversion von Skype. Hinweise zu Skype for Business finden Sie im Abschnitt
Unternehmens- und Entwicklerprodukte
dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen.
Im Rahmen der Bereitstellung dieser Features sammelt Microsoft Nutzungsdaten über Ihre Kommunikation. Dazu gehören Uhrzeit und Datum der Kommunikation und die Nummern oder Benutzernamen, die Teil der Kommunikation sind.
Kompatibilität mit Teams.
Als Skype-Benutzer können Sie sich auch mit Ihrem Skype-Konto bei Teams anmelden. Wenn Sie sich über Ihre Skype-Anmeldeinformationen bei Teams anmelden, können Sie Teams verwenden, um mit anderen Skype- und Teams-Benutzern zu chatten und sie anzurufen, und Sie können über Teams auf Ihre verpassten Skype-Anrufe und den Chatverlauf zugreifen. Teams-Benutzer können Sie auf Skype kontaktieren und Ihren Skype-Anwesenheitsstatus anzeigen. Weitere Informationen zu Teams finden Sie im Abschnitt
Microsoft Teams
dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen.
Suchen nach Teams und Skype-Kontakten.
Ihr Skype-Profil enthält Informationen, die Sie beim Einrichten eines Microsoft- oder Skype-Kontos angegeben haben. Damit andere Personen Sie über Skype (oder Produkte, die mit Skype interagieren, wie z. B. Skype for Business oder Microsoft Teams) finden können, wird Ihr Skype-Profil in die öffentlichen  Suchverzeichnisse von Skype und Teams aufgenommen und ist möglicherweise sowohl über Skype als auch über Teams sichtbar. Abhängig von Ihren Profileinstellungen können Skype  und Teams-Benutzer Sie anhand Ihres Namens, Ihrer E-Mail-Adresse und/oder Telefonnummer finden. Ihr Profil enthält Ihren Benutzernamen, Avatar sowie alle anderen Daten, die Sie Ihrem Profil hinzufügen oder Dritten anzeigen.
Notrufe in den Vereinigten Staaten.
Wenn Sie die Standortfreigabe für Notrufe aktivieren, wird Ihr Standort in regelmäßigen Abständen erfasst, damit Microsoft Ihren Standort für Notrufdienstanbieter freigeben kann, wenn Sie 911 wählen. Ihre Standortinformationen werden nur freigegeben, wenn Sie die Standortfreigabe für Notrufe aktivieren und einen 911-Anruf initiieren.
Skype Kontakte.
Wenn Sie „Outlook.com“ zum Verwalten von Kontakten verwenden, fügt Skype die Personen, die Sie kennen, automatisch zu Ihrer Skype-Kontaktliste hinzu, bis Sie die Anwendung zum Beenden auffordern. Mit Ihrer Zustimmung synchronisiert Teams Ihre Kontaktdaten in regelmäßigen Abständen und sucht nach anderen Skype-Benutzern, die mit Kontakten in Ihren Geräte- und Outlook-Adressbüchern übereinstimmen. Sie haben jederzeit die Kontrolle über Ihre Kontakte und können die Synchronisierung jederzeit beenden. Sie können Benutzer blockieren, wenn Sie ihre Mitteilungen nicht erhalten möchten. Wenn Sie die Synchronisierung Ihrer Geräte-Kontakte beenden oder auf Ihrem Gerät inaktiv sind, werden alle Kontakte, die während des Synchronisierungsprozesses nicht abgeglichen wurden, aus Skype gelöscht. Wenn Sie einen Ihrer Geräte- oder Outlook-Kontakte zur Teilnahme an einer Unterhaltung einladen möchten, können Sie Benutzer direkt zu einer 1:1-Unterhaltung einladen, oder Microsoft kann eine Einladung in Ihrem Namen per SMS oder E-Mail zu Gruppenunterhaltungen senden. Sie können Benutzer blockieren, wenn Sie ihre Mitteilungen nicht erhalten möchten; zusätzlich können Sie Microsoft ein Problem melden.
Hinweis für Nichtbenutzerkontakte.
Wenn Ihre Informationen in den Geräte- oder Outlook-Adressbüchern eines Skype-Benutzers angezeigt werden, der seine Geräte- oder Outlook--Kontakte mit seinen Skype-Kontakten synchronisiert, kann Microsoft Ihre Daten verarbeiten, um zu bestimmen, ob Sie ein aktueller Skype-Benutzer sind und Skype-Benutzern erlauben, Sie zum Dienst einzuladen, einschließlich per SMS und E-Mail. Solange der Skype-Benutzer weiterhin auf Skype auf seinem Gerät aktiv ist und weiterhin die Kontaktsynchronisierung ermöglicht, werden Ihre Informationen auf unseren Servern gespeichert, und wir verarbeiten Ihre Informationen regelmäßig als Teil der Skype-Benutzerkontaktsynchronisierung, um zu überprüfen, ob Sie Skype anschließend beigetreten sind.
Erfahren Sie mehr darüber, wie wir Ihre Informationen in Verbindung mit dem Kontaktsynchronisierungsfeature verarbeiten, das Skype-Benutzern angeboten wird
.
Wenn Sie Skype beitreten möchten, werden Sie als vorgeschlagener neuer Skype-Kontakt für alle Skype-  und Teams-Benutzer mit Ihren Informationen in ihren Geräte- oder Outlook-Adressbüchern angezeigt. Als Skype-Benutzer können Sie andere Skype-  und Teams-Benutzer blockieren, wenn Sie deren Mitteilungen nicht erhalten möchten. Darüber hinaus können Sie Bedenken an Microsoft melden.
Partnerunternehmen
. Damit noch mehr Menschen Zugang zu Skype haben, gehen wir Partnerschaften mit anderen Unternehmen ein, sodass Skype über die Dienste dieser Unternehmen angeboten werden kann. Wenn Sie Skype über ein anderes Unternehmen als Microsoft nutzen, unterliegt der Umgang mit Ihren Daten den Datenschutzrichtlinien dieses Unternehmens. Um geltendes Recht einzuhalten, auf Gerichtsverfahren zu reagieren oder unser Partnerunternehmen bzw. unseren lokalen Betreiber bei entsprechenden Vorgängen zu unterstützen, können wir auf Ihre Daten zugreifen, diese übertragen, weitergeben und aufbewahren. Diese Daten können z. B. private Inhalte wie Inhalte Ihrer Sofortnachrichten, gespeicherte Videonachrichten, Voicemails oder Dateiübertragungen enthalten.
Skype-Manager
. Mit Skype-Manager können Sie die Skype-Nutzung einer Gruppe (z. B. Ihrer Familie) zentral verwalten. Wenn Sie eine Gruppe einrichten, sind Sie der Skype-Manager-Administrator, und Sie sehen die Nutzungsmuster, einschließlich detaillierter Informationen wie z. B. Datenverkehrsdaten und die Details der Einkäufe von anderen Gruppenmitgliedern, die einem solchen Zugriff zugestimmt haben. Wenn Sie Informationen wie Ihren Namen hinzufügen, sind Sie für andere Benutzer in der Gruppe sichtbar. Mitglieder der Gruppe können die Zustimmung für Skype Manager widerrufen, indem sie ihre
Skype-Kontoseite
besuchen.
Push-Benachrichtigungen
. Skype-Apps verwenden den Benachrichtigungsdienst auf Ihrem Gerät, um Sie über eingehende Anrufe, Chats und andere Benachrichtigungen zu informieren. Diese Dienste werden bei vielen Geräten durch andere Unternehmen zur Verfügung gestellt. Skype muss mit dem Benachrichtigungsdienst kommunizieren, damit dieser Sie z. B. darüber informieren kann, wer anruft oder um Ihnen die ersten Worte eines neuen Chats zur Verfügung zu stellen. Das Unternehmen, das den Benachrichtigungsdienst auf Ihrem m Gerät bereitstellt, verwendet diese Informationen gemäß seinen eigenen Bestimmungen und Datenschutzrichtlinien. Microsoft übernimmt keine Verantwortung für die Daten, die vom Unternehmen erfasst werden, das den Benachrichtigungsdienst bereitstellt. Wenn Sie die Benachrichtigungsdienste für eingehende Skype-Anrufe und -Nachrichten nicht verwenden möchten, deaktivieren Sie sie in den Einstellungen der Skype-Anwendung auf Ihrem Gerät.
Übersetzungsfunktionen
. Wenn Sie die Übersetzungsfunktionen von Skype nutzen, sammelt und nutzt Skype Ihre Unterhaltung, um den Übersetzungsdienst bereitzustellen. Mit Ihrer Zustimmung können Ihre Daten zur Verbesserung von Microsoft-Produkten und -Diensten verwendet werden. Um der Übersetzungs- und Spracherkennungstechnologie beim Lernen und Entwickeln zu helfen, werden Sätze und automatische Transkriptionen analysiert und alle Korrekturen in unser System eingegeben, um bessere Leistungen zu erzielen. Diese Daten enthalten möglicherweise manuelle Transkriptionen Ihrer Sprachclips. Weitere Informationen dazu, wie Microsoft Ihre Sprachdaten verwaltet, finden Sie unter
Spracherkennungstechnologien
.
Aufzeichnungsfunktionen
. Einige Skype-Versionen verfügen über eine Aufnahmefunktion, mit der Sie Ihren Audio- bzw. Videoanruf ganz oder teilweise aufnehmen und freigeben können. Die Aufzeichnung wird gespeichert und an die Person oder Gruppe, mit denen der Aufruf durchgeführt wurde, als Teil des Unterhaltungsverlaufs freigegeben.
Sie sollten sich über Ihre rechtlichen Pflichten im Klaren sein, bevor Sie eine Mitteilung aufzeichnen. Dies kann die vorherige Zustimmung aller an dem Gespräch teilnehmenden Personen oder andere erforderliche Genehmigungen umfassen.
Microsoft ist nicht dafür verantwortlich, wie Sie Ihre Aufzeichnungen oder die Aufnahmefunktionen verwenden.
Skype-Bots
. Bots sind Programme, die von Microsoft oder Drittanbietern angeboten werden, und viele nützliche Dinge wie das Suchen nach Neuigkeiten, Spielen und mehr bieten. Je nach ihren Funktionen haben Bots Zugriff auf Anzeigenamen, Skype-ID, Land, Region, Sprache, und alle Nachrichten, Audio-, Video- oder Inhalte, die Sie mit dem Bot freigeben. Überprüfen Sie das Bot-Profil und die zugehörigen Datenschutzbestimmungen, bevor Sie eine individuelle Unterhaltung oder ein Gruppengespräch mit einem Bot durchführen. Sie können einen Bot löschen, den Sie nicht mehr nutzen möchten. Bevor Sie einen Bot zu einer Gruppe hinzufügen, stellen Sie sicher, dass die Teilnehmer der Gruppe zustimmen, ihre Informationen mit dem Bot zu teilen.
Untertitel
. Bestimmte Skype-Funktionen enthalten Bedienungshilfen wie Untertitel. Bei Skype-Anrufen kann ein Anrufteilnehmer eine Funktion aktivieren, die es ermöglicht, die gesprochene Chat-Kommunikation als Text anzuzeigen. Wenn ein Benutzer diese Funktion aktiviert, erhalten die anderen Anrufteilnehmer keine Benachrichtigung. Microsoft verwendet diese Sprach- und Textdaten, um Benutzern Untertitel für Audioinhalte bereitzustellen.
Kamerafunktionen
. Wenn Sie die Kamerafunktion in Skype verwenden, können Sie Ihre Videos und Bilder mit Lens-Diensten von Drittanbietern erweitern. Lens ist ein Feature, das Augmented Reality (AR) verwendet, um Ihre Selfies auf unterhaltsame Weise zu transformieren, z. B. damit Sie wie Ihr Lieblingstier aussehen. Mithilfe der Kamera in Skype können Sie das in Skype integrierte Lens-Feature auswählen, um Ihr Gesicht und Ihre Hände zu transformieren. Je nachdem, für welche Lens Sie sich entscheiden, können Ihre Videos und Bilder verarbeitet werden, um Informationen über die Lage der verschiedenen Bereiche Ihres Gesichts und Ihrer Hände zu gewinnen. Die extrahierten Daten werden ausschließlich zum Anwenden von AR-Effekten auf Ihr Gesicht und Ihre Hände verwendet. Keine dieser Daten wird verwendet, um Sie persönlich zu identifizieren. Diese Daten werden nur für die Dauer der Sitzung auf Ihrem Gerät verarbeitet und dann sofort gelöscht. Diese Daten werden nicht an Skype oder Dritte gesendet.
Zurück zum Anfang
Surface
Microsoft bietet seine Familie von Surface-Geräten und -Zubehör an, um eine großartige Computererfahrung zu bieten, einschließlich Surfen im Internet, Ansehen und Streaming von Videos, Spielen, Ausführen von Apps wie Excel, Word und OneNote und mehr. Dazu gehören Geräte und Zubehör wie Surface Laptops, Surface Studios, Surface Book, Surface Pro, Surface Headphones, Surface Earbuds, Surface Dock, Surface Keyboard und viele mehr. Im Rahmen dieser Erfahrung sammelt Microsoft bestimmte Diagnosedaten, wie unten beschrieben.
Diagnosedaten
. Microsoft sammelt Diagnosedaten, während Sie Ihre Surface-Geräte, Surface-Zubehör und Surface-Anwendungen verwenden. Diagnosedaten können Informationen zu Abstürzen, Leistung und Nutzung von Surface-Produkten enthalten. Die an Microsoft gesendeten Daten werden dazu verwendet, die Sicherheit, die Aktualität und die erwartete Leistung von Surface zu gewährleisten, und können uns dabei helfen, Surface zu verbessern.
Es gibt zwei Ebenen von Diagnose- und Aktivitätsdaten: „Erforderliche Diagnosedaten“ und „Optionale Diagnosedaten“.
Erforderliche Diagnosedaten
sind die Mindestmenge an Daten, die wir benötigen, damit Surface-Geräte, Surface-Zubehör und die Surface-Anwendung sicher, aktuell und erwartungsgemäß funktionieren.
Optionale Diagnosedaten
sind zusätzliche Diagnose- und Nutzungsdaten zu Ihren Surface-Geräten, Surface-Zubehör und der Surface-Anwendung. Wenn Sie sich dafür entscheiden, optionale Diagnosedaten an Microsoft zu senden, sind auch die erforderlichen Diagnosedaten enthalten.
Erforderliche Diagnosedaten werden immer für alle Surface-Geräte, Surface-Zubehör und die Surface-Anwendung an Microsoft gesendet. Sie können jedoch festlegen, ob Surface optionale Diagnosedaten erfassen und an Microsoft senden soll. Sie können diese Einstellung bei der Ersteinrichtung des Surface-Geräts vornehmen oder sie jederzeit in der Surface-App ändern.
Weitere Informationen finden Sie unter
Diagnosedaten für Surface-Produkte
und
Diagnosedaten in der Surface-App
. Eine Liste der gesammelten erforderlichen Surface-Diagnosedaten finden Sie unter
Erforderliche Diagnosedaten für Surface-Produkte
.
Zurück zum Anfang
Surface Duo
Das Surface Duo ist ein Gerät mit zwei Bildschirmen, das für die Produktivität unterwegs in Ihre Tasche passt. Basierend auf dem Google Android-Betriebssystem, unterstützt Surface Duo Mobilfunk- und Wi-Fi-Konnektivität und kann für E-Mail, Internet-Browsing, Spiele und Geschäftskonnektivität verwendet werden.
Microsoft bietet eine Surface Duo-Kernoberfläche, die auf dem Android-Betriebssystem ausgeführt wird. Die Surface Duo-Kernoberfläche umfasst Apps wie Microsoft Launcher, Setup-Assistent und den Begleiter für Ihr Smartphone. Sie können sich mit einer Google-ID anmelden und verschiedene Google-Dienste aktivieren. Sie können sich dann auch mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto (MSA) anmelden und Microsoft-Dienste aktivieren. Microsoft-Apps und -Dienste stützen sich möglicherweise auf die von Google bereitgestellten Informationen. Einige Funktionen (z. B. Standort) erfordern, dass Sie diese Funktionen für Google aktivieren und diese Informationen separat von Microsoft nutzen lassen.
Diagnosedaten
. Surface Duo sammelt Diagnosedaten, um Probleme zu lösen und um die Surface Duo-Kernoberfläche auf dem neuesten Stand, sicher und funktionstüchtig zu halten. Diese Daten helfen uns auch bei der Verbesserung von Surface Duo und den zugehörigen Microsoft-Produkten und- Diensten. Die Daten beinhalten weder Ihren Benutzernamen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, noch den Inhalt Ihrer Dateien. Es gibt zwei Stufen von Diagnosedaten:  „Erforderliche Diagnosedaten“ und „Optionale Diagnosedaten“.
Erforderlich
. Die Daten, die mindestens erforderlich sind, um die Surface Duo-Kernoberfläche zu schützen, auf dem neuesten Stand zu halten und dafür zu sorgen, dass sie ordnungsgemäß funktioniert.
Optional
. Zusätzliche Daten, die uns dabei helfen, Produktverbesserungen vorzunehmen. Sie umfassen erweiterte Informationen für Microsoft zur Erkennung, Diagnose und Behebung von Problemen.
Weitere Informationen in den Datenschutzeinstellungen von Surface Duo
.
Surface Duo-Standorteinstellungen
. Surface Duo basiert auf den Google-Standortdiensten, um den genauen geografischen Standort des Geräts zu bestimmen und das lokale Wetter anzuzeigen. Den Standort Ihres Surface Duo kann mit unterschiedlicher Genauigkeit bestimmt und in einigen Fällen genau bestimmt werden. Wenn Sie möchten, dass Microsoft-Apps auf Wetter- oder andere ortsbezogene Informationen verweisen oder diese anzeigen können, müssen Sie die Google-Standortdienste und den Zugriff auf Microsoft-Standorte aktivieren. Bei einigen Apps kann es erforderlich sein, dass diese Einstellungen unabhängig für die App aktiviert werden und in den Einstellungen des Surface Duo festgelegt oder geändert werden können. Die
Google-Datenschutzrichtlinie
bietet Details zum Standortdienst von Google und den zugehörigen Datenschutzbestimmungen. Weitere Informationen finden Sie unter
Surface Duo-Standorteinstellungen
.
Im Surface Duo enthaltene Microsoft-Apps
. Die Diagnosedaten-Optionen für die Surface Duo-Kernoberfläche werden beim ersten Einrichten Ihres Surface Duo konfiguriert und können in den Einstellungen des Surface Duo unter dem Abschnitt Diagnosedaten geändert werden.
Die anderen Microsoft-Apps auf Ihrem Surface Duo fordern Sie möglicherweise auf, Funktionen zu aktivieren, um die Anwendung in vollem Umfang nutzen zu können, oder Sie werden gebeten, die optionale Erfassung diagnostischer Daten zuzulassen. Sie können die Einstellungen für diese Apps in den Surface Duo-Einstellungen unter dem App-Namen ändern. Weitere Informationen zu diesen Apps finden Sie in den Abschnitten
Produktivität und Kommunikation
und
Suchen und Durchsuchen
dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Zurück zum Anfang
LinkedIn
Informationen über die von LinkedIn gesammelten Daten und deren Verwendung finden Sie unter LinkedIn
Datenschutzrichtlinie
.
Zusammenfassung anzeigen
Weitere Infos
Zurück zum Anfang
Suchen und durchsuchen
Such- und Durchsuchungsprodukte verbinden Sie mit Informationen und erfassen, verarbeiten und reagieren intelligent auf Informationen – lernen und passen sich im Laufe der Zeit an. Weitere Informationen zu künstlicher Intelligenz und Copilot-Funktionen in den Suchprodukten von Microsoft finden Sie im
Künstliche Intelligenz und Microsoft Copilot-Funktionen
Abschnitt oben.
Such- und Durchsuchungsprodukte verbinden Sie mit Informationen und erfassen, verarbeiten und reagieren intelligent auf Informationen – lernen und passen sich im Laufe der Zeit an. Weitere Informationen zu künstlicher Intelligenz und Copilot-Funktionen in den Suchprodukten von Microsoft finden Sie im
Künstliche Intelligenz und Microsoft Copilot-Funktionen
Abschnitt oben.
Bing
Bing-Dienste umfassen Such- und Zuordnungsdienste sowie andere Apps und Programme, die in diesem Abschnitt beschrieben werden. Bing-Dienste erfassen und verarbeiten Daten in verschiedenen Formen, einschließlich Freihand- oder eingegebener Text, Sprachdaten und Bilder. Bing-Dienste sind auch in anderen Microsoft-Dienste enthalten, z. B. Microsoft 365 und bestimmten Features in Windows (die wir als Bing-basierte Erfahrungen bezeichnen).
Wenn Sie eine Suche durchführen oder ein Bing-basiertes Feature verwenden, mit dem eine Suche durchgeführt wird oder für das Sie einen Befehl eingeben, erfasst Microsoft die von Ihnen bereitgestellten Suchdaten oder Befehle (Text, Sprach- oder Bilddaten) zusammen mit Ihrer IP-Adresse, Ihrem Standort, den in unseren Cookies oder ähnlichen Technologien enthaltenen eindeutigen Bezeichnern, der Uhrzeit und dem Datum Ihrer Suche sowie Ihrer Browserkonfiguration. Wenn Sie beispielsweise sprachfähige Dienste von Bing nutzen, werden Ihre Spracheingabe- und Leistungsdaten, die mit der Sprechfunktionalität in Verbindung stehen, an Microsoft gesendet werden. Weitere Informationen dazu, wie Microsoft Ihre Sprachdaten verwaltet, finden Sie unter
Spracherkennungstechnologien
. Und wenn Sie Bing-Dienste mit Bildaktivierung verwenden, wird das Bild, das Sie bereitstellen, an Microsoft gesendet. Wenn Sie Bing-basierte Erfahrungen wie die Bing-Suche verwenden, um auf einer Webseite oder in einem Dokument nach einem Wort oder einer Phrase zu suchen, wird das Wort bzw. die Phrase zusammen mit dem zugehörigen Kontext an Bing gesendet, um auf den Kontext bezogene Suchergebnisse bereitzustellen.
KI-erweiterte Bing-Suche
. Die Bing-Suche enthält jetzt eine KI-gestützte Websuche, die Microsoft Copilot in Bing nutzt. Diese unterstützt die Benutzer durch die Bereitstellung relevanter Suchergebnisse, die Überprüfung und Zusammenfassung von Informationen aus dem gesamten Web, die Verfeinerung von Suchanfragen durch das Chat-Erlebnis und die Förderung der Kreativität durch die Unterstützung der Benutzer bei der Erstellung von Inhalten. Die Nutzung und Erfassung personenbezogener Daten durch Copilot in Bing steht im Einklang mit dem in diesem Abschnitt beschriebenen Kernangebot der Websuche von Bing. Weitere Informationen über Copilot in Bing finden Sie unter
Copilot in Bing: Unser Ansatz für verantwortungsvolle KI
.
Suchvorschläge
. Beim Feature für Suchvorschläge werden die Zeichen an Microsoft gesendet, die Sie in eine von Bing gestützte Benutzeroberfläche eingeben (z. B. Such- und Websitevorschläge im Microsoft Edge-Browser), um eine Suche durchzuführen. Das gilt auch für angeklickte Elemente. So können wir Ihnen relevante Vorschläge unterbreiten, während Sie Suchbegriffe eingeben. Unter
Bing-Einstellungen
können Sie dieses Feature für eine Bing-Suche aktivieren bzw. deaktivieren. Es gibt andere Methoden, um dieses Feature in anderen Bing-basierten Umgebungen zu steuern, beispielsweise im Microsoft Edge-Browser. Die Suchvorschläge können im Suchfeld in Windows 10 und Windows 11 nicht deaktiviert werden. Wenn Sie möchten, können Sie das Suchfeld oder das Symbol in der Taskleiste ausblenden.
Bing-Verbesserungsprogramm für Bing Desktop und Bing Toolbar
. Wenn Sie Bing Desktop oder die Bing Toolbar verwenden und am Verbesserungsprogramm für die Nutzung von Bing teilnehmen wollen, sammeln wir außerdem zusätzliche Informationen darüber, wie Sie diese speziellen Bing-Apps verwenden wie z. B. die Adressen der von Ihnen besuchten Websites, um die Such-Rangliste und -Relevanz zu verbessern. Um Ihre Privatsphäre zu schützen, verwenden wir die über das Verbesserungsprogramm für die Nutzung von Bing erfassten Informationen weder zu Ihrer Identifizierung noch zur Kontaktaufnahme mit Ihnen und auch nicht für eine auf Sie zugeschnitten Werbung. Sie können das Verbesserungsprogramm für die Nutzung von Bing jederzeit in den Bing Desktop- oder Bing Toolbar-Einstellungen deaktivieren. Zu guter Letzt löschen wir die über das Verbesserungsprogramm für die Nutzung von Bing erfassten Informationen nach 18 Monaten.
Aufbewahrung und Deidentifikation
. Wir machen gespeicherte Suchanfragen unkenntlich, indem wir die IP-Adresse nach 6 Monaten vollständig entfernen. Cookie-IDs und andere sitzungsübergreifende Identifikatoren, die zur Identifizierung eines bestimmten Kontos oder Gerätes dienen, werden nach 18 Monaten unkenntlich gemacht.
Personalisierung über das Microsoft-Konto
. Einige Bing-Dienste bieten Ihnen eine erweiterte Erfahrung (beispielsweise das Synchronisieren Ihres Suchverlaufs auf allen Geräten), wenn Sie sich mit Ihrem persönlichen Microsoft-Konto anmelden. Sie können dieses Personalisierungsfeature verwenden, um Ihre Interessen, Favoriten und Einstellungen anzupassen und Ihr Konto mit den Diensten von Drittanbietern zu verbinden. Besuchen Sie die
Bing-Einstellungen
, um Ihre Personalisierungseinstellungen zu verwalten, oder das
Microsoft-Datenschutzdashboard
, um Ihre Daten zu verwalten.
Verwalten des Suchverlaufs
. Wenn Sie sich erneut bei einem persönlichen Microsoft-Konto angemeldet haben, können Sie Ihren Such- und Chatverlauf im
Microsoft-Datenschutzdashboard
löschen. Der Bing-Suchverlaufsdienst, der in den Bing-Einstellungen konfiguriert werden kann, bietet eine andere Möglichkeit, die von Ihnen bei einer Bing-Suche in Ihrem Browser eingegebenen Suchbegriffe oder die angeklickten Ergebnisse erneut zu verwenden. Sie können den Suchverlauf auf einem Gerät über diesen Dienst deaktivieren. Die Unterhaltungen, die Sie mit Microsoft Copilot in Bing führen, werden auch als "Letzte Aktivität" gespeichert. Der Verlauf der vorherigen letzten Aktivitäten wird gespeichert, wobei die Namen von Chats standardmäßig auf der ersten Abfrage des Chats basieren. Ihre letzte Aktivität wird auf der rechten Seite des Chatfensters angezeigt, wenn Sie den Dienst verwenden. Durch das Löschen des Suchverlaufs wird verhindert, dass dieser auf Ihrer Such- oder Chatverlaufs-Webseite angezeigt wird. Es werden dadurch jedoch keine Informationen aus unseren Suchprotokollen gelöscht, die wie oben beschrieben beibehalten oder deidentifiziert oder gemäß den Vorgaben im Datenschutzdashboard behandelt werden. Wenn Sie mit einem geschäftlichen oder schulischen Microsoft-Konto angemeldet sind und Microsoft Search in Bing verwenden, können Sie Ihren Microsoft Search-Suchverlauf in den Bing-Suchverlauf exportieren, aber nicht löschen. Ihr Dienstadministrator für Microsoft Search in Bing kann aggregierte Suchverläufe für alle Unternehmensbenutzer anzeigen, jedoch keine benutzerspezifischen Suchen.
Drittanbieterdienste, die Bing nutzen
. Sie haben die Möglichkeit, auf Bing-Features zurückzugreifen, während Sie Drittanbieterdienste verwenden wie z. B. die von Yahoo! Um diese Dienste anzubieten, empfängt Bing suchbezogene Informationen von diesen und weiteren Partnern, einschließlich Ihrer Suchanfrage und den dazugehörigen Daten, die Datum, Uhrzeit, IP-Adresse und einen eindeutigen Bezeichner enthalten können. Diese Daten werden an Microsoft gesendet, um den Suchdienst anbieten zu können. Microsoft wird diese Daten, wie in dieser Erklärung beschrieben, oder wie es sich aus unseren weiter beschränkten Vertragspflichten mit unseren Partnern ergibt, verwenden. Bei Fragen zur Erfassung und Verwendung der Daten durch Drittanbieterdienste sollten Sie die Datenschutzrichtlinien dieser Dritten konsultieren.
An die Zielwebsite übergebene Daten
. Wenn Sie ein Suchergebnis oder eine Anzeige auf einer Bing-Suchergebnisseite auswählen und die Zielwebsite aufrufen, erhält die Zielwebsite die Standarddaten, die Ihr Browser an jede von Ihnen besuchte Website sendet, z. B. Ihre IP-Adresse, Browsertyp und -sprache sowie den Hostnamen der Website, von der Sie kommen (in diesem Fall
https://www.bing.com/
).
Austausch von Daten aus Bing und von Bing-basierten Anwendungen von Drittanbietern
. Wir teilen einige deidentifizierte Daten (wobei die Identität einer bestimmten Person nicht bekannt ist) von Bing und von den von Bing bereitgestellten Features, mit ausgewählten Drittanbietern. Vorher durchlaufen die Daten einen Prozess, bei dem bestimmte sensible Daten entfernt werden, die Nutzer möglicherweise selbst in die Suchbegriffe eingegeben haben (z. B. Sozialversicherungsnummern oder Kreditkartennummern). Außerdem hält Microsoft diese Drittanbieter dazu an, die Daten sicher zu speichern und nicht für andere Zwecke zu verwenden, für die sie vorgesehen sind.
Zurück zum Anfang
Microsoft Edge
Immer wenn Sie einen Webbrowser verwenden, um auf das Internet zuzugreifen, werden Daten über Ihr Gerät ("Standardgerätedaten") an die von Ihnen besuchten Websites und Onlinedienste gesendet. Standardgerätedaten umfassen die IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, den Typ Ihres Browsers sowie die festgelegte Sprache, die Zugriffszeit und die aufgerufenen Websiteadressen. Diese Daten werden möglicherweise auf den Webservern dieser Websites oder Online-Services protokolliert. Welche Daten erfasst und wie diese Daten verwendet werden, hängt von den Datenschutzpraktiken der von Ihnen besuchten Websites bzw. den von Ihnen verwendeten Webdiensten ab. Bestimmte Funktionen in Microsoft Edge, z. B. wenn Sie eine neue Registerkarte im Browser öffnen, verbinden Sie mit Microsoft Start-Inhalten, und Ihre Erfahrungen mit solchen Inhalten werden im Abschnitt „Microsoft Start“ dieser Datenschutzbestimmung behandelt. Darüber hinaus sendet Microsoft Edge eine eindeutige Browser-ID an bestimmte Websites, damit wir aggregierte Daten entwickeln können, die verwendet verwenden, um die Browserfeatures und -dienste zu verbessern.
Microsoft Edge für Windows, Linux und macOS
. Microsoft Edge ist der Standard-Webbrowser für Windows 10 und höher und ist auch für andere unterstützte Versionen von Windows und macOS verfügbar.
Es werden auf Ihrem Gerät Daten zur Nutzung Ihres Browsers gespeichert, z. B. Browserverlauf, Webformulardaten, temporäre Internetdateien und Cookies. Sie können diese Daten von Ihrem Gerät entfernen, indem Sie den Browserverlauf löschen.
Microsoft Edge ermöglicht Ihnen das Erfassen und Speichern von Inhalten auf Ihrem Gerät, wie zum Beispiel:
Einstellungen und mehr
. Ermöglicht Ihnen die Verwaltung von Favoriten, Downloads, Verlauf, Erweiterungen und Sammlungen.
Sammlungen
. Sie können Text, Bilder, Videos und andere Inhalte auf einer Notizenseite in Ihrem Browser sammeln. Wenn Sie Inhalte in Ihre Sammlung ziehen, werden sie auf Ihrem Gerät zwischengespeichert und können über Ihre Sammlung gelöscht werden.
Website an Taskleiste anheften
. Hiermit können Sie Ihre bevorzugten Websites an die Windows-Taskleiste anheften. Websites können erkennen, welche ihrer Webseiten Sie angeheftet haben, und Ihnen so ein Infobadge bereitstellen, um Sie darüber zu informieren, dass Neuheiten vorhanden sind, die Sie sich auf der jeweiligen Website ansehen sollten.
Microsoft sammelt Daten, die zum Bereitstellen der von Ihnen in Microsoft Edge angeforderten Features nötig sind. Wenn sie mit Ihrem persönlichen Microsoft-Konto oder Geschäfts-, Schul- oder Unikonto bei Microsoft Edge angemeldet sind, synchronisiert Microsoft Edge Ihre auf Ihrem Gerät gespeicherten Browserdaten auf anderen angemeldeten Geräten. Sie können auswählen, welche Browserdaten synchronisiert werden sollen, einschließlich Favoriten, Browserverlauf, Erweiterungen und zugehörige Daten, Einstellungen, geöffnete Registerkarten, Auto-Ausfüllen-Formulareinträge (z. B. Name, Adresse und Telefonnummer), Kennwörter, Zahlungsinformationen und andere Datentypen. sobald diese verfügbar sind. Wenn Sie sich für die Synchronisierung von Erweiterungen entscheiden, die Sie von Drittanbieter-Webstores erworben haben, wird eine Kopie dieser Erweiterungen direkt aus diesen Webstores auf Ihren synchronisierten Geräten heruntergeladen. Wenn Sie den Kennwortmonitor aktiviert haben, werden Ihre gespeicherten Anmeldeinformationen gehasht, verschlüsselt und an den Kennwortmonitor-Dienst von Microsoft gesendet, um Sie zu warnen, wenn Ihre Anmeldeinformationen im Rahmen eines böswilligen Angriffs oder einer Sicherheitsverletzung erkannt wurden. Diese Daten werden von Microsoft nach Abschluss der Überprüfung nicht weiter aufbewahrt. Sie können die Synchronisierung in den Microsoft Edge-Einstellungen deaktivieren oder konfigurieren.
Wenn Sie sich mit Ihrem persönlichen Microsoft-Konto oder Ihrem Geschäfts-, Schul- oder Unikonto bei Microsoft Edge anmelden, speichert Microsoft Edge die Datenschutzeinstellungen Ihres Kontos. Microsoft Edge verwenden die gespeicherten Einstellungen, um die Datenschutzoptionen Ihres Kontos über Ihre angemeldeten Geräte hinweg zu migrieren, einschließlich während der Windows-Geräteeinrichtung oder beim Anmelden bei Microsoft Edge mit Ihrem Konto auf einem neuen Gerät.
Die
Such- und Seitenvorschläge
von Microsoft Edge verwenden Ihre Suchanfragen und Ihren Browser-Verlauf, um Ihnen einen schnelleren Seitenaufbau und mehr relevante Treffer zu liefern. In Microsoft Edge werden die Informationen, die Sie in die Adresszeile des Browsers eingeben, automatisch an Ihren in der Adressleiste konfigurierten Standardsuchanbieter gesendet, der nach jedem eingegebenen Zeichen Suchvorschläge anzeigt. Sie können diese Funktionen jederzeit in den Browsereinstellungen deaktivieren. Um Suchergebnisse zu liefern, sendet Microsoft Edge Ihre Suchanfragen, Standard-Geräteinformationen und den Standort (wenn Sie Standort aktiviert haben) an Ihren Standardsuchanbieter. Wenn Bing Ihr Standardsuchanbieter ist, verwenden wir diese Daten wie im Abschnitt "Bing" dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschrieben.
Microsoft Edge erfasst und verwendet Daten aus Ihren Suchaktivitäten im Web, einschließlich Websites, die Microsoft nicht besitzt oder betreibt, um Microsoft-Dienste zu verbessern, z. B. Microsoft Edge, Microsoft Bing und Microsoft News. Diese Daten können die Suchabfrage, die Suchergebnisse, die Ihnen angezeigt werden, demografische Informationen, die Teil der Suchergebnisse sind, und die Interaktion mit diesen Suchergebnissen umfassen, z. B. die Links, auf die Sie klicken. Microsoft Edge führt Schritte aus, um die gesammelten Daten zu anonymisieren, indem Daten entfernt werden, die die Person oder das Gerät identifizieren, von dem sie erfasst wurden, und bewahrt diese Daten ein Jahr lang ab dem Zeitpunkt der Erfassung auf. Microsoft verwendet diese gesammelten Daten nicht zum Personalisieren oder Bereitstellen von Werbung für Sie. Sie können die Erfassung dieser Daten jederzeit in den Browsereinstellungen deaktivieren.
Microsoft Edge lädt Inhalte von Microsoft-Diensten zur Verbesserung der Benutzerfreundlichkeit herunter. Dies gilt beispielsweise, wenn Daten zum Vorab-Rendern von Seiteninhalten zum schnelleren Surfen heruntergeladen werden oder zum Bereitstellen von Inhalten, die für die von Ihnen ausgewählten Features erforderlich sind, z. B. Vorlagen für Sammlungen.
Sie können auch Ihre Microsoft Edge-Browseraktivitäten freigeben, um es uns zu ermöglichen, Microsoft Edge und Microsoft-Dienste wie Werbung, Suche, Einkäufe und Neuigkeiten zu personalisieren. Microsoft Edge-Browsingaktivitäten umfassen Ihren Verlauf, Favoriten, Verwendungsdaten, Webinhalte und andere Browserdaten. Weitere Informationen zu unseren
Werbe-Datenschutz-Richtlinien
finden Sie im Abschnitt „Werbung“ in dieser Datenschutzerklärung. Im Microsoft-Datenschutzdashboard können Sie die Verwendung Ihrer Browseraktivität für personalisierte Werbung über die Einstellung
Anzeigen von Werbung, die Sie interessiert
steuern. Wenn Sie diese Einstellung im Microsoft-Datenschutzdashboard deaktivieren, erhalten Sie weiterhin personalisierte Weberfahrungen wie z. B. Suche und Nachrichten basierend auf Ihrer Browseraktivität. Sie können mit dem Teilen Ihrer Microsoft Edge-Browseraktivität aufhören, indem Sie
Erlauben Sie Microsoft, Ihre Browsing-Aktivitäten einschließlich Verlauf, Favoriten, Nutzung und anderer Browsing-Daten zu verwenden, um Microsoft Edge und Microsoft-Dienste wie Werbung, Suche, Einkaufen und Nachrichten zu personalisieren
in den Edge-Einstellungen deaktivieren. Wenn Sie die Copilot-Features in der Seitenleiste von Microsoft Edge verwenden, können Sie Microsoft Copilot in Edge erlauben, auf den Inhalt der von Ihnen angezeigten Webseite zuzugreifen, um weitere Einblicke zu erhalten, z. B. in Form von Seitenzusammenfassungen. Die Verwendung von Daten im Zusammenhang mit Copilot-Erlebnissen steht im Einklang mit der Verwendung von Copilot-Daten, die im Abschnitt "Bing" dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschrieben wird.
Microsoft Edge sammelt erforderliche Diagnosedaten, um Probleme zu beheben, Microsoft Edge auf dem neuesten Stand zu halten und um Windows sichern und ordnungsgemäß betreiben zu können. Die erforderlichen Diagnosedaten helfen uns auch dabei, Microsoft Edge und Windows zu verbessern.
Unabhängig von den oben genannten Suchaktivitätsdaten können Sie optionale Diagnosedaten zur Verwendung von Microsoft Edge und Informationen zu Ihren Browseraktivitäten, einschließlich Browserverlauf und Suchbegriffen, an Microsoft senden, um uns bei der Verbesserung von Microsoft Edge und anderer Microsoft-Produkte und -Dienste zu unterstützen. Für Microsoft Edge unter Windows 10 und höher werden diese Informationen bereitgestellt, wenn Sie optionale Diagnosedaten aktiviert haben. Ausführliche Informationen hierzu finden Sie im Abschnitt zur Windows-Diagnose der Datenschutzerklärung. Für Microsoft Edge auf anderen Betriebssystemen werden optionale Diagnoseinformationen bereitgestellt, wenn sie
Bei der Verbesserung von Microsoft-Produkten helfen, indem Sie Nutzungsdaten des Browsers senden
oder
Tragen Sie zur Verbesserung von Suchen und Microsoft-Produkten bei, indem Sie Informationen zu Websites senden, die Sie in Microsoft Edge besuchen
in den Browsereinstellungen aktivieren.
Die von Microsoft Edge gesammelten Diagnosedaten werden an Microsoft übertragen und mit einer oder mehreren eindeutigen Kennungen gespeichert, die uns helfen, eine individuelle Browserinstallation auf einem Gerät zu erkennen und die Serviceprobleme und Nutzungsmuster des Browsers zu verstehen.
Erfahren Sie mehr über Microsoft Edge, das Durchsuchen von Daten und den Datenschutz
.
Microsoft Edge auf iOS und Android
. Microsoft Edge auf iOS- und Android-Geräten erfasst Daten, die zur Bereitstellung der von Ihnen angeforderten Funktionen in Microsoft Edge nötig sind. Microsoft sammelt erforderliche Diagnosedaten auch, um Probleme zu beheben und Microsoft Edge auf dem neuesten Stand zu halten, zu sichern und funktionstüchtig zu halten. Die erforderlichen Diagnosedaten helfen uns auch dabei, Microsoft Edge zu verbessern.
Darüber hinaus können Sie optionale Diagnosedaten darüber, wie Sie Microsoft Edge verwenden, und Informationen über die von Ihnen besuchten Websites (Browserverlauf) für personalisierte Erlebnisse auf Ihrem Browser, Windows und anderen Microsoft-Produkten und -Diensten freigeben. Diese Informationen helfen uns auch, Microsoft Edge und andere Microsoft-Produkte und -Dienste zu verbessern. Diese optionalen Diagnosedaten werden an uns gesendet, wenn Sie
Nutzungsdaten für Personalisierung freigeben
oder
Informationen zu von Ihnen besuchten Websites bereitstellen
in den Browsereinstellungen aktivieren.
Die von Microsoft Edge gesammelten Diagnosedaten werden an Microsoft übertragen und mit einer oder mehreren eindeutigen Kennungen gespeichert, die uns helfen, einen individuellen Benutzer auf einem Gerät zu erkennen und die Serviceprobleme und Nutzungsmuster des Browsers zu verstehen.
Microsoft Edge verwendet Daten aus Ihren Suchaktivitäten im Web, einschließlich der Suchaktivität auf Websites, die Microsoft nicht besitzt oder betreibt, um Microsoft-Dienste zu verbessern, z. B. Microsoft Edge, Microsoft Bing und Microsoft News. Die Microsoft Edge gesammelten Daten können personenbezogene Daten umfassen. Microsoft Edge führt jedoch Schritte dazu, die Daten zu bereinigen und ihre Identifizierbarkeit zu entfernen. Microsoft Edge verwendet diese Daten nicht zum Personalisieren oder Bereitstellen von Werbung für Sie. Sie können die Erfassung dieser Daten jederzeit in den Browsereinstellungen deaktivieren.
Weitere Informationen zu Suchergebnisdaten für Produktverbesserung
.
Informationen zu den Datenschutzpraktiken älterer Versionen von Microsoft Edge (Versionen 44 und darunter) finden Sie in dieser Datenschutzerklärung im Abschnitt „Webbrowser – Microsoft Edge-Vorgängerversion und Internet Explorer“.
Zurück zum Anfang
Microsoft Translator
Microsoft Translator ist ein maschinelles Übersetzungssystem und ein Dienst zur automatischen Übersetzung von Text- und Spracheingaben zwischen zahlreichen unterstützten Sprachen. Microsoft Translator wird als eigenständige Heimanwender-App für Android, iOS und Windows zur Verfügung gestellt. Die Servicefunktionen sind auch in eine Vielzahl von Microsoft-Produkten und -Diensten integriert, z. B. Translator-Hub, Translator für Bing und Translator für Microsoft Edge. Microsoft Translator verarbeitet die Text-, Bild- und Sprachdaten, die Sie übermitteln, wie auch Geräte- und Nutzungsdaten. Wir verwenden diese Daten, um den Microsoft Translator bereitzustellen, Ihre Erfahrung zu personalisieren und unsere Produkte und Dienste zu verbessern. Microsoft hat geschäftliche und technische Maßnahmen implementiert, die dazu dienen, die Daten, die Sie an Microsoft Translator übermitteln, zu anonymisieren. Wenn wir beispielsweise Text und Audio nach dem Zufallsprinzip auswählen, um Microsoft Translator und die Spracherkennungstechnologien von Microsoft zu verbessern, löschen wir Bezeichner und bestimmten Text, z. B. E-Mail-Adressen und einige Zahlenfolgen, die in der Auswahl erkannt wurden und möglicherweise personenbezogene Daten enthalten. Weitere Informationen dazu, wie Microsoft Ihre Sprachdaten verwaltet, finden Sie unter
Spracherkennungstechnologien
.
Unabhängig von Microsoft Translator sind Microsoft-Übersetzungsdienste als Funktionen in anderen Microsoft-Produkten und -Diensten verfügbar, die andere Datenschutzpraktiken als Microsoft Translator haben. Weitere Informationen zum Text-API von Microsoft Azure Cognitive Services Übersetzer, zum benutzerdefinierten Translator und zur Translator Speech-API finden Sie im Abschnitt
Unternehmens- und Entwicklerprodukte
dieser Datenschutzerklärung. Informationen zum Translate-Feature in Microsoft 365-Apps und Skype finden Sie im Abschnitt
Produktivitäts- und Kommunikationsprodukte
dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Zurück zum Anfang
SwiftKey
Die Microsoft SwiftKey-Tastatur und ähnliche cloudbasierte Dienste (allgemein auch "SwiftKey-Dienste" genannt) verarbeiten Daten über von Ihnen verwendete Wörter und die Art Ihrer Eingabe, um Ihren Schreibstil zu lernen und eine personalisierte und Ihnen angepasste Autokorrektur und Texterkennung anzubieten. Wir verwenden diese Daten auch, um eine Reihe anderer Features anzubieten, z. B. Emoji-Vorhersagen.
Durch die Art und Weise, wie Sie SwiftKey verwenden, lernt unsere Vorhersagetechnologie und kann so ein personalisiertes Sprachmodell erstellen. Dieses Modell ist eine optimierte Sicht über die von Ihnen am häufigsten verwendeten Wörter und Sätze im Kontext und spiegelt dadurch Ihren einzigartigen Stil wider. Das Modell selbst enthält die von Ihnen häufig eingegebenen Wörter auf eine Art und Weise, die das Aktivieren von SwiftKey-Algorithmen ermöglicht, deren Prognose auf bereits von Ihnen eingegebenen Text basiert. Das Modell nimmt Informationen von allen Szenarien auf, in denen Sie die Tastatur nutzen. Dazu zählt beispielsweise die Texteingabe bei der Verwendung von Apps oder Websites. Die SwiftKey-Tastatur und das Modell vermeiden nach Möglichkeit das Sammeln vertraulicher Daten, indem solche aus bestimmten Feldern nicht verwendet werden, z. B. aus solchen, die als Felder für Kennwörter oder Zahlungsdaten erkannt werden. SwiftKey-Dienste protokolliert oder speichert die in Ihrem Modell enthaltenen Daten nicht, es sei denn, Sie teilen Ihre Daten mit uns (wie weiter unten beschrieben). Wenn Sie SwiftKey-Dienste nutzen, erfassen wir auch Geräte- und Nutzungsdaten. Wenn Sie sich bei Ihrem SwiftKey-Konto anmelden und der Freigabe der folgenden Daten zustimmen, verwenden wir nicht identifizierte Gerätedaten, Nutzungsdaten und Modelldaten, um die Dienstleistung zu analysieren und unsere Produkte zu verbessern.
Die SwiftKey-Dienste enthalten auch eine optionale Cloudkomponente namens SwiftKey-Konto. Wenn Sie ein SwiftKey-Konto erstellen möchten, wird Ihr Sprachmodell mit dem Clouddienst des SwiftKey-Kontos synchronisiert, damit Sie von diesem Modell auf verschiedenen Geräten profitieren können, und Zugriff auf zusätzliche Dienste wie Vorhersage-Synchronisierung und Sicherung erhalten. Wenn Sie ein SwiftKey-Konto erstellen, erfasst Microsoft auch Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und grundlegende demografische Daten. Alle gesammelten Daten werden über verschlüsselte Kanäle auf unsere Server übertragen. Wenn Sie bei Ihrem SwiftKey-Konto angemeldet sind, können Sie Ihre personenbezogenen Daten und SwiftKey-Kontoeinstellungen unter
data.swiftkey.com
steuern.
Im Rahmen Ihres SwiftKey-Kontos können Sie sich auch dafür entscheiden, Ihre Sprach- und/oder Eingabedaten zur Verbesserung von Microsoft-Produkten und -Diensten freizugeben. Wenn Sie sich anmelden, sendet SwiftKey möglicherweise kurze Datenausschnitte darüber, was und wie Sie korrekturbezogene Daten eingeben, zur Verarbeitung an unsere Server. Diese Textausschnitte werden in verschiedenen automatisierten Prozessen verwendet, um zu überprüfen, ob unsere Vorhersagedienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren, und um Produktverbesserungen vorzunehmen. Um Ihre Privatsphäre zu wahren, heben SwiftKey-Dienste die Identifizierung dieser Textausschnitte auf. Selbst wenn Sie über ein SwiftKey-Konto verfügen, werden diese Textausschnitte nicht mit ihr verknüpft.
Wenn Sie sich bei Ihrem SwiftKey-Konto anmelden und sich für die Freigabe Ihrer Sprach- und Eingabedaten anmelden, verarbeitet Microsoft Ihre freigegebenen Daten, um nach neuen Mustern für die Sprachverwendung in unserer Gesamten Benutzerbasis zu suchen. So können wir unsere Basismodelle für einzelne Sprachen verbessern. Die in diesem Prozess verwendeten Sprach- und Eingabedaten werden aggregiert, und alle Wörter oder Wortkombinationen, die möglicherweise für Einzelpersonen oder kleinen Benutzergruppen privat sind, werden herausgefiltert.
Sie können in den SwiftKey-Einstellungen jederzeit Ihr Einverständnis zum Teilen ihrer Sprache und Ihrer eingegeben Daten zur Verbesserung des Produkts zurücknehmen. Sie können in den Einstellungen von SwiftKey auch jederzeit Ihre Zustimmung widerrufen, dass SwiftKey-Dienste Ihre personenbezogenen Daten aufbewahren dürfen. Durch Widerrufen der Einwilligung, dass SwiftKey Ihre persönlichen Daten aufbewahren darf, werden Ihre durch die Verwendung der SwiftKey-Dienste erfassten personenbezogenen Daten gelöscht.
Möglicherweise erhalten Sie gelegentlich Benachrichtigungen über Produktupdates und -features auf Ihrem Gerät, die für Sie von Interesse sein könnten. Sie können diese Benachrichtigungen jederzeit durch das Aufrufen der SwiftKey-Einstellungen deaktivieren.
Wenn Sie das Kamerafeature in SwiftKey verwenden, können Sie Ihre Videos und Bilder mit Lens-Diensten von Drittanbietern erweitern. Lens ist ein Feature, das Augmented Reality (AR) verwendet, um Ihre Selfies auf unterhaltsame Weise zu transformieren, z. B. damit Sie wie Ihr Lieblingstier aussehen. Mithilfe der Kamera in der SwiftKey-Tastatur können Sie das in die Tastatur integrierte Lens-Feature auswählen, um Ihr Gesicht und Ihre Hände zu transformieren. Je nachdem, für welche Lens Sie sich entscheiden, können Ihre Videos und Bilder verarbeitet werden, um Informationen über die Lage der verschiedenen Bereiche Ihres Gesichts und Ihrer Hände zu gewinnen. Die extrahierten Daten werden ausschließlich zum Anwenden von AR-Effekten auf Ihr Gesicht und Ihre Hände verwendet. Keine dieser Daten wird verwendet, um Sie persönlich zu identifizieren. Diese Daten werden nur für die Dauer der Sitzung auf Ihrem Gerät verarbeitet und dann sofort gelöscht. Diese Daten werden nicht an SwiftKey oder Drittanbieter gesendet.
Zusammenfassung anzeigen
Weitere Infos
Zurück zum Anfang
Windows
Windows ist eine personalisierte Computerumgebung, die es Ihnen ermöglicht, nahtlos auf Dienste, Einstellungen und Inhalte auf all Ihren Computergeräten – von Smartphones über Tablets bis hin zum Surface Hub – zuzugreifen. Anstatt als statisches Software-Programm auf Ihrem Gerät installiert, basieren die Schlüsselkomponenten von Windows auf Cloud und beide, sowohl Cloud als auch lokale Elemente von Windows werden regelmäßig aktualisiert, um Ihnen die neuesten Verbesserungen und Features zu bieten. Um dieses Computer-Erlebnis anzubieten, erheben wir Daten über Sie, Ihr Gerät und wie Sie Windows verwenden. Und weil Windows für Sie persönlich ist, geben wir Ihnen die Wahlmöglichkeiten darüber, welche personenbezogenen Daten wir erheben und wie wir diese verwenden. Beachten Sie, dass für den Fall, dass Ihr Windows-Gerät von Ihrer Organisation (wie Ihrem Arbeitgeber oder Ihrer Schule) verwaltet wird, Ihre Organisation zentrale Verwaltungstools verwenden kann, die von Microsoft oder anderen bereitgestellt werden, um auf Ihre Daten zuzugreifen und diese zu verarbeiten und um Geräteeinstellungen (einschließlich Datenschutzeinstellungen), Geräterichtlinien, Softwareaktualisierungen, Datenerfassung durch uns oder die Organisation oder andere Aspekte Ihres Geräts zu kontrollieren. Darüber hinaus kann Ihre Organisation Managementtools von Microsoft oder anderen verwenden, um auf Ihre Daten von diesem Gerät zuzugreifen und diese zu verarbeiten, einschließlich Ihrer Interaktions- und Diagnosedaten sowie der Inhalte Ihrer Kommunikationen und Dateien.
Die Windows-Einstellungen
, früher bekannt als PC-Einstellungen, sind ein wesentlicher Bestandteil von Microsoft Windows. Sie bietet eine praktische Schnittstelle zum Anpassen der Benutzereinstellungen, zum Konfigurieren des Betriebssystems und zum Verwalten verbundener Geräte, sodass Sie Benutzerkonten verwalten, Netzwerkeinstellungen anpassen und verschiedene Aspekte von Windows personalisieren können. Windows bietet einen Mechanismus, mit dem Anwendungen auf verschiedene Gerätefunktionen wie Kamera, Mikrofon, Standort, Kalender, Kontakte, Anrufverlauf, Nachrichten und mehr zugreifen können, während der Zugriff auf Ihre persönlichen Daten kontrolliert wird. Jede Funktion verfügt über eine eigene Seite für die Datenschutzeinstellungen in den Windows-Einstellungen, so dass Sie steuern können, welche App die einzelnen Funktionen nutzen können. Hier sind einige wichtige Features der Einstellungen:
Anpassung: Sie können verschiedene Aspekte von Windows anpassen, z. B. das Aussehen, die Spracheinstellungen und die Datenschutzoptionen. Die Windows-Einstellungen verwenden Ihr Mikrofon, um die Lautstärke zu regeln, die Kamera, wenn Sie die integrierte Kamera verwenden, und den Standort, um die Helligkeit bei Nacht zu ändern, um Ihnen bei der Anpassung Ihres Windows zu helfen.
Peripherieverwaltung: Installieren und verwalten Sie Peripheriegeräte wie Drucker, Monitore und externe Laufwerke.
Netzwerkkonfiguration: Passen Sie die Netzwerkeinstellungen an, einschließlich WLAN-, Ethernet-, Mobilfunk- und VPN-Verbindungen, und verwenden Sie die physische MAC-Adresse, IMEI und Mobilfunknummer, wenn das Gerät Mobilfunk unterstützt.
Kontoverwaltung: Hinzufügen oder Entfernen von Benutzerkonten, Ändern von Kontoeinstellungen und Verwalten von Anmeldeoptionen.
Optionen auf Systemebene: Konfigurieren Sie Anzeigeeinstellungen, Benachrichtigungen, Energieoptionen, verwalten Sie die Liste der installierten Apps und vieles mehr.
Datenschutz- & Sicherheitsverwaltung: Konfigurieren Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen, z. B. Speicherort, Sammlung von Diagnosedaten usw. Optimieren Sie, welche einzelnen Apps und Dienste auf Gerätefunktionen zugreifen können, indem Sie sie aktivieren oder deaktivieren.
Weitere Informationen zur Datenerfassung unter Windows finden Sie unter
Zusammenfassung der Datenerfassung für Windows
. In dieser Erklärung werden Windows 10 und Windows 11 behandelt, und die Verweise auf Windows in diesem Abschnitt beziehen sich auf diese Produktversionen. Für ältere Versionen von Windows (einschließlich Vista, Windows 7, Windows 8, and Windows 8.1) gelten eigene Datenschutzbestimmungen.
Windows ist eine personalisierte Computerumgebung, die es Ihnen ermöglicht, nahtlos auf Dienste, Einstellungen und Inhalte auf all Ihren Computergeräten – von Smartphones über Tablets bis hin zum Surface Hub – zuzugreifen. Anstatt als statisches Software-Programm auf Ihrem Gerät installiert, basieren die Schlüsselkomponenten von Windows auf Cloud und beide, sowohl Cloud als auch lokale Elemente von Windows werden regelmäßig aktualisiert, um Ihnen die neuesten Verbesserungen und Features zu bieten. Um dieses Computer-Erlebnis anzubieten, erheben wir Daten über Sie, Ihr Gerät und wie Sie Windows verwenden. Und weil Windows für Sie persönlich ist, geben wir Ihnen die Wahlmöglichkeiten darüber, welche personenbezogenen Daten wir erheben und wie wir diese verwenden. Beachten Sie, dass für den Fall, dass Ihr Windows-Gerät von Ihrer Organisation (wie Ihrem Arbeitgeber oder Ihrer Schule) verwaltet wird, Ihre Organisation zentrale Verwaltungstools verwenden kann, die von Microsoft oder anderen bereitgestellt werden, um auf Ihre Daten zuzugreifen und diese zu verarbeiten und um Geräteeinstellungen (einschließlich Datenschutzeinstellungen), Geräterichtlinien, Softwareaktualisierungen, Datenerfassung durch uns oder die Organisation oder andere Aspekte Ihres Geräts zu kontrollieren. Darüber hinaus kann Ihre Organisation Managementtools von Microsoft oder anderen verwenden, um auf Ihre Daten von diesem Gerät zuzugreifen und diese zu verarbeiten, einschließlich Ihrer Interaktions- und Diagnosedaten sowie der Inhalte Ihrer Kommunikationen und Dateien.
Die Windows-Einstellungen
, früher bekannt als PC-Einstellungen, sind ein wesentlicher Bestandteil von Microsoft Windows. Sie bietet eine praktische Schnittstelle zum Anpassen der Benutzereinstellungen, zum Konfigurieren des Betriebssystems und zum Verwalten verbundener Geräte, sodass Sie Benutzerkonten verwalten, Netzwerkeinstellungen anpassen und verschiedene Aspekte von Windows personalisieren können. Windows bietet einen Mechanismus, mit dem Anwendungen auf verschiedene Gerätefunktionen wie Kamera, Mikrofon, Standort, Kalender, Kontakte, Anrufverlauf, Nachrichten und mehr zugreifen können, während der Zugriff auf Ihre persönlichen Daten kontrolliert wird. Jede Funktion verfügt über eine eigene Seite für die Datenschutzeinstellungen in den Windows-Einstellungen, so dass Sie steuern können, welche App die einzelnen Funktionen nutzen können. Hier sind einige wichtige Features der Einstellungen:
Anpassung: Sie können verschiedene Aspekte von Windows anpassen, z. B. das Aussehen, die Spracheinstellungen und die Datenschutzoptionen. Die Windows-Einstellungen verwenden Ihr Mikrofon, um die Lautstärke zu regeln, die Kamera, wenn Sie die integrierte Kamera verwenden, und den Standort, um die Helligkeit bei Nacht zu ändern, um Ihnen bei der Anpassung Ihres Windows zu helfen.
Peripherieverwaltung: Installieren und verwalten Sie Peripheriegeräte wie Drucker, Monitore und externe Laufwerke.
Netzwerkkonfiguration: Passen Sie die Netzwerkeinstellungen an, einschließlich WLAN-, Ethernet-, Mobilfunk- und VPN-Verbindungen, und verwenden Sie die physische MAC-Adresse, IMEI und Mobilfunknummer, wenn das Gerät Mobilfunk unterstützt.
Kontoverwaltung: Hinzufügen oder Entfernen von Benutzerkonten, Ändern von Kontoeinstellungen und Verwalten von Anmeldeoptionen.
Optionen auf Systemebene: Konfigurieren Sie Anzeigeeinstellungen, Benachrichtigungen, Energieoptionen, verwalten Sie die Liste der installierten Apps und vieles mehr.
Datenschutz- & Sicherheitsverwaltung: Konfigurieren Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen, z. B. Speicherort, Sammlung von Diagnosedaten usw. Optimieren Sie, welche einzelnen Apps und Dienste auf Gerätefunktionen zugreifen können, indem Sie sie aktivieren oder deaktivieren.
Weitere Informationen zur Datenerfassung unter Windows finden Sie unter
Zusammenfassung der Datenerfassung für Windows
. In dieser Erklärung werden Windows 10 und Windows 11 behandelt, und die Verweise auf Windows in diesem Abschnitt beziehen sich auf diese Produktversionen. Für ältere Versionen von Windows (einschließlich Vista, Windows 7, Windows 8, and Windows 8.1) gelten eigene Datenschutzbestimmungen.
Aktivierung
Sobald Sie Windows aktivieren, wird ein spezifischer Product Key mit dem Gerät verbunden, auf dem die Software installiert ist. Der Product Key, sowie Daten über die Software und Gerätetyp werden an Microsoft gesendet, um die Lizenz für die Software zu bestätigen. Diese Daten können erneut gesendet werden, falls sich eine Notwendigkeit ergibt, Ihre Lizenz erneut zu aktivieren oder zu validieren. Bei mit Windows betriebenen Telefonen werden auch die Geräte- und Netzwerkbezeichner sowie der Gerätestandort zum Zeitpunkt des erstmaligen Einschaltens des Gerätes für die Zwecke der Registrierung der Garantie, der Vorratsergänzung und der Betrugsprävention an Microsoft gesendet.
Zurück zum Anfang
Aktivitätsverlauf
Mithilfe des Aktivitätsverlaufs können Sie verfolgen, wie Sie Ihr Gerät nutzen – welche Apps und Dienste Sie verwenden, welche Dateien Sie geöffnet und welche Websites Sie durchsucht haben. Ihr Aktivitätsverlauf wird erstellt, wenn Sie andere Apps und Features wie die Vorgängerversion von Microsoft Edge, einige Microsoft Store-Apps und Microsoft 365-Apps verwenden, und er wird lokal auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert.
Sie können die Einstellungen für die lokale Speicherung des Aktivitätsverlaufs auf Ihrem Gerät aus- oder einschalten und Sie können den Aktivitätsverlauf Ihres Geräts jederzeit löschen, indem Sie zu
Datenschutz > Aktivitätsverlauf
in der Windows-Einstellungs-App gehen.
Erfahren Sie mehr über den Aktivitätsverlauf in Windows
.
Zurück zum Anfang
Werbe-ID
Windows erzeugt eine eindeutige Werbe-ID für jede Person, die ein Gerät verwendet. Diese Kennung kann von Anwendungsentwicklern und Werbenetzwerken zu eigenen Zwecken benutzt werden, beispielsweise zur Anzeige relevanter Werbung in Apps. Wenn die Werbe-ID aktiviert ist, können Microsoft Apps und Apps von Drittanbietern auf diese zugreifen und sie auf ähnliche Weise wie Websites verwenden, die auf einen eindeutigen, in einem Cookie gespeicherten Bezeichner zugreifen. Daher kann Ihre Werbe-ID von App-Entwicklern und den mit ihnen verbundenen Werbenetzwerken verwendet werden, um eine relevantere Werbung und andere personalisierte Erfahrungen mit deren Apps und im Web anzubieten. Microsoft sammelt die Werbe-ID für den hier beschriebenen Nutzen nur dann, wenn Sie die Werbe-ID als Teil der Datenschutzeinstellung aktivieren.
Die Einstellung für die Werbe-ID gilt für Windows-Apps, die die Windows Werbe-ID verwenden. Sie können den Zugriff auf diese Kennung jederzeit deaktivieren, indem Sie die Werbe-ID in der Windows-Einstellungsapp deaktivieren. Sobald Sie diesen erneut aktivieren, wird die Werbe-ID zurückgesetzt und ein neuer Bezeichner erzeugt. Wenn eine Drittanbieter-App auf die Werbe-ID zugreift, unterliegt die Verwendung der Werbe-ID deren eigenen Datenschutzrichtlinien.
Erfahren Sie mehr über Werbe-ID in Windows
.
Die Einstellung für die Werbe-ID gilt nicht für andere Methoden interessenbezogener Werbung, die von Microsoft oder von Drittanbietern bereitgestellt werden, z. B. Cookies für interessenbezogene Bildschirmanzeigen auf Websites. Produkte von Drittanbietern, auf die über Windows zugegriffen wird oder die unter Windows installiert sind, können gemäß ihren eigenen Datenschutzrichtlinien auch andere Formen von interessenbezogener Werbung liefern. Microsoft liefert andere Formen interessenbezogener Werbung in bestimmten Microsoft-Produkten sowohl direkt als auch durch Partnerschaften mit anderen Anzeigenanbietern. Weitere Informationen dazu, wie Microsoft Daten zu Werbezwecken nutzt, finden Sie im Abschnitt
So verwenden wir personenbezogene Daten
in diesen Bestimmungen.
Zurück zum Anfang
Diagnose
Microsoft sammelt Windows-Diagnosedaten, um Probleme zu beheben, Windows auf dem neuesten Stand zu halten und um Windows sichern und ordnungsgemäß betreiben zu können. Sie hilft uns auch bei der Verbesserung von Windows und verwandten Microsoft-Produkten und -Diensten. Während das Gerät läuft, werden Diagnosedaten gesammelt und regelmäßig an Microsoft übermittelt und zusammen mit einer oder mehreren eindeutigen Kennungen gespeichert, die uns dabei helfen können, einen einzelnen Benutzer auf einem einzelnen Gerät zu erkennen und die Serviceprobleme und Nutzungsmuster des Geräts zu verstehen.
Es gibt zwei Ebenen von Diagnose- und Aktivitätsdaten: „Erforderliche Diagnosedaten“ und „Optionale Diagnosedaten“. In einigen Produktdokumentationen und andere Materialien wird die Diagnosedatenkategorie „Erforderlich” als „Allgemein” und die Kategorie „Optional” als „Vollständig” bezeichnet.
Wenn eine Organisation (z. B. Ihr Arbeitgeber oder Ihre Schule) Microsoft Entra ID verwendet, um das Ihnen zur Verfügung gestellte Konto zu verwalten, und Ihr Gerät in der Windows-Diagnosedatenprozessorkonfiguration anmeldet, wird die Verarbeitung von Diagnosedaten durch Microsoft in Verbindung mit Windows durch einen Vertrag zwischen Microsoft und der Organisation geregelt. Wenn eine Organisation Microsoft-Verwaltungstools verwendet oder Microsoft mit der Verwaltung Ihres Geräts beauftragt, werden Microsoft und die Organisation Diagnose- und Fehlerdaten von Ihrem Gerät verwenden und verarbeiten, um die Verwaltung, Überwachung und Fehlerbehebung Ihrer von der Organisation verwalteten Geräte zu ermöglichen, sowie für andere Zwecke der Organisation.
Die erforderlichen Diagnosedaten
enthalten Informationen über Ihr Gerät, seine Einstellungen und Fähigkeiten sowie darüber, ob es ordnungsgemäß funktioniert. Wir sammeln die folgenden erforderlichen Diagnosedaten:
Geräte-, Verbindungs- und Konfigurationsdaten:
Daten über das Gerät wie Prozessortyp, OEM-Hersteller, Akkutyp und -kapazität, Anzahl und Typ von Kameras, Firmware und Speicherattribute.
Netzwerkfunktionen und Verbindungsdaten wie die IP-Adresse des Geräts, Mobilfunknetz (einschließlich IMEI und Mobilfunkanbieter) und Angaben dazu, ob das Gerät mit einem kostenlosen oder kostenpflichtigen Netz verbunden ist.
Daten über das Betriebssystem und seine Konfiguration, wie z. B. die Betriebssystemversion und Build-Nummer, Regions- und Spracheinstellungen, Diagnosedateneinstellungen und ob das Gerät Teil des Windows-Insider-Programms ist.
Daten über angeschlossene Peripheriegeräte wie Modell, Hersteller, Treiber und Kompatibilitätsdaten.
Daten über die Anwendungen, die auf dem Gerät installiert sind, beispielsweise Name, Version und Herausgeber der Anwendung.
Angaben darüber, ob ein Gerät für ein Update verfügbar ist oder ob Gründe vorliegen, die den Empfang von Updates verhindern können (beispielsweise niedriger Akkustand, wenig Festplattenspeicher oder Konnektivität über ein kostenpflichtiges Netzwerk).
Angaben darüber, ob Updates erfolgreich abgeschlossen wurden oder ob Fehler aufgetreten sind.
Daten über die Zuverlässigkeit des Diagnosesystems selbst.
Einfache Fehlerdaten wie Angaben über die Integrität von Betriebssystem und Anwendungen, die momentan ausgeführt werden. Beispielsweise wird bei dieser einfachen Fehlerberichterstattung übermittelt, ob eine Anwendung (z. B. Microsoft Paint) oder ein Spiel von Drittanbietern eingefroren oder abgestürzt ist.
Optionale Diagnosedaten
enthalten detailliertere Informationen über Ihr Gerät und seine Einstellungen, Fähigkeiten und den Gerätezustand. Optionale Diagnosedaten umfassen ggf. auch Daten über die von Ihnen besuchten Websites, die Geräteaktivität (manchmal auch als Nutzung bezeichnet) und erweiterte Fehlerberichte, die Microsoft helfen, Produkte und Dienste für alle Benutzer zu reparieren und zu verbessern. Wenn Sie sich dafür entscheiden, Diagnosedaten der Kategorie „Optional” zu senden, bestehen diese aus den Diagnosedaten der Kategorie „Erforderlich”, zu denen wir die folgenden zusätzlichen Informationen erfassen:
Daten über das Gerät, die Konnektivität und die Konfiguration, zusätzlich zu den in der Kategorie „Erforderlich” erfassten Diagnosedaten.
Statusdaten und Protokolldaten über die Integrität des Betriebssystems und anderer Komponenten, zusätzlich zu den in der Kategorie „Erforderlich” erfassten Diagnosedaten über die Update- und Diagnosesysteme.
Daten zur App-Aktivität, z. B. welche Programme auf einem Gerät gestartet werden, wie lange sie ausgeführt werden und wie schnell sie auf Eingaben reagieren.
Browseraktivität, einschließlich Browserverlauf und Suchbegriffe aus Microsoft-Browsern (Microsoft Edge oder Internet Explorer).
Erweiterte Fehlerberichterstattung, die den Speicherstatus des Geräts bei einem System- oder App-Absturz umfasst. Dabei können unbeabsichtigt Anwenderdaten, wie beispielsweise Teile der Datei übermittelt werden, die Sie beim Auftreten des Problems verwendet haben.
Einige der oben beschriebenen Daten werden möglicherweise nicht auf Ihrem Gerät erfasst, selbst wenn Sie gewählt haben, Diagnosedaten der Kategorie „Optional” zu übermitteln. Microsoft minimiert das Datenvolumen, das wir auf allen Geräten erfassen, indem wir in der Kategorie „Optional” bestimmte Daten nur auf einigen Geräten erfassen (Stichprobe). Wenn Sie das Tool „Diagnosedatenanzeige” ausführen, wird ein Symbol angezeigt, das angibt, ob Ihr Gerät Teil einer Stichprobe ist und welche spezifischen Daten auf Ihrem Gerät erfasst werden. Anweisungen zum Herunterladen des Tools Diagnosedaten-Viewer finden Sie in den Windows-Einstellungen unter Diagnose & Feedback.
Bestimmte Datenelemente der Windows-Diagnose können sich ändern, damit Microsoft flexibel genug ist, um die erforderlichen Daten für die beschriebenen Zwecke zu sammeln. Um Microsoft beispielsweise in die Lage zu versetzen, das neueste Leistungsproblem zu beheben, das sich auf die Computererfahrung der Benutzer auswirkt, oder ein Windows-Gerät zu aktualisieren, das neu auf dem Markt ist, muss Microsoft möglicherweise Datenelemente erfassen, die zuvor nicht erfasst wurden. Eine aktuelle Liste der Datentypen, die bei
Erforderlichen Diagnosedaten
und
optionalen Diagnosedaten
gesammelt werden, finden Sie unter
Windows-Diagnoseereignisse und -Felder
oder
Windows Optional (Vollversion) Diagnosedaten
. Wir stellen Partnern (z. B. dem Gerätehersteller) begrenzte Teile aus Fehlerberichten zur Verfügung, damit diese Probleme mit Produkten und Diensten beheben können, die mit Windows und anderen Produkten und Diensten von Microsoft in Zusammenhang stehen. Die Partner dürfen diese Daten ausschließlich zur Problembehebung oder Weiterentwicklung der genannten Produkte und Dienste verwenden. Wir teilen mit ausgewählten Dritten möglicherweise auch einige aggregierte, anonymisierte Diagnosedaten wie allgemeine Nutzungstrends für Windows-Apps und Features.
Weitere Informationen über Diagnosedaten in Windows
.
Erkennen von Freihand- und Tastatureingaben
. Sie können Microsoft auch bei der Verbesserung der Erkennung von Freihand- und Tastatureingaben unterstützen, indem Sie Diagnosedaten zu Freihand- und Tastatureingaben senden. Wenn Sie sich dafür entscheiden, sammelt Microsoft Muster des von Ihnen eingegebenen oder geschriebenen Inhalts, um Funktionen wie die Handschrifterkennung, die automatische Vervollständigung, die Vorhersage des nächsten Worts und die Rechtschreibkorrektur in den vielen von Microsoft-Kunden verwendeten Sprachen zu verbessern. Wenn Microsoft Diagnosedaten von Freihand- und Tastatureingaben sammelt, werden diese in kleinere Proben aufgeteilt und entsprechend verarbeitet, um Bezeichner, Sequenzierungsinformationen und andere Daten (z. B. Namen, E-Mail-Adressen und numerische Werte) zu entfernen, die geeignet sind, den ursprünglichen Inhalt zu rekonstruieren oder Ihnen zuzuordnen. Darin enthalten sind auch zugehörige Leistungsdaten, wie z. B. Textänderungen, die Sie manuell vornehmen, wie auch Wörter, die Sie dem Wörterbuch hinzugefügt haben.
Erfahren Sie mehr über die Verbesserung von Freihand- und Tastatureingaben in Windows
.
Zurück zum Anfang
Personalisierte Angebote
Wenn Sie
Personalisierte Angebote aktivieren
, verwenden wir Informationen über Ihr Gerät und Ihre Verwendung, einschließlich Windows-Diagnosedaten, in Kombination mit Ihren Kontoinformationen und den von anderen Microsoft-Produkten und -Diensten erfassten Daten, um Ihnen personalisierte Tipps, Anzeigen und Empfehlungen zur Verbesserung Ihres Windows-Erlebnisses anzubieten. Zu den personalisierten Angeboten gehören Vorschläge zum Anpassen und Optimieren von Windows sowie Werbeanzeigen und Empfehlungen für Produkte und Dienste von Microsoft und Drittanbietern, Features, Apps und Hardware für Ihre Windows-Erfahrung. Windows informiert Sie beispielsweise über neue Features, mit denen Sie Ihr Gerät optimal nutzen können. Wenn Sie Filme in Ihrem Browser streamen, kann Windows eine App aus dem Microsoft Store empfehlen, die effizienter streamt. Oder, falls nicht genügend Speicherplatz auf der Festplatte vorhanden ist, empfiehlt Windows möglicherweise, den Onlinespeicherdienst OneDrive auszuprobieren oder Hardware für zusätzlichen Speicherplatz zu erwerben.
Wenn personalisierte Angebote aktiviert sind, verwendet Windows möglicherweise Ihre erforderlichen Diagnosedaten, um Angebote zu personalisieren. Diese Daten können Informationen zu Ihrem Gerät, seinen Einstellungen und Funktionen sowie zu seiner ordnungsgemäßen Funktionsweise enthalten. Wenn Sie sich entschieden haben, optionale Diagnosedaten freizugeben, können die Daten, die zum Personalisieren von Angeboten verwendet werden, auch Informationen zu Ihrer Verwendung von Apps und Features sowie zusätzliche Informationen zur Integrität Ihres Geräts enthalten. Wir können auch Informationen über Ihr Gerät und Ihre Aktivitäten verwenden, um Angebote lokal auf Ihrem Gerät zu personalisieren, auch wenn die Daten Ihr Gerät nicht verlassen. Wir verwenden den Inhalt von Absturzabbildern, Sprach-, Eingabe- oder Freihandeingabedaten nicht zum Personalisieren von Angeboten.
Zusätzlich zu Informationen zu Ihrem Gerät und ihrer Verwendung, einschließlich Windows-Diagnosedaten, können wir die folgenden Daten aus anderen Microsoft-Produkten und Ihrem Konto mit Windows-Diagnosedaten verwenden oder kombinieren, um Angebote zu personalisieren:
Webaktivität, wenn Sie Microsoft Edge Berechtigung zum Sammeln Ihrer Webaktivität für personalisierte Suche, Anzeigen und Nachrichten erteilen.
Informationen zu Ihrer Verwendung anderer Microsoft-Produkte und -Dienste, einschließlich Microsoft Bing, Microsoft 365, Xbox und Microsoft-Websites, z. B. MSN.com.
Abonnement- und Kaufverlauf.
Daten von Websites von Drittanbietern, die möglicherweise mit Microsoft geteilt werden.
Wir können auch Informationen zu Ihren Interaktionen mit Tipps, Empfehlungen und Werbeaktionen verwenden, um personalisierte Angebote und ähnliche Nachrichten in anderen Microsoft-Produkten bereitzustellen und zu verbessern.
Um zu verwalten, wie von anderen Microsoft-Produkten gesammelte Daten zum Personalisieren von Angeboten verwendet werden, können Sie Ihre
Seite für personalisierte Anzeigen und Angebote
besuchen. Die Daten, die wir zum Personalisieren von Angeboten verwenden, können sich im Laufe der Zeit ändern, doch diese Seite enthält immer die neueste Liste von Datenquellen, damit Sie Entscheidungen darüber treffen können, wie Ihre Daten von Microsoft verwendet werden. In einigen Regionen, z. B. im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum, verhindert das Deaktivieren personalisierter Angebote unter Windows auch die Verwendung von Daten aus anderen Microsoft-Produkten, um Tipps, Anzeigen und Empfehlungen in Windows zu personalisieren. In anderen Regionen können Sie verwalten, wie von anderen Microsoft-Produkten gesammelte Daten verwendet werden, um Angebote zu personalisieren, indem Sie Ihre
Seite für personalisierte Anzeigen und Angebote
besuchen.
Kontextbezogene Daten von Ihrem Gerät und einige grundlegende Kontodaten werden verwendet, um Ihnen geeignete Nachrichten in Windows anzuzeigen, unabhängig davon, ob die Einstellung für personalisierte Angebote oder die Verwendung von Daten aus anderen Microsoft-Produkten zum Personalisieren von Angeboten deaktiviert sind. Diese Daten werden beispielsweise verwendet, um sicherzustellen, dass der Inhalt in der richtigen Sprache und für Ihre Zielgruppe geeignet ist.
Personalisierte Angebote gelten für Tipps, Angebote, Anzeigen und Empfehlungen, die in Windows angezeigt werden. Das Ändern dieser Einstellung wirkt sich nicht auf die Arten von Angeboten aus, die in anderen Microsoft-Produkten angezeigt werden. Sie können diese Einstellung jederzeit ändern, indem Sie in der Windows-Einstellungs-App nach
personalisierten Angeboten
suchen.
Weitere Informationen zu personalisierten Angeboten
.
„Personalisierte Benutzererfahrung“
Maßgeschneiderte Oberflächen werden in neueren Versionen von Windows durch personalisierte Angebote ersetzt. Wenn Sie nicht das neueste Windows Update installiert haben, werden auf Ihrem Gerät möglicherweise weiterhin maßgeschneiderte Oberflächen angezeigt.
Wenn Sie die Option Maßgeschneiderte Erfahrungen aktivieren, verwenden wir Ihre Windows-Diagnosedaten (erforderlich oder optional, je nach Ihrer Auswahl), um Ihnen personalisierte Tipps, Anzeigen und Empfehlungen zur Verbesserung der Microsoft-Erfahrung anzubieten. Wenn Sie "Erforderlich" als Einstellung für die Diagnosedaten gewählt haben, basiert die Personalisierung auf Informationen über Ihr Gerät, seine Einstellungen und Fähigkeiten sowie darüber, ob es ordnungsgemäß funktioniert. Wenn Sie die Einstellung Optional gewählt haben, basiert die Personalisierung auch auf Informationen darüber, wie Sie Anwendungen und Funktionen nutzen, sowie auf zusätzlichen Informationen über den Zustand Ihres Geräts. Wir verwenden jedoch keine Informationen über die von Ihnen besuchten Websites, den Inhalt von Crash Dumps, Sprach-, Tipp- oder Farbeingabedaten für die Personalisierung, wenn wir solche Daten von Kunden erhalten, die Optional gewählt haben. Die Daten für maßgeschneiderte Oberflächen werden mit mindestens einem oder mehreren eindeutigen Bezeichner(n) versehen, an Microsoft gesendet und gespeichert. Sie helfen uns dabei, einen einzelnen Benutzer auf einem bestimmten Gerät zu erkennen, Servicefälle des Gerätes zu verstehen und Nutzungsmuster zu speichern.
Die individuelle Benutzererfahrung beinhaltet Vorschläge zum Anpassen und Optimieren von Windows sowie Werbeanzeigen, Empfehlungen und Angebote für Produkte und Dienste von Microsoft und Drittanbietern, Features, Apps und Hardware für Ihre Windows-Erfahrung. Um Ihr Gerät optimal zu unterstützen, informieren wir Sie eventuell über Funktionen, die Sie möglicherweise nicht kennen oder die neu sind. Wenn Sie ein Problem mit Ihrem Windows-Gerät haben, wird Ihnen dort möglicherweise eine Lösung angeboten. Sie haben gegebenenfalls die Möglichkeit, Ihren Sperrbildschirm mit Bildern anzupassen oder mehr Bilder anzuzeigen, die Ihnen gefallen, oder weniger Bilder anzuzeigen, die Ihnen nicht gefallen. Wenn Sie Filme in Ihrem Browser streamen, kann eine App aus dem Microsoft Store empfohlen werden, die effizienter streamt. Ist nicht genügend Speicherplatz auf der Festplatte vorhanden, empfiehlt Windows möglicherweise, den Onlinespeicherdienst OneDrive auszuprobieren oder Hardware für zusätzlichen Speicherplatz zu erwerben.
Weitere Informationen über personalisierte Benutzererfahrungen in Windows
.
Zurück zum Anfang
Feedback-Hub
Feedback-Hub bietet eine Möglichkeit, Feedback zu Microsoft-Produkten und installierten Erstanbieter- und Drittanbieter-Apps zu sammeln. Wenn Sie Feedback-Hub verwenden, liest Feedback-Hub regelmäßig die Liste der installierten Apps, um zu bestimmen, für welche Apps Feedback gesendet werden kann. Feedback-Hub bestimmt die auf Ihrem Gerät installierten Apps über öffentliche APIs. Darüber hinaus verwendet Feedback-Hub für HoloLens Ihre Kamera und Ihr Mikrofon, wenn Sie die Umgebung und Audioeingabe freigeben möchten. Außerdem wird die Bild- und Dokumentbibliothek verwendet, um auf Screenshots und Bildschirmaufzeichnungen zuzugreifen, die Sie als Teil des Feedbacks zum Senden anfügen.
Sie können sich bei Feedback-Hub mit Ihrem persönlichen Microsoft-Konto anmelden oder mit einem von Ihrer Organisation (z. B. Ihrem Arbeitgeber oder Ihrer Schule) bereitgestellten Konto, das Sie verwenden, um sich bei Microsoft-Produkten anzumelden. Die Anmeldung mit Ihrem Geschäfts- oder Schulkonto ermöglicht Ihnen das Übermitteln von Feedback an Microsoft im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer Organisation. Jegliches Feedback, das Sie unter Verwendung Ihres Geschäfts-, Schul- oder Unikonto oder Ihres persönlichen Microsoft-Kontos abgeben, kann je nach den von den Administratoren Ihrer Organisation konfigurierten Einstellungen öffentlich angezeigt werden. Darüber kann Ihr Feedback, wenn Sie es mit Ihrem Geschäfts-, Schul- oder Unikonto bereitstellen, über den Feedback-Hub von den IT-Administratoren Ihrer Organisation angezeigt werden.
Wenn Sie Feedback an Microsoft zu einem Problem übermitteln oder weitere Details zu einem Problem hinzufügen, werden Diagnosedaten an Microsoft gesendet, um Microsoft-Produkte und -Dienste zu verbessern. Je nach Ihren Einstellungen für Diagnosedaten im Abschnitt
Diagnose & Feedback
der Windows-Einstellungen, sendet Feedback Hub entweder automatisch Diagnosedaten oder Sie haben die Möglichkeit, diese zum Zeitpunkt des Feedbacks an Microsoft zu senden. Je nach der Kategorie, die beim Übermitteln des Feedbacks gewählt wurde, können zusätzliche personenbezogene Daten erfasst werden, die bei der weiteren Fehlerbehebung helfen; z. B. ortsbezogene Informationen beim Übermitteln von Feedback zu Ortungsdiensten oder Anvisieren-bezogene Informationen beim Übermitteln von Feedback zu Mixed Reality. Microsoft kann auch Ihr Feedback zusammen mit den bei der Übermittlung Ihres Feedbacks gesammelten Daten an Microsoft-Partner (z. B. einen Gerätehersteller oder Firmware-Entwickler) weitergeben, um ihnen bei der Fehlerbehebung von Produkten und Diensten zu helfen, die mit Windows und anderen Microsoft-Produkten und -Diensten funktionieren.
Weitere Informationen über Diagnosedaten in Windows
.
Zurück zum Anfang
Hilfe
„Hilfe“ ermöglicht es Windows-Benutzern, technische Unterstützung für Windows und andere Microsoft-Anwendungen zu erhalten.  Es bietet Self-Service-Support (z. B. Links zu Hilfeartikeln oder Anleitungen, wie Windows-Benutzer Probleme selbst lösen können), Diagnosen und verbindet den Kunden gegebenenfalls mit einem Live-Microsoft-Agenten. Sie können sich mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto bei der Hilfe-Komponente anmelden, um einen Kunden-Supportfall zu erstellen.  Benutzer von Unternehmenskonten können je nach Supportvertrag ihres Unternehmens und nach Freigabe durch ihren Mandantenadministrator auch einen Kundensupportfall erstellen.
Hilfe schlagen möglicherweise vor, dass Sie eine Diagnose ausführen. Wenn Sie zustimmen, werden die Diagnosedaten gemäß dem Abschnitt
Diagnose
behandelt.
Wenn dies durch Systemeinstellungen zulässig ist, kann das Systemmikrofon verwendet werden, um die Supportfrage zu erfassen, anstatt sie eingeben zu müssen. Sie können dies in den Datenschutzeinstellungen für das Mikrofon in der Windows-Einstellungsanwendung steuern. Hilfe greifen auch auf Ihre Anwendungsliste zu, um die Feedback-Hub für die richtige App zu öffnen, wenn Sie den Feedbackprozess innerhalb Hilfe starten möchten. Das gesamte Feedback wird vom Feedback-Hub eingegeben und gesteuert, wie im Feedback-Hub Abschnitt dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschrieben. Hilfe verwendet Ihre Standortdaten nicht als Teil seiner Dienste.
Zurück zum Anfang
Liveuntertitel
Liveuntertitel transkribieren Audio, um das Verständnis gesprochener Inhalte zu erleichtern. Liveuntertitel können Beschriftungen aus jedem Audio generieren, das Sprache enthält, unabhängig davon, ob die Audiodaten online sind, auf Ihr Gerät heruntergeladen oder von Ihrem Mikrofon empfangen wurden. Standardmäßig ist das Transkribieren von Mikrofonaudio deaktiviert.
Beschriftete Sprachdaten werden nur auf Ihrem Gerät verarbeitet und nicht für die Cloud oder für Microsoft freigegeben.
Weitere Informationen zu Liveuntertiteln
.
Zurück zum Anfang
Ortungsdienste und Aufzeichnung
Windows-Standortdienst
. Microsoft verfügt über einen Positionsdienst, welcher dabei hilft, die genaue geografische Position eines bestimmten Windows-Geräts zu bestimmen. Je nach den Möglichkeiten des Geräts kann sein Standort mit unterschiedlicher Genauigkeit bestimmt und in einigen Fällen genau bestimmt werden. Wenn Sie den Ortungsdienst auf einem Windows-Gerät aktiviert oder Microsoft-Apps erlaubt haben, Positionsinformationen auf anderen Geräten zu erfassen, werden die Daten über Mobilfunkmasten und WLAN-Zugangspunkte sowie deren Standorte von Microsoft erhoben und der Positionsdatenbank hinzugefügt, nachdem alle Daten, welche die Person oder das Gerät identifizieren können, vorher entfernt wurden. Diese nicht identifizierten Standortinformationen werden verwendet, um die Standortdienste von Microsoft zu verbessern.
Windows-Dienste und -Funktionen, unter Windows ausgeführte Anwendungen und in Windows-Browsern geöffnete Websites können über Windows auf den Standort des Geräts zugreifen, wenn Ihre Einstellungen dies zulassen. Einige Features und Apps bitten um Ihre Zustimmung zur Standortbestimmung, wenn Sie Windows erstmals installieren, einige bei erster Verwendung der App und andere jedes Mal, wenn Sie auf die Positionsdienste des Geräts zugreifen. Weitere Informationen zu bestimmten Windows-Apps, die den Positionsdienst des Geräts verwenden, finden Sie im Abschnitt
Windows Apps
dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen.
Wenn eine App oder ein Feature auf die Positionsdienste des Geräts zugreift und Sie mit einem Microsoft-Konto angemeldet sind, lädt Ihr Windows-Gerät seine Position auch in die Cloud hoch, wo sie auf allen Ihren Geräten für andere Apps oder Dienste verfügbar sind, die Ihr Microsoft-Konto verwendet und für die Sie Ihre Zustimmung erteilt haben. Wir behalten nur die letzte bekannte Position bei (jede neue Position ersetzt die vorherige). Die Daten über den aktuellen Positionsverlauf eines Windows-Geräts werden außerdem auf dem Gerät gespeichert, auch wenn kein Microsoft-Konto verwendet wird, und bestimmte App- und Windows-Features können auf diesen Positionsverlauf zugreifen. Sie können den Standortverlauf Ihres Geräts jederzeit in der Windows-Einstellungsapp löschen.
In der Windows-Einstellungsapp können Sie auch anzeigen, welche Apps Zugriff auf den genauen Standort des Geräts oder den Standortverlauf Ihres Geräts haben, den Zugriff auf den Standort des Geräts für bestimmte Apps deaktivieren oder aktivieren oder den Zugriff auf den Standort des Geräts deaktivieren. Sie können ebenfalls den Standardstandort einstellen, wenn der Positionsdienst keine genauere Position für Ihr Gerät erkennen kann.
Es gibt einige Möglichkeiten zur Ermittlung des Standort Ihres Geräts, die nicht direkt von den Standorteinstellungen verwaltet werden.
Desktop-Apps fordern keine separate Berechtigung zur Standortbestimmung Ihres Geräts an und werden nicht in der Liste angezeigt, in der Sie Apps auswählen können, die Ihren Standort verwenden dürfen. Sie können von Microsoft Store oder aus dem Internet heruntergeladen, oder von einem bestimmten Medientyp (beispielsweise CD, DVD oder USB-Stick) installiert werden. Sie werden mit einer EXE-, MSI- oder DLL-Datei geöffnet und üblicherweise auf Ihrem Gerät ausgeführt, im Gegensatz zu webbasierten Apps (die in der Cloud ausgeführt werden).
Weitere Informationen über Drittanbieter-Desktop-Apps und wie diese immer noch die Position Ihres Geräts bestimmen können, wenn die Positionseinstellung des Geräts deaktiviert ist
.
Einige webbasierte Umgebungen oder Apps von Drittanbietern, die unter Windows angezeigt werden, können andere Technologien (z. B. Bluetooth, WLAN, Mobilfunkmodem usw.) oder cloudbasierte Positionsdienste verwenden, um den Standort Ihres Geräts mit unterschiedlicher Genauigkeit zu bestimmen, auch wenn Sie die Einstellung für den Gerätestandort deaktiviert haben.
Damit Sie im Notfall Hilfe erhalten, versucht Windows darüber hinaus bei jedem Notruf, unabhängig von Ihren Standorteinstellungen, Ihren genauen Standort zu bestimmen und zu teilen. Wenn Ihr Gerät eine SIM-Karte enthält oder auf andere Weise Mobilfunkdienste nutzt, hat Ihr Mobilfunkanbieter Zugriff auf die Position Ihres Geräts.
Weitere Informationen über den Positionsdienst in Windows
.
Ungefährer Standort
. Wenn Sie die Standortdienste aktivieren, können Anwendungen, die Ihren genauen Standort nicht verwenden können, dennoch auf Ihren allgemeinen Standort zugreifen, z. B. auf Ihre Stadt, Postleitzahl oder Region.
Mein Gerät suchen
. Die Funktion "Mein Gerät suchen" ermöglicht es einem Administrator eines Windows-Geräts, den Standort dieses Geräts unter account.microsoft.com/devices zu finden. Für die Aktivierung von „Mein Gerät suchen“ muss ein Administrator mit einem Microsoft-Konto angemeldet sein und die Positionseinstellung aktiviert haben. Dieses Feature kann auch dann genutzt werden, wenn andere Benutzer die Positionsdienste für alle Apps deaktiviert haben. Wenn der Administrator versucht, das Gerät zu finden, erhalten die Benutzer eine Benachrichtigung im Info-Center.
Weitere Informationen über „Mein Gerät suchen” in Windows
.
Aufzeichnung
. Einige Windows-Geräte besitzen auch eine Aufzeichnungsfunktion, die Ihnen die Erfassung von Audio- und Videoclips über Ihre Aktivitäten auf dem Gerät erlaubt, einschließlich der Kommunikation mit anderen. Wenn Sie sich dafür entscheiden, eine Sitzung aufzuzeichnen, wird die Aufzeichnung lokal auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert. In einigen Fällen haben Sie die Option zum Senden der Aufzeichnung an ein Microsoft-Produkt oder -Dienst, das/der die Aufzeichnung öffentlich überträgt.
Wichtig: Sie sollten sich über Ihre rechtlichen Pflichten im Klaren sein, bevor Sie eine Mitteilung aufzeichnen und/oder weiterleiten. Dies kann die vorherige Zustimmung aller an dem Gespräch teilnehmenden Personen oder andere erforderliche Genehmigungen umfassen.
Microsoft ist nicht dafür verantwortlich, wie Sie die Aufzeichnungsfeatures oder Ihre Aufnahmen verwenden.
Zurück zum Anfang
Sprachausgabe
Die Sprachausgabe ist eine Bildschirmleser-App, mit der Sie Windows ohne Bildschirm verwenden können. Die Sprachausgabe bietet eine intelligente Bild- und Seitentitelbeschreibung sowie Webseitenzusammenfassungen, wenn Sie auf Bilder ohne Beschreibung und mehrdeutige Links treffen.
Wenn Sie eine Bildbeschreibung aufrufen, indem Sie Sprachausgabe + STRG + D drücken, wird das Bild an Microsoft gesendet, um das Bild zu analysieren und eine Beschreibung zu generieren. Bilder dienen lediglich zum Generieren der Beschreibung und werden nicht von Microsoft gespeichert.
Wenn Sie Seitentitelbeschreibungen aufrufen, indem Sie Sprachausgabe + Strg + D drücken, wird die URL der besuchten Website an Microsoft gesendet, um die Beschreibung des Seitentitels zu generieren und Microsoft-Dienste bereitzustellen und zu verbessern, z. B. Bing-Dienste wie im Abschnitt „Bing“ weiter oben beschrieben.
Wenn Sie eine Liste beliebter Links für eine Webseite aufrufen, indem Sie Sprachausgabe + zweimal auf S drücken, wird die URL der besuchten Website an Microsoft gesendet, um die Zusammenfassung beliebter Links zu generieren und Microsoft-Dienste wie Bing bereitzustellen und zu verbessern.
Sie können diese Funktionen jederzeit deaktivieren, indem Sie zu
Sprachausgabe>Bildbeschreibungen, Seitentitel und beliebte Links abrufen
in den Einstellungen in Windows wechseln.
Sie können auch Feedback zur Sprachausgabe senden, um Microsoft bei der Diagnose und Lösung von Problemen mit der Sprachausgabe zu unterstützen und Microsoft-Produkte und -Dienste wie Windows zu verbessern. Mündliches Feedback kann jederzeit in der Sprachausgabe über die Sprachausgabe-Taste + Alt + F übermittelt werden. Wenn Sie diesen Befehl verwenden, wird die Feedback-Hub-App gestartet, mit der Sie mündliches Feedback übermitteln können. Wenn Sie die Einstellung “ "Hilfe zur Verbesserung der Sprachausgabe" ” in der Windows-Einstellungsapp aktivieren und über Feedback-Hub gesprochenes Feedback übermitteln, werden aktuelle Geräte- und Nutzungsdaten, einschließlich ETL-Daten (Ereignisablaufverfolgungsprotokoll), zusammen mit Ihrem Feedback übermittelt, um Microsoft-Produkte und -Dienste wie Windows zu verbessern.
Zurück zum Anfang
Smartphone-Link – Link zu Windows
Mit dem Smartphone-Link-Feature können Sie Ihr Android-Smartphone über Bluetooth mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto und Ihrem iPhone verknüpfen, um eine Verbindung mit Ihrem Windows-PC herzustellen. Ihr Android-Gerät wird mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto verknüpft und Ihr iPhone wird über Bluetooth verbunden, was eine Vielzahl von geräteübergreifenden Erfahrungen auf allen Ihren Windows-Geräten ermöglicht, auf denen Sie angemeldet oder über Bluetooth verbunden sind. Sie können Smartphone-Link verwenden, um aktuelle Fotos von Ihrem Android-Telefon auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät anzuzeigen, Live-Anrufe von Ihrem Android-Smartphone auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät zu tätigen und entgegenzunehmen, Textnachrichten von Ihrem Windows-Gerät aus anzuzeigen und zu versenden, Benachrichtigungen von Ihrem Android-Smartphone auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät anzuzeigen, zu verwerfen oder andere Aktionen auszuführen, den Bildschirm Ihres Telefons über die Spiegelungsfunktion von Smartphone-Link auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät freizugeben und sofortigen Zugriff auf Android-Apps, die auf Ihrem Android-Smartphone installiert sind, auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät zu erhalten. Sie können Smartphone-Link verwenden, um von Ihrem iPhone aus Anrufe zu tätigen und entgegenzunehmen, Textnachrichten anzuzeigen und zu senden sowie Benachrichtigungen auf Ihrem iPhone von Ihrem Windows-Gerät aus anzuzeigen, zu beenden oder andere Aktionen auszuführen.
Um Smartphone Link verwenden zu können, muss die Link zu Windows-App auf Ihrem Android-Smartphone installiert sein. Sie können optional auch den Smartphone-Link auf Ihr iPhone herunterladen.
Um Smartphone-Link verwenden zu können, müssen Sie sich in Ihrem Microsoft-Konto auf dem Smartphone-Link-Feature auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät und bei Link zu Windows auf Ihrem Android-Telefon anmelden oder Bluetooth auf Ihrem iPhone aktivieren. Ihr Android-Smartphone und Ihr Windows-Gerät müssen mit dem Internet verbunden sein. Für einige Features müssen Sie Bluetooth aktivieren und Ihr Smartphone mit Ihrem PC koppeln. Um das Feature "Anrufe" nutzen zu können, muss auf Ihrem Android-Telefon auch Bluetooth aktiviert sein.
Beim Einrichten Ihres Windows-Geräts können Sie Ihr Telefon mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto verknüpfen. Dazu müssen Sie sich auf Ihrem Android-Telefon bei Link zu Windows anmelden, Berechtigungen erteilen und das Onboarding abschließen. Sobald dies geschehen ist, synchronisiert Link zu Windows Ihre Daten mit all Ihren Windows-PCs, auf denen Sie sich mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto angemeldet haben. Weitere Informationen zur Verwendung Ihrer Daten finden Sie unten.
Als Teil der Bereitstellung der Features von „Smartphone-Link” erfasst Microsoft Leistungs-, Verwendungs- und Gerätedaten, zu denen beispielsweise die Hardwarefunktionen Ihres Mobiltelefons und Windows-Geräts, die Anzahl und Dauer Ihrer Sitzungen auf Ihrem Handy und die Setup-Zeitdauer gehören.
Sie können die Verknüpfung Ihres Android-Telefons mit Ihrem Windows-Gerät jederzeit aufheben, indem Sie die Einstellungen für den Smartphone-Link öffnen und ihr Android-Smartphone entfernen. Sie können dies auch über die Einstellungen in Link zu Windows auf Ihrem Android-Smartphone tun. Ausführliche Informationen finden Sie auf
unserer Supportseite
.
Sie können die Verknüpfung zwischen Ihrem iPhone und Ihrem Windows-Gerät jederzeit aufheben, indem Sie in den Smartphone-Link-Einstellungen die Option zum Entfernen des iPhone wählen. Sie können dies auch auf Ihrem iPhone tun, indem Sie zu
Einstellungen > Bluetooth > Wählen Sie ihren PC-Namen aus, > klicken Sie auf das Symbol (i) >
und wählen Sie
Dieses Gerät vergessen
aus. Alle Benutzer können die Bluetooth-Kopplung entfernen, indem sie die Benutzeroberfläche deaktivieren.
SMS: Android-Geräte.
Mit „Smartphone-Link” können Sie SMS-Nachrichten, die an Ihr Android-Handy gesendet werden, auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät anzeigen, und Sie können SMS-Nachrichten über Ihr Windows-Gerät senden. Auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät werden nur SMS-Nachrichten angezeigt, die innerhalb der letzten 30 Tage empfangen und gesendet wurden. Diese SMS-Nachrichten werden vorübergehend auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät gespeichert. Wir speichern Ihre SMS-Nachrichten niemals auf unseren Servern und ändern oder löschen keine SMS-Nachrichten auf Ihrem Android-Handy. Sie können Nachrichten sehen, die über SMS (Short Message Service), MMS (Multimedia Messaging Service) auf Android-Geräten gesendet wurden, und Nachrichten, die über RCS (Rich Communication Services) auf ausgewählten Samsung-Geräten in ausgewählten Mobilfunknetzen gesendet wurden. Um diese Funktionalität bereitzustellen, greift „Smartphone-Link” auf den Inhalt Ihrer SMS-Nachrichten zu sowie auf die Kontaktinformationen der Personen oder Unternehmen, mit denen Sie per SMS kommunizieren.
SMS: iPhones.
Mit „Smartphone-Link” können Sie SMS-Nachrichten, die an Ihr IPhone gesendet werden, auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät anzeigen, und Sie können SMS-Nachrichten über Ihr Windows-Gerät senden. Nur SMS-Nachrichten, die innerhalb Ihrer Bluetooth-Sitzung oder iMessage empfangen und gesendet werden, sind auf Ihren Windows-Geräten sichtbar. Diese SMS-Nachrichten werden vorübergehend auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät gespeichert. Wir speichern Ihre SMS-Nachrichten niemals auf unseren Servern und ändern oder löschen keine SMS-Nachrichten auf Ihrem iPhone. Sie können Nachrichten anzeigen, die per SMS (Short Message Service) gesendet wurden. Um diese Funktionalität bereitzustellen, greift „Smartphone-Link” auf den Inhalt Ihrer SMS-Nachrichten zu sowie auf die Kontaktinformationen der Personen oder Unternehmen, mit denen Sie per SMS kommunizieren.
Anrufe: Android-Geräte.
Mit „Smartphone-Link” können Sie Anrufe von Ihrem Android-Smartphone auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät tätigen und annehmen. Über „Smartphone-Link“ können Sie Ihre letzten Anrufe auch auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät anzeigen. Um dieses Feature zu aktivieren, müssen Sie bestimmte Berechtigungen, z. B. den Zugriff auf Anrufprotokolle und die Berechtigung, über Ihren PC zu telefonieren, sowohl auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät als auch auf Ihrem Android-Smartphone aktivieren. Diese Berechtigungen können Sie jederzeit auf der Seite mit den „Smartphone-Link”-Einstellungen auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät und in den Einstellungen für Ihr Android-Smartphone widerrufen. Auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät werden unter „Anrufprotokolle“ nur die innerhalb der letzten 30 Tage angenommenen Anrufe bzw. gewählten Nummern angezeigt. Diese Anrufdetails werden vorübergehend auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät gespeichert. Der Anrufverlauf auf Ihrem Android-Smartphone wird weder geändert noch gelöscht.
Anrufe: iPhones.
Mit „Smartphone-Link” können Sie Anrufe von Ihrem iPhone auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät tätigen und annehmen. Über „Smartphone-Link“ können Sie Ihre letzten Anrufe auch auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät anzeigen. Um dieses Feature zu aktivieren, müssen Sie das Feature "Kontakte synchronisieren" unter den Bluetooth-Einstellungen auf Ihrem iPhone aktivieren. Diese Anrufdetails werden vorübergehend auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät gespeichert. Wir ändern oder löschen Ihren Anrufverlauf auf Ihrem iPhone nicht.
Fotos: Android-Geräte.
Mit Smartphone-Link können Sie Fotos von Ihrem Android-Telefon auf Ihr Windows-Gerät kopieren, freigeben, bearbeiten, speichern oder löschen. Auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät wird jeweils nur eine begrenzte Anzahl der neuesten Fotos aus den Ordnern „Eigene Aufnahmen” und „Screenshots” Ihres Android-Handys angezeigt. Diese Fotos werden nur vorübergehend auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät gespeichert. Wenn Sie weitere Fotos auf Ihrem Android-Handy aufnehmen, entfernen wir die temporären Kopien der älteren Fotos von Ihrem Windows-Gerät. Wir speichern Ihre Fotos niemals auf unseren Servern und ändern oder löschen keine Fotos auf Ihrem Android-Handy.
Benachrichtigungen: Android-Geräte.
Mit „Smartphone-Link” können Sie Benachrichtigungen Ihres Android-Handys auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät anzeigen. Über „Smartphone-Link” können Sie die Benachrichtigungen Ihres Android-Handys auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät lesen und schließen oder andere Aktionen im Zusammenhang mit den Benachrichtigungen ausführen. Um dieses „Smartphone-Link”-Feature zu aktivieren, müssen Sie bestimmte Berechtigungen, z. B. für Synchronisierungsbenachrichtigungen, sowohl auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät als auch auf Ihrem Android-Handy aktivieren. Diese Berechtigungen können Sie jederzeit auf der Seite mit den „Smartphone-Link”-Einstellungen auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät und in den Einstellungen für Ihr Android-Smartphone widerrufen. Ausführliche Informationen finden Sie auf
unserer Supportseite
.
Benachrichtigungen: iPhones.
Mit „Smartphone-Link” können Sie Benachrichtigungen Ihres iPhones auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät anzeigen. Über „Smartphone-Link” können Sie die Benachrichtigungen Ihres iPhones auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät lesen und schließen oder andere Aktionen im Zusammenhang mit den Benachrichtigungen ausführen. Um dieses „Smartphone-Link”-Feature zu aktivieren, müssen Sie bestimmte Berechtigungen, z. B. für Synchronisierungsbenachrichtigungen, sowohl auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät als auch auf Ihrem iPhone aktivieren. Diese Berechtigungen können Sie jederzeit auf der Seite mit den „Smartphone-Link”-Einstellungen auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät und in den Bluetooth-Einstellungen Ihres iPhones widerrufen.
Telefonbildschirmspiegelung für Android-Geräte.
Auf unterstützten Geräten
, können Sie mit Smartphone-Link den Bildschirm Ihres Android-Smartphones auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät anzeigen. Der Bildschirm Ihres Android-Handys wird auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät als Pixelstream angezeigt. Jede Audiodatei, die Sie auf dem Bildschirm Ihres Android-Handys aktivieren, während es über „Smartphone-Link” mit Ihrem Windows-Gerät verbunden ist, wird über Ihr Android-Handy abgespielt.
App-Spiegelung: Android-Geräte
Auf unterstützten Geräten können Sie mit Smartphone-Link Ihre Android-Apps, die auf Ihrem Android-Telefon installiert sind, auf Ihrem Windows-Gerät verwenden. Sie können zum Beispiel eine Musik-App in Ihrer Windows-Sitzung starten und den Ton dieser App über die PC-Lautsprecher hören. Microsoft sammelt eine Liste Ihrer installierten Android-Apps und der letzten Aktivitäten, um den Dienst bereitzustellen und Ihnen Ihre zuletzt verwendeten Apps anzuzeigen. Microsoft speichert weder die von Ihnen installierten Anwendungen noch die von der Anwendung angezeigten Informationen über Ihre Erfahrungen mit der Anwendung.
Übertragung von Inhalten: Android-Geräte.
Auf unterstützten Geräten können Sie mit Phone Link Inhalte wie Dateien, Dokumente, Fotos usw. zwischen Ihrem Android-Telefon und Ihrem Windows-Gerät kopieren und einfügen.n. Sie können Inhalte von Ihrem Android-Smartphone auf Ihr Windows-Gerät und von Ihrem Windows-Gerät auf Ihr Android-Smartphone übertragen, indem Sie Inhalte per Drag & Drop zwischen den Geräten ablegen.
Schnell-Hotspot: Android-Geräte.
Auf unterstützten Geräten ermöglicht Link zu Windows den Austausch von mobilen Hotspotinformationen mit dem gekoppelten PC über sichere Bluetooth-Kommunikation. Ihr PC kann dann über das Windows-Netzwerk-Flyout mit dem Internet verbunden werden. Beachten Sie, dass je nach Ihrem mobilen Datentarif Gebühren für mobile Daten anfallen können.
Kontaktsynchronisierung: Android-Geräte.
Link zu Windows können Sie Ihre Android-Kontakte mit der Microsoft-Cloud synchronisieren, um in anderen Microsoft-Produkten und -Diensten darauf zuzugreifen. Sie können dieses Feature aktivieren, indem Sie zu Link zu Windows-Einstellungen wechseln und Feature "Kontakte synchronisieren" aktivieren. Ihre Kontaktinformationen werden online gespeichert und Ihrem Microsoft-Konto zugeordnet. Sie können die Synchronisierung jederzeit deaktivieren und diese Kontakte löschen.
Mehr dazu
.
Kontaktsynchronisierung: iPhone.
Mit Smartphone-Link können Sie Ihre Kontakte mit Ihrem iPhone synchronisieren, um sie für Nachrichten und Anrufe zu nutzen. Sie können dieses Feature aktivieren, indem Sie auf Ihrem iPhone in die Bluetooth-Einstellungen wechseln und „Kontakte synchronisieren“ unter Ihrem PC-Namen umschalten, nachdem Sie Ihr iPhone mit dem Smartphone-Link verbunden haben. Sie können die Synchronisierung jederzeit deaktivieren, indem Sie „Kontakte synchronisieren“ ausschalten.
Text vorlesen.
Smartphone-Link” kann Text vorlesen (Bedienungshilfe). Das Text-zu-Sprache-Feature ermöglicht die Umwandlung einer SMS-Nachricht oder Benachrichtigung in einen Audiostream. Wenn Sie diese Funktion aktivieren, werden Ihre SMS-Nachrichten und Benachrichtigungen beim Empfang laut vorgelesen.
Office für Unternehmen: Android-Geräte.
Link zu Windows können Sie Fotos direkt von Ihrem Mobiltelefon aus in Web- und Desktopversionen ausgewählter Microsoft 365 Apps wie PowerPoint, Excel und Word einfügen. Dazu muss Ihr IT-Administrator die Option Verbundene Erfahrungen für Microsoft Office-Anwendungen aktiviert haben, und Sie müssen Ihr Mobilgerät mit Ihrem Azure Active Directory (AAD)-Konto verknüpfen und Ihrem Geschäfts- oder Schulkonto die Berechtigung für Fotos erteilen. Nach dem Onboarding dauert Ihre Sitzung 15 Minuten, damit Sie Ihre Fotos von Ihrem mobilen Gerät übertragen können. Um dieses Feature erneut verwenden zu können, müssen Sie Ihren QR-Code scannen. Link zu Windows erfasst keine Geschäfts- oder Schulkontoinformationen oder Informationen zu Ihrem Unternehmen. Um diesen Dienst anbieten zu können, nutzt Microsoft einen Cloud-Dienst, um Ihre Dateien weiterzuleiten, damit die Fotos in die Web- und Desktop-Versionen ausgewählter Microsoft 365-Anwendungen wie PowerPoint-, Excel- und Word-Dateien eingefügt werden können.
Zurück zum Anfang
Geräteübergreifende Erfahrungen
Geräteübergreifende Erfahrungen in Windows ermöglichen Ihnen den Zugriff auf Ihr Mobilgerät von Ihrem PC aus mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto. Diese können unter „Mobile Geräte“ im Abschnitt Bluetooth & Geräte in den Einstellungen Ihres Windows-PCs verwaltet werden. Im Rahmen der Bereitstellung dieser Features sammelt Microsoft Leistungsnutzungs- und Gerätedaten, einschließlich Informationen zu den Hardwarefunktionen Ihrer mobilen und Windows-Geräte. Sie können diese Funktion jederzeit in Ihren Windows-PC-Einstellungen aktivieren oder deaktivieren.
Verwenden Sie Ihr mobiles Gerät als verbundene Kamera.
Mit diesem Feature können Sie die Kamera Ihres mobilen Geräts in Apps oder Produkten unter Windows verwenden, die Kamerafunktionen unterstützen. Sie können diese Funktion unter „Mobile Geräte“ im Abschnitt Bluetooth & Geräte in den Einstellungen auf Ihrem PC aktivieren. Microsoft zeichnet ihre Kamerasitzungen oder die von Ihrer Kamera angezeigten Informationen in keiner der Anwendungen oder Produkte auf oder speichert sie nicht.
Neue Fotobenachrichtigungen von Ihrem mobilen Gerät abrufen.
Mit diesem Feature können Sie Benachrichtigungen von Ihrem verknüpften mobilen Gerät auf Ihrem Windows-PC empfangen. Diese Fotos werden vorübergehend auf Ihrem Windows-PC gespeichert, während Sie diese Fotos bearbeiten oder öffnen. Sie müssen das Speichern auf Ihrem PC initiieren, um diese Fotos zu speichern, bis Sie sie löschen möchten. Wir speichern Ihre Fotos niemals auf unseren Servern oder ändern oder löschen Fotos auf Ihrem mobilen Gerät.
Zeigen Sie Ihr mobiles Gerät im Datei-Explorer
. Mit dieser Funktion können Sie im Datei-Explorer auf die Dateien Ihres mobilen Geräts zugreifen. Sie können diese Funktion unter „Mobile Geräte“ im Abschnitt Bluetooth & Geräte in den Einstellungen auf Ihrem PC aktivieren. Microsoft speichert Ihre Dateiinhalte nicht in seinen Diensten.
Zurück zum Anfang
Schutz- und Sicherheitsfunktionen
Geräteverschlüsselung
. Die Geräteverschlüsselung hilft dabei, die auf dem Gerät gespeicherten Daten durch eine Verschlüsselung mittels BitLocker-Laufwerkverschlüsselungstechnologie zu schützen. Wenn die Geräteverschlüsselung aktiviert ist, verschlüsselt Windows das Laufwerk auf dem Windows installiert ist automatisch und erstellt einen Wiederherstellungsschlüssel. Der BitLocker-Wiederherstellungsschlüssel für Ihr persönliches Gerät wird automatisch in Ihrem persönlichen Microsoft OneDrive-Konto online gesichert. Microsoft verwendet Ihre individuellen Wiederherstellungsschlüssel zu keinen anderen Zwecken.
Tool zum Entfernen bösartiger Software
. Das Tool zum Entfernen bösartiger Software (MSRT) wird als Bestandteil von Windows Update mindestens einmal im Monat auf Ihrem Gerät ausgeführt. MSRT überprüft Geräte auf Infektionen durch bestimmte, weitverbreitete Schadsoftware ("Malware") und hilft, alle gefundenen Infektionen zu entfernen. Bei der Ausführung von MSRT wird die auf der Website für Microsoft-Support gelistete Malware entfernt, sollte sie sich auf Ihrem Gerät befinden. Während einer Malware-Überprüfung wird ein Bericht mit spezifischen Daten über die erkannte Malware, die Fehler und andere Daten über Ihr Gerät an Microsoft gesendet. Wenn Sie nicht möchten, dass MSRT diese Daten an Microsoft sendet, können Sie die Berichtskomponente des MSRT deaktivieren.
Microsoft Family
. Eltern können Microsoft Family Safety verwenden, um den Gebrauch des Geräts durch ihr Kind einzuschränken. Lesen Sie die Informationen unter
Microsoft Family Safety
sorgfältig durch, wenn Sie eine Familiengruppe erstellen oder einer Familiengruppe beitreten möchten. Wenn Sie in einer Region leben, in der die Erstellung eines Kontos für den Zugriff auf Microsoft-Dienste erlaubt ist, werden Sie möglicherweise aufgefordert, die Zustimmung Ihrer Eltern einzuholen oder zu erteilen. Wenn ein Nutzer unter dem gesetzlichen Mindestalter in Ihrer Region ist, wird er während des Registrierungsprozesses aufgefordert, die Zustimmung eines Elternteils oder Erziehungsberechtigten einzuholen, indem er die E-Mail-Adresse eines Erwachsenen eingibt. Wenn die Berichterstattung über die Aktivität der Familie für ein Kind aktiviert wurde, wird Microsoft Einzelheiten dazu erheben, wie das Kind das Gerät verwendet und den Eltern Berichte über die Aktivitäten dieser Verwendung bereitstellen. Die Tätigkeitsberichte werden routinemäßig von den Microsoft-Servern gelöscht.
Microsoft Defender SmartScreen und Smart App Control
. Microsoft ist bestrebt, Ihr Gerät und Ihre Kennwörter vor unsicheren Apps, Dateien und Webinhalten zu schützen.
Microsoft Defender SmartScreen trägt dazu bei, Sie bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zu schützen, indem es Bedrohungen für Sie, Ihr Gerät und Ihre Kennwörter identifiziert. Zu diesen Bedrohungen können potenziell unsichere Apps oder Webinhalte gehören, die Microsoft Defender SmartScreen beim Überprüfen von besuchten Websites, heruntergeladenen Dateien und von Ihnen installierten und ausgeführten Apps erkennt. Während Microsoft Defender SmartScreen die Web- und Appinhalte überprüft, werden die Daten über den Inhalt und Ihr Gerät, einschließlich der vollständigen Webadresse des Inhalts, an Microsoft gesendet. Wenn zusätzliche Analysen erforderlich sind, um Sicherheitsbedrohungen zu identifizieren, können Informationen über die verdächtige Website oder App (z. B. angezeigte Inhalte, wiedergegebene Sounds und Anwendungsspeicher) an Microsoft gesendet werden. Diese Daten werden nur zu Sicherheitszwecken verwendet, um Sicherheitsvorfälle, Identitätsdiebstahl, Betrug oder andere böswillige, trügerische oder unzulässige Aktivitäten zu erkennen, vor ihnen zu schützen und auf diese zu reagieren. Sobald Microsoft Defender SmartScreen feststellt, dass der Inhalt möglicherweise nicht sicher ist, wird eine Warnung anstelle des Inhalts angezeigt. Microsoft Defender SmartScreen kann in der Windows-Sicherheit-App ein- oder ausgeschaltet werden.
Sofern unterstützt, hilft Smart App Control bei der Überprüfung von Software, die auf Ihrem Gerät installiert und ausgeführt wird, um festzustellen, ob sie schädlich ist, oder potenziell unerwünschte oder andere Bedrohungen für Sie und Ihr Gerät darstellt. Auf einem unterstützten Gerät wird Smart App Control im Auswertungsmodus gestartet, und die Daten, die wir für Microsoft Defender SmartScreen sammeln, z. B. den Dateinamen, Hash des Dateiinhalts, Downloadspeicherort und digitale Zertifikate der Datei, werden verwendet, um zu bestimmen, ob Ihr Gerät für die Verwendung von Smart App Control für zusätzlichen Sicherheitsschutz eignet. Smart App Control ist nicht aktiviert und wird während des Auswertungsmodus nicht blockieren. Einige Geräte eignen sich möglicherweise nicht, wenn Smart App Control die ansonsten beabsichtigten und legitimen Aufgaben eines Benutzers beeinträchtigt – z. B. Entwickler, die viele nicht signierte Dateien verwenden. Wenn Smart App Control für Sie gut geeignet ist, wird es automatisch aktiviert und bietet zusätzlichen Schutz für Ihr Gerät, der über Microsoft Defender SmartScreen hinausgeht. Andernfalls ist smart App Control nicht verfügbar und wird dauerhaft deaktiviert. Wenn Ihr Gerät nicht unterstützt wird oder sich nicht für Smart App Control eignet, tragen Microsoft Defender SmartScreen weiterhin zum Schutz Ihres Geräts bei. Wenn Smart App Control aktiviert ist und eine App als schädlich, potenziell unerwünscht, unbekannt und unsigniert identifiziert wird, wird Smart App Control vor dem Öffnen, Ausführen oder Installieren die App blockieren und Sie benachrichtig.
Weitere Informationen zu Smart App Control
.
Wenn Microsoft Defender SmartScreen oder Smart App Control eine Datei überprüft, werden Daten zu dieser Datei an Microsoft gesendet, einschließlich des Dateinamens, des Download-Speicherorts, eines Teils der Inhalte der Datei und der digitalen Zertifikate dieser Datei.
Smart App Control kann in der Windows-Sicherheit-App ein- oder ausgeschaltet werden.
Microsoft Defender Antivirus
. Microsoft Defender Antivirus sucht nach Schadsoftware und nach weiterer unerwünschter Software, nach potenziell unerwünschten Apps und nach anderen schädlichen Inhalten auf Ihrem Gerät. Microsoft Defender Antivirus wird zum Schutz Ihres Gerätes automatisch aktiviert, sollte keine andere Antischadsoftware für den Schutz Ihres Gerätes aktiviert sein. Wenn Microsoft Defender Antivirus aktiviert ist, wird der Sicherheitsstatus Ihres Geräts überwacht. Sobald Microsoft Defender Antivirus aktiviert ist oder durch die Funktion „Limitiertes regelmäßiges Scannen” ausgeführt wird, werden automatisch Berichte an Microsoft gesendet, die Daten über vermutete Schadsoftware und andere unerwünschte Software, potenziell unerwünschte Apps und andere schädliche Inhalte enthalten. Es werden auch Dateien zur weiteren Untersuchung gesendet, die Schadsoftware oder unbekannte Dateien enthalten. Wenn ein Bericht mit hinreichender Wahrscheinlichkeit personenbezogene Daten enthält, dann wird dieser nicht automatisch gesendet. Ein entsprechender Hinweis wird vor dem Versenden angezeigt. Sie können Microsoft Defender Antivirus so konfigurieren, dass keinerlei Berichte und vermutete Schadsoftware an Microsoft gesendet werden.
Zurück zum Anfang
Sprache, Spracherkennung, Freihand und Tastatureingabe
Sprache
. Microsoft bietet sowohl eine gerätebasierte Spracherkennungsfunktion an als auch cloudbasierte (Online-) Spracherkennungstechnologien.
Wenn Sie die Einstellung Online-Spracherkennung aktivieren, können Anwendungen die Cloud-basierte Spracherkennung von Microsoft nutzen. Darüber hinaus ermöglicht ihnen die Online-Spracherkennungseinstellung in Windows 10 die Verwendung der Diktatfunktion in Windows.
Wenn Sie beim Einrichten eines HoloLens-Geräts die Sprache aktivieren oder Windows Mixed Reality installieren, können Sie Ihre Stimme für Befehle, Diktate und App-Interaktionen verwenden. Sowohl die gerätebasierte Spracherkennung als auch die Online-Spracherkennungseinstellung werden aktiviert. Wenn beide Einstellungen aktiviert sind und das Headset eingeschaltet ist, hört das Gerät jederzeit auf Ihre Spracheingabe und sendet Ihre Sprachdaten an die cloudbasierten Spracherkennungstechnologien von Microsoft.
Wenn Sie cloudbasierte Spracherkennungstechnologien von Microsoft verwenden, unabhängig davon, ob sie durch die Online-Spracherkennungseinstellung aktiviert sind oder wenn Sie mit HoloLens oder Spracheingabe interagieren, erfasst und verwendet Microsoft Ihre Sprachaufzeichnungen, um den Spracherkennungsdienst bereitzustellen, indem eine Texttranskription der gesprochenen Wörter in den Sprachdaten erstellt wird. Microsoft wird Ihre Sprachaufzeichnungen nicht ohne Ihre Zustimmung speichern, proben oder sie anhören. Weitere Informationen dazu, wie Microsoft Ihre Sprachdaten verwaltet, finden Sie unter
Spracherkennungstechnologien
.
Sie können die gerätebasierte Spracherkennung verwenden, ohne Ihre Sprachdaten an Microsoft zu senden. Die cloudbasierten Spracherkennungstechnologien von Microsoft bieten jedoch eine genauere Erkennung als die gerätebasierte Spracherkennung. Wenn die Einstellung für die Online-Spracherkennung deaktiviert ist, funktionieren Sprachdienste, die nicht auf die Cloud angewiesen sind und nur die gerätebasierte Erkennung nutzen, wie Live-Untertitel, Sprachausgabe oder Sprachzugriff, weiterhin, und Microsoft erfasst keine Sprachdaten.
Sie können die Online-Spracherkennung jederzeit deaktivieren. Dadurch wird verhindert, dass Apps, die sich auf die Online-Spracherkennungseinstellung verlassen, Ihre Sprachdaten an Microsoft senden. Wenn Sie ein HoloLens- oder Windows Mixed Reality-Headset verwenden, können Sie die gerätebasierte Spracherkennung auch jederzeit deaktivieren. Dadurch wird verhindert, dass das Gerät auf Ihre Spracheingabe hört.
Weitere Informationen über die Spracherkennung in Windows
.
Sprachaktivierung
. Windows bietet unterstützte Apps mit der Möglichkeit, basierend auf Sprachschlüsselwörter, die für diese App spezifisch sind, zu reagieren und Maßnahmen zu ergreifen.
Wenn Sie einer Anwendung die Erlaubnis erteilt haben, nach Sprachschlüsselwörtern zu suchen, hört Windows aktiv das Mikrofon nach diesen Schlüsselwörtern ab. Sobald ein Schlüsselwort erkannt wird, hat die App Zugriff auf Ihre Sprachaufzeichnung, kann die Aufzeichnung verarbeiten, Maßnahmen ergreifen und antworten, beispielsweise mit einer gesprochenen Antwort. Die App sendet die Sprachaufzeichnung möglicherweise an ihre eigenen Dienste in der Cloud, um die Befehle zu verarbeiten. Jede App sollte Sie um Erlaubnis bitten, bevor Sie auf Sprachaufzeichnungen zugreift.
Die Sprachaktivierung kann aktiviert bleiben, wenn das Gerät gesperrt ist. Wenn diese Option aktiviert ist, hört die betreffende App das Mikrofon auch dann weiterhin auf Sprachschlüsselwörter ab, wenn Sie Ihr Gerät gesperrt haben, und kann auf alle Personen reagieren, die in der Nähe des Geräts sprechen. Wenn das Gerät gesperrt ist, hat die App Zugriff auf dieselben Funktionen und Informationen wie bei einem entsperrten Gerät.
Sie können die Spracherkennung jederzeit deaktivieren.
Weitere Informationen über den Stimmaktivierungsmodus in Windows
.
Selbst wenn Sie die Spracherkennung deaktiviert haben, können einige Desktop-Apps und -Dienste von Drittanbietern trotzdem auf das Mikrofon zugreifen und Ihre Spracheingabe speichern.
Erfahren Sie mehr über Drittanbieter-Desktop-Apps und wie sie möglicherweise weiterhin auf das Mikrofon zugreifen, selbst wenn diese Einstellungen deaktiviert sind
.
Spracheingabe
. In Windows 11 wurde die Diktatfunktion aktualisiert und als Spracheingabe umbenannt. Die Spracheingabe kann möglicherweise sowohl gerätebasierte als auch Online-Spracherkennungstechnologien, um den Dienst für die Sprachtranskription zu nutzen. Sie können auch Sprachclips beisteuern, um die Spracheingabe zu verbessern. Wenn Sie keine Sprachclips beitragen möchten, können Sie weiterhin die Spracheingabe verwenden. Sie können Ihre Auswahl jederzeit in den Einstellungen für die Spracheingabe ändern. Microsoft wird Ihre Sprachaufzeichnungen nicht ohne Ihre Zustimmung speichern, proben oder sie anhören.
Weitere Informationen über Microsoft und Ihre Sprachdaten
.
Sprachzugriff
. Windows ermöglicht es allen Personen, einschließlich Personen mit Mobilitätsbeeinträchtigungen, ihren PC zu steuern und Texte mithilfe ihrer Stimme zu erstellen. Der Sprachzugriff unterstützt beispielsweise Szenarien wie das Öffnen und Wechseln zwischen Apps, das Surfen im Web sowie das Lesen und Erstellen von E-Mails. Der Sprachzugriff nutzt die moderne Spracherkennung auf dem Gerät, um Sprache genau zu erkennen, und wird ohne Internetverbindung unterstützt. Wenn ein Benutzer den Sprachzugriff aufruft, wird das Gerätemikrofon verwendet.
Weitere Informationen zum Sprachzugriff
.
Freihand- & Eingabepersonalisierungen
. Ihre getippten und handgeschriebenen Worte werden erfasst, um Ihnen eine benutzerdefinierte Wortliste, eine bessere Zeichenerkennung für einfacheres Tippen und Schreiben auf Ihrem Gerät und Textvorschläge während des Tippens oder Schreibens bereitzustellen.
Sie können die Personalisierung von Freihand- & Tastatureingaben jederzeit deaktivieren. Dadurch wird die auf Ihrem Gerät gespeicherte Kundenwortliste gelöscht. Wenn Sie sie wieder aktivieren, müssen Sie Ihre benutzerdefinierte Wortliste neu erstellen.
Weitere Informationen zur Freihand- & Eingabepersonalisierung in Windows
.
Zurück zum Anfang
Einstellungen für Synchronisierung und Sicherung
Wenn Sie sich mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto bei Windows anmelden, kann Windows Ihre Einstellungen, Dateien und Gerätekonfigurationsdaten auf Microsoft-Servern speichern. Windows verwendet nur die gespeicherten Einstellungen, Dateien und Gerätekonfigurationsdaten, um Ihnen die Migration Ihrer Umgebung auf einem anderen Gerät zu erleichtern.
Sie können dieses Feature deaktivieren und verhindern, dass Windows Ihre Einstellungen, Dateien und Konfigurationsdaten aus den Windows-Einstellungen speichert. Sie können die Daten, die zuvor in Ihrem Microsoft-Konto gesichert wurden, löschen, indem Sie
Ihre Microsoft-Konto-Geräte-Seite
besuchen.
Weitere Informationen zu Windows-Sicherungs- und Synchronisierungseinstellungen
.
Zurück zum Anfang
Update-Dienste
Der Aktualisierungsdienst für Windows enthält Windows Update und Microsoft Update. Windows Update ist ein Dienst, der Sie mit Software-Aktualisierungen für die Windows-Software und andere unterstützende Software wie z. B. gelieferte Treiber und Firmware vom Gerätehersteller versorgt. Microsoft Update ist ein Dienst, der Sie mit Softwareupdates für andere Microsoft-Software wie beispielsweise Microsoft 365 versorgt.
Windows Update lädt Windows-Software-Aktualisierungen automatisch auf Ihr Gerät herunter. Sie können Windows Update so konfigurieren, dass diese Aktualisierungen automatisch installiert werden, sobald diese verfügbar sind (empfohlen) oder Sie durch Windows benachrichtigt werden, wenn ein Neustart erforderlich ist, um die Installation der Aktualisierungen abzuschließen. Apps, die über den Microsoft Store verfügbar sind, werden automatisch über den Microsoft Store aktualisiert, wie im
Microsoft Store
-Abschnitt dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschrieben.
Zurück zum Anfang
Webbrowser – Microsoft Edge Vorgängerversion und Internet Explorer
Dieser Abschnitt bezieht sich auf Vorgänger-Versionen von Microsoft Edge (Versionen 44 und darunter). Informationen zu Nicht-Legacy-Versionen von Microsoft Edge finden Sie im Abschnitt
Microsoft Edge
der Datenschutzbestimmungen.
Microsoft Edge ist der Standard-Webbrowser für Windows. Internet Explorer, der Vorgängerbrowser von Microsoft, steht in Windows ebenfalls zur Verfügung. Immer wenn Sie einen Webbrowser verwenden, um auf das Internet zuzugreifen, werden Daten über Ihr Gerät ("Standardgerätedaten") an die von Ihnen besuchten Websites und Onlinedienste gesendet. Standardgerätedaten umfassen die IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, den Typ Ihres Browsers sowie die festgelegte Sprache, die Zugriffszeit und die aufgerufenen Websiteadressen. Diese Daten werden möglicherweise auf den Webservern dieser Websites protokolliert. Welche Daten erfasst und wie diese Daten verwendet werden, hängt von den Datenschutzpraktiken der von Ihnen besuchten Websites bzw. den von Ihnen verwendeten Webdiensten ab. Darüber hinaus sendet Microsoft Edge eine eindeutige Browser-ID an bestimmte Websites, damit wir aggregierte Daten entwickeln können, die verwendet verwenden, um die Browserfeatures und -dienste zu verbessern.
Zusätzlich werden auf Ihrem Gerät Daten zur Nutzung Ihres Browsers gespeichert, z. B. Browserverlauf, Webformulardaten, temporäre Internetdateien und Cookies. Sie können diese Daten von Ihrem Gerät entfernen, indem Sie den Browserverlauf löschen.
Microsoft Edge ermöglicht Ihnen das Erfassen und Speichern von Inhalten auf Ihrem Gerät, wie zum Beispiel:
Webseitennotiz
. Ermöglicht Freihand- und Textanmerkungen auf den von Ihnen besuchten Webseiten, die Sie zudem ausschneiden, speichern und teilen können.
Aktive Lesevorgänge
. Dient zur Zusammenfassung und Verwaltung von Websites oder Dokumenten in einer Leseliste
Hub
. Dient zur einfachen Verwaltung von Leselisten, Favoriten, Downloads und Verlauf in einem einzigen Bereich.
Website an Taskleiste anheften
. Hiermit können Sie Ihre bevorzugten Websites an die Windows-Taskleiste anheften. Websites können erkennen, welche ihrer Webseiten Sie angeheftet haben, und Ihnen so ein Infobadge bereitstellen, um Sie darüber zu informieren, dass Neuheiten vorhanden sind, die Sie sich auf der jeweiligen Website ansehen sollten.
Einige auf Ihrem Gerät gespeicherte Microsoft-Browserinformationen werden auf anderen Geräten synchronisiert, wenn Sie sich mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto anmelden, sodass Sie auf allen Ihren angemeldeten Browsern auf allen Ihren Geräten auf Ihre Daten zugreifen können. Zu diesen Informationen gehören im Internet Explorer z. B. Browserverlauf und Favoriten und in Microsoft Edge Favoriten, Leselisten und Eingaben in automatisch ausgefüllten Formularen, beispielsweise Name, Anschrift und Telefonnummer und eventuell Daten für von Ihnen installierte Erweiterungen. Wenn Sie in Microsoft Edge beispielsweise Ihre Leseliste auf verschiedenen Geräten synchronisieren, werden Kopien der Inhalte, die Sie für eine Speicherung in Ihre Leseliste auswählen, an jedes synchronisierte Gerät gesendet, um sie später betrachten zu können. Sie können die Synchronisierung in Internet Explorer deaktivieren, indem Sie zu
Start
>
Einstellungen
>
Konten
>
Einstellungen synchronisieren
wechseln. (Weitere Informationen finden Sie im Abschnitt
Synchronisierungs
dieser Datenschutzerklärung.) Sie können die Synchronisierung von Microsoft Edge-Browserinformationen auch deaktivieren, indem Sie die Synchronisierungsoption in den Microsoft Edge-Einstellungen deaktivieren.
Sowohl Microsoft Edge als auch Internet Explorer verwenden Ihre Suchanfragen und Ihren Browser-Verlauf, um Ihnen einen schnelleren Seitenaufbau und mehr relevante Treffer zu liefern. Diese Features umfassen:
Suchvorschläge
in Internet Explorer senden die Informationen, die Sie in die Adressleiste des Browsers eingeben, automatisch an Ihren Standardsuchanbieter (z. B. Bing), um Ihnen bei der Eingabe jedes Zeichens Suchvorschläge zu machen.
Such- und Website-Vorschläge
in Microsoft Edge senden die Informationen, die Sie in die Adressleiste des Browsers eingeben, automatisch an Bing (auch wenn Sie einen anderen Standard-Suchanbieter ausgewählt haben), um bei der Eingabe jedes Zeichens Suchempfehlungen anzubieten.
Sie können diese Features jederzeit deaktivieren. Um Suchergebnisse bereitzustellen, senden Microsoft Edge und Internet Explorer Ihre Suchabfragen, Standardgeräteinformationen und den Standort (sofern der Standort aktiviert ist) an Ihren Standardsuchanbieter, wenn die App verwendet wird. Wenn Bing Ihr Standardsuchanbieter ist, nutzen wir diese Daten, wie im Abschnitt
Bing
dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen beschrieben.
Zurück zum Anfang
Windows KI-Features
Aktion per Mausklick
Aktion per Mausklick kann in Partnerschaft mit Recall oder als eigenständiges Feature ausgeführt werden. Nach dem Start können Sie mit Aktion per Mausklick Screenshots aufnehmen und analysieren sowie das Vorhandensein von Text und Bildern erkennen und dann für jedes davon die entsprechenden Aktionen ausführen. Aktion per Mausklick bietet Ihnen beispielsweise Optionen zum Bearbeiten eines Screenshotbilds oder zum Überarbeiten oder Umarbeiten des erfassten Texts. Aktion per Mausklick kann den Inhalt des Texts oder der Bilder, die in einem Screenshot identifiziert werden, nicht erkennen,  aber  Sie können  lokale KI und  andere Tools verwenden, um den Inhalt zu ändern, wenn Sie möchten. Alles verbleibt auf Ihrem lokalen Gerät, sofern Sie keine explizite Auswahl treffen, z. B. ein Bild für eine Suche an Bing senden, Aktion per Mausklick bitten, eine Zusammenfassung des vom Benutzer ausgewählten Textes bereitzustellen (in diesem Fall wird diese an den Azure AI-Clouddienst von Microsoft gesendet) oder eine andere lokale KI oder ein anderes Tool verwenden, um einen Screenshot der Aktion per Mausklick zu ändern.
Aktion per Mausklick ermöglicht es Ihnen auch,   Ihr Mikrofon zu verwenden , um in einem Screenshot nach Text zu suchen. Wenn  Sie auf die Mikrofonschaltfläche klicken, beginnt die Aktion per Mausklick zuzuhören, was gesagt wird, was in das Suchfeld eingegeben wird, und  hebt alle Übereinstimmungen aus der Suche hervor. Die vom Mikrofon erfassten Audiodaten werden nicht von   Ihrem Gerät übertragen.
Windows Recall
Recall ist eine Windows-Funktion, die nur auf Copilot+ PCs verfügbar ist und es Benutzern ermöglicht, Dinge, die sie auf ihren Geräten gesehen haben, anhand von Text- und visuellen Hinweisen wiederzufinden, an die sie sich erinnern. Um Recall zu verwenden, muss ein Benutzer der Speicherung von Momentaufnahmen auf seinem Copilot+ PC zustimmen. Dabei handelt es sich um Bilder von allem, was auf dem Bildschirm des Benutzers geöffnet und sichtbar ist, und die zugehörigen Metadaten wie den App-Namen und den Zeit-/Datumsstempel enthalten. Alle Daten werden lokal auf dem Gerät gespeichert und mit Windows Hello Enhanced Sign-in Security (ESS) geschützt, das sicherere biometrische Anmeldungen bietet und dazu beiträgt, dass nur der Kunde auf seine Informationen zugreifen kann. Jedes Mal, wenn ein Benutzer Recall startet, wird er aufgefordert, sich mit der biometrischen Anmeldung oder PIN von Windows Hello zu authentifizieren, bevor der Inhalt des Momentaufnahmeordners entschlüsselt wird. Aktion per Mausklick wird über den Momentaufnahmen in Recall ausgeführt und hilft dem Benutzer, Dinge schneller zu erledigen, indem es ihm ermöglicht, Aktionen mit seinen Inhalten (Bilder oder Text) auf dem Bildschirm auszuführen. Die Analyse von Momentaufnahmen wird immer lokal auf dem Gerät durchgeführt, und die verfügbaren Aktionen ändern sich je nach der Art des erkannten Inhalts.
Mit Recall können Sie das Mikrofon Ihres Copilot+ PC-Geräts auch verwenden, um in aufgenommenen Momentaufnahmen nach Text zu suchen. Wenn Sie auf die Mikrofonschaltfläche klicken, die sich im Such-Eingabefeld im Recall-Fenster befindet, wird das Gesagte abgehört und in das Suchfeld eingegeben. Das Mikrofon bleibt in Gebrauch, bis  Sie Ihre Sprache anhalten . An diesem Punkt wird es deaktiviert, bis  Sie die Mikrofontaste erneut explizit drücken. Alle Übereinstimmungen aus der Suche werden in den Ergebnissen hervorgehoben. Die vom Mikrofon erfassten Audiodaten werden nicht von   Ihrem Gerät übertragen.
Von Recall erfasste Daten, einschließlich personenbezogener Daten (z. B. Momentaufnahmen, Metadaten, Verarbeitungsergebnisse und Benutzerabfragen), bleiben lokal auf dem Gerät in Ihrem angemeldeten Konto auf dem  Copilot+ PC und werden nicht vom Gerät übertragen, es sei denn, Sie ergreifen bestimmte Maßnahmen. Zum Beispiel, wenn Sie eine Momentaufnahme kopieren und in eine andere App einfügen oder  beim Senden von Feedback über den Windows-Feedback-Hub eine Momentaufnahme einschließen . Die einzige Möglichkeit, Recall-Inhalte mit jemandem zu teilen, besteht in einer expliziten Aktion des Benutzers auf dem Gerät.
Sie können Ihre Inhalte (z. B. Momentaufnahmen, Metadaten, Suchabfragen und Verlauf) steuern, indem Sie Momentaufnahmen anhalten oder löschen, Inhalte filtern oder einen unterstützten Browser im Datenschutzmodus verwenden.
Hier
erfahren Sie mehr über Ihre Privatsphäre und Ihre Kontrolle über Ihre Recall-Erfahrung.
Zusätzlich zur Recall-Suchfunktion verfügt Recall auch über eine Zeitleiste, in der Ihre Momentaufnahmen chronologisch organisiert und in einer horizontalen Bildlaufleiste visualisiert werden, die Sie nutzen können, um Ihre vergangenen Aktivitäten auf Ihrem PC zu suchen und zu nutzen. Zusätzlich zu den in der Zeitachse verfügbaren Funktionen können Sie Momentaufnahmen aus dieser Ansicht löschen, entweder einzeln oder nach allen Momentaufnahmen, die eine Websitedomäne enthalten (z. B. alle von www.bing.com) oder solche aus einer bestimmten App.
Recall verfügt außerdem über einen standardmäßig aktivierten Filter für vertrauliche Inhalte, um die Speicherung möglicherweise vertraulicherer Informationen (z. B. Kreditkartennummern, staatlich ausgestellte Ausweisnummern usw.) zu verhindern. Benutzer können diesen Filter in den Windows-Einstellungen deaktivieren, wenn sie möchten.
Zurück zum Anfang
Windows-Apps
Eine Reihe von Microsoft-Apps sind in Windows enthalten und weitere sind im Microsoft Store erhältlich. Einige dieser Apps enthalten:
Karten-App
. Die Karten-App bietet positionsbezogene Dienste an und verwendet die Bing-Dienste, um Ihre Recherchen in der Karten-App zu verarbeiten. Wenn die Karten-App Zugriff auf Ihren Standort hat und Sie standortbasierte Dienste in Windows aktiviert haben, erfassen die Bing-Dienste, sobald Sie das Zeichen „@” zum Starten einer Suche in unterstützten Textfeldern in Windows-Apps eingeben, den eingegebenen Text nach dem Zeichen „@”, um standortbezogene Vorschläge zu unterbreiten. Weitere Informationen über diese Bing-basierten Funktionen finden Sie im Abschnitt
Bing
dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen. Wenn die Karten-App Zugriff auf Ihren Standort hat, kann Microsoft deidentifizierte Gerätepositionsdaten erfassen (selbst wenn die App nicht verwendet wird), die zur Verbesserung der Microsoft-Dienste beitragen. Sie können den Zugriff der Karten-App auf Ihren Standort deaktivieren, indem Sie den Positionsdienst oder den Zugriff der Karten-App auf den Positionsdienst deaktivieren.
Sie können Ihre bevorzugten Orte und die letzten Kartensuchen in der Karten-App verfolgen. Ihre Lieblingsorte und Ihr Suchverlauf werden als Suchvorschläge aufgenommen werden. Wenn Sie der Karten-App Zugriff auf Ihre Kamera gewähren, können Sie den Ort erfassen, an dem Ihre Fotos aufgenommen wurden – ein Foto Ihres Autos zeigt Ihnen zum Beispiel auch an, wo es geparkt ist. Sie können Ihren Standort auch für andere Personen in Ihren Kontakten freigeben. Wenn Sie mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto angemeldet sind, werden Ihre Lieblingsorte, Ihr Suchverlauf und bestimmte App-Einstellungen mit anderen Geräten und Diensten synchronisiert. Weitere Informationen finden Sie im Abschnitt
Synchronisierungs- und Sicherungseinstellungen
dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Kamera-App
. Falls Sie der Kamera-App erlauben, Ihre Position zu verwenden, dann werden die Positionsdaten in den mit Ihrem Gerät aufgenommenen Fotos und Videos eingebettet. Weitere beschreibende Daten wie z. B. Kameramodell und das Datum, an dem das Bild oder das Video aufgenommen wurde, sind ebenfalls in den Fotos und Videos eingebettet. Wenn Sie ein Foto oder Video teilen, werden alle eingebetteten Daten für die Personen und Dienste, mit denen Sie diese teilen, zugänglich. Nach der Aktivierung können Sie den Kamera-App-Zugriff auf Ihren Standort jederzeit deaktivieren, indem Sie den gesamten Zugriff auf den Positionsdienst im Einstellungsmenü Ihres Geräts oder den Kamera-App-Zugriff auf den Positionsdienst deaktivieren.
Wenn die Kamera-App geöffnet ist, zeigt sie von der ausgewählten Kamera erkannte Rechtecke für Bereiche im Bild an, die potenziell zur Bildverbesserung verwendet werden können. Die Kamera-App behält keine Bildverbesserungsdaten. Sie können die Kamerazugriffseinstellungen jederzeit im Einstellungsmenü der Kamera-App oder im Windows-Einstellungsmenü ändern. Die Kamera-App verwendet verschiedene Gerätefunktionen wie Position, Kamera, Mikrofon, Video und Bildbibliothek. Weitere Informationen finden Sie im
Microsoft Store
.
Fotos-App
. Die Fotos-App ist in zwei Versionen verfügbar. Die aktualisierte Fotos-App enthält Features wie die iCloud-Integration sowie lokale und Cloudordneransichten. Die Vorgängerversion der Fotos-App enthält Features wie den Video-Editor, die Registerkarte "Personen" und Alben. Sie verwenden die aktualisierte Fotos-App, wenn im Abschnitt "Info” in den Einstellungen der Fotos-App angegeben ist, dass es sich bei der App um die "aktualisierte” Fotos-App handelt. In einigen Fällen kann ein Benutzer sowohl die aktualisierte als auch die Vorgängerversion der Fotos-App auf sein Gerät heruntergeladen haben.
Mit der aktualisierten Fotos-App können Sie Ihre Fotos und Videos organisieren, anzeigen und freigeben. Die Fotos-App bietet beispielsweise verschiedene Möglichkeiten zum Gruppieren von Fotos und Videos nach Namen, Aufnahmedatum oder Änderungsdatum sowie in Ordnern, in denen diese Dateien gespeichert werden, z. B. lokal auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert oder über OneDrive, iCloud oder andere Clouddienste mit Ihrem Gerät synchronisiert. Die App ermöglicht es Ihnen auch, Dateien an verschiedene Speicherorte auf Ihrem Computer oder auf OneDrive zu verschieben, zu kopieren oder hochzuladen. Auf der Registerkarte "Alle Fotos" werden Ihre lokal gespeicherten oder synchronisierten Fotos und Videos entsprechend dem Aufnahmedatum angezeigt. Auf der Registerkarte "Favoriten" können Sie Fotos und Videos anzeigen, die Ihnen zuvor gefallen haben oder als Favoriten markiert wurden. Auf der Registerkarte "Ordner" können Sie Fotos oder Videos nach ihrem Speicherort anzeigen. Es gibt auch Registerkarten, auf denen Sie Ihre Fotos und Videos aus verfügbaren Clouddiensten (z. B. OneDrive und anderen Drittanbieterdiensten) anzeigen können, die Sie mit Ihrem Gerät synchronisiert haben.
Mit der Vorgängerversion der Fotos-App können Sie ebenfalls Ihre Fotos und Videos organisieren, anzeigen und freigeben. Wenn Sie die Vorgängerversion verwenden, werden jedoch möglicherweise andere Features angezeigt, die in der neueren Version der Fotos-App nicht verfügbar sind, einschließlich Sammlungen, Alben, Video-Editor und der Einstellung "Personen". Die Registerkarte „Sammlung” zeigt die Fotos und Videos entsprechend dem Aufnahmedatum. Auf der Registerkarte „Alben” können Sie Ihre Fotos und Videos nach Standort und allgemeinen Tags organisieren. Mit dem Video-Editor können Sie Videos bearbeiten, erstellen und freigeben.
Die Einstellung "Personen" kann auf der Seite "Einstellungen" der Vorgängerversion der Fotos-App und auf der Registerkarte "Personen" der App aktiviert werden. Wenn diese Option aktiviert ist, verwendet die Vorgängerversion Gesichtsgruppierungstechnologien, um Ihre Fotos und Videos in Gruppen zu organisieren. Das Feature "Gruppieren" kann Gesichter in einem Foto oder Video erkennen und bestimmen, ob sie Gesichtern in anderen Fotos und Videos in Ihrer lokalen Fotosammlung visuell ähnlich sind. Sie können eine Gesichtsgruppierung mit einem Kontakt aus Ihrer Personen-App verbinden.
Wenn in der Vorgängerversion der Fotos-App aktiviert, bleiben Ihre Gruppierungen so lange auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert, wie Sie die Gruppierungen, Fotos oder Videos behalten möchten. Wenn die Einstellung "Personen" aktiviert ist, werden Sie nach drei Jahren der Nicht-Interaktion mit der Vorgängerversion der Fotos-App gefragt, ob Sie die Gesichtsgruppierungen weiterhin zulassen. Sie können jederzeit zur Seite "Einstellungen" in der Vorgängerversion der Fotos-App gehen, um die Einstellung "Personen" zu aktivieren oder zu deaktivieren. Durch das Deaktivieren dieses Features werden die Gesichtsgruppierungsdaten aus der Vorgängerversion der Fotos-App entfernt, nicht aber Ihre Fotos oder Videos.
Weitere Informationen über die Vorgängerversion der Fotos-App und die Gesichtsgruppierung
.
Wenn Sie ein Foto oder Video über die Fotos-App oder die Vorgängerversion der Fotos-App teilen, sind alle eingebetteten Daten (z. B. Position, Kameramodell und Datum) für die Personen und Dienste zugänglich, mit denen Sie das Foto oder Video teilen.
Kontakte-App
. Mit der Kontakte-App können Sie mit all Ihren Kontakten zentral interagieren. Wenn Sie der Kontakte-App ein Konto hinzufügen, werden Ihre Kontakte aus Ihrem Konto automatisch zur Kontakte-App hinzugefügt. Sie können weitere Konten der Kontakte-App hinzufügen, einschließlich denen von Ihren sozialen Netzwerken (z. B. Facebook und Twitter) und E-Mail-Konten. Wenn Sie ein Konto hinzufügen, werden Sie darüber informiert, welche Daten die Kontakte-App importieren oder mit dem entsprechenden Dienst synchronisieren kann. Anschließend können Sie die hinzuzufügenden Elemente auswählen. Andere Apps, die Sie installieren, können u. U. ebenfalls Daten mit der Kontakte-App synchronisieren, darunter zusätzliche Details zu bestehenden Kontakten. Wenn Sie einen Kontakt in der Kontakte-App anzeigen, werden Informationen über Ihre aktuellen Interaktionen mit dem Kontakt (z. B. E-Mails und Kalenderereignisse, auch von Apps, deren Daten mit der Kontakte-App synchronisiert sind) abgerufen und angezeigt Sie können jederzeit ein Konto aus der Kontakte-App entfernen.
Mail- und Kalender-App
. Mit der Mail- und Kalender-App können Sie alle E-Mails, Kalender und Dateien an einem Ort verknüpfen, einschließlich der von Drittanbieter-E-Mail- und Dateispeicheranbietern. Die App bietet positionsbezogene Dienste, wie z. B. Wetterinformationen in Ihrem Kalender, an. Sie können allerdings die Verwendung Ihrer Standortinformationen durch die App deaktivieren. Wenn Sie der Mail- und Kalender-App ein Konto hinzufügen, werden E-Mails, Kalenderinformationen, Dateien, Kontakte und weitere Einstellungen von Ihrem Konto automatisch mit Ihrem Gerät und den Microsoft-Servern synchronisiert. Sie können jederzeit ein Konto entfernen oder die Daten ändern, die von Ihrem Konto synchronisiert werden. Um ein Konto zu konfigurieren, müssen Sie die Kontozugangsinformationen (wie Ihren Benutzernamen und Ihr Kennwort) in die App eingeben, die über das Internet an Drittanbieter-Server gesendet werden. Die App wird zunächst versuchen, eine sichere Verbindung (SSL) zu verwenden, um Ihr Konto zu konfigurieren, wird jedoch diese Informationen unverschlüsselt senden, wenn Ihr E-Mail-Anbieter SSL nicht unterstützt. Wenn Sie ein Unternehmenskonto (z. B. die E-Mail-Adresse des Geschäfts/Unternehmens) hinzufügen, kann der Besitzer der Organisationsdomäne gewisse Richtlinien und Regelungen implementieren (z. B. eine mehrstufige Authentifizierung oder die Möglichkeit, Daten aus der Ferne zu löschen), die sich auf die Nutzung der App auswirken können. Diese App verwendet Ihre Gerätefunktionen wie Standort und Kamera. Weitere Informationen finden Sie im
Microsoft Store
.
Windows-Anbietermitteilungen (zuvor Microsoft-Nachrichten)-App
. Die Windows-Anbietermitteilungen-App empfängt und zeigt auf Ihrem PC oder Gerät kontobezogene SMS-Nachrichten Ihres Mobilfunkanbieters zu Ihrem Datentarif (z. B. zu Ihren Rechnungen und Datenlimits) an. Diese Nachrichten werden lokal auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert. Auf Ihrem Gerät können Sie auch auf diese Nachrichten zugreifen, sie anzeigen und löschen. Diese App verwendet Ihre Gerätefunktionen wie „Kontakte“. Weitere Informationen finden Sie im Microsoft Store auf Windows.
Die Uhr-App
ist Ihr Dreh- und Angelpunkt für Zeitmanagement und Konzentration auf Windows. Wenn sich die Benutzer mit ihrem Microsoft-Konto anmelden, können sie Microsoft To Do aktivieren, eine mit der Cloud verbundene Benutzeroberfläche. Wenn der Benutzer „Fokussitzung“ aktiviert, werden die Sitzungsdaten lokal gespeichert und der Benutzer kann sie löschen, indem er die Seite mit den Uhreinstellungen aufruft. In Fokussitzungen können Sie außerdem eine Verbindung mit Spotify-Konten herstellen, um Umgebungsgeräusche zu hören, die Benutzern bei der Konzentration helfen. Besuchen Sie
Microsoft Store
, um mehr zu erfahren.
Microsoft Journal
ist eine Windows-Anwendung, die speziell für berührungsempfindliche, stiftfähige Geräte wie Tablets und 2-in-1-Geräte entwickelt wurde. Sie bietet Benutzern die Möglichkeit persönliche Freihand-Notizen zu erstellen. Die App nutzt künstliche Intelligenz (KI) und maschinelles Lernen, um Ihre Handschrift besser zu erkennen und Daten lokal auf Ihrem Gerät zu verarbeiten. Wenn eine Verbindung mit Microsoft 365 besteht (Abonnement erforderlich), können Benutzer nahtlos auf ihren M365-Kalender und ihre Kontakte in der App zugreifen. Alle vom Benutzer erstellten Inhalte werden automatisch am Standardspeicherort in der Dokumentbibliothek zur späteren Referenz gespeichert. Im Journal können Sie auf die Fotobibliothek und die Gerätekamera und das Mikrofon zugreifen, damit Sie sie einer Arbeitsmappe hinzufügen können. Erfahren Sie
hier
mehr über die Journal-App, oder besuchen Sie
Microsoft Store
, um mehr zu erfahren.
Die App
Mobilfunktarife
hilft Ihnen, auf Ihrem Windows 10 PC und 11 LTE-Geräten einfach und an mehr Orten online zu gehen. Bei der Registrierung für einen Datentarif auf Ihrem Gerät wird eine Verbindung mit dem Mobilfunkanbieter hergestellt, so dass Sie Käufe über das Online-Portal des Mobilfunkanbieters tätigen können. Sie benötigen eine unterstützte SIM-Karte, um diese App verwenden zu können. Die Mobilfunktarife-App verwendet Ihre IMEI, IMSI, EID, ICCID und Ihr Land (grober Standort bestimmt durch Mobilfunknetz-ID oder WLAN-Reverse IP), um zu ermitteln, welche Mobilfunkanbieter in Ihrer Region verfügbar sind. Der Mobilfunkanbieter kann Benachrichtigungen über die Mobilfunktarife-App an Benutzer senden. Diese App verwendet die Funktionen Ihres Geräts, z. B. Kamera und Mikrofon. Besuchen Sie
Microsoft Store
, um mehr zu erfahren.
Microsoft PC Manager
ist in ausgewählten Regionen verfügbar und ist ein Desktop-Tool, das die Leistung Ihres PCs steigern soll. Basierend auf Ihrer Anforderung scannt PC Manager Ihr Gerät und ermöglicht es Ihnen, nicht benötigte oder temporäre Dokumente zu löschen, den Cache zu optimieren, unbefugte Änderungen zu stoppen oder wiederherzustellen oder andere Features wie Integritätsprüfung, Boost mit einem Klick, Speicherbereinigung, Datei- und Popup-Verwaltung und Schutz Ihrer Standardeinstellungen zu nutzen.
PC Manager blockiert Popup-Fenster basierend auf den AdBlock-Regeln und den von Ihnen ausgewählten Popup-Fenstern durch die benutzerdefinierte Blockierung. Wenn Sie dem Microsoft PC Manager Popup-Plan zustimmen, können Sie beim Blockieren von Popup-Fenstern durch die benutzerdefinierte Blockierung dazu beitragen, das Popup-Verwaltungsfeature von Microsoft PC Manager zu optimieren, indem Sie Screenshots der Popups machen und diese an Microsoft senden. Microsoft erfasst keine anderen Informationen als Screenshots, den Windows-Titel und die Klasse von Windows. Gesendete Screenshots werden nur für kurze Zeit aufbewahrt und regelmäßig gelöscht. Sie können Ihre Popupplaneinstellungen jederzeit über die PC Manager-Einstellungen verwalten. Das Feedbackfeature in PC Manager verarbeitet möglicherweise auch personenbezogene Daten, wenn Sie sie in das Feedback aufnehmen, das Sie Microsoft bereitstellen. Das Feedback von Benutzern wird nach der Verarbeitung regelmäßig gelöscht. Besuchen Sie
Microsoft Store
, um mehr zu erfahren.
Das
Snipping Tool
ist ein praktisches Dienstprogramm in Windows, das Ihr Mikrofon und Ihre Bilderbibliothek nutzt, um Screenshots und Bildschirmaufnahmen zu erfassen und zu speichern. Das Snipping Tool enthält ein Textaktionsfeature, die die integrierte optische Zeichenerkennung (OCR) unterstützt. Sie können Text mithilfe von OCR direkt aus Bildern auswählen und kopieren. Außerdem können Sie das Textaktionsfeature verwenden, um vertrauliche Informationen aus dem erfassten Text zu entfernen. Mit der Integration der Zwischenablage werden Objekte, die mit dem Snipping Tool kopiert wurden, auch in Ihre Zwischenablage kopiert. Wenn Sie den Zwischenablageverlauf geräteübergreifend aktivieren, kann der kopierte Inhalt nahtlos auf verschiedenen Geräten verwendet werden. Benutzer können ihre Einstellungen für Zwischenablage und Ausschneiden über die Windows-Einstellungen verwalten. Besuchen Sie
Microsoft Store
, um mehr zu erfahren.
Die
Sprachrekorder-App
ist ein vielseitiges Werkzeug, das für die Aufnahme von Audio über Ihr Mikrofon in verschiedenen Szenarien entwickelt wurde. Während der Aufzeichnung können Sie wichtige Augenblicke markieren, um wichtige Abschnitte später leicht zu finden. Sie können Ihre Aufzeichnungen auch zuschneiden, die Lautstärke anpassen oder andere Änderungen vornehmen und sie wiedergeben. Ihre Aufzeichnungen werden automatisch gespeichert und in Ihrem Dokumentenordner abgelegt, so dass Sie leicht darauf zugreifen können, und Sie können Ihre aufgezeichneten Audiodaten mit Freunden und Familie teilen. Besuchen Sie
Microsoft Store
, um mehr zu erfahren.
Microsoft Clipchamp
ist ein Video-Editor, der die Erstellung von Videos erleichtert. Er ermöglicht es Benutzern, Videos, Bilder und Audiodateien zu kombinieren, Text und Effekte hinzuzufügen und das fertige Video auf ihrem Gerät zu speichern oder ihre Videos in ihrem persönlichen OneDrive über ihr Microsoft-Konto zu speichern. Benutzer können auch Stockvideos und Stockmusik- oder Soundeffekte, Stickers, grafische Elemente, Hintergründe und vieles mehr hinzufügen. Benutzer können Clipchamp den Zugriff auf ihre Kamera und ihr Mikrofon erlauben, um Videos direkt von ihrem Gerät aus aufzuzeichnen. Für eine bessere Nutzererfahrung, wie z.B. die Sprachauswahl, die Ihnen angezeigt wird, erfasst Clipchamp Ihren groben Standort. Benutzer können Clipchamp mit einem persönlichen oder familieninternen Microsoft-Konto über die Clipchamp-App für Windows 10 oder Windows 11 und im Edge- oder Chrome-Browser unter
https://app.clipchamp.com
aufrufen.
Medienwiedergabe
ist der standardmäßig eingebaute Player für Multimedia-Dateien (Audio und Video). Wenn Sie eine Multimediadatei öffnen, liest die Medienwiedergabe den Inhalt dieser Datei. Wenn Sie die Medienwiedergabe öffnen, werden die Inhalte Ihrer Musikbibliothek und der Videobibliotheksordner gelesen, um ihre eigenen Musikbibliotheks- und Videobibliotheksseiten innerhalb der Medienwiedergabe aufzufüllen, um Ihnen beim Organisieren, Anzeigen und Wiedergeben von Multimediainhalten zu helfen.
Um Ihre Erfahrung bei der Wiedergabe von Musik zu erweitern, versucht die Medienwiedergabe automatisch, Künstler- und Albumgrafiken für die Inhalte, die Sie wiedergeben, und die Inhalte in Ihrer Musikbibliothek anzuzeigen. Um diese Informationen bereitzustellen, sendet die Medienwiedergabe eine Informationsanforderung an Microsoft, die Standardgerätedaten enthält, z. B. Ihre Geräte-IP-Adresse, die Gerätesoftwareversion, Ihre Regions- und Spracheinstellungen sowie einen Bezeichner für den Inhalt. Falls gewünscht, kann dieses Feature auf der Seite "Einstellungen" der App deaktiviert werden.
Filme & TV.
Microsoft Filme & TV ermöglicht es Ihnen, Filme und TV-Episoden zu leihen oder zu kaufen und auf Ihrem Gerät abzuspielen.
Um Ihnen zu helfen, Inhalte zu entdecken, die Sie interessieren könnten, sammelt Filme & TV Daten darüber, welche Filme und Fernsehsendungen Sie sich ansehen, einschließlich der Spieldauer und aller Bewertungen, die Sie abgeben.
Filme & TV kann auch lokale Videodateien anzeigen und abspielen, die auf Ihrem PC gespeichert sind. Zu diesem Zweck benötigt sie Zugriff auf die Videobibliothek auf Ihrem Gerät.
Windows Media Player Legacy.
Wenn Sie Windows Media Player Legacy verwenden, kann es Medieninhalte wie Video-, Audio- und Bilddateien lesen, sodass Sie CDs und andere digitale Inhalte (z. B. Video- und Audiodateien) wiedergeben, CDs kopieren und Ihre Medienbibliothek verwalten können. Um Ihre Erfahrung beim Wiedergeben von Inhalten in Ihrer Bibliothek zu erweitern, zeigt Windows Media Player Legacy verwandte Medieninformationen an, z. B. Albumtitel, Songtitel, Albumgrafik, Interpret und Komponist. Um die Medieninformationen zu bereichern, sendet Windows Media Player Legacy eine Anfrage an Microsoft, die Standardcomputerinformationen enthält, einen Bezeichner für die Medieninhalte und bereits in der Windows Media Player Legacy-Bibliothek enthaltene Medieninformationen (einschließlich von Ihnen bearbeitete und eingegebene Informationen), damit Microsoft den Titel erkennt und zusätzliche verfügbare Informationen darüber zurück gibt.
Windows Media Player Legacy gibt ebenfalls Inhalte wieder, die über ein Netzwerk gestreamt werden. Um diesen Dienst bereitzustellen, muss Windows Media Player Legacy mit einem Streamingmedienserver kommunizieren. Diese Server werden in der Regel von einem anderen Inhaltsanbieter als Microsoft betrieben. Während der Medienstreamingwiedergabe sendet Windows Media Player Legacy ein Protokoll an den Medienserver oder an andere Webserver, wenn der Streamingmedienserver dies anfordert. Das Protokoll enthält folgende Informationen: Verbindungszeit, IP-Adresse, Betriebssystemversion, Windows Media Player Legacy-Version, Player-ID (Player-ID), Datum und Protokoll. Um Ihre Privatsphäre zu schützen, sendet Windows Media Player Legacy standardmäßig eine Player-ID, die für jede Sitzung unterschiedlich ist.
Zurück zum Anfang
Windows Hello
Windows Hello bietet über die biometrische Authentifizierung einen sofortigen Zugriff auf Ihre Geräte. Wenn Sie die Funktion aktivieren, verwendet Windows Hello ein Bild Ihres Gesichts, Ihres Fingerabdrucks oder Ihrer Iris, um Sie anhand einer Reihe von eindeutigen Punkten oder Merkmalen, die aus dem Bild extrahiert und auf Ihrem Gerät als Vorlage gespeichert werden, zu identifizieren – das tatsächliche Bild Ihres Gesichts, Ihrer Iris oder Ihres Fingerabdrucks wird nicht gespeichert. Biometrische Überprüfungsdaten, die bei der Anmeldung verwendet werden, verlassen Ihr Gerät nicht. Ihre biometrischen Überprüfungsdaten verbleiben auf Ihrem Gerät, bis Sie sie entfernen. Nach einem längeren Zeitraum Windows Hello Inaktivität werden Sie jedoch aufgefordert zu bestätigen, dass Sie Ihre biometrischen Überprüfungsdaten weiterhin speichern möchten. Sie können Ihre biometrischen Überprüfungsdaten aus den Einstellungen löschen. Erfahren Sie mehr über
Windows Hello
.
Zurück zum Anfang
Windows Search
Mit Windows Search können Sie eigene Informationen sowie das Web von einer Stelle aus durchsuchen. Wenn Sie Windows Search zur "persönlichen Suche" verwenden, werden Ergebnisse für Elemente zurückgegeben, die sich auf Ihrem persönlichen OneDrive, Ihrem OneDrive for Business (wenn aktiviert), auf anderen Cloud-Speicheranbietern (sofern diese Anbieter von Drittanbietern unterstützt werden) und auf Ihrem Gerät befinden. Wenn Sie Windows Search dazu nutzen, das Web zu durchsuchen oder Suchvorschläge über Windows Search zu erhalten, werden die Suchergebnisse von Bing bereitgestellt. Ihre Suchabfrage wird wie im Abschnitt
Bing
dieser Datenschutzbestimmungen beschrieben behandelt.
Weitere Informationen über die Suche in Windows
.
Zusammenfassung anzeigen
Weitere Infos
Zurück zum Anfang
Unterhaltung und ähnliche Dienste
Unterhaltung und ähnliche Dienste bieten eine komplexe Erfahrung und ermöglichen es Ihnen, auf eine Vielzahl von Inhalten, Anwendungen und Spielen zuzugreifen.
Unterhaltung und ähnliche Dienste bieten eine komplexe Erfahrung und ermöglichen es Ihnen, auf eine Vielzahl von Inhalten, Anwendungen und Spielen zuzugreifen.
Xbox
Das Xbox-Netzwerk ist der Online-Spiel- und Unterhaltungsdienst von Microsoft, der aus Software besteht und Online-Erfahrungen über verschiedene Plattformen hinweg ermöglicht. Mit diesem Dienst können Sie Spiele suchen und spielen, Inhalte anzeigen und sich mit Freunden auf Xbox und anderen Spiel- und sozialen Netzwerken verbinden.
Wenn Sie sich für ein Xbox-Profil registrieren, weisen wir Ihnen einen Gamertag (einen öffentlichen Spitznamen) und einen eindeutigen Bezeichner zu. Wenn Sie sich bei Xbox-Geräten, -Apps oder -Diensten anmelden, werden die Daten, die wir über Ihre Nutzung sammeln, unter Verwendung dieser eindeutigen ID(s) gespeichert.
Xbox-Konsolen sind Geräte, mit denen Sie Spiele, Filme, Musik und andere digitale Unterhaltung finden und abspielen können. Wenn Sie sich bei Xbox-Erfahrungen – in Apps oder auf einer Konsole – anmelden, weisen wir Ihrem Gerät ebenfalls eine eindeutige ID zu. Wenn Ihre Xbox-Konsole beispielsweise mit dem Internet verbunden ist, und Sie melden sich bei der Konsole an, dann stellen wir fest, welche Konsole und welche Version des Betriebssystems der Konsole Sie verwenden.
Zu den Daten, die wir über Ihre Nutzung von Xbox-Diensten, -Spielen, -Apps und -Konsolen erheben
, gehören:
Wenn Sie sich bei Xbox an- und abmelden, alle getätigten Einkäufe und die erhaltenen Inhalte.
Welche Spiele Sie spielen und welche Apps Sie verwenden, Ihr Spielfortschritt, Erfolge, Spielzeit pro Spiel und andere Spielstatistiken.
Leistungsdaten über Xbox-Konsolen, Xbox Game Pass und andere Xbox-Apps, das Xbox-Netzwerk, verbundenes Zubehör und Ihre Netzwerkverbindung, einschließlich Software- oder Hardware-Fehler.
Inhalte, die Sie über das Xbox-Netzwerk hinzufügen, hochladen oder teilen, einschließlich SMS, Bilder und Videos, die Sie in Spielen und Apps erfassen.
Soziale Aktivitäten, einschließlich Chatdaten und Interaktionen mit anderen Spielern und Verbindungen (von Ihnen hinzugefügte Freunde und Personen, die Ihnen folgen), die sie im Xbox-Netzwerk machen.
Wenn Sie sich auf einem anderen Gerät anmelden, das auf das Xbox-Netzwerk zugreifen kann, und dieses Gerät ein Speichergerät (Festplatte oder Speichereinheit) enthält, werden die Nutzungsdaten auf dem Speichergerät gespeichert und an Microsoft gesendet, wenn Sie sich das nächste Mal bei Xbox anmelden, auch wenn Sie offline gespielt haben.
Die von uns gesammelten Daten ermöglichen es uns, Ihnen unsere Dienste und zusammengestellte Erfahrungen bereitzustellen. Dazu gehört, Ihnen Spiele, Inhalte und Dienste vorzuschlagen sowie Ihnen Angebote, Rabatte und Empfehlungen zu präsentieren. Um Ihre Einstellungen für diese Empfehlungen zu ändern, besuchen Sie die Seite
Xbox Online-Sicherheit und Datenschutzeinstellungen
.
Kamera und Mikrofon
. Während der Nutzung der Xbox können die Spieler die Funktionen des Geräts wie Mikrofon, Kamera und Bildschirmaufnahme nutzen, um ihre Spielerfahrung zu verbessern. Wenn ein Xbox-Spiel im Windows Game Bar gespielt wird, können die Kamera und das Mikrofon verwendet werden, einschließlich zum Lesen von Fotos und Videos sowie zum Aufnehmen und Aufzeichnen von Screenshots.
Xbox-Diagnosedaten
. Diagnosedaten haben zwei Kategorien: erforderlich und optional.
Erforderlich
. Xbox sendet erforderliche Daten an Microsoft. Die Daten, die mindestens erforderlich sind, um Xbox zu schützen, auf dem neuesten Stand zu halten und dafür zu sorgen, dass sie ordnungsgemäß funktioniert.
Optional
. Optionale Daten sind zusätzliche Daten, die Sie mit Microsoft teilen können. Optionale Daten können zusätzliche Details zu Betrieb, Nutzung und Leistung Ihrer Xbox-Produkte und -Dienste sowie erweiterte Fehlerberichte enthalten.
Weitere Informationen finden Sie unter
Einstellungen für die optionale Datenfreigabe verwalten
.
Spielaufzeichnungen
. Jeder Spieler in einer Multiplayer-Spielsitzung kann Video (Spiel-Clips) aufzeichnen und Screenshots von ihrer Ansicht des Spiels erfassen. Die Spiele-Clips und Screenshots anderer Player können während dieser Sitzung Ihren In-Game-Charakter und Gamertag erfassen. Wenn ein Player Spiele-Clips und Screenshots auf einem PC aufzeichnet, können die resultierenden Spiele-Clips auch Audiochats erfassen.
Untertitel
. Bei Xbox Echtzeit- („Party“) Chat können Spieler ein Sprache-zu-Text-Feature aktivieren, das es ihnen ermöglicht, diesen Chat als SMS anzuzeigen. Wenn ein Player dieses Feature aktiviert, wird die gesamte Sprachkommunikation in der Gruppe für den Player untertitelt. Microsoft verwendet die resultierenden SMS-Daten, um Untertitel für Benutzer zu erstellen, die diese benötigen, sowie für andere in dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie beschriebene Zwecke.
Xbox-Daten, die von anderen angezeigt werden können
. Ihr Gamertag, die Spiel- und Wiedergabestatistiken, Erfolge, Präsenz (ob Sie gerade bei Xbox Live angemeldet sind), Inhalte, die Sie teilen, und andere Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten auf Xbox können eingesehen werden von:
Andere Player, die bei Xbox angemeldet sind.
Kunden von Drittanbietern, mit denen Sie Ihr Profil verknüpft haben, oder
Andere mit Xbox verknüpfte Dienste (einschließlich derjenigen der Partnerunternehmen).
Zum Beispiel gelten Ihr Gamertag und Ihre Punktzahlen, die auf Spiele-Bestenlisten angezeigt werden, als öffentlich und können nicht verborgen werden. Für andere Daten können Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen auf den Konsolen und auf
Xbox.com
anpassen, um einzuschränken oder zu blockieren, was mit der Öffentlichkeit oder mit Freunden geteilt wird.
Weitere Informationen finden Sie unter
Xbox Online-Sicherheit und Datenschutzeinstellungen
.
Freigabe von Xbox-Daten an Drittanbieter, einschließlich Spiele- und App-Herausgebern
. Wenn Sie ein Xbox-Onlinespiel oder eine mit dem Netzwerk verbundene App auf Ihrer Xbox-Konsole, Ihrem PC oder Mobilgerät verwenden, hat der Herausgeber dieses Spiels oder dieser Anwendung Zugriff auf Daten über Ihre Nutzung, um den Herausgeber bei der Bereitstellung, Unterstützung und Verbesserung seines Produkts zu unterstützen. Diesen Daten können umfassen: Ihre Xbox-Benutzer-ID, Gamertag, eingeschränkte Kontoinformationen wie Land/Region und Altersgruppe, Daten über Ihre Kommunikation im Spiel, alle Xbox Durchsetzungsaktivitäten, Spielsitzungen (z. B. im Spiel ausgeführte Spielzüge, im Spiel verwendete Fahrzeugtypen), Ihre Präsenz im Xbox-Netzwerk, die Zeit, die Sie mit dem Spiel oder der App verbringen, Ranglisten, Statistiken, Spielerprofile, Avatare oder Gamerpics, Freundeslisten, Aktivitätsfeeds für offizielle Clubs, denen Sie angehören, offizielle Clubmitgliedschaften und alle Inhalte, die Sie im Spiel oder in der App erstellen oder übermitteln.
Drittanbieter, die Spiele und Apps herausgeben und entwickeln, haben eine eigene und unabhängige Beziehung zu den Benutzern und die Erhebung und Verwendung personenbezogener Daten unterliegt den spezifischen Datenschutzrichtlinien dieser Dritten. Sie sollten deren Richtlinien sorgfältig überprüfen, um festzustellen, wie Ihre Daten verwendet werden. Herausgeber können beispielsweise Spieldaten über ihre eigenen Dienste offenlegen oder anzeigen (z. B. in Bestenlisten). Sie finden ihre Richtlinien möglicherweise über Links von den Spiel- oder App-Detailseiten im Microsoft Store.
Erfahren Sie mehr unter
Datenfreigabe mit Spielen und Apps
.
Um die Freigabe von Spiel- oder App-Daten für einen Herausgeber zu beenden, entfernen Sie dessen Spiele oder Apps von allen Geräten, auf denen sie installiert sind. Einigen Verlagen kann der Zugriff auf Ihre Daten unter
https://microsoft.com/consent
entzogen werden.
Kinder und Familie
. Wenn Sie Kinder haben, die das Xbox-Netzwerk benutzen möchten, können Sie Kinder- oder Jugendprofile für sie einrichten, sobald sie Microsoft-Konten haben. Erwachsene Organisatoren in Ihrer Microsoft-Familiengruppe können Zustimmungsentscheidungen und Online-Sicherheitseinstellungen für Kinder- und Jugendprofile auf
Xbox.com
ändern.
Erfahren Sie mehr über Microsoft-Familiengruppen unter
Vereinfachen Sie das Leben Ihrer Familie
.
Weitere Informationen zur Verwaltung von Xbox-Profilen finden Sie unter
Xbox Online-Sicherheit und Datenschutzeinstellungen
.
Weitere Informationen über die Erfassung von Daten von Kindern durch Microsoft, einschließlich Xbox, finden Sie im Abschnitt
Erfassung von Daten von Kindern
in dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Sicherheit
. Um dazu beizutragen, das Xbox-Netzwerk zu einer sicheren Spielumgebung zu machen und die Community-Standards für Xbox durchzusetzen, können wir Sprache, Text, Bilder, Videos und spielinterne Inhalte (z. B. Spielclips, die Sie hochladen, Unterhaltungen, die Sie führen, und Dinge, die Sie in Clubs und Spielen posten) sammeln und überprüfen.
Anti-Cheat und Betrugsverhütung
. Die Bereitstellung einer fairen Spielumgebung ist uns sehr wichtig. Wir verbieten Betrug, Hacking, Kontodiebstahl und jegliche andere nicht autorisierte oder betrügerische Aktivitäten, wenn Sie ein Xbox-Online-Spiel oder eine netzwerkverbundene App auf Ihrer Xbox Konsole, Ihrem PC oder Mobilgerät verwenden. Zur Erkennung und Verhinderung von Betrug und Täuschung setzen wir u. U. diesem Zweck dienende Tools, Anwendungen und andere Technologien ein. Solche Technologien erstellen u. U. digitale Signaturen (als “Hashes” bezeichnet) aus bestimmten Informationen, die von Ihrer Xbox-Konsole, Ihrem PC oder Mobilgerät sowie dazu, wie Sie das jeweilige Gerät verwenden, erfasst werden. Dies kann Informationen über den Browser, das Gerät, Aktivitäten, Spiel-IDs und das Betriebssystem umfassen.
Legacy
.
Xbox 360
. Diese Xbox-Konsole sammelt begrenzte erforderliche Diagnosedaten, damit Ihre Konsole wie erwartet funktioniert, während Sie eine Konsole verwenden, die mit dem Xbox-Netzwerk verbunden ist.
Kinect
. Der Kinect Sensor ist eine Kombination aus Kamera, Mikrofon und Infrarot-Sensor, die es ermöglicht, Bewegungen und Stimme zur Steuerung des Spielverlaufs zu nutzen. Zum Beispiel:
Wenn ihr wollt, könnt ihr euch mit der Kamera über die Gesichtserkennung automatisch im Xbox-Netzwerk anmelden. Diese Daten verbleiben auf der Konsole und werden nicht an Dritte weitergegeben, und Sie können sich jederzeit dazu entscheiden, diese Daten von der Konsole zu löschen.
Beim Spielen bildet Kinect die Abstände zwischen den Gelenken Ihres Körpers ab, um eine Strichmännchen-Darstellung von Ihnen zu erstellen, die Kinect beim Spielen unterstützt.
Mit dem Kinect-Mikrofon kann während des Spiels ein Voice-Chat zwischen den Spielern stattfinden. Das Mikrofon ermöglicht auch Sprachbefehle zur Steuerung der Konsole, des Spiels oder der App oder zur Eingabe von Suchbegriffen.
Kinect Sensor kann auch für die Audio- und Videokommunikation über Dienste wie Skype verwendet werden.
Erfahren Sie mehr über Kinect unter
Xbox Kinect und Datenschutz
.
Zurück zum Anfang
Microsoft Store
Der Microsoft Store ist ein Onlinedienst, auf den Sie über einen PC, die Xbox-Konsole und die Xbox App zugreifen können und mit dem Sie Anwendungen und andere digitale Inhalte durchsuchen, herunterladen, kaufen, bewerten und überprüfen können. Es enthält Folgendes:
Apps und Inhalte für Windows-Geräte, wie z. B. Mobiltelefone, PCs und Tablets,
Spiele, Abonnements und andere Apps für Xbox-Konsolen und andere Geräte.
Produkte und Apps für Microsoft 365, SharePoint, Exchange, Access und Project (alle ab Version 2013).
Wir erfassen Daten zu Ihrem Zugriff auf den Microsoft Store und die von Ihnen angezeigten, gekauften oder installierten Produkte, zu den Präferenzen, die Sie für das Anzeigen von Apps im Microsoft Store festgelegt haben, sowie zu allen Bewertungen, Beurteilungen und Problemberichten, die Sie übermitteln. Ihr Microsoft-Konto ist mit Ihren Bewertungen und Beurteilungen verbunden, und sobald Sie eine Beurteilung verfassen, wird der Name und das Bild von Ihrem Microsoft-Konto gemeinsam mit Ihrer Beurteilung veröffentlicht. Der Microsoft Store verwendet die auf Ihrem Gerät konfigurierte Region, um relevante und geeignete Inhalte und Werbemittel anzuzeigen. Der Microsoft Store verwendet Ihre Geräte-ID, um die an ein bestimmtes Gerät gebundenen Produktrechte zu verwalten.
Berechtigung für Microsoft Store-Apps
. Viele Apps, die Sie aus dem Microsoft Store installieren, sind so konzipiert, dass sie Vorteile aus den Hardware- und Software-Features Ihres Gerätes ziehen. Die Verwendung bestimmter Hardware- und Softwarefunktionen durch eine App kann sowohl der App als auch dem damit verbundenen Dienst Zugriff auf Ihre Daten geben. Zum Beispiel könnte eine Fotobearbeitungs-App auf Ihr Gerät zugreifen, um Ihnen zu ermöglichen, ein neues Foto zu machen oder auf gespeicherte Fotos oder Videos auf Ihrem Gerät zum Zwecke der Bearbeitung zuzugreifen, und ein Restaurantführer könnte anhand Ihres Standorts Empfehlungen für die Umgebung anbieten. Informationen zu den Funktionen, die von einer App verwendet werden, sind in der App-Produktbeschreibungsseite im Microsoft Store erhältlich. Viele der von den Microsoft Store-Apps verwendeten Features können in den Datenschutzeinstellungen Ihres Gerätes aktiviert und deaktiviert werden. Unter Windows können Sie in vielen Fällen auswählen, welche Apps eine bestimmte Funktion verwenden können. Gehen Sie zu
Start > Einstellungen > Datenschutz oder Datenschutz & Sicherheit
, wählen Sie die Funktion (z. B. Kalender) und wählen Sie dann, welche App-Berechtigungen aktiviert oder deaktiviert sind. Die Listen der Apps in den Windows-Datenschutzeinstellungen, die Hardware- und Software-Features verwenden können, enthalten nicht die "klassischen Windows"-Apps, und diese sind nicht von den Einstellungen betroffen.
App-Updates
. Sofern Sie die automatischen App-Updates in den entsprechenden Microsoft Store-Einstellungen nicht deaktiviert haben oder eine vom App-Entwickler bereitgestellte und aktualisierte App erworben haben, sucht der Microsoft Store automatisch nach App-Updates, lädt diese herunter und installiert sie, um sicherzustellen, dass Sie über die neuesten Versionen verfügen. Aktualisierte Apps können möglicherweise unterschiedliche Windows-Hardware- und Softwarefunktionen aus früheren Versionen verwenden, die ihnen einen Zugang zu unterschiedlichen Daten auf Ihrem Gerät geben können. Sie werden zur Zustimmung aufgefordert, sobald eine aktualisierte App auf bestimmte Funktionen wie zum Beispiel den Standort zugreifen möchte. Sie können auch die von einer App verwendeten Hardware- und Softwarefeatures überprüfen, indem Sie sich die Produktbeschreibungsseite im Microsoft Store ansehen.
Jede Nutzung Ihrer Daten durch eine App, die durch eine dieser Funktionen gesammelt wurden, unterliegt den Datenschutzbestimmungen des jeweiligen App-Entwicklers. Wenn eine über den Microsoft Store erhältliche App Ihre personenbezogenen Daten sammelt und verwendet, wird vom App-Entwickler verlangt, eine Datenschutzrichtlinie zur Verfügung zu stellen, und ein Link zu der Datenschutzrichtlinie ist auf der App-Produktbeschreibungsseite im Microsoft Store verfügbar.
Quergeladene Apps und Entwicklermodus
. Entwickler-Features wie die "Entwicklermodus"-Einstellung sind nur für den Entwicklungsgebrauch bestimmt. Wenn Sie Entwicklerfunktionen aktivieren, kann Ihr Gerät unzuverlässig oder unbrauchbar werden, und Sie Sicherheitsrisiken aussetzen. Mit dem Herunterladen oder dem anderweitigen Erwerb von Apps außerhalb des Microsoft Stores, auch "Querladen" von Apps genannt, können Ihr Gerät und Ihre personenbezogenen Daten anfälliger für einen Angriff oder eine unvorhergesehene Verwendung durch Apps werden. Windows-Richtlinien, Benachrichtigungen, Berechtigungen und andere Funktionen zum Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre beim Zugriff von Apps auf Ihre Daten funktionieren möglicherweise nicht wie in diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen beschrieben, wenn Entwicklerfunktionen aktiviert sind oder Apps quergeladen werden.
Zurück zum Anfang
Microsoft Start
Microsoft Start (früher bekannt als MSN oder Microsoft News) ist ein Inhaltsdienst, der Nachrichten, Wetter, Sport und Finanzen umfasst. Die Microsoft Start-App ist auf verschiedenen Plattformen wie iOS und Android verfügbar. Der Microsoft Start-Dienst ist auch in anderen Microsoft-Diensten enthalten, einschließlich des Microsoft Edge-Browsers und Widgets auf Windows.
Bei der Installation der Apps Microsoft Start, MSN Wetter oder Microsoft News erfassen wir Daten, die uns Aufschluss darüber geben, ob die App ordnungsgemäß installiert wurde, sowie das Installationsdatum, die App-Version und andere Daten über Ihr Gerät wie das Betriebssystem und den Browser. Diese Daten werden auf einer regelmäßigen Basis erhoben, die uns dabei hilft, die Anzahl der Benutzer von Apps zu bestimmen und Leistungsprobleme im Zusammenhang mit verschiedenen App-Versionen, Betriebssystemen und Browsern zu identifizieren. Wenn Sie die Wetter-App verwenden, verwenden wir Ihren Standort, um Ihnen relevante Wetterinhalte bereitzustellen.
Wir erheben auch Daten darüber, wie Sie Ihre Microsoft Start-Inhalte nutzen, zum Beispiel Nutzungshäufigkeit und angezeigte Inhalte, um Ihnen relevante Inhalte bereitzustellen. Microsoft Start bietet eine erweiterte Erfahrungsmöglichkeit an, sobald Sie sich mit Ihrem Microsoft-Konto anmelden, einschließlich der Möglichkeit, Ihre Interessen und Favoriten anzupassen. Wir verwenden Ihren Standort, um Ihnen relevante Inhalte wie lokales Wetter und Nachrichten bereitzustellen. Sie können die Personalisierung über Microsoft Start- und Bing-Einstellungen sowie über Einstellungen in anderen Microsoft-Diensten, die Microsoft Start-Dienste enthalten, anpassen. Die Daten werden von uns auch dafür erhoben, um Sie mit Werbung zu versorgen, die für Sie von Interesse sein könnte. Sie können die interessenbezogene Werbung über die Werbelinks in den Microsoft Start-Diensten oder auf der Microsoft-
Kündigungsseite
deaktivieren.
Frühere Versionen von MSN Finanzen ermöglichen es Ihnen, auf persönliche Finanzinformationen von Drittanbieter-Finanzinstituten zuzugreifen. MSN Finanzen zeigt diese Informationen lediglich an, speichert sie jedoch nicht auf unseren Servern. Ihre Anmeldeinformationen für den Zugang zu Ihren finanziellen Informationen von Drittanbietern sind auf Ihrem PC verschlüsselt und werden nicht an Microsoft übermittelt. Diese Finanzinstitute sowie alle anderen Dienste von Drittanbietern auf welche Sie über MSN-Dienste zugreifen können, unterliegen deren eigenen Bedingungen und Datenschutzrichtlinien.
Zurück zum Anfang
Silverlight
Microsoft Silverlight hilft Ihnen, auf reichhaltige Inhalte im Web zuzugreifen und diese zu genießen. Silverlight ermöglicht es Websites und Diensten Daten auf Ihrem Gerät zu speichern. Weitere Silverlight-Funktionen beinhalten das Einrichten einer Verbindung zu Microsoft, um Aktualisierungen zu erhalten oder zu Microsoft oder zu Servern von Drittanbietern, um geschützte digitale Inhalte wiederzugeben.
Silverlight-Konfigurationstool
. Sie können eine Auswahl für diese Features im Silverlight-Konfigurationstool vornehmen. Um das Silverlight-Konfigurationstool aufzurufen, klicken Sie mit der rechten Maustaste auf den Inhalt, der gerade von Silverlight angezeigt wird, und wählen Sie
Silverlight
. Sie können das Silverlight-Konfigurationstool auch direkt ausführen. In Windows können Sie beispielsweise auf das Tool zugreifen, indem Sie nach "Microsoft Silverlight" suchen.
Silverlight-Anwendungsspeicher
. Silverlight-basierte Apps können Datendateien lokal auf Ihrem Computer für eine Vielzahl von Zwecken abspeichern, einschließlich dem Speichern Ihrer benutzerdefinierten Einstellungen, dem Speichern von großen Dateien für grafikintensive Features (z. B. Spiele, Karten und Bilder) sowie dem Speichern von Inhalten, die Sie innerhalb bestimmter Anwendungen erstellen. Sie können den Anwendungsspeicher im Silverlight-Konfigurationstool deaktivieren oder konfigurieren.
Silverlight-Updates
. Silverlight wird in regelmäßigen Abständen einen Microsoft-Server auf Updates überprüfen, um Ihnen die neuesten Features und Verbesserungen zur Verfügung zu stellen. Eine kleine Datei, die Informationen über die aktuelle Silverlight-Version enthält, wird auf Ihren Computer heruntergeladen und mit Ihrer aktuell installierten Version verglichen. Falls eine neuere Version verfügbar ist, wird diese heruntergeladen und auf Ihrem Computer installiert. Sie können im Silverlight-Konfigurationstool Updates konfigurieren oder deaktivieren.
Digital Rights Management
. Silverlight verwendet Microsoft Digital Rights Management (DRM), um die Rechte der Eigentümer von Inhalten zu schützen. Wenn Sie auf DRM-geschützte Inhalte (wie Musik oder Video) mittels Silverlight zugreifen, wird es Mediennutzungsrechte von einem Rechteserver im Internet beantragen. Um ein nahtloses Wiedergabeerlebnis zu ermöglichen, erhalten Sie keine Aufforderung, bevor Silverlight die Anforderung an den Rechteserver sendet. Während des Anforderns von Mediennutzungsrechten wird Silverlight dem Rechteserver eine ID für die DRM-geschützte Inhaltsdatei sowie grundlegende Daten über Ihr Gerät zur Verfügung stellen, einschließlich der Daten über die DRM-Komponenten auf Ihrem Gerät wie Version und Sicherheitsstufen sowie einen eindeutigen Bezeichner für Ihr Gerät.
DRM-Updates
. In einigen Fällen kann der Zugriff auf DRM-geschützte Inhalte ein Update für Silverlight oder für die DRM-Komponenten des Gerätes erforderlich machen. Wenn Sie versuchen, Inhalte abzuspielen, die ein DRM-Update erfordern, wird Silverlight eine Anfrage an einen Microsoft-Server senden, die grundlegende Daten über Ihr Gerät, einschließlich Informationen über die DRM-Komponenten auf Ihrem Computer wie Version und Sicherheitsstufen, Daten zur Problembehandlung sowie einen eindeutigen Bezeichner für Ihr Gerät enthält. Der Microsoft-Server verwendet diesen Bezeichner, um eine eindeutige DRM-Aktualisierung für Ihr Gerät zurückzugeben, die dann von Silverlight installiert wird. Sie können DRM-Komponenten-Updates auf der Registerkarte
Wiedergabe
im Silverlight-Konfigurationstool deaktivieren oder konfigurieren.
Zurück zum Anfang
Windows Mixed Reality
Mit Windows Mixed Reality können Sie eine Virtual-Reality-Oberfläche aktivieren, die Sie in Apps und Spiele eintauchen lässt. Mixed Reality verwendet die Kamera, das Mikrofon und die Infrarotsensoren eines kompatiblen Headsets, damit Bewegungen und Stimme zur Steuerung des Spielverlaufs und zur Navigation von Apps und Spielen verwendet werden können.
Microsoft sammelt Diagnosedaten, um Probleme zu lösen und um Mixed Reality unter Windows auf dem neuesten Stand, sicher und funktionstüchtig zu halten. Diagnosedaten helfen uns auch bei der Verbesserung von Mixed Reality und verwandten Microsoft-Produkten und -Diensten, je nachdem, welche Diagnosedateneinstellungen Sie für Ihr Gerät ausgewählt haben.
Weitere Informationen über Windows-Diagnosedaten
.
Mixed Reality verarbeitet und sammelt auch Daten, die sich speziell auf die Mixed Reality-Erfahrungen beziehen, wie z. B:
Mixed Reality bildet Abstände zwischen den Gelenken Ihres Körpers ab, um eine Strichmännchendarstellung von Ihnen zu erstellen. Wenn Sie mit dem Internet verbunden sind, sammeln wir diese numerischen Werte, um Ihre Erfahrung zu ermöglichen und zu verbessern.
Mixed Reality erkennt spezifische Handgesten, mit denen einfache Systeminteraktionen (wie Menünavigation, Schwenken/Zoomen und Scrollen) durchgeführt werden sollen. Diese Daten werden auf Ihrem PC verarbeitet und nicht gespeichert.
Die Mikrofone des Headsets ermöglichen Sprachbefehle zur Steuerung von Spielen, Apps oder zur Eingabe von Suchbegriffen.
Weitere Informationen über Sprachdatenerfassung
.
Windows Mixed Reality kann auch für Audio- und Videokommunikation über Dienste wie Skype verwendet werden.
Zusammenfassung anzeigen
Weitere Infos
Zurück zum Anfang
Zurück nach oben
Sub-policy 20
https://zoom.us/docs/de-de/privacy-and-legal.html:
Trust Center
Security, Privacy, Blogs
Additional Resources
Zoom Trust Center
Klicken Sie
hier
, um mehr darüber zu erfahren, wie Sie Ihre Meetings vor Störungen schützen und wie Sie Meetings bei Bedarf aussetzen können.
Nahtlose Zusammenarbeit, sichere Erfahrungen.
Verstehen Sie, wie Vertrauen alles beeinflusst, was wir bei Zoom tun.
Sicherheit
Datenschutz
Zertifizierungen und Testate
Vertrauen und Sicherheit
Rechtliche Bestimmungen
Preisgekrönte Produkte und Sicherheitsexperten
90-Tage-Sicherheitsplan
2021
Cutting Edge Security
Team of the Year
2022
Best Pandemic Pivot
2022
Compliance
Datenschutzbenachrichtigungen in
Zoom Produkten
2022
Power 100
Tammie Kim
2022
Datenschutzbenachrichtigungen in
Zoom Produkten
2022
Hot Company
Verschlüsselung
2021
Führung in der
Cyber-Branche
Max Krohn, Head of <br/ > Security Engineering
2021
Verschlüsselung – Mittelgroße
Unternehmen
2021
90-Tage-Sicherheitsplan
2021
Cutting Edge Security
Team of the Year
2022
Best Pandemic Pivot
2022
Compliance
Datenschutzbenachrichtigungen in
Zoom Produkten
2022
Power 100
Tammie Kim
2022
Datenschutzbenachrichtigungen in
Zoom Produkten
2022
Hot Company
Verschlüsselung
2021
Führung in der
Cyber-Branche
Max Krohn, Head of <br/ > Security Engineering
2021
Verschlüsselung – Mittelgroße
Unternehmen
2021
90-Tage-Sicherheitsplan
2021
Previous
„Zoom hat großartige Arbeit geleistet, um das am einfachsten zu bedienende Produkt der Branche zu entwickeln und gleichzeitig die beste Sicherheit der Branche zu gewährleisten. Zoom-Kunden können davon ausgehen, dass sie weiterhin mit Zoom unterwegs sein können und ihre Daten nicht gefährdet werden, da Zoom Sicherheit ernst nimmt.“
Zeus Kerravala, Gründer und Hauptanalyst bei ZK Research
„Die Balance zwischen Sicherheit und Benutzerfreundlichkeit ist ein echter Drahtseilakt, aber ich finde, das Team hat das gut hinbekommen.“
Cy Fenton, Chief Security and Privacy Officer, Globale Infrastruktur, SVP Ralph Lauren
„Der Zugang zur End-to-End-Verschlüsselung über Zoom wird vielen Menschen gefallen. Das ist etwas, was es bei Teams nicht gibt und das Zoom ein weiteres Alleinstellungsmerkmal für die Erweiterung seines Funktionsportfolios verschafft.“
Kate O'Flaherty, Senior Cybersecurity Contributor bei Forbes
„Zoom setzt meiner Meinung nach branchenweit neue Maßstäbe und bietet ein Produkt, das nicht nur mindestens so sicher ist wie die Produkte von Wettbewerbern, sondern außerdem die vorhandenen Sicherheitsmechanismen so einsetzt, dass weder Funktionsumfang noch Benutzerfreundlichkeit leiden.“
Jenseits der lauten Debatte – 7 Gründe, warum es sicher ist, Zoom zu verwenden
von Rowan Trollope
„Die heutigen Plattformen zur Zusammenarbeit verlangen ein Höchstmaß an Sicherheit. Zoom hat für seine einfach zu bedienende Plattform ein starkes Set an erweiterten Sicherheitsfunktionen entwickelt, mit denen sich jeder Anwender sicher und wohl fühlen sollte.“
Roopam Jain, Senior Director – ICT
„Zoom hat großartige Arbeit geleistet, um das am einfachsten zu bedienende Produkt der Branche zu entwickeln und gleichzeitig die beste Sicherheit der Branche zu gewährleisten. Zoom-Kunden können davon ausgehen, dass sie weiterhin mit Zoom unterwegs sein können und ihre Daten nicht gefährdet werden, da Zoom Sicherheit ernst nimmt.“
Zeus Kerravala, Gründer und Hauptanalyst bei ZK Research
„Die Balance zwischen Sicherheit und Benutzerfreundlichkeit ist ein echter Drahtseilakt, aber ich finde, das Team hat das gut hinbekommen.“
Cy Fenton, Chief Security and Privacy Officer, Globale Infrastruktur, SVP Ralph Lauren
„Der Zugang zur End-to-End-Verschlüsselung über Zoom wird vielen Menschen gefallen. Das ist etwas, was es bei Teams nicht gibt und das Zoom ein weiteres Alleinstellungsmerkmal für die Erweiterung seines Funktionsportfolios verschafft.“
Kate O'Flaherty, Senior Cybersecurity Contributor bei Forbes
„Zoom setzt meiner Meinung nach branchenweit neue Maßstäbe und bietet ein Produkt, das nicht nur mindestens so sicher ist wie die Produkte von Wettbewerbern, sondern außerdem die vorhandenen Sicherheitsmechanismen so einsetzt, dass weder Funktionsumfang noch Benutzerfreundlichkeit leiden.“
Jenseits der lauten Debatte – 7 Gründe, warum es sicher ist, Zoom zu verwenden
von Rowan Trollope
„Die heutigen Plattformen zur Zusammenarbeit verlangen ein Höchstmaß an Sicherheit. Zoom hat für seine einfach zu bedienende Plattform ein starkes Set an erweiterten Sicherheitsfunktionen entwickelt, mit denen sich jeder Anwender sicher und wohl fühlen sollte.“
Roopam Jain, Senior Director – ICT
„Zoom hat großartige Arbeit geleistet, um das am einfachsten zu bedienende Produkt der Branche zu entwickeln und gleichzeitig die beste Sicherheit der Branche zu gewährleisten. Zoom-Kunden können davon ausgehen, dass sie weiterhin mit Zoom unterwegs sein können und ihre Daten nicht gefährdet werden, da Zoom Sicherheit ernst nimmt.“
Zeus Kerravala, Gründer und Hauptanalyst bei ZK Research
Next
Trust Center-Ressourcen
Besuchen Sie unsere
Trust Center-Ressourcen
, um weitere Informationen zu den Themen Sicherheit, Datenschutz, Recht und Gesetzeskonformität sowie Vertrauen und Sicherheit von Zoom zu finden.
Sicherheitsteam kontaktieren
Crypto Ops kontaktieren
Cookie Preference Center
Cookies and other similar technologies (“Cookies”) are important to the proper functioning of a site and to provide visitors with a seamless and customized experience.  Zoom uses Cookies to enable you to use our site. We also use cookies to enable you to personalize your use of our site, to provide you enhanced functionality and to continuously improve the performance of our site. If you have Targeting cookies enabled below and depending on your account type or login state, we may allow third-party advertisers to show you advertising relevant to you on our website or products, using their Cookies on our site.
You can accept or decline all but Strictly Necessary Cookies, or customize your cookie settings below. You can change your cookie settings at any time. Some Strictly Necessary Cookies may transfer personal data to the United States.  To learn more about how Zoom processes personal data, please visit our
privacy statement
.
For California Residents, you may exercise your right to “Opt-Out of the Sale of Personal Information” by toggling the button labeled “Targeting” below to off.
More information
Accept All Cookies
Manage Consent Preferences
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to track your usage of our website and, depending on their policies, may combine that information with other information to show you relevant advertisements on our site and other sites. If you do not allow these cookies, you will not see personalized advertising on Zoom’s website or products.
Cookies Details‎
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and customization. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Cookies Details‎
Always Active
These cookies are strictly necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Performance Cookies
Vendor Search
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
View Cookies
Name
cookie name
Zoom uses cookies and similar technologies as strictly necessary to make our site work. We and our partners would also like to set additional cookies to analyze your use of our site, to personalize and enhance your visit to our site and to show you more relevant content and advertising.  These will be set only if you accept.
You can always review and change your cookie preferences through our cookie settings page.  For more information, please read our
Privacy Statement
.
Decline Cookies
Accept Cookies
Cookies Settings